//------------------------------//
// Urohringr// by Imploding Colon//------------------------------//

		//------------------------------//
		// A Time That Was Relevant		//------------------------------//

    “Ledo’s Pride to Mountain Fall Tower!” a frazzled stallion shouted into a soundstone while the bulkheads of a zeppelin gondola rattled all around him.  “Ledo’s Price to Mountain Fall Tower!  We’re losing altitude rapidly!”

    A console toward the starboard compartment caught flame.  Another pony shrieked, flinching away as flames leapt at his coat.  A tremor ran through the ship, finally causing the port side windows to buckle.  They exploded with a shower of glass, raining shards all across the cockpit and filling the interior with the blistering rush of frigid winds.

    “Ledo’s Pride to Mountain Fall Tower!  Please, respond!  We’re coming in too fast!  You need to clear the loading docks right away!  Do you copy?!”  The soundstone in the stallion’s grip went dim.  He grimaced and flung a sweaty look behind his shoulder.  “There’s no response!”

    A mare coughed from the billowing smoke inside.  She leaned against a bulkhead while clutching her bloodied shoulder.  “The communications array must be fried!  Whatever caused that explosion, it crippled us!”

    The stallion with the soundstone gazed down the smoke-filled corridor beyond the cockpit.  As the entire gondola leaned more and more precariously towards starboard, entire clusters of equine passengers clambered over a series of sealed doors.  Stallions grunted and strained with their hooves against the tight handles while mares watched on, holding their foals while shivering in abject terror.

    “Can we get the lateral doors to the manacraft to open?!” he asked.

    “Not with the central manacore of the ship offline!” the mare sputtered to respond.  “All of the conduits have been dead since that first explosion rocked us!”

    “Any idea how to get the doors open?”

    “I’m sorry!”  The mare grimaced as the ship buckled again.  High altitude winds pelted her face as she shouted into the bedlam, “Red Bolt was the engineer, and we lost her in the blast!”

    “How many other ponies are dead?!”

    “I-I haven’t had a chance to keep count!”

    The stallion gritted his teeth and shouted across the compartment.  “Does anypony still alive have any engineering skills whatsoever?!”

    Several citizens shivered in fright.  Two ponies tending to a wounded mare merely glanced up.  At last, a zebra galloped into view, panting frantically.

    “I know a thing or two!” he shouted, then gulped.  “This is my sixth month serving on board Ledo’s Pride!”

    “What’s your name?!” the stallion asked.

    “Pilate.”

    “Aren’t you in charge of Navigations?”

    Another window shattered, causing several ponies to flinch and a few more to shriek.  Pilate gritted his teeth, leaning against a bulkhead while his blue eyes glared across the compartment.  “You couldn’t have picked a less fortuitous time to push the issue!  I’ve witnessed many a pony at work in more zeppelins than you can count!  So tell me what you need me to do!”

    “We’re descending fast!” the stallion exclaimed.  Behind him, the windows showed nothing but mountains and forest canopies.  “There are entire families on board this ship, and the doors to the escape manacraft are jammed shut!  If you can restore energy to the manaconduits, we might be able to get most of the ponies out of here!”

    Pilate braced himself as another tremor rattled through the gondola.  “If what caused the explosion is what I think it is, then there’ll be barely enough mana left in the core to allow access to one of the ships!”

    “Good enough!”

    “But I can’t promise there’ll be any energy left to even us out!  Even if I recalibrated it from the start!”

    “I know,” the stallion said.

    Pilate blinked.  He clenched his jaw, and after a deep breath uttered, “I’m going to need help!”

    “I’m with you!” the stallion said, shoving the sound stone into the mare’s grasp.  “Keep trying to contact the Tower at Mountain Fall!  If we can get through to them, they might just be able to spare a manaship in time to save us!”

    “Right…”

    “When those doors open, make sure as many ponies get off this zeppelin as possible!”  The stallion followed Pilate as they both rushed towards a series of vertical crawl spaces leading down to the lower decks.  “Wait for the doors, not for us, do you hear me?!”

    “Loud and clear!”

    The panicked voices of the ponies up above dwindled, devoured by the noise of hissing steam and rattling bulkheads as the two stallions rapidly descended into the heart of the ship.  Pilate was several ladder rungs below the other equine, moving at a brisk pace.  He was a deck away from his destination when the entire ship shook.  The ladder bent down its middle, and both ponies felt their bodies swaying as the zeppelin’s center of gravity shifted.

    “Nnngh!”  The stallion above grimaced, his hooves slipping.  “Whoah-Aaaaugh!”  He plummeted towards a mesh of metal pipes below.

    A strong hoof clasped over his.  Pilate dangled from one forelimb as he shot his other out, saving the stallion at the last second.  The two swung like pendulums from a single ladder rung.  Pilate sweated, glancing out the corner of his eye as sweat ran down his muzzle.  Through a tiny porthole, he could see the horizon pivoting about forty-five degrees.  The faint blur of buildings and mountains spun in and out of view.

    “Just swing me!  I can latch on--”

    Pilate was way ahead of him.  “Hnnnngh!”  With tight muscles, the zebra tossed the stallion’s weight towards the lower ladder.  The pony caught on, took a deep breath, and shimmied down the last length.  “I owe you one!”

    “Nopony owes me anything yet…”  Pilate hopped down beside him.  Steambolts popped loose from a console beside him and the air in the chamber heated up. “Move!  Move!”

    Both stallions galloped down a crooked passageway while backup steam tanks buckled behind them.  Once they made it past a compartment door, they brushed aside the half-burnt corpse of a crew member and both worked together to slam a thick metal door shut.  They succeeded in sealing it on their end before the tanks on the other side ruptured, filling the chamber with scalding hot steam.

    “We can’t have much time,” the stallion said.  “We could be hitting the ground at any moment.”

    “Fortunately I know where to go.”

    “Good, because I’m lost down here.”

    “Follow me.”  Pilate galloped down the cramped passageway.

    After a few paces, it opened up into a wide chamber lit with hazy blue light.  Pilate immediately galloped up to a wall lined with five translucent compartments.  He squinted, staring into the multiple furnaces.  “This isn’t good.”

    “Lay it on me.”

    “Only two of the compartments contain manaflame.  We’ve loss too much energy.  I’m not sure we have enough to reignite the manaconduits to the upper gondola’s doors.”

    “Can you think of something?” the stallion stammered.  “Anything?!”

    Pilate rubbed his chin, his blue eyes darting left and right in thought.  He stood calmly while the ship groaned metallically around him.  At last, the zebra gritted his teeth and muttered, “It would require opening the lateral vents to the combustible particulates…”

    “Come again?”

    Pilate pointed to black tanks located on either side of the five furnaces.  “Each Class Three Ledomaritan Engine is equipped with pressurized supplies of arcane powder that is used to ignite the core for acceleration.  Typically, the material is channeled into the furnace in tiny bursts.  But, with the manaflame in such short supply, we could dump all of the particulates into the remaining lit cores and ignite a spark large enough to--”

    “You don’t have to go all encyclopedia on me!” the stallion shouted.  “Will it work?”

    “It will work more than it will not work!” Pilate said, wincing.

    “Good enough!  Tell me what to do!”

    “You see that lever over there?  Beneath the black tank?”

    “Yes…”

    “Go and grab it in both hooves!  Don’t pull until I tell you to!”

    The stallion odded and ran to his position.

    In the meantime, Pilate rushed forward, turned three dials, spun a pair of valves, and then galloped over to a lever at the black tank on the other side.  He gripped it and looked to where his colleague was standing.  “We pull at the same time.  Keep an eye on the furnaces.  If this works, the flame in the two chambers will spread to all five.  Once they’re uniformly lit up, we have to push the two levers in the middle, and it’ll send a brief but functional mana burst throughout the ship’s manaconduits.  You got that?”

    “Yeah!  Sure thing!”

    “Okay!” Pilate nodded.  “With me!”  He took a deep breath.  “Three… two… one… pull!”

    Both ponies pulled the levers as one.  A low hiss emanated from the engine, and then--no less than twenty seconds later--all five furnaces lit up with bright blue light.

    “Whoah!”  The stallion jolted, then smirk.  “Hey!  Just like you said!”  He panted and glanced over with a sweaty smile.  “Fine work!”

    Pilate could barely make out his words from a loud groaning sound filling the room.  The zebra’s ears twitched, and he turned left to see a massive dent rupturing across the bulkheads of the room.  He shouted, “Grab onto something--”

    CRACK!  The portside wall tore completely off from the rest of the hull.  Bright sunlight flooded the compartment, and a gust of cold wind fountained through the exposed interior.  The ship reeled from the decompression, tilting hard to port.  Pilate was already grasping a metal bar.  The other stallion…

    “Nnngh--Guh!”  He somersaulted, toppled, and slid across the floor towards the gaping hole.  His limbs fumbled vainly for a hoofhold.  Only when his body flew backwards did he begin to shriek, but even that was cut savagely short when his skull made contact with a dangling bulkhead.  There was a spray of red mist, and then his body darted away, disappearing into the yawning countryside below.

    Pilate hissed in strain, clutching desperately to the metal bar.  He wrenched his eyes away from the sight of the Ledomaritan landscape below.

    All five furnaces were churning brightly with vibrant blue energy.

    He felt the ship tearing apart above and around him.  As the wind pelted his face and mane, he saw the countryside looming closer and closer beyond the ruptured hull.  With a determined breath, he swung his body back, planted his lower legs against the nearest wall, and bucked with all his might.

    “Hnnngh!”

    Pilate slid across the careening floor.  His body shifted towards the gaping hole along the portside, but his forelimbs flew forward just in time to grasp the twin levers beneath the centermost mana furnace.  Dangling loosely, he swung his lower body forward, braced himself against the engine wall, and pulled his lower body down.

    Both levers swung with him.  Not long after, the lights of the damaged engine room flickered briefly to life.

    Pilate tilted his head up, mouth agape as he listened to the hum of mana being distributed throughout the whole zeppelin.

    Just then, there was another shake.  A console somewhere a deck above must have exploded.  Flames erupted just outside the hole, and the ship was thrown so that it tilted the opposite way and towards starboard.

    “Haaaugh!”  Pilate felt himself thrown against a wall of sparking instruments.   He winced, sprawling about as he struggled to find balance.  Dazedly, he looked up.

    Blue sky loomed beyond the gaping hole.  After two streams of black smoke wafted by, he saw the glint of light off a manaship’s hull as it unclamped from the zeppelin’s gondola.  The escape craft evened out, and Pilate’s quivering eyes could see no less than two dozen pony shapes seated safely on the outer deck.

    A breath escaped him, and the zebra smiled.  “Blessed Spark,” he murmured with quivering lips.

    There was a groaning sound in front of him.

    Pilate turned to see.

    The five furnaces were burning brighter than the sun.  Their glass encasements had begun to fracture.

    The zebra’s ears folded atop his head.  He flinched--as if to turn away.

    Kapow!  The centermost furnace exploded, and vaporous streams of manaflame flew across the chamber.  All at once, he saw a spectacular flash of blue.

    And then he saw nothing.

    ”Aaaaaugh!”  Pilate curled up against wet grass in the drizzle of cold rain.  Her clamped a pair of hooves over his eyes as he shivered, hyperventilated.  “Nnnngh… mmmm… Bellesmith… beloved…?”  He lowered his hooves and peered across the darkness.  “Bellesmith… where are you?”

    There was a hushed roar in the distance, like thunder.  It was rushing towards him quickly.

    “Beloved?”  He tried standing up, but his legs felt weak… numb.  Nervously, he furrowed his metal brow and fired a pulse of mana into O.A.S.I.S.  The sphere around his neck did a scan of his immediate area.

    Hard vertical lines coalesced, showing waving grass and the streaking facsimile of rain drops. In the center of the ebony void, a soft muzzle formed, along with flowing, velvety soft bangs and a stubby horn.

    Pilate gulped.  “Belle… what’s going on?  Is everything alright?”

    Line by line, her face faded into blackness.  So, in desperation, Pilate activated O.A.S.I.S. again.  Her face drifted back into existence, only it was different now.  The lines were jagged, portraying a haggard face, a single surviving eye, and a long horn broken down the middle.  The thunder had arrived in all its clarity now, full of screams and the anguished death rattles of ponies.  The streaking rain gave way to the monochromatic tongues of flame as a savage hoof reached across the blackness and strangled Pilate’s throat.

    “Snkkkkt--Grkkk!”

    ”You may not be able to see what she does, zebra,” he sneered, smelling of blood and ashes.  ”But I’ll make sure you hear the child’s every scream.”  There was a metallic scraping sound, punctuated by Kera’s shrill shrieks.



    Pilate sat straight up, drenched in cold sweat.

    Darkness.

    He gritted his teeth and felt all around.  The Noble Jury’s infirmary bed was a mess of tangled sheets and loose bandages.  A bitter chill hung in the air of the room, and the bulkheads of the place hummed with the grace of puttering engines.

    Darkness.

    It took a full five minutes for Pilate’s heartbeat to slow to a steady pace.  He sat on the edge of his bed, feeling as the blood rushed back to his limbs.  Nervously, he twitched his about.  The silence was nauseating.

    “H-hello…?”

    Nothing.

    “Hello?!”

    No reply.

    Taking a deep breath, he reached forward, feeling around with bruised forelimbs.  His weight shifted forward, and he landed on the floor.  The stallion winced in pain, but he swiftly pushed himself up into a standing position.  This was no easy task; he had been bedridden for as long as he could remember.  Days… weeks… months--he wasn’t sure any longer.  Feeling his way across the miniscule compartment, he reveled in the sensory information: rivets and bolts brushing across his hooves.

    He could at least assume he was no longer dreaming.  It was at least cold enough to be reality.

    “Hello?”  This time, his voice echoed, for he had shuffled out into the long slender hallway of the ship’s middle floor.  He tilted his head to the left, facing what he knew to be the direction that the mess hall was in.  “Ebon?”

    Silence.

    He gulped and tilted his head to the right, facing down the corridor where the six sleeping quarters lay across from one another.  “Eagle Eye?  Miss Props?”  He hesitated slightly.  “Belle?”

    More silence.  The hum of the ship had a haunting quality to it.

    Pilate bit his lip.  He stood straight up, wincing from the ache of his stiff muscles.  He brought a hoof up to the metal plate along his forehead--now a dull plank of useless runes.  Stifling a sigh, he nonetheless trotted forward, towards what he judged to be the bow of the ship.  As he shuffled along, his hooves felt the seams in the floor which denoted the three sets of parallel doors lying across from one another.  He lingered at the second set of doorframes, tilting his head towards the ship’s port side.

    He heard nothing--certainly not the chipper voice of a young filly.

    In a melancholic gait, he shuffled along.  At last, he came upon the vertical crawlspace located towards the front of the ship.  He was instantly pelted with a rush of cold air.  Tilting his head up, he winced against the bitter chill and murmured, “Mr. Floydien?  Rainbow Dash?  Is… is anypony there?”

    Silence.

    With a daunting breath, he stretched his hooves out, feeling around the portside.  He finally made contact with the rung of a metal ladder.  With relief, he slumped towards it… and his lower body gave way.

    “Gaah!” Pilate clung to the ladder, dangling suddenly.  He had misjudged how close the gap in the floor was.  Now, an entire lower deck loomed below him.  Regaining his balance, he gripped the ladder rungs with all four limbs and began a slow climb.  His body shivered the more he ascended.  Once he reached the cockpit at the very top, he understood why.

    It was cold.  It was beyond cold.  The air hissed with a bone-chilling wind, as if it was flurrying in from all directions.  With chattering teeth, Pilate pulled himself onto the floor and rolled aside.  Once his flank bumped into an instrument panel, he realized that the cockpit was empty.

    “Mr. Floydien…?”  He gasped.  “But… where… where could…?”

    At last, he heard something--voices from the top deck.  He turned towards them with twitching ears.

    “...been out for too long.  We should go search for her.”

    “How?  None of us have wings.  Maybe Roarke could have cooked up something with jet fuel but… well… we all know how that ended up.”

    “Uhhh… actually, no we don’t.”

    “Well, most of us, Ebon.”

    “You and Floydien saw what went down, EE.  Didn’t you?”

    “All I know is what Rainbow Dash told us.”

    “Heh… like that’s really been much to stand by lately.”

    “Ebon…”

    “I mean it!  Ever since we crossed the frozen waters, she’s been a regular Rainbow Dull!”

    “Does the sailboat boomer ever known when to shut his teeth sheathe?  Floydien’s trying to keep an eye out!”

    “And I’m telling you, she’s been gone for too long!  Something’s not right!”

    “Just let her do her thing.  You heard what Props said the other day.  This is the only way we can restore the ship’s dormant heating system without sacrificing a chunk of skystone!”

    “Well, I’d be down for that.  Wouldn’t mind cooking you guys up something warm for a change.  It’ll keep Josho off my flank, that’s for sure.”

    “Fat boomer was never on board the sailboat to begin with.”

    “Oh, go ride a bike, you oversized space elk.  It was just a figure of speech.  Shouldn’t be an alien concept to the likes of you.”

    “Can we all just hush up and keep scanning the horizon, please?”

    “What’s going on?” Pilate asked, shivering against the wind.  “Where’s Rainbow Dash?”

    Hooves shuffled against the top deck.

    “Whoah!  Look at those stripes!  They’re practically blue!”

    “Pilate!  For Spark’s sake, pal…”  A soft set of hooves scampered over.  Eagle Eye rubbed the zebra’s shoulders.  Pilate could feel long, woolie sleeves dangling around the ends of the young stallion’s fetlocks.  “You totally shouldn’t be up here!  Not until I’ve stitched you something too!”

    “But… but…”

    “I’m getting to you, I promise!  It’s just that… well… Rainbow’s took a heck of a lot longer.  After all, she’s flying right into the elements for what Props asked for and--”

    “EE!  For the love of apricots!  He’s in no condition to be up here!”

    “Sailboater is right.  Lavender, make with the whisk-whisk. Striped boomer has no business being blue boomer, yes yes?”

    “But…”  Pilate stammered, “Is everything alright?  At least tell me why we’re stalled like this.”

    Eagle Eye was already ushering Pilate back into the cockpit.  “You can tell that we’re stalled?”

    Pilate sighed.  “There’s nopony piloting the ship, Eagle Eye.  And unless Mr. Floydien’s Nancy Jane has acquired sentience--”  He suddenly gasped, levitating.

    Eagle Eye grunted a bit with the effort of floating the zebra down the crawlspace as he climbed the ladder after him.   “It’s… nngh… simple.  Rainbow Dash is trying to get something for Props to use in heating the ship back up.  After all, it’s been super cold, and it’s only going to get colder as we cross the Frozen Sea!”

    “Eagle Eye…”

    “And Spark knows how far the thermometer is going to drop once we get to that nasty Strip of Flurries place.”  Eagle Eye and Pilate touched down upon the middle deck again.  “Erm… can you call the ‘Strip of Flurries’ a place, really?”

    “Eagle Eye, I’ve been in extreme situations before.  I don’t need--where are you taking me?”

    “Some of your bandages fell off.  But no matter.”  Eagle Eye led the weak zebra back to the infirmary.  Gently, he pushed the stallion back onto the bed and started reapplying strips of gauze to Pilate’s exposed limbs.  “You’ll be better in no time.  Well, mostly better.”

    “I can’t stay in here forever, Eagle Eye.”

    “Pffft.  Well of course not, silly zebra. But we want you to get healed, y’know?  You’ve still got a lot of nasty bruises and--”

    “At least let me go back to the navigation room below.  Rainbow Dash shouldn’t feel like she doesn’t have a guide.”

    Silence.  And then:  “Until Belle whips up a second O.A.S.I.S., Pilate, I really don’t th-think you should be straining yourself.”

    The zebra bit his lip.

    “It’s all gonna be okay.  R-really!  Rainbow will be back soon and Ebon will make us all a congratulatory meal!  Even th-though he’s having to ration things… pr-pretty paper thin.”  A gulping sound.  “And I’m at least certain Rainbow Dash will make it back… pr-probably…”

    Pilate winced.  “What… what is it that’s gotten her in so much peril?”

    “Hey, your guess is as good as mine.”  Shuffling hooves.  Eagle’s voice drew away.  “With half the stuff Props has been cracking up lately, I’m scared to ask.  But… hey!  She’s Rainbow!  And… we c-can totally count on her, right?”

    Silence.

    “Right.  Uhm… I gotta go.  They need my eyes.  Erm… not that… my eyes are all that spectacular.  I mean… they’re just eyes... and… uhmm… ennnnghhh… yeah.  See ya later… or hear ya later…”

    “Eagle Eye, it’s not that I’m worried, it’s just…”  Pilate stopped in mid speech.

    The silence in the room was permeating.  He was alone.

    He bit his lip.  With a sigh, he deflated like a flower and curled up into the bedsheets.  “I j-just want to be useful…”  He took a deep breath.  In the deep vestiges of darkness, he thought he could make out waving lines… like dancing flames.  There was nothing to close his eyes to, so he instead concentrated on steady breaths, stroking the mattress beneath him with a hoof, imagining it was a warm cheek instead.

		//------------------------------//
		// Rainbow Over the Frozen Sea		//------------------------------//

	A bright white sun glistened off wave after bitter cold wave.  The Frozen Sea stretched towards every horizon without blemish, save for one spot.  A large chunk of ice floated by its lonesome in the middle of the bobbing waters.  The miniature iceberg was a long, slender thing, about seven feet across and over ninety feet in length.  It resembled a great frozen coffin, in a way, and the falling flakes of snow had formed a thin carpet of powdery frost across its otherwise translucent surfaces.

	There was a brief flurry of wind, and some of the downy snow blew away, revealing a dull form lying darkly beneath the surface of the frozen slab.  The shard rocked a bit, its sides bobbing in the water.  Not long after, a forelimb reached down across the powdery snow.  A blue hoof slid free from a length sleeve of dark brown leather, then proceeded to brush the snow off the ice in sweeping motions.  The exposed surface of the shard reflected a hooded figure with twitching ears.

	With a deep breath, Rainbow Dash narrowed her goggled eyes, then swept more of the powder loose with her hoof.  The dark form exposed beneath the slab's exterior spread out underneath her, occupying the bulk of the floating block of ice.  Rainbow Dash backtrotted, clad in a tanned leather coat that fitted her form tightly, with a pair of holes allowing her blue wings to stick through.

	Shuffling and shuffling, Rainbow Dash brushed more of the snow off the slab's surface, utilizing her spectral tail hairs.  At last, she stumbled upon something of interest.  A few feet within the slab, she saw a gigantic row of teeth, frozen in an immortal snarl.  Not that far from this was a slender snout, at the end of which was attached a slender probiscus, coiled in a tight spiral from years of freezing temperatures and rigor mortis.  At the end of this fleshy attachment was a dark, bulbous structure... and it was glowing red, albeit dimly.

	Rainbow Dash took a deep breath.  At last, she lowered her hood, exposing her ears and billowing prismatic mane to the Frozen Sea's bitter winds.  Adjusting the lenses of her goggles, she reached back to a pair of tan leather saddlebags built into the material of her coat.  Opening one flap, she pulled out a metal tool of Props' design.  There was a hoof-shaped knob at one end, a glowing crystal in the center, and a sharp golden needle at the opposite point.

	Rainbow stood squarely over the dark figure beneath the ice.  With careful hooves, she tweaked and turned the knob of the instrument before flipping a tiny switch on its side.  The crystal started flickering as a high pitched whine filled the air.  Rainbow next unbuttoned a leather flap just beneath the collar of her coat.  Her ruby pendant was exposed from around her neck.  This, she rubbed with gentle motions of her hoof, summoning a ruby glow from within.  The unworldly light of her element illuminated the depths of the translucent ice block beneath her.  She zeroed her sights in on the spot where the frozen, fleshy probiscus attached to the dimly glowing gland beneath her, and she aimed her instrument's golden needle point at the stretch of ice directly above it.

	Bracing herself with her lower legs, Rainbow squatted low and turned the knob of her instrument, activating it.

	Vhrrrrrr!  The golden tip sparkled brightly, rivaling the sun's glow.  Tinting her goggles, Rainbow Dash leaned down and sliced deep into the ice.  Steam rose up around her in rapid grand columns, turning to frost downwind behind her.  Scrkkkk!  With practiced precision, Rainbow Dash cut a deep square in the ice, large enough to frame the target that awaited her underneath.

	She was two-thirds of the way through her task when she heard a sudden splash of water.

	Instantly, Rainbow Dash cut the instrument off and looked up.  With a blurred hoof, she reached up and untinted her goggles.

	Waves and waves surrounded her in the Frozen Sea.  There wasn't a single object to be found—not a solitary darting shape.  She did sense the slab weaving slightly, but even that came to a standstill—just like everything.

	Squinting, Rainbow Dash retinted her goggles and resumed her task.  It wasn't long before she had cut an entire square with the heated tool.  Once that was complete, she pulled the item back, reached into her opposite saddlebag, and produced what looked like a hollow cylinder lined with metal rods.  This she stood up in the center of the cut block and hammered it with a metal mallet until it was embedded deep into the slab.  A hole resided at the exposed end of the cylinder, and she stuck the golden tip of her heat tool into it.  Flipping another tiny switch, she spun the knob all the way.  The device hummed, its crystal core flashing brightly.

	Holding her breath, Rainbow Dash galloped away—careful not to slip on the aged ice.  Once she was at a twenty foot distance, she shielded her face with her wingfeathers and looked towards the far horizon.

	Wriiiiiiiii—Pow!  The instrument sent a single pullse into the cylinder.  There was a pulse of golden light, and less than two seconds later the sliced block had melted entirely.  A gust of hot steam flew skyward while the instrument and its glowing hot cylinder rattled to a stop in a sudden niche within the surface of the ice.

	Rainbow Dash trotted back over.  She slid on her knees and adjusted her goggles to examine the exposed chunk of ice.  Slimy scales with netrotic veins glistened in the sunlight, exposed for the first time in an unknowable amount of decades.  A fleshy snout coiled tightly, connecting to a bulbous gland of red flesh—like a giant cherry—that glowed with natural luminescence.  One or two jagged teeth from a monster's petrified jaws loomed below, with two-foot-long teeth glistening with slick condensation.

	The pegasus spent no time sight-seeing.  She slid the instrument and pocket away into separate saddlebags and reached into another pocket for her hatchet.  Just as she slid it out with a metallic chiiing, she heard another splash of water echoing her movements.  She froze, gazing up with inquisitive goggles.

	This time, she definitely caught sight of a stream of water rippling past the floating ice slab.  It sped up, slowed down, and then vanished completely.  Five seconds later, a deep pulse of red light rippled out from the depths just beneath the ice slab.

	Rainbow Dash hissed into gritting teeth.  Clutching the hatchet in the crook of her hoof, she stuck her upper body down into the evaporated gap and began slicing and chiseling away at the fleshy probiscus attached to the glowing gland.

	This went on for an agonizing two minutes, during which the waves picked up, forcing the slab to sway left and right dramatically.  The red glow around the ice chunk itensified, strobing in alternate pulses than the dimness emanating from the gland tjat Rainbow was attempting to retrieve.

	Frustrated, Rainbow Dash resorted to biting her teeth onto the hatchet's handle and throwing her head down in jerky motions.  Grunting, she slashed and chopped away at the fleshy material attached to the petrified gland.  The scales split apart.  Ice water mixed with a pool of black blood and jaundice.  At last, she caused the large red thing to snap loose.  Immediately pocketing the hatchet, she reached two hooves down into the gross excavation and yanked loose the fleshy crimson sphere.  It was the size of four watermelons clumped together, and it was a tricky feat for the pegasus to even hold it.  Nevertheless, she gripped it in a pair of strong forelimbs.

	A victorious smile crossed her lips...

	Hressssshaaaa!  A mammoth pair of jaws burst up out of the Frozen Sea, smashing loose a chunk of the frozen slab to Rainbow's left.

	"Gaaaugh!"  She fell back, slamming onto her spine with a flap of her coat's leathery hood.

	The red pulsing gland slipped out of her grasp, careening towards the far end of the slab.

	Panting, Rainbow Dash rolled onto her chest, gripping onto the violently bobbing ice platform for dear life.  Her goggles glinted with red light, and she tilted her head up to see the elongated snout of an Ice Wyrm looming directly above, its nose fitted with a long cartiligenous cord, at the end of which dangled a naturally glowing lantern.  Fluids inside the bulbous sphere rotated until it faced Rainbow's sprawled figure.  Otherwise blind, the sea monster let loose a hideous roar and plunged its neck and jaws towards her.

	Squeaking, Rainbow Dash flapped her wings and slid forward on her chest like a penguin.  The monster's jaws came down behind her, forcibly smashing the slab in half and tilting her end of it down.  She grabbed her hatchet and slammed it into the ice, anchoring herself in place as her body suddenly dangled over the lurching jaws of the beast beneath her.

	Something with a dull glow was sliding towards her face.  Breathless, she looked up, and her goggles' lenses reflected the gland rushing back towards her across the snowy, upended surface of the slab.  In a single grunt, she bit her teeth over the hatchet's handle, bucked off the slab with her lower legs, backflipped, and flapped her wings.  She flew tup owards the gland, grabbed it in two forelimbs, and flapped her wings again—faster this time.

	Hresssssh! The monster lunged again, its teeth undulating outward in three rows surrounding a gummy maw.

	"Nnngh!"  Rainbow Dash spun around with the fleshy sphere in her grasp.  As the dead monster's twin lunged at her, she hovered in place, waited, and spun around with the hatchet gripped in her teeth.  With daredevilish timing, she was able to lacerate the monster's glowing lantern just as it swung at her.

	Black blood spilled through the snowy air.  The monster let loose a shriek, reared back, and cannonballed back into the icy currents.  It thrashed painfully about in the depths, its two-pronged tail sending sprays of ice water flying hundreds of feet into the air.

	Meanwhile, Rainbow Dash flew safely away.  Adjusting her grip of the gland, she spat the hatchet out and spun so that it landed safely in one of her coat's pockets.

	"Sorry, sister," she muttered over her shoulder as her fuzzy ears twitched from the wyrm's painful shrieks.  "This early bird's not interested in you."  Blue feathers spread, she climbed altitude and soared towards a gray speck along the southwest horizon, hovering alone above the endless cold waves.



	"Hey, grease monkette," Josho grumbled from where he sat on the corner of the Noble Jury's top deck, polishing a mana rifle.  "I've got news for you.  It's warmer outside than it is inside."

	"Like I told everypony two days ago—I'm working on it, Fatty Cathy!"  Props stuck her tongue out as she trudged from the stern's stairwell towards the cockpit on the other side.  "Besides, we all know we're waiting for Rainbow Dash to deliver the—whoahwhoahwhoah!"  She slid across the deck, only to be caught in Zaid's warm embrace.  She looked up, tilted her lopsided goggles out from across her eyes, and murmured, "Hiya, cheese grater."

	"Hi yourself, blondie," Zaid returned with a smirk.  He was clad in a woolie cloat and an even woolier hood.  "Is Mount Rushmoron here giving you a hard time?" he asked, nodding his head in Josho's direction.

	"We were supposed to have the heat back on by now," Josho droned, his lips curling as he pretended to be concentrated on the rifle in his grasp.  "As much as I've gotten used to our burgundy chef's soggy noddle hay soup, I'd rather heat myself up with something that doesn't give me the runs."

	"Ever thought of sitting on a rod of hot coals and melting all that greased fat out your ears?"  Zaid smirked.  "Now there's a way to keep warm."

	"Hardy har har.  You know, for a cultist, your humor ain't that heavenly."

	"The only paradise around here is standing upwind around you."  Zaid winked.  "How about giving blondie some slack?  She's only doing everything but walking outside the ship and pushing."

	"I swear..."  Josho grumbled as he trotted off with his gun.  "If I have to light a bonfire just to take a piss..."

	"Grrrr..."  Props pouted with red cheeks as she brushed past Zaid and approached the cockpit.  "You stallions are all alike—all bragging and yellow snow.  Hey handsome!"

	"Make it quick before boomer's spit freezes!"  Floydien snarled, fumbling with the loose wires of a partially dismantled intercom console inside the ship's cockpit.  "Did blonde boomer find the overloaded manaconduit?"

	"It wasn't on my end!"  Props exclaimed, then waved a charred black needle.  "Though I did find this outdated arcano-copper leyline expander!"  She squinted at the elk.  "What was it doing in the aft engine compartment?"

	"Balls if Floydien knows."  The elk's cloven hooves dug deeper and deeper into the technical intestines.  "Everything's been inside out before Floydien allowed boomers to co-boom Nancy Jane!"

	"But it wasn't supposed to be in that compartment to begin with, you silly robot goose!"  Props stamped her hoof.  "If this is how you dress up your beloved's womb, then maybe it explains why the intercom system and the air conditioning went down!"

	"Nonsense!  It's the weather, Floydien tells boomer!"  His red eyes narrowed between sparkling antlers.  "Nancy Jane's a summer creature.  She was born to be wet with glory sparkles."

	"How did you build her so flank-backwards anyways?!"

	"It was simple!  With lots of spit, affection, and anti stabby-stab!"  Floydien fidgeted.  "Also glimmer squirrel..."

	"Dag to the nabbit!"  Props shook in place. "I should be testing out our newly refined skystone array now!  Not dealing with all of this... nnngh... icky doo doo mush!  Why, I feel so angry I could say... I could just say..."

	"S'all good, Propsy." Zaid waved from afar, smirking.  "Let it out, girlllllllll."

	"Nnnnnnnnnnnnnngh!"  Props raised her hoof, raised it higher, then lightly kicked a lonely spot along the ship's railing.  "...peaches!"  She blinked, then gasped, falling down on her knees and nuzzling the part of the ship she had just kicked.  "I'm so sorry!  Oh, Nancy!  I am soooooo... sooooooo sorry..."  She bit her lip, sniffled, and glanced Floydien's way with sparkly blue eyes.  "I'll polish her up!  I'll make it better!  I'm so sorry for getting mean and nasty!"

	"Hrnnnnghhh..."  Floydien's hairy nostrils flared.  "Estrogenoboomerrrrr... Floydien swears, yes yes Floydien does..."

	At that moment, Eagle Eye climbed up from the vertical crawlspace below, levitating his sword and shield behind him.  "Okay, that does it."  He pulled a leather hood over his lavender face and muttered firmly, "It's been over eight hours.  I'm going after her."

	"After who?"  Props squeaked, blinking her eyes wide.  "Rainbow Dash?"

	"Well, if I wanted to go after Crimson at this point, I'd have a heck of a swim ahead of me."  Eagle Eye approached the edge of the ship.

	"Forgive me for being the proverbial idiot on the floating crystal ship here..."  Zaid raised his hoof.  "But are you trying to put me out of a job?"

	"Huh?"

	"How do you plan to go after Rainbow Dash, dude-gal-bro?"  Zaid's eyebrow lifted.  "You know how she goes on these trips as of late.  She's likely miles away... in the air.  How do you plan to go after her?  Did Franzington teach Propulsive Flatulence 101?"

	"After sailboat boomer's bean soup, what boomer can say?"

	"Hey, knock it off!"  Eagle frowned aside.  "I happen to like Ebon's beans... soup.  Bean soup."  His violet eyes crossed, and he shook his snout.  "Anyways, I was going to use this..."  He raised his shield.

	"Isn't it the wrong kind of weather for boogey boarding?  Besides, there isn't much of a surf."

	"It's simple!"  Eagle Eye said.  "I'll use my telekinesis to push myself along.  With a good coat of frost against the shield's surface, I can cover a lot of ground!"

	"You're really funny when you're serious."

	"For real!  I did this sort of stuff back in my training days!  Me and Phoenix and Zenith would race each other across the crystal lake by the barracks!"

	"Yeah?  And how much distance did you cover?"

	Eagle Eye fidgeted.  "A hundred meters."

	"You know what?  I stand corrected."  Zaid stepped aside and gestured towards the wide, glittering ocean.  "Take a dip, gurl."

	"Well, I don't see any of you ponies coming up with bright ideas!"

	"I take offense to that, sir," Zaid frowned.  "My village was raided by a marauding gang of bright ideas when I was just a colt!"

	"All of this floating around isn't doing any good!  If Roarke was here, we'd have figured out a way to send another flier out there along with Rainbow Dash!"

	"Yes, well, since she spontaneously decided to leave us, we've had to make do with a lot less sexiness!"  Zaid turned and waved at Props.  "No offense."

	"It's okay.  Besides, that's Floydien's job."

	A loud electrical buzz sparked from the cockpit, and the elk grunted, "Deep puss!  Grnngh!  Biscuit eating estrus fridge!"

	Props sighed dreamily, fanning herself.  "Nothing short of poetry..."

	"Well, we've gotta do something!"  Eagle Eye cackled.  "Turn the ship about!  Follow her last known coordinates!"

	"Staying here is the smartest thing," Props said, blinking at both stallions.  "And we all know it."

	"I dunno about you, but I'm running out of patience."  Eagle Eye folded his forelimbs.  "Rainbow had better have a sweet excuse for why she's been gone for so long!"

	"I dunno about sweet—but how's 'juicy' for a twist?"

	Phwomp!  A large, wet sack of flesh landed on the deck in front of Eagle Eye.  He and Props jumped back, gasping.  The large gland bled into a shallow pool, its organic core pulsating with dull crimson light.

	"Play ball!" Zaid quipped.

	Rainbow landed a few feet away, shaking like a feline as she tossed all the loose flecks of snow from her leather coat.  "Nnnngh... Can't believe I carried that thing for over an hour.  Ever wondered what it's like to share a stagecoach with a skunk that's eaten twenty whole onions?"  She shivered.  "Luna poop, I don't even wanna finish that analogy..."

	"I can't believe you found another one!"  Props squealed, practically hugging the large fleshy sack.  "And it's so well-preserved, too!"  She glanced over, blinking.  "Did you chop it off a live one, this time?"

	"Heck, no.  You think I wanna become dinner before my time?"  Rainbow Dash lowered her hood and shook her mane loose.  "If I die that way, then I want ogres sipping my blood for an energy drink.  Trust me, I've brushed paths with way too many subterannean worms, eels, and tentacled... tentacles to ever wanna end up the lunch of one."

	"I do believe there is enough flame mucus inside this to make a new core for the Jury's mana-powered heat synthesizer!"

	"You sure there's enough?"  Rainbow Dash made a face.  "The thing's pretty darn dim."

	"To steal something that Ebony's been saying lately..."  Props gripped the slimy gland in one hoof and strained as she dragged it towards the rear stairwell.  "Nnnngh... 'I'll take what I can get.'"

	"Propsy, you can have it."  With a shiver, Eagle turned, faced Rainbow, and smiled.  "I knew you'd come back in one piece!"

	"Anypony ever tell you that your horn grows when you lie?"

	"Huh?"  The stallion blinked, then felt his forehead.

	"Nnnngh... Celestia, that's creepy."  Rainbow Dash turned towards the cockpit.  "It used to work on the bookworm too."

	"Hey, Rainbow, now that you're here, think you might pay a visit to the infirmary?" Zaid remarked, waving.

	"What for?"  Rainbow asked without looking.  "Is Pilate sick?"

	"Well, no..."  Zaid's eyes narrowed.  "But he could certainly use some company that isn't me and... well... me.  I hear too much of me can lead to gallstones."

	Rainbow Dash lingered above the crawlspace besides where Floydien was angrily fiddling with the intercom console.  At last, she took a deep breath and said, "Pilate needs his rest.  He doesn't need me disturbing him—or any other pony for that matter."

	"For real?"  Zaid blinked.  "We've been hovering over this ocean of lameness for nearly a week.  It's breaking our brain balls hard enough as it is—I fear for the zebra's pair."

	"Cute.  But he's been through crud and back.  Just let him and Belle be at peace while nothing's trying to kill us. Same goes for Kera."

	"Yeah, but Rainbow—"

	"Zaid, they're my friends," Rainbow said with a glare as she started to climb down.  "I think I know a bit more about them than you do."

	"Uhm..."  Eagle Eye darted forward.  "H-how about I clean that coat for you?"

	"No thanks..."

	"Or at least hang it up!  I... er... I-I know how much you hate the sight of leather, Rainbow.  While you're back on board, might as well get comfortable—"

	"I'm fine, EE."  Rainbow disappeared beyond view.  "Besides, I doubt Props has all she needs to warm us up with.  I'll likely be going back out within an hour."

	"Yeah, okay.  Just don't..."  Eagle tried to wave, but she was gone.  "Overdo it..."

	Silence.

	Zaid leaned in.  "You know, for being named after a rainbow, she's been a bit dull lately."

	"Hrmmph..."  Eagle Eye briefly frowned.  With a sigh, he ultimately spun around and trotted towards the distant stairwell.  "I'm starting to think that if she just put some copper lenses over her eyes, she'd be right at home where she's at lately."

	"Oh, please, don't get my hopes up."

	Bzzzzt!  "Motherspitter!"

		//------------------------------//
		// The Noble Jury Flies East		//------------------------------//

	Like a bronze and red cloud, the Noble Jury coasted over the glittery waves of the Frozen Sea.  Its reflection danced like a waving flag across the waters below.  Dull gray clouds hung over the east, shadowing the skystone vessel as it proceeded through the drifting curtains of frost.

	Far ahead, Rainbow Dash flew point, her leather coat hugging her body warmly.  Her goggled eyes scanned the east horizon as midday approached.

	There were no birds, no errant shapes along the horizon.  It had been several days since any member of the crew had seen another zeppelin.  The air of this place felt stagnant, thin, untouched.  It was a sensation Rainbow Dash hadn't felt in a long time.  She had to glance over her shoulder every now and then to remind herself she wasn't alone.  The mare sighed often.

	At some point, something caught Rainbow Dash's peripheral vision.  She glanced down, and she could have sworn she saw a dark mass swimming eastward beneath the currents, situated somewhere between herself and the Noble Jury.  Squinting, Rainbow Dash adjusted her goggles lenses.  She thought for a moment that she spotted a flicker of red light.

	She exhaled, and for the millionth time cold vapors emanated from her muzzle.  Glancing towards her left, she took a few minutes to squint at the northern horizon.  A thin dark layer of clouds constantly hovered just beyond the vanishing point of her vision.  She saw tiny flashes of light—even in the daytime.  There was no doubt that they were within screaming distance of vast skystone deposits.  And beyond that... an unapproachable convergence of atmosphere, energy, and firmaments.

	Rainbow's lungs quivered.  She looked straight ahead, clenching the jaws of her muzzle beneath her hood.

	There were times when she wished that some edges of the world were just as easy to scale as others.

	She flew ahead with a strong tail-wind, leading the Jury across the shifting, frozen wastes.



	Hours later, the group skirted what appeared to be a breakaway chunk of an ice cap.  A sudden armada of icebergs surged suddenly beneath the Jury.  Rainbow Dash ascended towards the clouds, and Floydien's ship slowly followed suit.  Rainbow was careful not to lead the ship to too high of an altitude; it was freezing enough as it was at this spot along the plane.

	After about two hours of passing over the shattered arctic shelf, Rainbow Dash signaled to the Jury and dipped down to inspect the icebergs closer.  The ship maintained its altitude while she descended, flying adjacent now to the sharp peaks of the bobbing islands.

	Her goggled eyes examined each chunk of petrified ice as she passed by.  Their surfaces looked like polished sapphires, with thin bridges that the orange glow of the setting sun could pierce through.  Occasionally, she would dip beneath a promontory or two, even going so far as to thread her way through a hole in one massive iceberg.

	At one point, she passed over a significantly large platform.  She couldn't help but slow her eastward movement a bit, admiring the hundreds of feet of rock-hard ice that had been floating in the same current for centuries.  If she squinted hard enough, she could make out pockets of translucent blue residing deep within the heart of the shelf.  A part of her wondered if she would able to bore her way into the iceberg and breathe the same air that the alicorns did.

	The ice bergs thinned a bit, denoting a current of warmer water drifting up from the south.  The air grew windier, and the snow was starting to pelt Rainbow's wing feathers.  Undaunted, she pulled her jacket's hood tighter and ascended, putting her tail once again to the setting sun.



	Night fell, though it was hard to tell.  For the second evening in a row, a neon green lightshow played overhead, cascading north where it melted into chaotic red streamers against the converging firmaments.  It felt like a Hearth's Warming pageant against the cosmos, and Rainbow Dash couldn't help but breathe warmer for a space in time.

	It didn't last long.

	Her wings were starting to grow stiff.  Rainbow wasn't certain if she could blame the cold or her reliance on the Noble Jury as of late.  Regardless, the mare kenw better than to push herself beyond her limits.  She flew back, gave Floydien a nod through the cockpit's dashboard, and touched down on the top deck.

	Standing there, she lowered her hood and tossed her mane loose.  Breathing evenly, she coiled her wings by her side and stood there for a while.  Her gaze tilted north, once again watching in mute wonder as the aurora of green bands ribboned out into red geysers, then disappeared into a pinpoint black void.

	For a moment there, it looked as if her lips were going to curve upwards.

	Suddenly, a pale glow overcame her. She actually gasped, flinching slightly.  She glanced down at her pendant.  The Element of Loyalty was resonating with sparkling energy.  The pegasus was confused at first, until she glanced up to see a full moon piercing the emerald light show.

	The pegasus' ears twitched... twitched again... then gradually folded over her heads.  Her lips quivered, and she clenched her eyes shut, taking a long and labored breath.  She trembled a bit; she only wished it was because of the snow.



	Eagle Eye yawned. With softly padding steps, he scaled the Noble Jury's stern stairwell, tightening the bands of his felt hoodie.  Coming out onto the top deck for a breather, he caught sight of Rainbow Dash—what's more, he caught sight of her in the spotlight of the lunar glow.

	Blinking, he tilted his violet eyes up.  As soon as he saw full moon, he gasped for joy.  Beaming, he galloped out onto the middle of the deck and froze in place, grinning at the pale glow illuminating Rainbow Dash.  Fidgeting, he swallowed hard and inhaled deeply to pronounce her name...

	But instead he lingered, blinking awkwardly.

	Rainbow Dash had just thrown her coat's hood back over her head.  As soon as the moon's glow was cut off from her pendant, the pale aura faded away, along with all the twinkling traces of enchanted light.  With sagging shoulders, Rainbow Dash marched coldly—limply—into the cockpit, where she slinked her quiet way down the passageway and into the dull heart of the airship.

	Eagle Eye's mouth hung open.  With sad, drooping ears, he glanced back up at the full moon, then at the space of the deck where Rainbow's body had previously occupied.  In a cold shudder, he plopped back on his haunches, numb to the core.
		//------------------------------//
		// Moon to Your Mother, Son		//------------------------------//

	"And all I'm saying is would it kill you to try seasoning something for once?" Josho asked.

	"Seasoning isn't the issue!" Ebon Mane grumbled from where he stirred a pot on the far side of the kitchen.  "I'm trying to ration all of our solid foods!  That's why I've cooked so much soup over the past few days!  We've got plenty of that to go around!"

	"Right.  And sprinkling a little bit of hay garlic over it would kill... who, exactly?"

	"You're not going to want seasoning unless you're able to eat a full plate of pasta or oats again, trust me!"  Ebon grumbled.  "You know, at least the other members of the crew understand the situation we're in, but you're the one who keeps going at my jugular."

	"But seriously, do you ever taste your own stuff, buddy?"

	"Yes!  As a matter of fact, all I do is taste!" Ebon rattled a ladle against the edge of the soup pot he was stirring in.  "I don't even get to nibble much these days!  I dunno—maybe it's a little thing called 'selflessness!'  I'd much rather you guys eat since I'm so darn worried about everypony starving!"

	"Easy for you to say.  I don't think I've ever seen you have a bite of your own stuff—like—ever."

	"Grrrghhh... You know what?  Since you're such an expert on the whole matter..."  Ebon turned, frowned, and shoved the ladle into Josho's chest.  "You make the soup, ya big talking sofa cushion!"

	"Oh come on, don't get all rotten princess on me.  That's Eagle's job."

	"And you pretend to be the expert on that too!  Well I've got news for you!"  Ebon stomped his hoof and shouted, "You're not!"

	"There isn't exactly a line for job applicants there, pal."

	"Nnnngh!"  Ebon tossed his hooves and stomped towards the stairwell.  "I'm going out!"

	"Out where?  There isn't much 'out' to be had," Josho said.

	"Yeah, cuz you keep filling up the darn airship with your fat!"

	"Good one there, slick."

	"Oh hush!"

	Once Ebon was gone, Josho sighed, rolled his eyes, and hesitantly approached the steaming pot of soup.  "Congratulations, old stallion," he muttered aloud.  "Tomorrow's breakfast holocaust is in your hooves now..."



	Ebon marched up the stairwell.  Near the entrance to the cold upper deck, he sat in place, shivering.  A burning frown ripped across his face, and with a snarl he bucked the doorframe several times.  "Nnngh!  Grghhh!  Hnnngh!"

	Slumping against the frame, he panted and panted, then gripped his skull with quivering hooves.

	"Help me, mother.  I'm going insane.  At this rate, I'm going to... going to..."

	"...I stitched her this really snazzy coat, Your Highness.  She really likes it.  Well... I can only assume she likes it, because she's used it constantly and hardly takes it off..."

	Ebon's ears twitched.  He turned, gazing down the open deck under moonlight.

	Flakes of snow fluttered past Eagle Eye's figure as he stood along the port side railing, staring up at the pale night sky.  A calm smile graced his lavender face, and he had his hoodie pulled down around his silken mane.

	"It's made out of leather and canvas seams.  Don't worry, your highness.  The leather didn't come from anything that... uh... speaks."  Eagle Eye gulped.  "I mean, I've kind of gathered from Rainbow Dash how Equestrians feel about that sort of thing.  I really didn't mean any offense, and as a matter of fact I was kind of frightened she wouldn't want the jacket, but it fits her wonderfully and she's used it to warm herself while scouting the Frozen Sea ahead of us.  So... seems to be win-win in the end.  I'm... kind of proud of the stitching job I did on it too, but I digress."

	Eyebrow raised, Ebon slowly trotted out of the stairwell and towards the stallion.  He weathered the chill of the high winds, instead focusing on the words coming from Eagle's muzzle as his breath vapors twinkled in the moonlight.

	"Rainbow Dash does so much to protect us and to see that we make it over this passage safely.  She's selfless that way.  But I think she's a little too selfless at times.  The poor mare has... so much weighing on her.  I mean, sure, she always has.  But a lot of really bad stuff has happened lately, and I think she feels super guilty for it.  This might be why she's distanced herself from her closest friends, including me... and n-now you.  Please, Your Highness, don't take it the wrong way.  She still loves you and everypony back in Equestria.  I'm certain of it."

	"Uhm..."  Ebon shuffled to a stop and politely cleared his throat.  "I.. I-I apologize for interrupting, but..."

	Eagle Eye turned and looked over his shoulder.  He smiled gently.  "Heya, Ebon.  Chilly night, isn't it?"

	"Oh, sure.  Makes you wonder why a stallion's standing out here on his lonesome... talking to the snow."  He squinted.  "Just... who are you talking to, anyways?"

	"Oh... uhm..."  Eagle Eye bit his lip and fidgeted where he stood.  "Princess Luna."

	"Really?"

	"Well... kind of, sort of."

	"Cuz I thought... well..."  Ebon glanced towards the crawlspace at the open cockpit.  "Don't you need the pendant around Rainbow's neck to open communication?"

	"I just figured that maybe there's enough enchantment in the moonlight itself for her to hear me, you know?"  Eagle Eye smiled softly.  "It's the first full moon in a month, after all."

	"Rainbow didn't let you get a word in when it was her turn to talk?"

	Eagle winced openly.

	With a blink, Ebon grimaced.  "She... she did talk with Luna, didn't she?"

	"I... I don't think so, Ebon."

	"But... but th-that's crazy!"  Ebon stammered, pretending to glare daggers through the top deck of the Jury.  "Doesn't she have tons of ponies waiting at home to hear what happens to her?!  They'll think that she's dead or something!"

	"Would that be any further from the truth?"

	Ebon opened his mouth, lingered, then sighed.  "Eagle Eye..."

	"I can't undo the decisions that Rainbow Dash makes—even the stupid ones."  Eagle Eye gazed back at the lunar glow in the sky.  "That's why I'm hoping there's a chance Luna can hear me enough as it is."

	Ebon shuffled towards him.  "That's... uh... that's kind of a stretch, don't you think?"

	"Mmmm... not really."  Eagle gazed at Ebon with a warm smile.  "Haven't you ever wanted to reach someone you care about so much that you'll say anything to them, even if you know they may never receive your words?"

	Ebon instantly paled.  His ears folded back as he hung his head.

	"Hey..."  Eagle placed a hoof on his shoulder.  "Don't look sad.  We've all been there."

	Ebon gulped, murmuring with a wilted voice, "Really...?"

	"Sure.  I'm willing to bet even Luna's been there too.  That's why I'm trying to get my words to her.  Who knows—maybe Rainbow's pendant being so close by will let her at least hear us, even if we can't hear her.  I'd rest better knowing she wasn't so worried about Rainbow's situation."

	"If she found out, wouldn't she have a reason to be?"

	"Not everything is horrible, Ebon," Eagle Eye said with a soft smile.  "You're here, aren't you?"

	"Uhhhh..."

	"Princess Luna, I want you to meet Ebon."  Eagle pulled Ebon closer with a side hug, smiling up at the moon.  "You've met him before, but not like this.  Ebon's my bestest best friend on the whole Jury—and in the whole world, for that matter!"

	Ebon blinked, his muzzle hanging open.  "Best... fr-friend?"  His burgundy cheeks reddened slightly.  "But I thought Josho—"

	"So now I have a stallion who's like a father to me, a mare who's like a mother to me, a mare who's like a sister..."  Eagle Eye winked aside.  "And a darn good cook who makes me smile and feel full."

	"Heh... eheheh..."  Ebon Mane nodded with an awkward smile.  "Yeah, I guess I do do that, don't I?"

	"Pssst..." Eagle leaned in, whispering.  "Don't tell me, tell her!"

	"Oh?  OH!  Ahem..."  Ebon shivered a bit.  Blaming it on the cold, he nevertheless leaned in and tilted his muzzle towards the moon.  "Uhhh... hello, Princess Looney."

	"Luna."

	"Right.  Luna.  Uhm... it's nice to speak with you again.  I dunno if you can really hear us like EE's saying, but the truth is he's totally right about Rainbow.  She could use some help.  I mean, we're her friends n'all, but I don't think she's going to listen to us much.  What she needs to hear from is you.  You're a piece of her home, and the thing that gives her the courage to keep flying."

	Eagle looked at Ebon.

	Ebon was shuddering.  He murmured, "We all feel lost from time to time, and it's easy to hide within ourselves.  But it's so much better being in the light, so long as we have the ability to seize it.  And you seem to harbor so much light, Your Highness.  Please... shine on Rainbow Dash.  She really needs to believe again.  Believe in what?  Well, everything, I guess.  Goddess knows she's given us so much to believe in.  Now it's her turn... you think?"

	Eagle Eye smiled and gazed up at the moon.  "My friend Ebon likes to write letters a lot, so forgive his wordiness."

	Ebon hissed, "Don't tell her that!"

	"Why not?" Eagle hissed back.  "It's not like letter-writing is illegal in Equestria!"

	"Neither of us know that!"

	"She's not going to behead you, Ebon.  You're safe," Eagle Eye winked, and the next part sort of trickled out.  "You're always safe."

	Ebon looked his way, or at least his head did.  His eyes suddenly had to avoid Eagle's.

	The unicorn shrugged it off, tilting his gaze back at the moon.

	Silence.

	"You gonna tell her anymore?" Ebon asked.

	"I dunno..."  Eagle Eye shifted on three legs, his left forelimb still resting on Ebon's shoulder.  "You can only say so much before talking a princess' head off."

	"Are you... an expert on princesses or something?"

	"Hardy har.  Been talking to Josho?"

	"Pfft.  Barely."

	"I know, right?"

	"I wonder what kind of desserts they serve in the palace where Luna lives."

	"Or the seamstresses she hires."

	"Seems too magical a home for a badflank pegasus like Rainbow."

	"I dunno..." Eagle Eye smiled.  "I think it just fits."

	Frost lingered between them, numbing their skin.  This might explain why Eagle didn't notice at first that Ebon was leaning his head against his shoulder.

	"Hmmm?"  Eagle glanced aside.  "You cold?"

	Ebon shivered and his teeth were chattering.  "No," he muttered.  "Not r-really..."

	Eagle merely nodded.  With a graceful smile, he pulsed a wave of mana into his horn, performing a basic warming spell.  A lavender aura bathed the two, and Ebon's shivers settled somewhat.  He didn't stop leaning against the stallion, though.

	Silence.

	"Princess Luna?"  Ebon murmured.  "You've got a darn pretty moon, girl."

	Eagle giggled vaporously into the night.
		//------------------------------//
		// Just a Test, She Said		//------------------------------//

	"The important thing right now is that you stay calm.  You're going to pull through this—I promise.  The best physicians of Mountain Fall are going to take care of you."

	"But I-I can't see!  I can h-hardly even feel!  That... that explosion killed me!  Blessed Spark, what have I done?!"

	"Shhhh... Easy there.  You've saved dozens of ponies—that's what you've done.  You're a very brave zebra, Mr..."

	"Pilate.  My n-name's Pilate.  Did... did I really save—?"

	"Hmmm... Yes.  Ponies on the ground spotted a hovercraft undocking from the main zeppelin just seconds before it crashed.  Entire families survived the final impact—and it's all thanks to you."

	"I just... I-I was just doing what I knew h-how to do.  I couldn't let everypony die.  I just c-couldn't..."

	"Well, you showed great tenacity and zeal, Mr. Pilate.  Stallions like you are rare among Ledo's ranks.  Don't give into dismay.  You're in one piece, and I'm going to make sure you're rewarded for the selflessness you've shown."

	"R-rewarded?  How c-can that be?  I can't see a single thing.  I'm useless..."

	"Not if I can help it.  Rest easy, and let your troubles slip away.  Soon you'll see again... and the first thing you'll notice is that hope is stronger than the darkness.  Of this, I assure you."

	"You... y-you have a beautiful voice.  What's your n-name?"

	"...Bellesmith.  Doctor Bellesmith, and I am proud to bring you back from the depths, Mr. Pilate."



	Pilate's eyes opened, and all he noticed was that the world beyond the shadows was slightly colder.  He sighed, sitting up... somewhere.  Feeling with his hooves, he realized he was still inside the infirmary.  How long had be been lying on that mattress with crumpled bedsheets?  Weeks?  Months?  Years?

	A warm voice trailed in his ears, threading apart with the grace of a warm, angelic tone that he had fallen in love with years ago.  In its absence, the bulkheads of the Noble Jury rattled with a cold, dull hum.

	The zebra hugged himself, rubbing his forelimbs and fetlocks together as a chill brought a chatter to his teeth.  With a sigh, he hung his head, ears folded to the sightless ceiling.

	Not long after, the entire ship shook.  He nearly fell off his bed from the sheer jolt that he was dealt.  Gasping slightly, he tilted his head up, blinking blindly to the oblivion.

	After a period of silence, the ship shook again.  Curious, Pilate slipped out from beneath the bedsheets, held his breath, and slinked like a striped serpent into the hallway directly outside.



	"Hey... uhm..."  Ebon Mane looked up from where a giant, pulsating red mass was stuffed into a metal basin in the center of the engine room.  The Frost Wyrm gland's bloody center had several wires running between it and a series of glowing orange coils situated along the far end of the chamber.  "With all this jostling around, do you we'll melt this ugly thing to goo?  I mean, not that I'm love with it or anything, but it'd be a shame for us to lose the ship's heat on account of a simple test."

	"Nnngh!"  Props kicked a console along the wall shut and leaned against an instrument panel, panting.  "The icky wicky thing's gonna run out of Frost Wyrm blood juice soon anyway!  Until Dashie somehow forages up another one, we're going to have to heat ourselves up with your hay noodle soup!"

	"Yeah.  About that."  Ebon winced.  "I can't be cooking that stuff forever.  Even without a Josho on board, we'll be running out by week's end."

	"Well, here's hoping the skystone will take us someplace quickly enough to compensate for the Joshozoid Mass!"  Props side-stepped towards a series of levers and yanked on them.  "Okay lemon spraaaaay... That should about do it."

	"What are the risks of failure?"

	"Uhm... just a little bit less than the risk of blowing up."

	"Buh?"

	"Time for the signal!"  Props motioned towards the stairwell beyond the stern-side door.  "Tell Floydien I'm counting down from sixty!"

	"Righto..."  Ebon galloped to the doorway and leaned his muzzle into the space beyond.  "Sixty seconds!"

	Halfway up the stairwell, Eagle Eye stood.  Upon hearing Ebon's shout, he tilted his head towards the top of the chamber above.  "Sixty seconds, guys!"

	At the mouth of the stairwell, standing in the bitter chill of the morning, Josho uttered loudly, "There's the signal for one minute countdown!"

	Rainbow Dash nodded.  Spinning in her coat, she flew towards the cockpit.  "Ya hear that?  Gotta be fifty seconds at this point."

	"Yes yes yes..."  Floydien turned several knobs while simultaneously firing energy bolts from his antlers into the cockpit controls.  "Floydien hopes Nancy Jane's been exercising secretly or else this is going to be a very short trip."

	A series of loud, heavy hoofsteps ended with Josho sliding to a stop inside the cockpit, panting.  "Better shut this dayum door, elkazord.  I'm waiting for Ebon to switch dinner meals at least once before I toss myself overboard to the Frost Wyrms."

	"For spit's sake, Nancy Jane could pay Frost Wyrms with fat boomer for a boost across the Sea."

	"Knock it off, guys," Rainbow Dash grunted.  On the way out the cockpit, she kicked a lever, causing a metal door to slide shut behind the elk and the obese unicorn.  "I'll be right outside to spot ya!"  She lowered her muzzle to shout through the remaining space in the shutting door.  "Josho, if worse comes to worse, you give the shout through the crawlspace for Props to turn the skystone off!"

	Thud!

	"She must think I'm denser than frozen cat poop."

	"Twenty seconds until glimmer spectacle," Floydien grumbled aloud, his red eyes spotting various dials needling their way to their highest energy readings.  "Blonde boomer is a smart boomer, but if she tears Nancy Jane to shreds—Floydien swears to pears..."

	"Hey... relax..."  Josho smirked with a calm expression.  "Of all the morons on board this ship, she's the one with the tightest grasp on what she's doing—"

	Vrmmmmmmmmmmmmmmmm—POWWWWWW!  The engines exploded into full power.  The skystone shard above the ship's gondola flashed like a second sun, sending sparkling reflections rivuleting across the Sea towards every horizon.  Burning forward in a red streak, the Noble Jury swiftly became a red splotch along the eastern sky, leaving a flabbergasted Rainbow Dash hovering by her lonesome.

	"Luna poop!"  Rainbow Dash's voice cracked.  Wincing, she flapped her wings and rocketed desperately after the runaway vessel.
		//------------------------------//
		// See the World, She Said		//------------------------------//

	The Noble Jury shot ahead like a fiery red cannon.  It took every ounce of Rainbow's strength to so much as keep the vessel within her line of sight.  She found herself naturally ascending, as if in expectation of the skystone ship somehow burning its way past the natural vanishing point.

	A pocket of violently displaced air rippled ahead of her, toying with her feathers and throwing her flight off balance.  Nevertheless, she glided east as speedily as her wings could afford her.

	The Noble Jury weaved left and right.  Rainbow judged that Floydien was attempting to create wind drag and slow the vessel's eastbound approach.  Still, it grew more and more distant, and Rainbow as at a loss to catch up.

	She was only just starting to panic when something truly drastic set in.  Without warning, the world around her spun.  Rainbow's startled mind attempted to explain what was going on:  a wind gust?  A tidal wave?  A stray comet hitting the ocean?

	Then, by the fourth blink, Rainbow Dash understood completely.  Her body jolted in mid-air, quivering uncontrollably.  Wave after wave of dizziness rippled through her being, the first time in several days.  Wincing, she slowed her flight into a casual drift, flapping her wings for the sole purpose of keeping aloft.  She winced, and her tearing eyes flickered yellow on red before flashing back to their normal ruby luster.

	"Never good t-timing... never g-good..."  She wheezed, voice cracking as she struggled to fly upright.  "Come on, keep it together.  K-keep it..."

	Her eyes rolled back.  With a wheezing exhale, her body went numb—as did her wings.  She plummeted towards the Frozen Sea below.



	"Spit!"  Floydien grunted, gripping the ship's controls with a pair of tight, cloven hooves.  "Spit spit spit spit spit!"

	"Care to put your brain where your muzzle is?!" Josho shouted, leaning against the edge of the cockpit for support.  "How do we stop this dayum thing?!"

	"Floydien has a good mind to throw fat boomer into the engine and blow a gasket!"

	"Cute."  Josho threw himself—grunting—against the floor and virtually stuck his head down the crawlspace.  "Hey!  [h]Heeeey!  Shut it off!  We're leaving Miss Paint Bucket in the dust!"

	Indecipherable shouts dripped down the rattling bulkheads.

	"I said!"  Josho frowned.  "Get that goggled brainazoid to cut the engines!  We'll end up in flames if we continue this interstellar loogey impersonation!"

	"Gnnngh!"  Eagle Eye stumbled into view two decks down.  His lavender face looked up.  "Old stallion!  Tell Rainbow Dash that we need another three minutes of flight before we can recalibrate the engines for the next test!"

	"Gonna be a little hard to do that, seeing as she checked out, sugar flanks!" Josho snarled back.

	Eagle Eye blinked.  His face paled.  "Oh cat nuggets!"  With a whimpering squeak, he scampered back the way he came, dove through the navigation room, and flung the heavy door back open to the engine compartment.  "Cut it off!  Cut it off!"

	"But... I-I gotta fix this thing!" Props stammered into the lavender pulse of the caged tome.

	Eagle Eye shouted, "Rainbow Dash is outside, remember?!  She'll be a pinprick on the horizon by now!"

	"Whoopsicles!"  Props grimaced, turning to face the array of sparkling cables fastened to an instrument panel.  "Uhhhhh... uhhhhh..."

	Ebon spoke up from the far side of the engine room.  "Whatever you do, Props, be delicate!"

	"I'll do a tea party later!  Dashie needs us!"  She pouted.  "Ohhhhhhhh—"  Lunging forward, the goggled mare bit onto one wire and yanked it loose.  There was a flash of mana, and the entire ship surged backwards, decelerating within an instant.  Props' body flew hard into Ebon Mane.  "Ooof!"

	"Daaah!"



	A pair of blue eyelids fluttered shut.

	A mane of prismatic hair billowed out from a leather coat's hood.

	The world toppled and spun while a glittering ocean of ice loomed ever closer.

	"Austraeoh..."

	"Mmmmmm..."  Rainbow's mouth stirred.  Her wings twitched, quivered.  Water enveloped the toppling world.

	"Austraeoh... when did you stop flying east?"

	With a gasp, Rainbow's eyes flew open.  Red and yellow colors flickered, then reflected frosty waves of water.

	Gritting her teeth, Rainbow fought against the dizziness, spread her wings wide, and caught air just seconds before she could plow into the currents of the Frozen Sea.  Her body pulled itself upright with a jolt, the tips of her hooves skimming the cold, cold waters.  She hissed through her teeth from the numbing sensation.  As her dizziness dissolved, she swore she saw a dark mass surging underwater along with her.  A pulse of light emanated from below, crimson and bright.  Before she could make out the texture of scales and massive fins, she had pulled up to a comfortable distance, flapping her wings until she was a stone's toss from the glittering waters.

	Panting, she hovered in place, her upper body slick with sweat beneath the tight contours of the leather coat.  She gulped and looked all around.

	The skies were clear.  She was the only winged thing within visual distance.

	Rotating about with a perpetual shiver, she finally saw the one speck that she was looking for.  The Noble Jury floated in a limp hover along the eastern horizon.

	Rainbow's body ached.  Nevertheless, with the faint traces of her chaotic illness lingering in her veins, she lurched her way through the arctic breeze and approached the stalled ship.



	Ebon, Eagle Eye, and Props galloped out of the stairwell.  Breathless, they spun about, scanning every horizon they could.  The cockpit door slid open, allowing Josho to stumble out and join them.

	"What in the McBuck Burger happened?!" Josho growled.

	"The engine worked!"  Props gulped.  "A little too well."

	"Dang it, lady, are you ever going to get that thing working properly?"

	"Don't be so hard on her, old stallion," Eagle Eye said, still worriedly squinting across the waves.  "She's kept us from plunging into the ocean time and time again."

	"I'd gladly take that at this rate—rather than drifting here forever and becoming sea serpent food!"

	"Yeah, well, if we need to appease the hungry monsters here, we know who to toss first!" Ebon grunted.

	"Ebon," Eagle sighed.  "Must you—"

	"I'm getting really sick of him spitting out mule muffins everytime he opens his fat muzzle!  Is it so easy to forget that we're making a team effort here?!"

	"The only reason I'm at the end of my rope is because I'm eating watered down vomit each evening for breakfast with nothing to shoot at!"

	"Would it at least kill you to turn your frustrations to something else?!"

	"Well, if I tried headbutting you, Sir Soups A Lot, I'd cause us all to starve, cuz you'd be sobbing it off like a pansy for a week!"

	"Josho—"

	"You really wanna push my buttons, don't you?!"

	"How about it, burgundy?!  Frying pans at thirty paces!"

	"Everypony, cut it out!"  Props stood between the stallions.  She hoisted her goggles up to her blonde bangs and panted.  "Look, I'm super, super sorries about the engine going all kersplodey.  Next time we test it, we should just keep everypony on board, that way I can calibrate for the resistance manifold and make sure that we can decelerate in the future because—"  She froze in mid-speech, blinking suddenly towards the western horizon.  "Oh lookie!  Dashie!"

	Thud!  Rainbow Dash's limp body plowed into Props.  Both mares went toppling across the deck.

	"Whoah!" Eagle Eye jumped in place.  "There she is!"

	"Propsy!" Ebon gasped.

	"Hold on..."  Josho trotted over and disentangled the two ponies with telekinesis.  "There.  Catch your breaths.  Breathe."

	"Nnnngh..."  Rainbow Dash curled up, coughing and sputtering as her muzzle twisted in dizzied pain.

	"Phweeeee..."  Props sat up, shaking the cobwebs out of her skull.  "Thank goodness I'm so plush or one of us would have broken something!"  She leaned over and shook Rainbow's shoulder.  "Hey Dash-Dash?  You okay?  Usually you bounce back up after plowing full force into another pony."

	"Guhhh... mmmff... I'm f-fine..."  Rainbow stood up on wobbling legs.

	"Eagle..."  Ebon leaned over, murmuring.  "It's acting up again..."

	"Yeah, I get it."  Eagle nodded, then trotted to Rainbow's side.  "Rainbow?  How bad is it this time?"

	"I said I'm fine," Rainbow grumbled.

	"Because there's room in the infirmary for another pony, I'm sure."  Eagle smiled and placed a hoof on the pegasus' shoulder.  "Lemme just walk you down there and—"

	"Don't you guys get a clue?!" Rainbow snapped, batting Eagle's hoof away and frowning.  "I said I'm fine so I'm fine!"  She hobbled forward.  "Besides, the ship's more important than me."

	Eagle Eye winced, biting his lip.  "Rainbow..."

	"Well?  How about it?"  Rainbow glared at Props as she trotted by.  "We learn anything?"

	"Uhhhhhhhhhh..." Props shifted uncomfortably.

	"You know what?  Forget it.  I'm sure you've got control of it."  Rainbow limped on towards the cockpit and shimmied her way down the crawlspace.  "I'm gonna go crash for a bit.  Knock on the doorframe to the observation room when you all are ready to give it another go."

	That said, the ponies were left alone on the top deck, fidgeting in the cold winds.

	Dead silent.
		//------------------------------//
		// Because We've Laughed Them All		//------------------------------//

	The dark interior of the Noble Jury shifted with the weight of the vessel's deceleration.

	A pair of chestnut brown eyes fluttered open to dim lantern light.

	Bellesmith sat up, her face blank.  After a few seconds, she blinked.  A sigh escaped her lips as she gazed down.

	Kera laid on her side amidst the blankets of the small cabin's cot.  Her eyelids were shut, just as still as the rest of her.  The tattooed filly's lungs rose and fell with tiny breaths.

	Belle bit her lip.  Leaning down, she nuzzled the child gently, careful not to disturb her slumber.  She remained their, her cheek resting against the back of the filly's mane.  Just as the mare's eyes began watering, she shuffled off the bed and stood on wobbling legs.  Her head turned towards a grimy mirror.  In the dim light, a lethargic reflection stared back.  A neck-length mane hung in tattered strings.  Belle brought her hoof up, running it through the frazzled mess.  A brush lay on the end-table, and for a brief moment she reached her forelimb towards it.  She froze, however, and stood limply in place.

	Seconds later, Belle shuffled towards the door to the cabin.  She rotated the valve and pushed the metal thing open.  Lingering in the doorframe, she paused, turned around, and gazed at Kera.  With a lasting breath, she limped out of the cabin altogether and shut the door just a crack behind her.



	With softly clanking hooves, Belle descended the ladder of the forward vertical crawlspace.  She came to a stop on the bottom deck, turning towards the bow.  She blinked.

	A canvas curtain hung across the entrance to the observation room, blotting out all light coming from Rainbow Dash's chosen sleeping quarters.

	Belle fidgeted, adjusting her weight from one pair of legs to the other.  At last, she reached a hoof up to knock on the doorframe.  She froze just inches from making a noise.  She hissed through clenched teeth, shuddering from head to tail.  With slumped shoulders, she lowered her hoof and backtrotted from the curtain.

	Eyes downcast, she turned around, looking at nothing in particular.

	That's how the mare discovered the door to the navigation room hanging ajar.

	With an eyebrow raised, Belle tilted her head to peer inside.  She reached forward, sliding the door open all the way with a slight creak.  Stepping inside, she was greeted with a dark, dark room.  Without hesitation, she illuminated a lantern to her right.

	A moving set of stripes squatted before a bookcase on the far end of the room.

	Belle blinked.  Her eyes ran down the zebra's figure, fixating on the bandages still clinging to his forelimbs.  Not long after, her gaze fell to the floor, and she swiftly made for the door.  Inadvertently, her flank brushed against the side of a globe, producing a rattling noise.

	Pilate froze.  His head tilted up, ears twitching.

	Belle clenched her jaw shut.

	After several seconds, the stallion quietly said, "You have the quietest breaths of everypony on board, beloved."  He gulped.  "Especially lately."

	Belle said nothing.

	Pilate moved again, his hooves placing several books back onto an empty shelf.  "There's a tarp... or a blanket of some sort acting as a barrier to the observation room."  He took a deep breath.  "Any idea why?"

	Belle fidgeted.  She stared into the shadows next to him as she finally said, "Rainbow put it up.  If you want to know a reason why, you should ask her."

	"I haven't had a chance to run into her," Pilate said.  "I barely hear from anypony.  I just figured... uhm... that maybe the two of you—"

	"We haven't."

	"Ah... okay."

	Silence.

	Belle's brow furrowed.  "What... are you doing?"

	Pilate shuffled through more books, feeling across the floor to find ones that had scattered from the rest.  "Mr. Floydien didn't make this library ver speed-proof, it woulod seem.  Books and folders have been falling all over the place down here for days—what with all of the skystone tests that the crew's evidently been doing."

	"There's no telling what order they were in to begin with, Pilate," Belle said.  "You don't need to bother yourself with—"

	"Yes, well, I'm the only pony on board with nothing to do.  I figure everyone will be fine with these books arranged by weight and size."

	"Pilate, there's no telling when I'll actually be able to make a new O.A.S.I.S. for you—"

	"I didn't ask you for a time frame, now did I?" he grunted.

	Belle frowned.  Exhaling heavily, she glared into the shadows.  The limping seconds pulled the hard lines loose from her brow, and she lost herself in a depressed glare.

	At last, Pilate asked with a shuddering tone, "Has she... gotten any better?"

	"No.  Kera hasn't."

	The zebra winced.

	"But... she... uhm..."  Belle ran a shaking hoof through her tousled mane.  "She hasn't exactly gotten any worse either.  I mean, it's not as though she refuses to eat or drink.  She does basic functions when prompted.  She's even... uhm... managed to walk when prompted.  But..."  Belle grimaced.

	Pilate tilted his head towards her from across the dark room.

	"She's not talking, Pilate," Belle murmured.  "I don't know if... if it's something that can be nurtured... or if she's going to be this way for the rest of her life, or if she has to be re-taught..."  The mare gulped.  "But the Kera we both knew is gone.  The things she was forced to see... and hear and t-taste..."  Her voice trailed off.

	Pilate spoke up.  "Maybe if I had a chance to speak with her?"

	Belle shivered.  "I don't know..."

	"I mean, if the two of us brought her topside, showed her some sunlight..."

	"Pilate..."

	"It might bring something back, you know?  Instead of day in and day out of... of d-darkness..."

	"She's fine, Pilate."

	"Fine?  Belle, beloved, you just said that—"

	"Kera doesn't need any more favors!" Belle snapped.  A blink, and her ears folded.  "I mean... that..."  She shook her head.  "That's not what..."  A gulp.  "I didn't mean for it to sound like... that..."

	Pilate sighed into the books.  "Then what was it that you meant?"

	There was no answer to that.

	"Some things may be irreversible," Pilate murmured.  "But not irrecoverable.  I think Kera could use some sunlight, Belle.  Even companionship.  That's all."

	"I've not left her side for a single moment."

	"I know."

	Belle squinted at that.  With a cold breath, she spun towards the vertical chamber.  "Knock on the engine room when you're ready to come back up to the infirmary.  Best that Props or another pony be there to help you up the ladder."

	"I'll keep that in mind, Belle," Pilate began, but lingered.

	Belle's hoofsteps became faint as they ascended up the passageway beyond.

	The zebra's nostrils flared.  "...thank you."
		//------------------------------//
		// In a Very Short Time		//------------------------------//

	"If I could just build Nancy's womb from scratch, y'know?"  Props stammered as she sweated beneath a series of gutted manaconduits inside the engine room.  Using her forelimbs, she ratcheted several pipes together and tightened them to the breaking point.  "Nnnngh... I could make handsome's ship sing!  Instead, all I have to work with is clutter and mothballs!"

	"You're doing a great job, Propsy," Ebon Mane said from the sidelines.  "Don't let anypony tell you different."

	"They can tell me whatever they wanna tell me," Props muttered, tossing her blonde mane out from her eyes as she squinted at an intersection of tubes.  "Still isn't going to change the fact that we're all better off remaking the womb instead of trying to salvage what's been doubly, triply, and quadruply done on this!"

	"Yes, well, one mare's womb is another's pit of snakes."  Ebon turned to Eagle Eye, grinning.  "Right?"

	Eagle Eye grimaced.  "Wrong."

	"Erm..."

	"Stick to cooking... for real..."

	Props giggled, then batted her eyelashes from where she lay beneath the pipes.  "Manatuner?"

	Eagle levitated the item in question from the bench to where Props was.  "I'm just glad we were able to shut this off before we left Rainbow Dash in the dust.  You can never know when her dizzy spell kicks in."

	"You can never know anything about her period," Ebon Mane muttered.  "Especially as of late."

	"Yes, well, we all know the weight she's been carrying."

	"Of course we do!"  Ebon exclaimed with a nod.  "All the reason—y'know—for us to revevaluate things... maybe..."  The stallion fidgeted.

	Eagle Eye squinted.  "What are you getting at?"

	"I can't be the only pony who's thinking it."

	"Thinking what, Ebony?" Props squeaked in mid-tinker.

	"That... well..."  Ebon scratched his head and shrugged awkwardly.  "Maybe we should have somepony else take the leadership chair for a while."

	"Heh... like who?"  Eagle Eye smirked.  "Floydien?  Belle?  The first is nonsense and the second is no show.  I'd vote for Pilate, but he's kind of lacking foresight at the moment... or at least just sight."

	"What about Josho?" Props asked.

	"HA!"  Eagle Eye held a hoof over his smirking muzzle.  "Oh please.  That old stallion would run the Noble Jury into the ground."

	"I'd rather worry about the ship than about us," Ebon said.

	"How do you mean?"

	"Do I gotta spell it out for you?"  Ebon glanced at the doors on either side of the long engine compartment and spoke in a lower tone.  "Maybe Rainbow's saved the day for us before, but lately she's developed the coaching talent of an alligator.  She stands around, saying nothing, and if you get too close to her she hisses."

	"I think pegasi are warm blooded..."

	"You could have fooled me!" Ebon exclaimed.  "With the way she's been holing herself up lately!"

	"Just have some faith in her," Eagle said.  "She'll come around."

	"EE, she passed up an opportunity to talk to her Moon Princess last night!"

	"She did?" Props blinked.

	Eagle sighed.  "Ebon, let's not bring that up..."

	"Why not?!"  Ebon shrugged.  "We can't just bury the issue, can we?  Then we'd be adding to... y'know..."

	"To what?"

	"The misery that seems rampant as of late."  Ebon frowned.  "I know what they say about 'misery loving company,' but that isn't what I signed up for!  The pegasus who smuggled us out of Blue Nova believed in something, and at this rate it's gonna take more than time and circumstance to jump start her back into action!"

	"Ebon, I'm all for sunny skies and rainbows, but I really don't think now's a good time to challenge the status quo."

	"But—"

	"We're hovering high over the Frozen Sea.  It's already been a week and we still haven't reached the Strip of Flurries.  Rainbow Dash may not exactly be her usual, cheery self, but she's no less dedicated to this crew and everypony's safety."  Eagle smiled as she said, "Let her do what works for her.  The problem isn't in the leadership, but just the overall mood on board the Jury.  That, the rest of us can work on.  We don't need a charismatic head hauncho to be charismatic, y'think?  I mean, listen to us!  We're striking a good chord, just the three of us, aren't we?"

	"Yeah!"  Props grinned.  "And I don't even know how to play guitar!"

	After sighing, Ebon smiled tiredly in the mare's direction.  "Maybe we could vote you in charge of the Jury for a while, Propsy.  Your smile's bright enough to melt a path through the Flurries."

	"You think?"  Props blinked her blue eyes.  "You want that I should put a veil over it or something?"

	"Errr..."

	"Hey, uhm..."  Eagle's ears flicked.  "Is there a steam leak?"

	Props turned towards him.  "Huh?"  She peered through the mess of pipes.  "Shouldn't be.  I went over the pipes with a fine toothed comb just yesterday."

	"I swear, I hear... like... a hissing sound."

	"You know, I hear it too," Ebon said, nodding.  "It's more of a crackle than a hiss."

	"Where's it coming from?" Props asked while tightening another pipe.

	"From across the room, I think.  Almost as if it's coming from the bench."

	Thud!  Props head struck the pipes, sending a resonating clannnnng throughout the engine compartment.  "Owie zowie!"  She slid out, breathless.  "The communicator!"

	"Huh?!"

	"It's picked up something!  Somepony be a gentlecolt and help me up!"

	Ebon and Eagle Eye bumped into each other to reach Props.  Wincing, Eagle resorted to giving the mare a boost with his telekinesis.

	She sprang across the room and threw her hooves deep into a mess of wires and electrical dials.  "Oh please... oh please..."  She bit her lip and sweated as she adjusted the frequency, causing the fragmented spurts of white noise to come in slightly better clarity.  "Come on..."

	"Seems like a crazy mess there, Propsy," Ebon asked.

	"Yeah, you need any help?" Eagle added.

	"Shhhh!" Props frowned.  "You stallions just stand there, being cute and quiet!  But mostly quiet!"

	In a jerking motion, Ebon and Eagle pressed themselves against the wall like wooden soldiers.



	Bellesmith climbed her way up to the middle deck of the ship.  She paused, gazing down the crawlspace to where she had just finished chatting with Pilate.  After a sigh, she turned and resumed her lonesome lurch back to her room.

	She froze in place.

	The door to her quarters hung fully ajar.

	Turning pale, Belle galloped in a yellow blur towards the room. She flung her head through the doorway.

	"Kera...?!"

	The filly was gone.

	"Kera?!"

	Her yelping voice echoed across blank bulkheads and empty bedspace.

	Panting, hyperventilating, the mare looked all around.  She dashed from room to room, unabashedly flinging the doors open and gazing inside.  "Kera?!"  At one point, she startled a groggy Josho awake, but moved right along with a frown when there was no filly to be seen.  "Kera?!  Where'd you run off to?!  Please, for the love of the Spark, answer m-me!"

	By the time she peered into the lavatory and infirmary—both with no success—she was starting to collapse.  Tears sprang from her eyes and her muzzle choked on a sob.

	It was around that time she heard a faint voice from the next compartment towards the stern.  Breathless, Belle dried her cheeks and limped into the mess hall.  Between the hallway and the long table, a pair of figures sat on the sofa that filled up most of the tiny lounge.  One was Kera, slumped sideways against a hoofrest with her legs curled up.  She gazed into the distance while Zaid squatted in front of her.  The stallion had a glossy metal bowl full of fresh grapes, and he was plucking them one at a time off a tiny set of stems.

	"...now here's a bit of a secret, only it isn't one, really.  And yet it is, cuz I've carried it with me for so long."  The stallion smirked and raised a goblet to her tiny lips.  "Strawberry and cranberry juice.  Good stuff, right?  Here, take a sip, sweet pea."

	Kera's lips tensed and untensed.  At last, they pursed wide enough for Zaid to pour a tiny amount into her mouth.

	"Ah!  There we go.  No need to drown you in fruitgasm, though that'd be a fitting thing for a tombstone."  He winked, lowered the goblet, and held the bowl of grapes up.  "Now, give it a second or two for the taste to settle.  'Kay?  Now... let's have ourselves a nice purple grape, shall we?  Just what the doctor ordered... the doctor of awesome."  He held it to her muzzle, giving it a tiny shove against her lips.  "It's alright.  Don't be afraid.  It's the green grapes that'll murder ya..."

	Not long after, Kera nibbled, then inhaled the tiny piece of fruit in question.  Zaid hoofed her another, and she gobbled it down more liberally.

	"Yeah... and one to grow on!"  Zaid smirked.  "Now, here's the part with enchantment and kitten sparkles.  Ya ready?"  He picked up the goblet again.  "Same juice, right?  But—alas... if we just take a sip..."

	He tilted it to her lips.  The tiny filly swallowed a miniature gulp.  Once Zaid lowered the cup, Kera remained still, but her ears twitched slightly... then twitched again.  There was the hint of darting movement to her eyes.

	"Eh... ehhhh?"  Zaid grinned from ear to ear.  "Where'd the strawberry and cranberry go?  Was it suddenly and inexplicably replaced with a muzzle-ful of sweetastic heaven?!"  He slapped his two hooves dramatically in front of her.  "Pshhhhhh!  Magic!  Killer, huh?"  He smirked as he picked the bowl of grapes up again.  "I learned it while having to ration fruit on top of one of Khao's ships.  I tell ya... those long journeys over the Ledomaritan mountains were boring as stones, but I found a way to jazz up the situation.  Amazing how sweet life can get if you just squeeze out the bitter, y'know?"

	It was around this point that Belle finally regained the breath to speak.  "Zaid...!"

	The stallion looked over his shoulder.  "Hey-heyyyyy!  Look who's up'n'at'em!"  Zaid winked at Kera.  "She's a very funny mare, your mom."

	"What do you think you're doing?!" Belle stammered as she hobbled towards the sofa.

	"Uhhhh..."  Zaid blinked awkwardly with the bowl in his grasp.  "What I do best?  You don't have to be in demolition to break through walls."  He popped a piece of fruit into his mouth and held the bowl out to her.  "Mmmmmf... how 'bout some nibble for your tribble?"

	"Did you steal Kera out from our room?!" Belle growled.

	"Ew, and commit Grand Theft Filly on a Tuesday?  No thank you."

	"Answer the question!" She stamped a hoof.

	Zaid choked on a grape, wheezed, and waved a forelimb.  "Alright!  No need to get all Riversaddle on me!  Jeez!"  He slapped his own chest, inhaled sharply, and said, "I heard somepony whimpering.  Figured it was her.  Thought the little scamp could use some food, so..."

	"Zaid, I've got Kera taken care of!"  Belle frowned.  "If you wanted to see her, you should have asked me!"

	"Uhhhh..."  Zaid's eyes darted left and right.  He smirked awkwardly.  "I think I can see her just fine.  What, do I need your permission to use my eyes?"

	"Zaid..."

	He scarfed down another grape.  "Mmmf... cuz if you ask me, Pilate's overdue in that department—"

	"For Spark's sake, Zaid, do you ever stop joking for once?!"  Belle brushed past him and picked the Kera up, draping filly over her flank.  "In case you haven't been paying attention, this poor little pony's been through a lot!"

	"Uhhhhh... yeah..."  Zaid gulped down some grapes and shrugged.  "So I figured... y'know... sweet fruit, companionship, sunshine?  The girl's catatonic, not a vampire."

	"She needs rest and peace, Zaid!" Belle grunted.  "Not to be carted around the ship at random and force fed fruit!  There's no telling what a change in her diet will do to her stomach!"

	"Yeesh.  Chillax, chestnut!"  Zaid remarked in a drawling tone.  "She isn't exactly getting any better in that sarcophagus of a room you keep her in!"

	Belle stared daggers his way.  "Are you insinuating that I don't know how to take care of her?!" she spat.

	Zaid tongued the inside of his mouth, eventually murmuring, "Ya think... uhhh... that maybe I should be?"

	Belle fumed and fumed some more.  At last, she stomped away with Kera in tow.

	"Y'know, Belle, the girl used to eat grasshoppers and dodge chaos snakes.  I think she can handle a tasty grape or two—"

	"Kera is not the girl we used to know!" Belle threw angrily over her shoulder.  "And until you're sharp enough to realize that, Zaid, I don't want you anywhere near her!"

	"Belle, c'monnnn!  I was just—"

	"I mean it!  Stay away!"  Belle was hollering from halfway down the hall at this point.  It only took three more heavy steps, and she was inside her quarters, slamming the door shut behind her.  She stood there, breathing heavily.  After a half-minute, she calmed down, knelt by the bedside, and lay Kera down again.

	She pulled a blanket over the filly's tattooed body.  Kera stared at belle... through her.  The mare reached a hoof over and stroked her mane.  As the seconds wore on, so did Belle's resolve.  Her eyes glistened, and by the time her muzzle twisted in a sob, she had buried her face into the mattress beside Kera, crying in tiny little salvos of bitter breath.



	"So... uh..."  Eagle Eye leaned forward.  "What do you think it means?"

	"Shhhh!" Props hissed, tweaking and adjusting the dials of her communication array.

	Eagle gulped, then leaned towards Ebon.  "Hey... what do you think she thinks it means?

	"To be perfectly frank?"  Ebon shrugged.  "We're probably not alone out here."

	"You mean over the Frozen Sea?" Eagle asked.  "Who else would be dumb enough to get stranded out here in the middle of the Spark-forsaken cold?"

	"Pizz Fah Wizz!"  Props jumped in place.  "I knew it I knew it I knew it!"

	"Mind telling us the it that you know?"

	"I only got it for a second—like a ghost signal—but I'd recognize that frequency in my sleep!  Heck—while doing backflips in my sleep!"  Props spun, her cheek rosy as the edges of her happy bright eyes glistened.  "It's just gotta be him!  Him and nopony else!"

	
		//------------------------------//
		// The Two Ponies You Slap		//------------------------------//

	"So..."  Rainbow Dash's voice droned.  She blinked, turning to glance at Props from across the engine room.  "Where's the signal?"

	"It was crackling like crazy earlier!"  Props sing-songed, hopping in place while Ebon and Eagle looked on.  "For two minutes solid!"

	"For two minutes solid..."  Rainbow squinted.  "Crackling?  Doesn't sound like much of a signal to me."

	"But it totally was!"  Props grinned.  "And I could recognize the frequency in a heartbeat!  Nopony but my own genuine Uncle Prowse could possibly broadcast it!  It's his radio signature from across the waters!  I know it!"

	Rainbow Dash's muzzle scrunched and unscrunched.  She trotted quietly across the engine compartment, her eyes locked on the communications array.  After an extraordinarily long pause, her voice unenthusiastically muttered, "And you detected this how long ago?"

	"About a half hour!  I got you as quickly as I could!  Well.."  Props fidgeted, staring down at her hooves with a slight blush.  "To be honest, it took me twenty minutes of courage to interrupt you from your hammocking."

	"We basically kicked her in the flank," Ebon said with a wink.

	"Yeah, Rainbow."  Eagle nodded.  "We figured you needed to see this."

	Rainbow turned about, her eyes dull and jaded.  "What's there to see?"

	Eagle's and Ebon's ears drooped.

	"Uhm..."  Props bit her lip.  "It was the only signal that my array picked up in days..."

	"And yet it's somehow matching your Uncle's trademark frequency?  After all these months of being away from him?"

	"Uhhhh—"

	"Props..."  Rainbow Dash sighed.  "Have you stopped to consider that the only reason you know it to be Prowse's signature is because that's what you want it to be?"

	"But... but..."  Props' muzzle quivered as her eyes sparkled.  "It's him!  It h-has to be..."

	"Rainbow, what are you getting at?"  Eagle Eye trotted over to Props' side.  "We all know that Props is an expert on this stuff.  Why shoot her down?"

	"Was there a voice on the other end?" Rainbow asked with a raised eyebrow.  "Was there clear communication from a stallion fitting her Uncle's description?"

	"The signal came from ninety miles southeast!" Props exclaimed, leaning forward.  "That's a lot of room for interference!"

	"A lot more room for phantom noises, if you ask me," Rainbow said.

	"Rainbow, can't we just check it out?" Ebon asked.

	"No."  Rainbow frowned.  "We can't just check anything out.  We've been out here for a long time, and we're running out of resources as it is.  Now our goal is to head towards the Strip of Flurries, and we're going to need all the concentration we can get to pass on through it.  Any detour we take could put us behind, not to mention risk starving us completely."

	"I can draft a new ration, Rainbow!" Ebon said with a hopeful smirk.  "Josho may be ticked off, but so what?  He can survive off his body fat.  If this is indeed Prowse's Uncle trying to radio for help, then it'd be really stupid to not go and investigate!"

	"We know that he's headed this way, Rainbow," Eagle insisted.

	"No, we know that he's headed east.  No pony in their good minds would try to cross the Frozen Sea, which puts us in a far worse position than him."  Rainbow turned towards Props.  "I'm sorry, Props, but unless we get something on that array of yours that's actually concrete, I can't have us risking the crew unnecessarily."

	"But can't we just... I dunno... cruise by the source of what I picked up?  Please?"  Props fought the urge to grimace as she pleaded.  "If I could just see him again, it would be really, really, really super!  What's the harm in just making a quick flyby?"

	Rainbow frowned.  "There's every harm in it.  We need to stick to the plan."

	"Rainbow—"  Eagle Eye began.

	She snapped at him.  "Every detour we have taken—Every.  Single.  One... has ended in manure hitting the fan.  From a gunfight at Green Slope, to abduction at Gray Smoke, to a total friggin' massacre at Lerris, we've done nothing but find or stir up trouble, and I'm not about to risk it again."

	"If you'd please just listen—"

	"No, you listen!  My job is to make sure this ship gets across the Frozen Sea and to the continent on the other side!" Rainbow growled.  "We're not here to chase after phantoms."  She blew the bangs out from her brow.  "Celestia knows we've got enough of those to deal with as of late.  I owe it to my friends and everypony on board this ship to get us to safety.  I'm sorry, Props, but until you've given me more than just a mere hunch to lean on, we're heading east and east only.  You got that?"

	"But... but..."  Props shuddered, then hung her head.

	Ebon's eyes swam from Rainbow to Props and back again.  He stood cold and silent.

	"Props, I appreciate all the work that you've been doing on the skystone engine, but there's no need to overdo it.  That much labor without sleep will play tricks on your head.  Trust me, I know."  Rainbow trotted over, paused, and motioned with her head towards the dried up Ice Wyrm gland.  "Looks like that thing's running out of juice.  Is the fluid for the heating system depleted?"

	"Uhm..."  Props ran a shaky hoof through her mane and nodded limply.  "Yeah."  She sniffled.  "Kind of."

	"I'll see what I can do about fetching another.  Eagle, next time you're on the top deck, keep a look out for more peculiar shaped icebergs.  We're bound to run into another one of those frozen creeps at this point."

	"Uhhh... r-right..."

	"Give a shout if there's an emergency or anything."  With that, Rainbow Dash briskly made her exit towards the stairwell.

	The three ponies stood alone.

	Eagle Eye sighed. He looked towards the lone mare in the room.  "Props, look... I... I'm sorry..."

	"No, it's... it's alright."  The Noble Jury's engineer hid her face, trotting with slumped shoulders across the room.  "She's right.  I-I haven't been getting that much sleep lately.  I... I guess I'm letting my imagination get the best of me..."

	"Props..."

	"Ebon, if you don't mind watching over the engine, I-I think I'm gonna go lie down for a while..."

	Eagle Eye winced, watching as Props trotted through the door to the navigation room, closing it gently shut behind her.  He sighed, toying with his silken bangs as he paced across the engine compartment.  At one point he froze, tilting his head up until he looked squarely at Ebon.

	Ebon stared back.

	"Wh-what?" Eagle stammered.

	"You're the one who looked at me," Ebon said.

	"Only 'cuz it looks like you've got your mind on something."

	"I've got my mind on something, alright," Ebon remarked with a nod.

	"Like... what are you thinking?"

	With a hard sigh, Ebon glared towards the stern.  "That Austraeoh and Eljunbyro are both the best and worst things to happen to us..."

	

	Rainbow Dash lingered halfway up the stairwell.  She stood, slumped against the wall in her brown leather coat, turning over a pair of goggles in her hooves.  The initials "S.L." were barely noticeable, just dark blemishes obscured by shadow.

	A cold gust blew down from the open entrance above, carrying with it flakes of frost and arctic air.  Rainbow Dash shook.  Her teeth chattered, and for a moment she feared the onset of another dizzy spell.  So, impulsively, she trotted up the stairwell and made for the first door that she could find.

	She emerged upon the upper platform of the hangar.  There, she stumbled to a stop, for she was not alone.

	"Just choke her to death, while you're at it," Zaid muttered to himself, bouncing a little rubber ball against the wall and back again.  "Not like she's got anything to breathe but your incurable funk, anyways."  Upon feeling a sudden draft, the stallion's ears twitched.  He turned around, blinked, and smiled faintly.  "Ah.  Rainbow Dash, as I live and drown.  How kerflails you?"

	Rainbow's eyes squinted.  "Where'd you get that ball?"

	"I'm fine, thanks for asking."  Zaid threw the object up and balanced it playfully on the tip of his nose.  "Found this lying in a mostly empty crate along the bottom floor of the hangar.  Figures that the only thing with mirth and silliness is what Roarke would have left behind when she blew this ship like a tornado trying to get the bills paid."

	"Hrmmph..."  Rainbow's eyes narrowed.  "I can see this hangar is taken.  I'll leave you alone."

	"Pfffft.  Oh please.  It's a free airship, at least until Floydien desides to go Saddle Haysein on our flanks!"  Zaid head-butted the ball up and balanced it with his tail.  "Seriously, I can see what Roarke digged about this place.  It's quiet, roomy, and the acoustics makes for some really bodacious ballad recittals."

	"I... don't think Roarke was the type to take up singing at random," Rainbow Dash muttered as she shuffled along the platform's railing.

	"Heh.  How would you know?  You barely hung out with her; Goddess knows she tried."

	"You do realize we're talking about Roarke here," Rainbow droned.  The pegasus leaned against the railing, staring down into the spacious compartment below.  "She didn't exactly present herself as friendship material."

	"And yet, from what I've been told, all it took was five rounds of buttkicking for you to learn her right!"  Zaid winked as he hoisted the ball up, over his flank, onto his shoulders, then balanced on the square of his head.  "Seems like you two made rapid progress!  Ya can't harsh that!"

	"Zaid, she's gone.  Will you drop it?"

	"Nah.  I've kept this thing off the floor for thirty consecutive minutes.  I'm trying to challenge myself."

	Rainbow merely groaned.

	Zaid tongued the inside of his mouth.  He whistled for a few seconds, cleared his throat, and then leaned towards her.  "Y'know... in speaking of challenges..."

	"Mmmm..." Rainbow merely hummed.

	"I can't help but feel like a certain pony has been coming short."

	"Oh really...?"

	"Yeah really.  For sure for sure."  He smirked.  "A pony who has had every opportunity imaginable to rise up out of the deepest pits, but for some reason has chosen instead to stay cold, distant, and downright unsexy."

	Rainbow's jaws tensed.  "Before you start, Zaid, don't.  I know I've been treating most ponies at forelimb's length, but it's because I wanna stay concentrated on the journey.  There's a Strip of Flurries for us to fly through and—"

	"Yeah yeah yeah.  I ain't worried about you, girl.  That's like being paranoid about my own large intestine imploding.  It's a little too silly of a notion to sit on.  Hah!  Sit on!  Get it?"

	Rainbow groaned, rolling her eyes.

	"Nah, Rainbow, I'm not worried about you."  Zaid gulped then said, "It's your friends that I'm freaked out about.  Belle and Pilate—sure—but not just them, but Kera too.  And Props.  And Ebon and that princessy mare that he keeps hanging out lately.  Heck, even Floydazar and Joshochu in the flesh."  Zaid stared up at the ceiling, spinning the ball atop a raised hoof.  "Let's see... am I forgetting anypony...?"  He turned to blink at Rainbow.  "The Professor.  Did I mention him yet?"

	"It's been a tough journey for all of us," Rainbow muttered.  "And need I remind you what happened only two weeks ago?"

	"No.  You needn't... needle... nerdgasm...?"  Zaid went cross-eyed, then shook it off.  "I get it.  Life sucks and then you blow.  Still, I dunno about you, but the only thing I'll ever roll over for is a threesome with Japaneighs Schoolfillies.  So we've been through the fire and the flame.  Big whoop.  There's plenty of life to make music out of, and lately there's been a whole lot off sighing off key."

	"Yes, Zaid, I've noticed—"

	"Have you?"  Zaid raised an eyebrow.  "The only reason I came in here to begin with is to walk off the goosebumps I got after being given the third degree by your best friend!"

	Rainbow blinked quizzically at him.  "Belle?"

	"No, the seapony with a red mane and a thing for forks.  Of course I mean Belle!  Or at least, 'It Came From the Belle Dimension.'  Pffffft... if you ask me, she's exchanged 'lovely and funny' for 'nihilistic and stuck-up,' not to mention the fact she clings to Kera like a friggin' ball and chain.  And even after saying that I can't honestly claim to know who is the one tied to who."

	"They've been through a lot, Zaid," Rainbow muttered.  "Give them time."

	"They've got time!" Zaid cackled.  "I've got time!  You've got time!  Everypony on this friggin' ship has got time—but nothing to fill it with, and certainly not hugs!  Also, correct me if I'm wrong, but am I the only one who hasn't forgotten that one of your friends went blind?"

	"What are you trying to get at...?"

	"Come on, gurl!  You've got wings!"  Zaid balanced the ball to another hoof so that he could reach over and nudge her.  "Swoop in and catch them!  Before they fall too deep into the pit as it is!"

	"They're alive and they're healthy."

	"They're miserable!  Even a blind zebra could see that—and I bet he does!  Every day of his friggin' life, as of late!"  Zaid sighed, gazing at the spinning ball before his muzzle.  "I'm just bummed out to see it get this pathetic.  From what I've seen and heard, you and your pals had something really sweet goin' on, like a friggin' platinum posse of ponies.  I'd hate for the same misery that engulfed Roarke to bite the eyeballs out of them too."

	"What do you mean?"

	"Well, I guess that's a bit of a stretch."  Zaid chuckled to himself.  "Roarke at least had a bunch of tools at her disposal.  She wouldn't have left under the promise of pure hopelessness.  The dayum mare's too resourceful... not to mention sexy."

	Rainbow's nostrils flared.  Staring into the far corners of the room, she surfaced from her deep thoughts just long enough to mutter, "Roarke didn't leave because she was miserable."

	"Hmmm?  What, then?  She caught sight of a rust trade as we passed by the last row of mountains?"

	"No."  Rainbow slowly shook her head.  "I sent her away."

	The hangar echoed a light thud as the rubber ball fell to the metal platform below.

	"She... confessed to me that she had told Kera about Lerris before we even left Archer Pointe."  The mare's features tightened slightly.  "She coerced the little scamp into making the decision to stay.  And look at what happened?"

	Silence.

	"I was upset with her... beyond pissed.  I wanted her out of my sight... and so... I made it happen.  I told her to leave.  And she did."  Sighing, she leaned away from the railing and turned aside.  "I almost tried going after her, but I realized that she was better off on her own—"

	Thwap!  Zaid's hoof flew across Rainbow's cheek.

	The mare's head jerked to the left, though her body stayed anchored in place.  Slowly, icily, she looked back towards him.

	What she saw was a snarling muzzle just a twitch away from foaming at the mouth.  "You sent her away?!"  Zaid's mouth hung like a pendulum.  "You flippin' sent Roarke away?!"  He blinked like he was having a seizure, shook his head, and spat, "Are you out of you goddess damn mind?!  Did you drink extra paint that day?!  Wake up with feathers stuffed between your ears?!"

	"Zaid..."  Rainbow's whelted muzzle icily droned, "Calm down—"

	"Stuff it!"  Zaid pointed in her chest.  "You don't get to make orders and play the role as this ship's leader if all you can muster is stupid buck-ups like that!  I know you've been biting the proverbial bullet after all of that Shell crap, but to send Roarke away?!  Roarke, the one mare with the resources and know-how to get us through life's thickest bullcrap?!  Were you dropped on your head from a super high cloud as a foal or what?!  How in the turkey-humping Hell could you possibly have felt that was a good idea?"

	"I... I-I..."  Rainbow shifted nervously, avoiding his gaze.  "I was upset—"

	"You were a hysterical tube worm—that's what you were!  And now we're all having to pay the price because she's gone!"

	"Zaid, listen—"

	"No, you listen!" He leaned into her face and growled, "I've tried my darnedest to be a perfect gentlecolt!  In all my life, I've only ever hit a mare on two occasions!  I'll give you a hint!  One of them was Nightshade!"

	Shuddering, Rainbow let her gaze fall to the metal platform below.  "I couldn't trust Roarke, Zaid.  Not after what she had done.  Not after learning how far she'll go to do something she thinks is right..."

	"Heh... yeah... and you're just batting a thousand, aren't you?"  Zaid frowned.  "Rainbow, I can't pretend to know all the highs and lows you've flounced your sweet tight body through in your life, but at some point in time—it seems—the colors lost and something far darker won the ballgame.  All in all, I'm not a huge fanboy of what this nastiness is turning you into, because from this angle it's looking more and more like the hollow freak that lived up to his namesake and did a number on your best of friends!"

	Rainbow flashed him a furious frown.  "Don't you ever compare me to—"

	"—then stop before you become him!" Zaid snarled.  "Stop pushing your friends away, pretending that it's all for the best.  Stop distancing yourself from this crew, claiming that it's in the ship's good interest!  And, last but not least..."  He reached forward and slapped her shoulder like an angry sibling.  "Don't.  Be.  A dick!"

	"Guhhh..."  Rainbow Dash winced from his light pummeling.  "Zaid, I can't expect you to know what this journey's going to cost me—going to cost all of us—if I don't see to everypony's safety first and foremost!"

	Zaid stared at her with an iron frown.  "Rainbow, your journey ended the moment you stopped being awesome."

	The pegasus blanched at that.  She leaned back, her face pale as a pair of fuzzy ears folded over her scalp.  Shivering slightly, she stared down at her hooves.  She said nothing.

	"Rainbow Dash..."  Zaid sighed, ultimately squatting down across from her.  "Someway, somehow, you're going to have to pull yourself together.  It's not something any of us can do for you.  The whole universe knows that it's something that only you can accomplish.  And you'd better get it together quick.  You've already lost Roarke—who knows what this lameness is going to cost you next.  Belle?  Pilate?  If you ask me, they're already gone, Rainbow.  They're further gone than even Kera at this point.  But it doesn't have to be too late.  It doesn't have to be.  Talk to them.  Talk to yourself.  Just talk to somepony."

	Rainbow Dash clenched her eyes shut.  She sniffled slightly, gritted her teeth...



	...and slowly tilted her head up towards the full moon.

	Pulling the collar of her coat wide open, she exposed the loyalty pendant to the cosmos.

	Her body lit up, resonating with regal energy from where she sat on the very bow of the Noble Jury.

	With remarkable speed, a delightfully eerie voice drifted along the arctic wind, tickling her ears and stealing the mare's breath away.

	"Rainbow Dash?  Rainbow Dash, thou still liveth?"

	Rainbow sucked her breath in.  After a few tense seconds, she muttered, "Yes, Your Highness.  It's me.  I'm still here."

	"Oh, Rainbow Dash!  We ask that thou excuseth our tone of enthusiasm.  We hadst received no response from thy voice the evening previous, and we feared the worse hadst travaileth upon thee."

	"It's... uh... it's all good, Princess Luna.  I'm not dead or anything.  I'm alive.  And... like... my friends and I are making our way to another continent... with kingdoms unknown."

	"We admit to being somewhat perplexed, Rainbow Dash.  If thou art not in harm's way, then what disturbeth thy attempts at monthly communication?"

	"I..."  Rainbow Dash fidgeted.  She tried smiling, but it lasted for only a few seconds, and then she was stammering.  "I just... I felt..."

	The echoing voice morphed into a gentle, warm whisper.  "Rainbow Dash.  Doth thou fair well?"

	The pony's muzzle scrunched up.  Tears trickled down her cheek.  She inhaled, shook, then squeaked, "No... No, Luna."  A sniffling.  "I'm not okay..."  She collapsed on shivering hooves, weeping into her forelimbs.  "N-nothing is okay..."  She hyperventilated, then wailed in a muffled tone.  "Everything is so horrible."

	Silence... and then:  "Wouldst thou wish to talk about it, our little pony?"

	"Yes... y-yeah..."  Rainbow gulped, nodding weakly into the moonlight.  "I think... I-I think I have to, your Highness.  I really do..."
		//------------------------------//
		// That Which We Drive Away		//------------------------------//

	"...and you know what the worst of it is?"  Rainbow Dash muttered towards the cosmos as she lay casually on her back along the bow of the Jury.  "It's not the over-one-hundred dead Lerringtons.  It's not how traumatized Kera is.  It's not how unhappy my friends and I have been as of late."  She gulped before saying, "Earlier today, while nearly crashing into the Frozen Sea from a dizzy spell, I could have sworn I heard a voice..."  Her jaw grew tight.  "Axan's voice..."

	"Just like the manner in which thou heard her at the battlefield between the Ledomaritans and the Xonans?"

	Rainbow Dash nodded.  "It was a reminder that someway—somehow—she is following me.  Keeping an eye out on me.  Observing everything that happens to me with her ancient... erm... dragon tingling or something."

	"Without a doubt.  Considering what thou hast done to free her sister from suffering, the Divine hath taken a great interest in thee."

	"But, your Highness, it's way m-more than that!"  Rainbow Dash sat up.  "Axan nearly killed me.  For all intents and purposes, she did kill me.  The only thing that made her spare my pathetic flesh is the fact that she figured out I was this 'Austraeoh' crap."  Nostrils flaring, Rainbow glared down into the cold waters lying in the darkness beneath the Jury.  "Now she's heck-bent on making sure I make this trip east, as if it's something that was prophesied or what-crap.  So that got me to thinking... why didn't she intervene at Lerris?"  The pegasus winced, her voice taking on a squeaking tone.  "What makes her think that what Shell did to so many innocent ponies and to the ones I care about was... s-somehow necessary?"  She brought a pair of hooves to her face, groaning.  "And then the shape-shifters and the doppelganger of Lasairfion who knew my name and... and..."

	"We can only imagine that thou feeleth remarkably overwhelmed, Rainbow Dash."

	"Nnnnngh... you have no idea.  Feels like the further I fly east, the less and less control I have over what happens—both good and bad.  But m-mostly the bad."

	Silence.

	Rainbow lowered her hooves from her face, sighing.  "And... and I've taken it out on my friends, all the while pretending to be protecting them.  I figured that my loyalty is the one thing hurting them.  In a lot of ways, it kind of is, at least in the way I see it."

	"When stuck in the pits of despair, it is undeniably easy to see every element of thy life as a flaw.  While this typically can be the signature of a wise and noble sentry, it too can act as a veil, under the shadow of which our greatest enemies travaileth to undermine that which maketh us strong."

	"Yeah, well..."  Rainbow Dash grumbled aside.  "I've got a crapton of enemies, it seems."

	"We art no strangers to malevolent shape shifters, Rainbow Dash."

	"Oh?"

	"In ancient times, before even the utilization of the Elements of Harmony, three older siblings retreated deep into the mountains of Equestria.  There, they fed off the caverns of crystals that they found in hiding..."

	"Wait... older siblings?"  Rainbow Dash raised an eyebrow.  "You mean... like alicorns?"

	"A brother and two sisters.  At one time, they would properly have been called alicorns, but they sacrificed their station as guardians of Equestria for the sake of selfish persuits. They were drawn to the magically imbued minerals located deep below modern day Canterlot.  The enchanted properties of the crystals granted immense power and improved magical prowess.  These alicorns were so addicted to the riches of this plane, that they forsook harmony for any sensation that the substances gave them.  Eventually, Celestia, ourself, and the other alicorns at the time had to intervene.  We succeeded in driving the three out of the mountains, but the caves had been stripped bare, and the consequences of the magical consumption had taken their effect on those whom we once trusted as our own flesh and blood.

	"The two sisters, Chrysalis and Tchern, were driven to the far corners of Equestria.  They took with them scores upon scores of ponies—minions who tragically shared in the curse that the crystals had brought upon them.  They could no longer harbor emotions like the naturally born ponies of this plane.  Instead, they had to mimic others in order to feed off of feelings of love, passion, and distress.  The sisters became queens of a nomadic brood, and they telepathically lorded over the mutated ponies who pledged their undying allegiance to them.  The only way the mortals could now survive was by operating under a hive mind with Chyrsalis and Tchern at the center.  The last time we ever saw them, they had fled to the dark side of the world, where undoubtedly they had constructed a kingdom of malevolence where no sunlight or moonlight can be glimpsed... to remind them of the true love that they have forsaken.

	"Our brother, Sombra, was even worst off.  To evade our harmonic touch, he sacrificed his wings, his mind, even his own corporeal form to become one with shadow.  He fled to the frozen north beyond the borders of Equestria, and there he enslaved countless thousands of crystal ponies, harvesting their very essence in order to satisfy the hunger that his dark soul had become dependent on.  We and Celestia discovered him centuries later, and the battle we had was devastating.  We had succeeded in vanquishing him from this plane, but tragically he took the entirety of the Crystal Empire with him, burying himself and thousands of innocent ponies in shadow.  It was a terrible price to pay for ridding this land of his wicknedness, and there isn't a day that goes by when it doesn't dwell upon our conscience."

	"Yeesh, Your Highness."  Rainbow Dash winced.  "I knew you've battled nasty-nasties in the past, but I had no idea..."  She gulped.  "Your own brothers and sisters?  That's really tough."

	"Indeed, but not as distressing as knowing the fate of every pony that blindly followed Chrysalis and Tchern to the ends of the earth... nor the crystal ponies who fell into shadow along with Sombra.  But they art hardly the worse that this plane has to offer."

	"Oh...?"

	"When we succumbed to the darkness ourselves... when we became Nightmare Moon, we too brought doom upon thousands of innocent ponies."

	"Come on, Luna..."  Rainbow smiled weakly.  "It... it c-couldn't have been that horrible."

	"Alas, it was.  Thousands of unicorns marched to our evil cause, and even more sarosians flew in the shadow of our dark wings.  We brought war and cruelty to the land of Equestria, blanketing the countryside in eternal night, until every corner of the world was covered in darkness.  The worst part is that it wasn't the initial banishment to the moon that cleansed us, but rather the revitalization of the Elements of Harmony over a thousand years later."

	"Yeah... but... it all worked out in the end, didn't it?" Rainbow meekly asked.  "When Twilight and the gang..."  She fidgeted.  "When we gave you the zap, you were cleansed of all that nasty Nightmare Moon junk right?"

	"Yes, but it still hath not taken away the scars that we hath caused, the generations upon generations of persecuted sarosians, the unicorns who died attempting to defend a malevolent dictator who was banished centuries ago."

	"Ouch."  Rainbow Dash grimaced.  "I... I-I don't know what to say, Luna.  I mean, from the way I hear it, y-you're totally a good alicorn in spite of all that."

	"Indeed, we are cleansed of the horrible taint, and we hath endeavored to raise the sun and moon with unwavering diligence.  Thou must realize, Rainbow Dash, that in this age—just as in ages previous—evil always finds a place to bring anguish and torment.  But where there is evil, there is always the opportunity to bring about good.  While Chrysalis and Tchern morphed into horrible mimics of their past selves, it taught the rest of the alicorns the dangers of crystalline addiction, so that we could better protect the mortal populace.  While Sombra enslaved thousands of ponies, his reign was put to a vicious end before he could grow powerful enough to corrupt millions.  And while Discord nearly managed to convert the entire world to chaos..."

	"Yeah, I hear ya..."  Rainbow Dash muttered.  She nervously rubbed a hoof across her pendant, sighing.  "While I'm glad that dude kicked the bucket, I'm not all that happy with what it took to do it."

	"Nor can we expect thee to comprehend—much less appreciate the good that hath come out of thy adventures as of late.  While it pains us to hear of Nevlamas' passing, we are pleased to know that she was stopped before she could bring corruption to the entirety of the realm beneath the world.  And it would seem, Rainbow Dash, that Chrysalis and Tchern have not entirely left the light side as we thought.  Regardless, thine intervention in Xona has assured the end of a great and costly war—one that could have grown to excessively murderous lengths had you not flown through the air of that landscape whatsoever."

	"But..."  Rainbow Dash sniffled, her eyes growing moist as she gazed across the Frozen Sea.  "What of Lerris?  What good could possibly come out of what Shell did... and what I-I had to do to stop him?  Honestly, Luna, it f-feels that no matter what good I do for these lands, I end up doing a whole lot worse in the end, and I-I don't like what it's turning me into."  She shuddered and sighed.  "It's like I'm becoming just as monsterous as the siblings you had to drive out of the mountains to begin with..."

	"We highly doubt that.  A monster hath no conscience, Rainbow Dash, much less ponies whom one can practice loyalty with."

	"Yeah, well, I'm a bit out of practice, if you ask me."

	"We could equally feel the same.  We hath felt the same, repeatedly, with seemingly no outlet for our grief."

	"Then just what makes you go on?  How do you raise the sun and moon every day without fail?"

	"Because we have to.  Because so many ponies depend on us.  And because we knoweth that to give into despair—if even for a moment—would mean giving the victory to our enemies, even if our greatest foe is ourselves."

	"Yeah, but I killed Shell.  He's gone for good."

	"He is never dead, Rainbow Dash, so long as thou willeth his corruption to endure through the acceptance of thy defeat.  He will resurface, like the will of Chrysalis and Tchern, or like the shadow of Sombra, so long as thou becometh so despondent that though giveth him a vessel through yourself."

	Rainbow Dash bit her lips.

	"We accept with a heavy heart the possibility that there'll come a full moon when thou wilt no longer be alive to reply to us, Rainbow Dash.  Please, we beseech thee, do not let a day come when the pegasus on the other end of the communication spell is voiced by a spirit far darker than yours."

	Rainbow sighed.  "I won't become another Nightmare Moon, your Highness."  She smiled bitterly.  "Besides... I'd look like a total lame-o in that balding helm thing you were sporting."

	"We shall pretend to understand that and smile."

	"Works for me..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Mothballed Since Project Blue Buck		//------------------------------//

	"Nnnngh!"  Props strained, twisting at a rivet with a large wrench.  "Guhh!  Mmmffffnngh!"  At last, she finished tightening a bulkhead in place.  She exhaled, her muzzle producing tiny vapors.  With a slight shiver, the blonde mare tightened a cloak over her sweaty figure.

	Behind her, one of the doors to the engine room squeaked as it opened.

	Props immediately winced.  "Sorriez!  Loads of sorriez!"  She twirled about.  "I lost juice for the air conditioning just now!  But good news!  The skystone should be ready for another test anytime soon—"

	"Don't worry about the heating for now," Rainbow Dash said.  She trotted lightly across the compartment in her leather coat.  "We've got stuff to bundle up with.  Besides, I can totally find more of that ice wyrm stuff to help us out in a pinch."

	"Oh, totallies.  But still... uhm..."  Props squirmed, avoiding the pegasus' eyes.  "If we're gonna test the skystone engine again, might I suggest you stay inside this time?  I mean, I know it's not my place to tell you what to do, Dash-Dash, but the last thing I want is for you to be abandoned again—"

	"The test can wait for a bit," Rainbow said.

	Props blinked.  "Huh?"

	Rainbow looked at her.  "If we're trying out the skystone, I want us to be heading east as we do it."

	"You mean we're... n-not heading east?"

	"You picked up that signal from the south, right?"

	Props nodded with a gaping muzzle.

	"Well, what are you waiting for?"  Rainbow nodded towards the wall.  "You got the intercom back online yesterday evening, right?  Tell Floydien to set a course for the source of the broadcast.  Better now than never."

	Props stared at her.  Her eyes quivered as a slow smile was birthed across her face.  Clenching her jaw, she let out a tiny squeal as she flounced over to the intercom.

	Rainbow smirked and trotted back the way she came.

	"Hey!  Hey hey hey!  Handsome!"  Props chirped into the crystal console.  "Guessy whatty!  We're going after my Uncle after all!  Take us southeast by about sixty degrees from sunrise!"

	"Scrkkkk!  Just as soon as I get these glimmer boomers out of my sight!"

	Rainbow froze, glancing back over her shoulder in mid-trot.

	Props blinked.  "Uhhhhh..."  She leaned her muzzle closer to the intercom.  "What glimmer boomers?"

	

	It was black, round, and glossy—with a pair of slender fins jutting out of its stern.  The rising sun glinted off the front of the aircraft as it hovered two hundred feet over the northwest waters.

	"It certainly looks stabby stabby, from Floydien's circlehood."  The elk snorted with a frown from the doorframe to the cockpit.  "It's been following Nancy Jane since starlight, about four hours now.  Sometimes it glides, other times it just lingers.  Like frecklespace.  Floydien doesn't like it one bit, especially how it eyes Nancy with unseen eyes of envy spit."

	"No balloon... no steam vents... no signs of any sort of obvious propulsion," Props murmured, squinting off the ship's port side.

	"Your goggles can't do everything, girl," Rainbow Dash muttered, then turned towards Eagle Eye.  "Anything you can see?"

	"Uhhhh..."  The stallion squinted from where he stood in the middle of the deck.  His breath came out in fitful vapors.  "If I didn't know any better, I'd say that its bow is actually facing us."

	"Really?  That big bulbous thing?  Looks like a flying dome."

	"I know, but... it's hard to make out—but I think I see thin orange lines aimed at us... maybe the cockpit window.  I've been staring at the vessel for the last ten minutes, during which we must have traveled several hundreds of meters.  I've no doubt it's pivoted to keep facing us directly."

	"That's not creepy or anything," Rainbow muttered.

	"Whoever it is, they probably have some sort of long range crystalline scanning devices," Props said.  "Otherwise they would have swung in for a closer peep show."

	"Floydien would have bucked them into their own butt cracks," the elk grumbled.

	"Easy there, twinkle toes." Rainbow looked past Eagle Eye.  "You recognize this thing at all?"

	"Nnnghhh..."  Josho rubbed his chin in thought.  "Can't say that I do.  They sure as Hell ain't Xonan.  The tattooed weirdoes are fond of the color blue and serpent designs.  Most of their decks are open and exposed so that they can jump from ship to ship and board enemy vessels.  But this thing is super crazy.  It's like a bowling ball with cake knives sticking out its ass."

	"I know it's far away," Eagle Eye thought aloud.  "But I can't see any doors, portholes, or windows whatsoever."

	"Just the glowing orange stuff, right?" Rainbow asked.

	"Yeah, for lack of a better term."

	"Maybe they've come to deliver us pumpkins!" Props exclaimed.

	Everypony turned to look at her.

	She bit her lip, ears drooping as she hugged her cloaked self.  "I think I'll be going back into the engine room now..."

	"Wait!"  Floydien suddenly barked.  "Hold your spit!"

	"The elk's right!" Josho grumbled.  "It's moving!"

	"EE, keep your eyes on it!" Rainbow shouted.

	Everyone flinched as the vessel spun like a top, twirled, and stopped dead—facing northwest.  Half a second later, there was a flash of orange and yellow lights—and the vessel shot off incredibly fast on amber streams.

	"Jinkle streams!"  Props gasped.  "Did you see that?!"

	"I absolutely did," Eagle Eye said, exhaling vapors.  "Those fins at the back were definitely venting something."

	"Like what?"  Josho grumbled.  "Those ain't like no steam vents I've ever seen!"

	"Can you see it anymore?" Rainbow asked.

	"No, Rainbow..."  Eagle gulped.  "It's gone."

	"What do you mean it's gone?"

	"I mean it's already beyond visual sight!"

	"Glimmer runs..." Floydien muttered.

	Rainbow flapped her wings.  "Perhaps... if I went after it?"

	"No offense, color wheel."  Josho glanced over.  "But that dayum thing is far faster than you."

	"The old stallion has a point, Rainbow."  Eagle rubbed his eyes and turned to blink at her.  "That thing is zooming about freaky quick.  Perhaps you should just stay here."

	Rainbow sighed out her nostrils as she touched back down.  "I'm not a fan of being watched by something we can't... w-watch back."

	"Tell Floydien about it," the elk muttered.  "It freaks Floydien out everytime."

	Rainbow flung him a squinting glance.  "You mean this isn't the first time they've been oogling us?"

	He shrugged.  "Floydien thought he saw black glimmer against the starlight the last two nights, but counted it off to imagination and drowse drowse.  Spit you any less?  Floydien thinks not."

	"At ease.  We're not ganking you or anything," Rainbow muttered.  "It just ticks me off, is all... out here in the middle of nowhere..."

	"Rainbow, you don't suppose..."  Eagle's words trailed off.

	"Hmmm?"

	He gulped.  "I mean, the stuff that the Lerringtons talked about.  Golden Happenstance especially.  You think that maybe these Frozen Wastes aren't quite so... wasted after all?"

	"If a bunch of punks were streaking across my lawn, I'd study them real hard before giving them the proverbial smackdown," Josho uttered with a nod.  "I'm just saying."

	"I really can't imagine anyone claiming ownership of these parts," Rainbow muttered.  "As far as I'm concerned, the Frozen Sea belongs to the Ice Wyrms."

	"One thing's for sure," Props said with a wince.  "That glowy energy we just saw?  As the ship jetted away?"  She gulped.  "That was skystone propulsion."

	Rainbow glanced towards the northwest horizon, then back at her.  "You sure about that?"

	"Pretty sniffing sure."

	Rainbow exhaled.  The paced about in a slow trot.

	Josho and Eagle Eye looked on.  "What do you think we should do?" asked the younger.

	Rainbow gritted her teeth.  "Keep an eye out.  Lemme know if they show up again, and then I'll get Floydien to steer back east again."

	"Steer back east?"  Josho raised an eyebrow.  "Are we going somewhere?"

	"That we are, buckaroo."  Rainbow Dash flapped her wings and darted towards the stairwell.  She patted his sweatered shoulder along the way.  "Somepony's got an Uncle who's hopefully less dirty than you.  So bundle up.  It's gonna be a chilly ride."
		//------------------------------//
		// Something Frozen This Way Foreshadows		//------------------------------//

    The Noble Jury throttled its way south, dipping low so that it skimmed over the jagged peaks of several icebergs floating at random.  A veritable field of alabaster chunks lay across the Frozen Sea, some of them reaching so high that their twisted summits made beams of shadow in the pale sunlight.

    Rainbow Dash flew parallel to the ship, scanning the bobbing mess below with goggled eyes.  She’d occasionally dip down beneath the level at which the Jury hovered, inspecting the icebergs closer, studying the moving mountains from different angles.

    Some of the ice shards’ surfaces were so smooth, so shiny, that they reflected Rainbow Dash’s leather-coated figure completely.  She found herself gazing at them, squinting at the flecks of frost clinging to her exposed muzzle and mane.

    Then, following a sporadic flicker of her ruby lightning pendant, she swore she spotted a black shape swirling by in the reflected sky.  With a gasp, she hovered in place, staring up at the heavens.  All she could see was a blank blue sphere.  The desolation of the world once again settled across her skin, shaken only by the sound of the Noble Jury’s thundering engines.

    With a shuddering breath, Rainbow Dash pressed on, threading her tiny body between separate icebergs as she weaved a meandering path southeast.  Along the way, she couldn’t help but glance at the waters directly beneath her.  Through the edge of her vision, she could have sworn she saw a hint of crimson light glistening just beyond the waves.  The pegasus’ brow furrowed, and she felt the hairs on the back of her neck raising slightly.  However, the more she looked at the waves below, the less she saw of anything but black depths gurgling indefinitely.

    Undaunted, she pressed on, escorting the Noble Jury into the southern stretches of the Frozen Sea as the sun melted its way towards the western horizon.



    “Is… is that it?” Ebon Mane asked as he squinted off the starboard railing.

    “It definitely has to be,” Props murmured, wide-eyed behind her goggles.

    “Why does it look like a crashed shipping freighter?” Ebon remarked.

    Meanwhile, Eagle Eye was squinting.  “That’s because it is a crashed shipping freighter.”  He gulped.  “Or at least half of it.”

    Rainbow Dash hovered alongside the Noble Jury as it levitated high over a large slab of ice.  Along the frozen chunk’s western edge, a jagged hull of rusted metal lay deep in the translucent surface.  The unmistakable signs of a stern, a rudder, and a snow-covered top deck lingered in the amber sunlight.

    “Looks like it ran aground at some point,” Eagle Eye murmured aloud.

    “How long do you suppose it’s been stuck in there?” Rainbow Dash asked.

    Floydien stuck his head out from the cockpit’s entrance.  “Many years since the kerplunk-a-chunk, Floydien thinks!  The ship is half as old as the iceberg from the looks of it.”

    “Certainly doesn’t match any design I’ve seen,” Josho grumbled.

    “Perhaps…”  Ebon fidgeted, then glanced at the others.  “Perhaps Propsy’s Uncle was part of a separate expedition that got stranded out here and this was their only place of refuge?”

    “Or he could have been abandoned here,” Josho said.

    Eagle Eye flung him a disgusted look.  “Old stallion…!”

    Josho shrugged.  “Just saying.  Looks right like a Spark-forsaken prison to me.”

    “And we’re sure the signal is emanating from here?” Rainbow Dash asked, eyes squinting.

    “Yeah!”  Props stammered breathlessly.  “I know it!  Something inside that chunk of a ship is broadcasting the signal!”

    “And on Prowse’s frequency…” Ebon murmured.

    The mare nodded.  “As best as can be managed with the technology available!”

    “One thing’s for sure,” Eagle Eye spoke into the frosty air.  “Whatever or whoever is in there--they can’t be all that comfortable for long.  Place looks like a tomb.”

    “Oh please…”  Props bit on the edges of her hooves.  “Use another word that rhymes with Nancy Jane’s belly!”

    Rainbow Dash took a deep breath.  “Well, there’s no sense in waiting up around here.”

    “What’s the hurry, paint bucket?”  Floydien spoke up.  “Does the boomer think Nancy Jane is being followed?”

    “At least being oogled from afar, yes.”  Rainbow nodded.  “But we came for Prowse, and we might as well go all the way.  But I don’t want to stick around here any longer than we have to.”

    “Sorry for adding my own miserable two bits as usual, but…”  Ebon gulped and pointed over the railing.  “That ship doesn’t exactly look stable.”

    “Nothing that the heaviest set of hooves this side of Ledomare can’t bother to test.”  Rainbow Dash turned towards the stallion in question.  “Josho?”

    “Hell, I’m game.”  The unicorn pumped a crystalline shotgun levitating beside him.  “Beats dying of old age on this ship.”

    “Count me in as well,” Eagle Eye said with a nod.  “There’s no telling what freaky stuff could have crept on board that thing.”

    “Uhm… uhhhh…”  Props fidgeted from one set of hooves to the other, biting her lip.  “I… uhm…”

    “Oh, knock it off, girl,” Rainbow Dash muttered as she signaled Floydien to bring the ship further down.  “Consider this your first complimentary away mission.”

    Props blinked, then smiled with rosy cheeks.  “Squee….!”

		//------------------------------//
		// The Gloom and Doom Room		//------------------------------//

    Somewhere, inside a dark dark corridor with rusted bulkheads…

    A door hung on its hinges, covered with a slick layer of condensation.  All was silent, until a tapping sound resonated on the far side.  This was followed by a grinding noise, and then a rattling cacophony of tremors.  Once again, all was silent.  Then, just as the last echo of the previous noise had begun to settle…

    Clangggg!  The door blew off its hinges, collapsing somewhere in the middle of the long narrow hallway.  As the vapors of dispelled mana settled, Josho’s silhouette could be seen standing against the blinding light with a glowing horn.

    Eagle Eye winced from where he and Props stood behind the obese stallion.  “Did you really need to get Medieval on the doorway like that?”

    “This is a rescue mission,” Josho grumbled.  “Not a one pony sneaking mission.”

    “Speak for yourself,” Eagle Eye said with a gulp.  “Who’s to know how long this ship’s been run aground on this iceberg?  I don’t want to wake up anything that doesn’t need to see the light of day.”

    “You’re supposed to be sassy, Princess, not paranoid.”

    “Yeah, well, some old habits of the battlefield die hard.”

    “Heh… that’s what she said.”

    “Oh, for the love of--!”

    “Shhhh…”  Rainbow Dash hovered down into view, peering through the opened doorway.  “Thanks for making an entrance, Josho.  Let’s do this next part somewhat quietly, okay?”

    “Pffft.  If you insist.”

    “I do.  Also that I go first.”

    “But you’re always taking point!”

    “Josho…”  Rainbow Dash clenched her eyes shut, sighed, then gestured ahead.  “Fine.  Be the knight in shining armor.”

    “Damn straight.  I was born with turtle wax.”  Josho stepped over the bottom frame of the door and shuffled his way into the claustrophobic corridor.  His glowing horn lit the way while he levitated a shotgun cautiously left and right, eyeing every shadow that the ship’s interior presented.

    Rainbow Dash floated close behind, her wings flapping above a tight leather coat.  Behind her, Props nervously trotted, sliding her goggles above a pair of wide, blinking blue eyes.  Eagle Eye took up the rear, levitating his sword and shield alongside him.

    The interior was somewhat disorienting, a consequence of the structure of the ship leaning at an awkward thirty-degree angle towards its dilapidated stern.  Though it looked like the quartet was trotting straight down an even plane, they felt like they were moving uphill.  What’s more, the cold hallway walls were slick with moisture, causing Josho to slip a few times, much to his grumbling dismay.

    “Don’t worry,” Rainbow murmured, her voice echoing a lot louder than she expected.  Nevertheless, she patted the stallion’s shoulder and murmured into his ear.  “You at least still look like a cool guy.”

    “I never cared much for ships,” Josho grumbled.  “At least the ones that stuck to water.”

    “Why’s that?” Eagle’s voice murmured from the rear of the procession.

    “Could never handle the cramped conditions.  Plus, sailors are just… friggin’ weird,” Josho grumbled back at the unicorn.  “Odds are they’d either eat me alive for sustenance if we got stranded, or they’d at least try and turn me into you.”

    Eagle Eye frowned.  “Really?  We’re going into that at a time like this?”

    “Shhh!”  Rainbow Dash hissed.  “Save it for the honeymoon, coltfriends.”  She glanced over her shoulder.  “Props, any idea how we’ll know if we’re getting warm?”

    “Uhm… if we get warm.”

    Rainbow sighed.  “Props…”

    “No!  For real!” she squeaked.  “Notice how slick the walls and floors of this place are?”

    Josho slipped again, forcing Rainbow to steady him.  “It did occur to me,” he grumbled.

    “I’m guessing that most of the time the arctic air has layered the walls of this place with frost.”  The mare paused to run her hoof across a wall streaked with water droplets.  “But something’s causing that residual frost to melt!”

    Eagle Eye craned his head.  “Like a heat source?”

    “Yup yup!  And a doozy of one too!”  Props grinned brightly.  “And my Uncle Prowse sure does love to light a big fire!”

    “Heh…”  Josho smirked.  “I bet he does.”

    “So, lemme guess…”  Rainbow glanced over her shoulder.  “We find a heat source and follow it to the pony we’re looking for?”

    “Seems a safe bet to me!  And if that doesn’t work, I can try and triangulate the signal that’s being broadcasted from somewhere inside this ship!”

    “Well…”  Eagle Eye smirked.  “If you ask me, this doesn’t sound half as bad as it looked from the outside--”

    Crkkkk-k-k-k-k-k…

    Everypony froze as the ship groaned around them.  Droplets of water fell loose from the ceiling.  Josho’s glowing horn reflected off wavering bands of moisture in the distant edge of the corridor.

    Props gulped and stood closer to Eagle Eye, shivering.

    “Yeah, okay…”  Rainbow Dash nodded, her ruby eyes darting left and right.  “Let’s get this mission over with before the ship decides to fart us out.”

    “Nothing but poetry,” Josho droned.

    “Propsy, where do we go, girl?” Eagle asked.

    “Uhm…”  Props reached under her cloak and produced a metal instrument.  She tapped it a few times with her other hoof, then held it over her head, squinting.  After a few seconds, she smiled happily at the rest.  “Down!”

    “Unnngh…”  Josho shook his head and stumbled forward.  “I swear, if we run into any iceberg yettis down here, I’m tossing her at them first.”

    “Iceberg… yettis…?”  Eagle Eye blinked.

    “It’s called an imagination, kid.  You should try it sometime.”

    “I think that’s the last thing we need right now.”  Rainbow Dash motioned the other two to follow as she hovered after Josho.  “Let’s go, ponies.” She looked forward. “Stay frosty--”  Her eyes crossed.

    Eagle Eye groaned while Props giggled.

    “Yeah…”  Rainbow’s nostrils flared.  “Just forget I said anything.”

    The group followed the bobbing light of Josho’s horn into the frozen metal intestines of the derelict ship.

		//------------------------------//
		// Everypony Hates the Water Temple		//------------------------------//

	Crkkk-kkk-kkk!

	Eagle Eye winced, ducking his head slightly as he glanced forlornly at the rattling ceiling of a tight hallway.  Gulping, he adjusted his hoodie and shuffled along with his sword and shield levitating alongside.

	Ahead of him, Props, Rainbow Dash, and Josho traversed narrow chambers between cold leaning bulkheads.  The light from the two unicorns shone off of glossy metal surfaces, giving the claustrophobic interior an ethereal quality.

	"Have we figured out just who this ship belonged to yet?" Rainbow Dash spoke out loud.

	"Hmmm..."  Props rubbed her chin in thought.  "Quadruple bolted bulkheads.  Exposed mana conduits.  Reliance on leyline reinforcement coils instead of enchanted crystals."  She smirked.  "I'd say standard Alexian tech."

	"Alexian?" Rainbow repeated aloud.

	Eagle Eye's echoing voice spoke up.  "They're unicorns and earth ponies who hail from the far south."

	"I thought there was nothing but ocean south of us."

	"Er... south of Franzington, more or less."  Eagle Eye smiled nervously.  "Below Ledomare, the Continent breaks up into a bunch of seas and deep rivers that open up into the ocean.  Alexia is the closest archipelago to the mainland, and the equines there have mastered ship building and merchant trade.  They've been known to sail their mana-powered steamships all along the continental shore.  Where they're not exploring or trading, they're at least selling their ships to other cultures who need to use them."

	"So this may not have been run by... Alexians."

	"Certainly smells too good in here to be Alexian," Josho said in a dull tone.  "For all the time they spend around water, those bootstrapped freakazoids never bothered to bathe."

	"Yes, well..."  Eagle Eye shuddered.  "That's one reason we always fought for the Ledomaritans and not for the Alexians."

	"Yeesh."  Rainbow Dash winced.  "Was everyone on your continent going to war with someone?"

	"Made for a good economy," Josho said.  "Heck, all the explosions you started in Blue Nova has gotta give tons of ponies new jobs."

	"Jee... thanks..." Rainbow muttered with folded ears.

	"It's sad to think about," Props spoke aloud.  "Jasper, Ebony, and I had a lot of reasons to call Nightshade a 'meanie head,' but we never had any grudge against the hundreds upon thousands of ponies who worked for her."  She pouted.  "With her company going bye-bye now, how many of those employees are going to have trouble feeding the mouths of their beloveds?"

	"Well, Props, with the war over, maybe they'll consider something that doesn't involve the construction of weapons," Eagle Eye said.  "I can already see the Council of Ledo funding a major agricultural boom!"

	"If they're lucky, they'll just open borders with the northwest provinces and let ponies fill in a lot of that abandoned farmland," Josho said.  "Who cares if the plains are haunted by the spirits of the dead caribou who once lived there."

	"Hey, uh, not to sound like a heartless lame-o, but does it really matter?"  Rainbow Dash's jaw tightened.  "That place is friggin' behind us.  Let's just focus on what's ahead."

	Eagle Eye craned his head with a smirk.  "You've said that a bunch of times already, and yet here we are in the belly of a crashed sea vessel.  How does this count on 'focusing on what's ahead?'"

	Rainbow exhaled out her nostrils.  "Look, we're here for Props, okay?  I made her a promise that we'd look for her Uncle, so let's get it done."

	Props gasped, hopping excitedly.  "So you do remember!"

	"I always did," Rainbow muttered, wings flapping between the icy bulkheads.  "I just lost track of what was truly important for a while there."

	"Our... uhm... safety...?"

	"Let's start with 'happiness' and see if we can make the ends meet."

	"Shhhh!"  Josho hissed.

	"Wow, old stallion," Eagle spat.  "Way to be a buzz kill."

	"No!  I mean it!"  He raised a hoof while glaring at a corner of the hallway.  "Clam up!"

	Everypony came to a stop behind him, dead silent.

	Josho's eyes narrowed.  He gazed from left to right.  At some point, a slight clattering sound emanated from the bulkheads in front of them.  His ears twitched, and he turned to look back at Rainbow.

	Eagle and Props trembled.  Rainbow, in the meantime, nodded back and flapped her wings harder.  With the grace of a flying serpent, she slinked around Josho's shoulder, clung to the ceiling, and flew her way around the corner.

	Edging her way into the shadows, she flew for a few frozen seconds.  At last, hovering to a stop, she pulled the collar of her leather coat down and ran a hoof across her pendant.  A dim glow lit up the room, casting ruby beams across the walls.  Rainbow Dash found herself staring into what must have been an open storage compartment.  It was twice as wide as the Noble Jury's mess hall.  What's more, it was longer  How long—she couldn't say, the reason being that half of the chamber was submerged in water.

	It felt colder in the room, but it wasn't just the water's fault.  Gazing up, Rainbow saw that the ceiling of the chamber sloped up while the floor went down.  Exposed ice from the glacier pierced the bulkheads, and a fine mist hung over the waters.  From what she could judge, that portion of the ship had broken like a twig where it impacted the glacier, and the water had formed overtime from where the ancient ice had melted from friction.

	Hoofsteps echoed behind her as the rest of the group trotted to a stop behind Rainbow.

	"Sinking squirrelsicles!" Props exclaimed.  "This ship sure took a dip!"

	"I'm guessing all the water came from the glacier," Josho remarked.

	"I thought the ice was too old to just melt," Eagle Eye said.

	Props shrugged.  "Could be that exposed manaconduits caught fire and provided enough heat to allow a slow burn."

	"That would explain the burn marks along the shattered bulkheads," Rainbow said.  Biting her lip, she levitated down and pressed the tip of her hoof into the waters.  "Hssssss!"  She hovered back up, shaking her forelimb as if she had burned it.  "Luna poop!  I think I grew new nipples from just touching th-that!"

	"Why would you even do that?" Eagle asked.

	Josho pointed.  "That's why."

	Eagle and Props craned their necks to see.  Their muzzles hung agape.

	A dim orange glow emanated from the submerged end of the sunken chamber.  There was a light source from beyond the broken part of the ship.

	"Is... is it a fire?" Props remarked.

	"I feel bad for not seeing it first," Eagle Eye stammered.

	"Yeah, well, nopony's perfect, princess," Josho said.  He turned towards Rainbow Dash.  "Whoever's alive on board this ship, they're probably camped on the other side.  If I know a crap or two about Alexian vessels, we've just trotted the bulk of it.  That end is smaller and likely more insulated."

	"Seems like a good place for survivors to last a while," Rainbow said with a nod.  "I wonder if any magical devices could operate from inside?"

	"What for?"

	Rainbow turned towards Props.  "How's the signal?"

	The goggled mare held up the instrument in question.  After half a minute, she flashed Rainbow a bright-eyed look.  "Could from anywhere.  Which probably means..."

	"Right under our noses," Rainbow Dash said with a nod. She turned back to the waters.  "There's gotta be a way to get over there."

	"All the other passageways are blocked up by ice," Props said.  "We all saw it on the way here."

	"We could go outside the ship again," Josho said.  "See if there's another way to enter the vessel from the far side."

	"Nah... All of that is under the iceberg's surface," Rainbow said.  "The way we entered is the only way to do it."

	"What if we got one of Floydien's or Roarke's tools from the hangar and tried to burn a hole into the far side of the ship's hull?" Eagle Eye asked.

	Crkkk-kkkk!

	Everypony fidgeted nervously as ripples of water ran across the disturbed pool.

	"Couldn't have said it better myself," Rainbow Dash said, starting to strip of her coat.  "The longer we take to get to the far side of the ship, there's not going to be any ship."

	"Uhhh..." Eagle Eye squinted.  "What are you doing?"  He jolted as Rainbow's coat was thrown into his telekinetic field.

	"What does it look like?"  Rainbow Dash cracked the joints in her neck.  "The next step is simple.  I'm gonna swim in there and check what's on the other side."

	"Pffft... Your funeral, color wheel," Josho said.

	"Are you out of your pony mind?!" Eagle Eye gasped.  "That's freezing water!  You'll become a winged popsicle!"

	"You obviously weren't born in a floating cloud city."  Rainbow Dash smirked at him in the unicorns' light. "I can handle cold.  I'm 'cool' all the time for a reason, y'know."

	"Rainbow, this isn't a joke!  You could freeze to death!"

	"It doesn't look that far of a swim," Rainbow said.  "Besides, looks like they got a fire on the other side.  I should be fine."

	"At least let one of us come with you!" Eagle Eye said.  "You shouldn't have to go alone!"

	"Look, I'll give you guys a signal."  Rainbow nodded towards Josho.  "You bring the sound stones?"

	Josho nodded and slipped one from out of his jacket.

	Rainbow grabbed it in the crook of her hoof.  "I'll fill you guys in on what I find.  If I need help, then one of you can come over.  Feel free to spend the next minute or two deciding who gets to be a second-wing polar bear for the afternoon."

	"I volunteer Eagle Eye," Josho grunted.

	"Dude!" Eagle squeaked.

	"He already looks purple!" Props giggled.

	"D-dudette!" Eagle squeaked in a higher pitch.

	"Nnnngh... Yeah... I think I could use an excuse to wake up."  Rainbow Dash gazed at the waters.  "Celestia, give me strength."

	"At this rate, she would do better to give you balls," Josho said.

	"Not where I'm going."  Rainbow Dash said.  Stepping up to the pool's edge, she took one breath... two breaths... three breaths... then clamped the soundstone into her mouth and—

	Splooosh!

	If a million knives stabbed every single square inch of her body, it still wouldn't have been an adequate description of how cold it felt.  Undaunted, Rainbow Dash kicked her limbs, torpedoing her way towards the dim light on the far end of the sunken chamber.
		//------------------------------//
		// Shoulda Brought a Tank Buster		//------------------------------//

    When Rainbow Dash emerged, she felt strangely colder than when she was underwater.  This produced a gasp, followed by the clattering sound of her sound stone falling to the metal floor.  She caught it before it could roll back into the waters.  Shuffling up the steep incline of metal, she spread her wings and shook her body from head to tail.  Most of the agonizing water droplets rolled off her, but she was still coated with a fine layer of frosty liquid.

    Rubbing her forelimbs together, she next brought a trembling hoof to her pendant and rubbed it rigorously.  The ruby light from her Element glowed at its maximum luminosity, warming the ends of her moist coat hairs.  She still felt numb through and through, but at least she hadn’t collapsed.

    Without hesitation, she flapped her wings while performing vigorous “galloping” motions in midair.  Once the blood started flowing, she breathed more easily, pivoting about to take in the far side of the ship where she had swum to.

    Though it was paltry compared to the vibrance of her pendant, Rainbow Dash could make out the hint of a fire on the opposite end of the chamber.  A stack of crates stood between here and the light source, obscuring the details of the room.

    Shuddering, Rainbow reached down, grabbed the sound stone in the crook of her hoof, and proceeded forward.

    “Scrkkk!  Dashie?!  You frozen to death?”

    “Sorry to disappoint you, girl,” Rainbow Dash said.  “Tell Josho and EE I’m safe.”  She gulped.  “For now.”

    “Uh oh!  Is there something super scary and dangerous on that side?”

    “Only thing dangerous in here is me,” Rainbow Dash said as she hovered over the crates and peered on the other side.  “As for super and scary…”

    A camp had been set up, with several empty and crumpled soup cans forming a pile in the far corner.  Rainbow Dash saw two burlap saps with potato sacks for pillows.  A set of random horseshoes lay on the side, and there were multiple chests full of metal trinkets, tools, and nick-nacks.

    ”Well?  Don’t leave us in suspenders!”

    “The fire’s still fresh,” Rainbow Dash said as she hovered further over the indoor campsite.  “Looks like they’re using tiny white filament to burn.  Doesn’t look like hay to me.  Besides, where they heck would anypony get hay?”

    ”That’s probably excess manafibers from the ship’s backup!  That’s why Alexia never gets to play with the big boys.  Everything they build is flammable in some way or another!”

    “Seems to be working for whoever’s here.”

    ”Do you see ‘em?  Huh?  Huh?”

    “Can’t see much of anything, to be honest.”  Rainbow squinted along the far end of the chamber.  “Looks like there’s a passage that leads out of here.  For all we know, whoever’s been hiding here has plenty of more places to crawl away.”

    ”Josho’s asking if you can tell how many have been staying down there!”

    “Well, I see two beds.  So it’s either two ponies or one really fat pony.”

    ”You sure it’s an equine?”

    “I doubt the extra horseshoes are for eating.”

    ”Can you see the communications array, at least?”

    “Looking as we speak.”  Rainbow Dash trotted along the corridor, sweeping her vision across the firelit resources.  “Sure is dank in here.  I wonder how much oxygen there is to burn.”

    ”There’s probably an air leak that connects to the atmosphere above the iceberg.”

    Crkkkkkk-kkkk!

    Rainbow Dash paused, staring at the ceiling.  “Thank you both for reminding me what’s at stake here.”  She proceeded forward.  “Lots of junk around this part of the ship.”

    ”You mean tools and metal machine parts and the like?”

    “You’ve seen one, you’ve seen them all.”

    ”I knew it!  Uncle Prowse can never sit around without tinkering on something!  He’s gotta be there!”

    “Hold your blondie, horses… er…”  Rainbow Dash rolled her eyes and sighed.  “You know what I mean…”

    ”Have you seen any transprocketed bilateral strut casings?  He can make those babies in his sleep!”

    “No… I’m… uh… just seeing a bunch of crap.”  Rainbow Dash hovered to a stop, blinking.  “And I think I’m seeing the crappiest bit of all.”

    ”Huh?”

    “It’s the communication array.  I’m staring right at it.  At least I think I am.”  Rainbow flew closer to a jagged console with exposed wires and dimly glowing blue diodes.  “It’s looking like it just threw its own guts out after eating spoiled daffodil alfredo.”

    ”I-I’m sure it’s just water damage!”

    “It’s about the cruddiest I’ve seen a pony-built structure since I flew over Silvadel.”  Rainbow Dash sighed.  “Props, it doesn’t look like anypony’s been around to repair this thing in ages.”

    ”What… what do you mean, Dashie?”

    “I dunno, Props.  But it’s not looking good.  If your Uncle Prowse was really around, I’m sure he wouldn’t let this thing go to waste like it did.”  Rainbow hung her head.  “I hate to be such a downer, but it might be time that we expect the worst--Mmmmmmmffff!”

    A metal forelimb with multiple digits had wrapped around Rainbow’s muzzle from behind.

    “Ye bit yer blue boggin bawbag yoo've got yerself th' warst, ye huddy tube!”  The world spun around Rainbow as she was lifted in a violent bear-hug--”Hrraaaaaaaugh!”--and suplexed through a wooden box behind her.  Smassssh!

    Rainbow’s sound stone fell loose, rattling towards the far end of the chamber.  ”Dashie?!  Dashie, come in!  Dashiiiiiiie!” Props’ voice strobed against a sudden onslaught of darting shadows.

    “Unnngh…”  Seeing stars, Rainbow struggled to stand up.  A heavy weight pressed against her from behind.  “Gughh!”

    “Yoo've come tae steal uir lit, eh?”  A hoof and a metal hand gripped Rainbow’s skull from behind.  “Aam gonnae skelp yer fizzog aff tae Spark's blazes, ye loopin wanker!”

    “Grnnnngh!”  Rainbow spread her wings, knocking the weight off to give her space to slam the attacker in the groin.

    “Ach, my bloody knob!”

    “Yaaaugh!”  Rainbow flew her elbow back,  Her tingling skin felt the hint of a beard, then struck all cranium.  Whud!

    “Ooomf!”  The body stumbled back with uneven hoofsteps.

    Rainbow backflipped, twirled in mid-air, and turned--snarling--towards her attacker.  “Okay, who ordered the concussion with a side of fries?!”

    “Grrrrrr!”  A tall, lanky horse with a scraggly red tail and an even scragglier tail stood--cross-legged--glaring at Rainbow through a squinting eye.  “Yoo're a reit jobby bastart!  Snuck in frae winter's oothoose tae hae a go at mah wares, huh?!”

    Rainbow frowned.  “I think I’ll settle for your face, you overgrown redwood forest--”

    Clakka-clak-clak!  The stallion’s metal left forelimb converted into a boomstick, burning bright red.

    “Luna poop!”  Rainbow turned tail and flew.

    Kapow!  Kapow!  Kapow!  The chamber erupted with the echoing salvos.

    Chunks of metal splashed at Rainbow’s hooves as she desperately outraced the mayhem.

    “Professor!” a timid voice stammered from beyond the thunder.  “Stop it!  She obviously didn’t know what she was getting into--”

    “Shut yer cabbage hole, loon!!”  The augmented stallion spat, his blue eyes quivering after his darting target.  “Aam blastin' thes pigeon's yanny in twain!”

    “To what end?!  You’ll sink us all!”

    “I'll jawbox 'er first--”

    Rainbow spun, kicked against the ceiling, and sailed towards her foe.  Her ruby light blinded him, causing the stallion to stumble backwards, gripping his pained eyes.  She flew into his chest with a massive backdrop, kicked his leg joints, then spun around.  Flinging a hoof up, she grabbed his neck from behind and dropped straight down, slamming his chin against her shoulder.

    “Gaaagh!” The stallion flailed and fell back through a crate of metal junk, smoking leg cannon and all.

    Panting, Rainbow Dash kipped back on all fours.  “Okay…”  She wiped her brow.  “That sure warmed me up.”  She turned around limply.  “Now, who in the hay did I just go to war with--Oh jeez!” She flinched back dramatically.

    A giant shell with features jerked back, its scaled facial features wincing behind a jagged beak.  “Please!  Don’t hurt me!  I can’t help it if my only friend is a half-metal psychopath!”

    “Uhhhhh…”  Rainbow Dash’s eyes fell over the reptile’s stubby legs and tail from where they stuck out the rigid shell.  “I’m not sure where to punch you even if I wanted to.”

    “It’s okay!  We’re both harmless!”  The reptile smiled awkwardly.  “Really!”

    “Raaaaaugh!” The stallion stood back up, eyes crooked above a bleeding smile.  “Dinnae talk mince, Tankette lass!”  He threw his left limb out again, converting it to a jagged grappling hook.  Clakka-clakkkk!  “I've nae yit begin tae gie thes winged fitbaw a beatin'!”

    Rainbow grind her hooves against the metal floor.  “Pull the trigger, bucko, and I’ll be making you eat those words you keep crapping out!”

    “Try meh, ya wee fart!”

    Splasssssh!  A loud gasping noise emanated from the waters, followed by a sputtering, “Uncle?”

    The stallion’s ears instantly folded.  “Propsicle…?”  Lips quivering, he turned to look across the campfire.  “Did Ah jist hear mah propsicle?”

    “Unky Prowsy!” Props hopped up and down, splashing water everywhere.

    “Weel, Ah’ll be skint tae Spark's mana dust!”  He fired the grappling hook at her.  “Come haur, lassie!”

    Rainbow flinched, only to watch the metal claw expertly wrap three times around Props’ midsection.  The mare was flung viciously towards the lanky stallion.

    “Heeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee!”

    The collision sent the two rolling back through a rattling ocean of nuts and bolts.  They rolled in the grease and ended with the lank stallion sitting on his bony haunches while rubbing the mare’s skull harshly with a metal hoof.

    “Whew!  Yoo're a micht chankin!  Hae ye bin rollin' aroond in th' arctic pools withit a sweater?”

    “I had to come find you, Unky Prowsy!”  The mare shivered, but nevertheless nuzzled his pale fuzzy chest dearly, her smile wide enough to burst.  “Mmmmm!  I can smell the soot on you for days!  What are you doing down here?!”

    “Tryin' tae bide aheid ay th' braw wi' naethin' but a turtle tae lean oan!  And you?”

    “Ohhhhhh outrunning evil war machines, giant frost wyrms, and super meanie unicorns with inconceivably high power levels!  But enough about me!  Tell me about youuuuu!”

    “Ohhhhh Propsicles.”  The stallion sniffled, nuzzling her with his red beard.  “Ah cannae keep mah eyes dry with the sweet smell of ya.”

    Rainbow Dash stared, rubbing her head.  A scaled hand touched her shoulder.  She flinched once more.

    The turtle winced behind her beak.  “Erm… sorry.  My name is Elma.  Elma Boreal.”  She shrugged.  “It’s a snapping turtle name.”

    “I bet it is.”

    “Are you here for the Professor?”

    “Professor?”

    “Yeah.  Professor Prowse.”

    “Uhhh…”  Rainbow Dash glanced over at the tender reunion.  “More or less.”

    Elma gulped.  “Did you br-bring tranquilizers?”

		//------------------------------//
		// They May Dash Our Lives...		//------------------------------//

    “You caught the Professor’s signal?” Elma Boreal asked with a quivering beak.

    “Errr… yeah.  It took us most of the day to get here.”

    “How’d you navigate the icebergs?”

    “Well, we flew.”

    Elma gasped.  “You’ve got an airship?!”  Her reptilian eyes narrowed on Rainbow’s wings.  “Err… or do you mean you personally?”

    “As much as I’d love to, I wouldn’t be able to carry robo-bronco’s niece on my lonesome.”  Rainbow gestured towards the pool of water where Props had just emerged.  “We’ve got an airship.  Four of us came down here to the wreck to rescue who’s left.  Tell me, how many of you guys are down here?”

    “Erm…”  Elma brushed one foot with another, her shell rattling slightly.  “Just us two.  We holed up in here where it was better insulated, but we were starting to run out of food ever since we were stranded here.”

    “You were stranded here?”  Rainbow squinted.  “What exactly happened to you guys?”

    “Well, uhm, there were these pirates, you see, and they thought they could make away with this Alexian tech while there were passengers on board and--”

    “Haaaaugh!”  Prowse shoved the overgrown turtle away with a savage metal hoof.  “Stap yer havering, Tankette!  Yer story doesnae hae enaw explosions in it!”  He spun towards Rainbow Dash, wild eyes and even wilder whiskers.  “A boorichie ay mingin' pirate mingers tried tae hae uir guts fur garters! Sae Ah gae them a taste ay th' auld professor's boomstick! Showed them th' sights ay th' abyss, Ah did!  It was Spark's blessin' 'at we ran aroond ay a floatin' piece ay frizzen guff insteid ay sinkin' tae Spark's shadaw an' becomin' frost w'rm scran!”  He grinned proudly.

    Rainbow Dash blinked at him.  Slowly, she brought a hoof up and wiped the copious amount of spit from her deadpan face.  Panning over, she stared at Props.  “Care to relay that in your typical Bouncelish?”

    The blonde mare slid into sight, smiling.  “Unky Prowsy here says that they ran into a bunch of pirates, but he blasted them away with his super cooly crispies prosthetic arm cannon!  Then they luckily ran aground this iceberg!’

    “Ach, pure barry!”  Prowse nodded with a red-bearded grin.  “Boggin buncha dobbers ran off!  Ah hud tae slap together a communications array wi' th' baur scrap ay th' naf they left us!”  He kicked a crate of metal junk on his right.  “Thes is what's left ay th' lest attempt.”  He kicked the box of junk on his left.  “Thes is th' mince frae th' first thee.”

    Elma finally finished rolling over in time to stammer, “You only had to do it so many times because it kept blowing up in our faces!”

    “Ach, don’t get totally radge on meh, Tankette!”  Prowse rolled his eyes.  “Luckily, yoo've got a sheel an' aam guid at booncin' oan mah crease.”

    Elma hoisted Rainbow down by her pendant.  “Pleeeeeeeease tell me you’ve got room on your airship for the both of us!”  She gulped.  “Or at least just me!”

    “Dornt be sassin' me loch th' pirates noo!”

    “Professor, you haven’t had a wink of sleep in four days!  We need to get out of here!”

    “Anno!”  The stallion waved his prosthetic with a smile.  “Lit me jist gie mah triple sprocketed nick nacks an' bob's yer uncle!”

    “Weeeeeee!”  Props hopped and hopped in place.  “I get to sample Unky’s Tech!  It’s been so long!”

    “Wait wait wait…”  Rainbow Dash waved her forelimbs.  “Hold on!”

    ”Scrkkkk!  Rainbow?!  This is Eagle!  Are you and Props alright?!  She just dove in and--”

    “Yes!  We’re fine!  We’re all fine!  Just everypony stop talking and spitting for one second!”  Rainbow Dash took a deep breath, her feathertips fluttering in the camplight.  “Alright… this place is starting to crumble all around us, and we haven’t got much time.”

    “Just point me where to go and I’ll move my shell!” Elma said with a wide-eyed expression.  “Between pirates and the cold and the constant threat of an leg cannon, I’m ready to jump through flaming hoops!”

    Prowse narrowed his eyes.  “Ye pure cannae expect me tae lae aw ay mah patented doohickeys behin'!”

    “Believe me, buddy,” Rainbow droned with folded ears.  “You’re doohickey enough.  Now, let’s mosey.”

    “But at least lemme keep meh--”

    Crkkkk-kkkkkk-kkkk!  The entire chamber shook.  A savage crack formed in the bulkheads ahead, immediately showering the interior with snow and flakes of frost.

    Props gasped, her blue eyes blinking wide.  She leapt aside and clung--trembling--to her stalwart uncle.

    “What in the turtle gods is that?” Elma stammered.

    “Uhhhh…”  Rainbow gulped.  She raised the sound stone to her muzzle.  “Eagle?  Josho?  You feel that?”

    ”I’m pretty sure Crimson and Tweak back in Aurum felt it!  We gotta get out of here!”

    The entire ship groaned once more, as if a large object was scraping at it from down below.

    “Whoopsie poopsie…”  Props gulped.  “I don’t like the sound of this…”

    “Ay, lass…”  Prowse nodded inquisitively in Rainbow’s direction.  “Ye didne by chance happen tae attract onie giant brine serpents wi' wee danglin' lanterns alang th' way haur, did ye?”

    “Uhhhhhhh…”  Rainbow Dash’s forehead glistened with a single sweatdrop.

    Crkkk-kkkkk!  The chamber shook violently.  This time, the turbulence was accompanied with the noise of a deep bass roar.  Two seconds of silence later…

    Crackkkk!  A bulkhead in the far corner of the chamber exploded with a gust of water.

    “Bloody Hell!” Prowse gasped.

    Through the splashing water and rippling metal, a gaping maw lined with serrated teeth showed in the rippling firelight.

    “Frost wyrms!” Elma howled.

    “Show’s over, everyturtle!”  Rainbow Dash darted towards the pool of water on the opposite end, motioning to the group to follow.  “Time to get wet!  Move it!”  Her voice was swallowed up by the sound of bulkheads collapsing all around them.

		//------------------------------//
		// Cold of Jury: Mustering Warmare		//------------------------------//

    “Lit me jist grab mah tools an' aam guid!”  Prowse dove towards his supplies, only to be tugged backwards by his scruffy read tail.

    “Pffft!”  Rainbow spat, “You stay here and you’re meat!  Move it!”

    Crkkkkkk!  The entire compartment collapsed in a wave of imploding debris towards the quartet.  With invasive jets of freezing water, the mouth of the frost wyrm lunged closer and closer, filling the ship’s interior with sparkling light from its crimson lantern.

    “Ohpoopohpoopohpoop!” Props squeaked as she fidgeted at the pool’s edge.  “How’d I do this the first time?!”

    “It's loch i've aye said, lassie! Less thinkin' an' mair spelunkin'!”  Prowse bucked her savagely in the flank.  “Noo oan yer trolley!”

    Whap!  “Eeeep!”  Props plunged into the rippling waters.  Sploosh!

    “Make loch tatties an' mash, Tankette!”  Prowse dove after his niece.  Splash!

    Rainbow waved a hoof while barreling across the rocky floor.  “Come on, Miss Boreal!  We gotta get out before this whole place does an eggshell impression!”  She stopped at the waters and spun around.  “Elma--Oh for Pete’s sake!”

    “Nnnghhh…”  Elma winced, oozing her scaled limbs forward while the gobbling maw of the frost wyrm tore through the metal behind her.  “Not… so g-good… on land!”

    “Friggin’ A!”  Rainbow darted over, positioning herself at the snapping turtle’s stubby tail.  She pushed with two forelimbs, slipping on the slick floor.  So she spun around, putting her back into it as she shoved against the creature’s shell with all her might.  “Gnnnngh!”

    Craakkkk!  A layer of serrated teeth slammed into the floor just centimeters from Rainbow’s hooves.

    The breathless pegasus slumped backwards over Elma’s shell.  “Duahhhhhhh…!”

    The turtle glanced back.  “Is it close?”

    “You can pull your legs in, right?”

    “Y-yeah!  Every turtle can since hatching--”

    Rainbow spun around and gripped opposite sides of her shell.  “Do it!  Do it now!”

    “Oh gosharooni!”  Elma’s limbs retreated into her body.

    “Nnnnnnnnngh!”  Rainbow’s facial muscles contorted as she carried the weight of herself and the giant reptile on her wings alone.  She fluttered forward just seconds before the giant wyrm’s jaws slashed through the floor where they were situated.  With agonizingly slow grace, the pegasus threw the two of them into the morbidly freezing pool.  Once submerged, the collapsing ship sounded off with echoing salvos against Rainbow’s twitching ears.  She held Elma’s body for buoyancy and paddled her hooves behind the two of them, propelling both through the murky depths.  The faint light of unicorn magic shone ahead, and Rainbow propelled the pair upwards as bubbles erupted all around them.

    Four bodies jolted backwards, wide-eyed.

    “Spppkkkkkt… guhhh!”  Rainbow hissed, shoving Elma’s shell onto dry metal, shivering.  “Like f-foaling… sn-snowponies… I swear!  Mmmnnffngh!”

    “Rainbow!  What happened?!”  Eagle Eye leaned forward with her coat.  “Who’s this stallion?  Did you find Prowse!”

    Rainbow batted his hoof away and jumped up on jittery hooves.  “It’s r-right behind us!”

    “What is?” Eagle asked.

    Hcrkkkk!  The partially-caved-in ceiling finally collapsed entirely, revealing the moist throat and lashing teeth of the arctic eel.

    “Ackies!” Eagle stumbled backwards, tripping on Rainbow’s coat.

    “It’s gonna gobble us like gob-gobs!” Props shrieked into Prowse’s shoulder.

    “Hook hooves wi' me, bonnie lassie!”  Prowse extended his left forelimb into a glowing cannon.  Clakka-clak!  “An' i'll feed thes jobby taker some flak!”  Kapow!  Pow!

    The frost wyrm groaned as the high calibre shots took chunks of its teeth and gums away.  The water turned red as it churned closer.

    “Stop it!”  Rainbow wheezed from where she slid across the trembling floor with Elma’s shell.  “No sense in making it more ticked off than it already is--”

    ”Raaaaaaaaaaaaugh!”  Josho stormed forward, unloading several blasts of his shotgun into the monster’s mouth.

    The creature’s muscles quivered with each violent impact.  Once enough of its flesh had been torn away, it shook, shimmied, and slinked away from the crumpled hull.

    Josho gritted his teeth, grinning into the smoke from his levitating gun.  “Nnnnngh--Buck yeah!”  He spun with a wicked smirk tossed Prowse’s way.  “Friggin’ finally!  A pony who likes to party my way!”

    “Ach, brae, sonny jim!”

    “Uhhhhh…”  Eagle’s glowing horn illuminated the dust and flakes of metal falling from the ceiling.  “Rainbowwwww?”

    “We need to get out of here!” Rainbow shouted.

    “The Jury should be right outside!” Props squeaked.

    “Skelp my baheid!”  Prowse glanced at her.  “Ye hae an airship?!”

    “I’d think so!”  Props nodded, blonde bangs flouncing.  “I’ve been in her womb all month!”

    “If Ah kent ye hud it in ye tae be a fanny filly Ah woods hae hoofed ye a brush insteid ay wrench!”  Prowse heaved the gasping mare onto his back and broke into a sprint.  “Let's jit! Lest a body it can kiss mah mother's erse!”

    “I’m with oatmeal mouth!”  Eagle Eye yelped as he scampered after the two.

    “Everypony remember the way in which we came!” Rainbow shouted, then looked at the remaining stallion.  “Josho?”

    “Wha--?”

    Rainbow flung the shell into his telekinetic field.  “You’re on turtle duty!”  She picked up her coat, flapped her wings, and shot after the group.  “Move it move it move it!”

    “Huh?!”  Josho turned the shell over.

    A wrinkly reptilian face slid out, her beak to his muzzle.  “Hello!”

“Augh!”  Josho flinched, nearly dropping her.  “Anus!”

    ”Joshoooo!”

    “Coming!”  Josho grimaced as he floated Elma along his galloping figure.  “I swear to Ledo, when it shits, it pours.”

    “You’re a horse with a horn in its head!  Neato!”  Elma wheezed in mid twirl.  “And I thought wings were pushing it…”

    “I didn’t ask for a soundtrack!” Josho grumbled as he navigated collapsing bulkheads and falling walls.  “Arrrrrgh!”  He leapt through an imploding doorframe while water and ice shards splashed madly behind him.

    “Come on!”  Rainbow grabbed his hoof and hoisted the two stragglers along as they threaded through a claustrophobic interior growing thinner and thinner by the second.  Rivets and bolts popped on either side of them while torturous jets of arctic cold water sprinkled their skin.  “Just a little further along!  I can already see daylight!”

    Up ahead, Props gasped from atop Prowse’s back.  “Holey moley the holey!”

    Prowse’s blue eyes reflected the collapsing exit at the end of the hallway.  “We cannae make it! it's tay damn thin!”

    “Hold up!”  Eagle hurled himself past the two of them.  He slid to a stop, planting his hooves against the bottom edges of the bowing door’s frame.  Cl-Clank!  He telekinetically planted his sword and shield between the buckling planks of metal, forcing a thin gape to remain intact.  “Nnnnnghhh… okay… g-go through!” The ex-mercenary hissed.

    “Barry job, bonnie loon.”  Prowse slinked on past him with Props in tow.

    Slivers of metal and copper plating collapsed around Eagle’s trembling body.  Breathless, he looked down into the ship’s dark interior and hissed, “Rainbow…?!”

    “We’re right behind ya!”  Rainbow and Josho reached the doorframe… but only then woke up to just how obese the former enforcer was.  “Awwwww crapazoid.  How the heck are we gonna do this?”

    “Like so.”  Josho lowered Elma to the floor.

    “Uhhh…”  The turtle glanced up.  What are you doing--

    Plonk!  The stallion kicked her so that she slid out between Eagle Eye’s legs.

    “Gaaaaaaaaiiie!”  Elma slid to a stop along the iceberg beside Prowse and Props.

    “Now for the main event…”  Josho hooked a forelimb around both Rainbow and Eagle.  “No moist ideas.  Hnnngh!”  With a telekinetic boost, he shoved the three of them forward.  The doorframe exploded around them, giving them the berth they needed for an emergency exit.  Milliseconds later, the hull of the ship sunk behind them, collapsing into the frosty body of the iceberg.

    “Guhhh!”  Rainbow winced as she, Eagle Eye, and Josho went sprawling across the sheet of ice.  The wind picked up, and Rainbow looked up to see the Noble Jury looming directly above.  Zaid and Ebon Mane stood on the door plank to the open hangar.

    “Hey!  Awesome!”  Zaid said, pointing.  “An excuse for Mr. Sailboat to make more soup!”

    “Rainbow!  What’s going on?!”

    “Lower and grab us!” Rainbow shouted.  “Quick!”

    Ebon hollered into a sound stone, his voice cracking above the arctic wind.  “Floydien!  Bring us down more!  Rainbow found survivors, but they all need to get on board!  ASAP!”

    “You heard the stallion!”  Zaid leaned down, hoof outstretched.  “Aching Saddle Ass Pronto!”

    With a dull hum, the Noble Jury lowered towards the tip of the iceberg.  Prowse was halfway through hoisting Props on board with a massive roll of thunder lit the air.  Rainbow Dash and Josho looked back to see the chunk of ice cracking in two and the collapsed ship falling into the frothing depths below.

    “Thaaaaaat’s a big crack!”  Eagle stammered.

    “I’ve worn bigger.”  Josho twirled and threw Eagle sky-high with a burst of mana.  While the shrieking unicorn flew in, Josho jumped, grabbed onto the hangar plank’s edge, and required Zaid, Props, and Ebon to be pulled on board.  Meanwhile Prowse hopped in while Rainbow shoved on board Elma.

    Not long after, a blood-curdling growl emanated from the waters.  Rainbow’s ears twitched, and immediately she stopped what she was doing to yell, “Up!  Up!  Go up!”

    Sploooosh!

    With a high-pitched shriek, the bloodied frost wyrm lunged out of the waters, its teeth clamping onto the stern of the Noble Jury.

    “Bloody Hell!”  Prowse found himself thrown against the hangar wall.  He tried to aim an arm cannon but fell victim to the throes of inertia.

    “What what what what what--?!”  Ebon pointed, wide-eyed and trembling.

    Zaid leaned over the ship’s cook to shout, “Rainbow!  Do something about your pet, will ya?!  She reeks!”

    “Grggggh!” Rainbow gripped the plank with her forelimbs while slamming her lower legs viciously into the monster’s gills.

    The eyes of the creature flinched, rolled back, then disappeared under mucus lids.  With a vomit of saliva, the thing released its bite on the Jury and slunk back into the waves.

    Almost instantly, the Noble Jury rose like a bottle rocket, putting yards upon yards of distance between its quivering hull and the sinking iceberg below.

    “Mmmmf!” Rainbow slumped on board the hangar, panting.  Her breathless wheezes were shared by the rest of the crew as they all stood on the stern entrance’s edge, peering into the tempestuous brine.  The pale figure of the massive frost wyrm shook and writhed violently.

    “Yeesh…”  Zaid stammered, smiling wearily at the others.  “I suppose that one dude in the robe was right… y’know… about there always being a bigger fish?”

    Josho shook his head.  “Gimme a closer shave than that and I’ll be all bone.”

    “You okay?”  Ebon shook Eagle’s dazed body.  “You’re not bitten or frozen or anything, are you?”

    “I… don’t think so…?”  The unicorn felt his bangs with a wincing expression.  “Oh Spark, how’s my mane look?”  A beat.  He blinked and glanced aside at the stallion nuzzling him.  “Uhhh… Ebon?  I said I’m fine.”

    “So what now?” Elma stammered, glancing up at the others.  “Thank you for saving us.  But we’re still out in the middle of nowhere.  What brought you out this far anyways?”

    Rainbow Dash was silent.  She stood up, glaring suddenly into the waters far below.

    “Uhm…”  Elma’s beak clammed up as her head drew deeper into her shell.  “Was it something I said?”

    Suddenly, Rainbow stripped of her saddlebag, reached inside, pulled her trusty hatchet out in her teeth, then threw the satchel into Zaid’s grasp.  Then, without warning, she spread her limbs and swan dove clear off the plank of the Noble Jury.

    “Jeebuses!” Props squeaked, eyes wide.

    “Rainbow!” Eagle Eye scampered up to the side, only to be stopped by Josho at the last second.  Ebon and Prowse also looked over in shock.  “What’s she doing?!”

    “Shhhh!”  Josho grunted, eyes squinting.

    Rainbow Dash had already splashed into the waters below.  Her body disappeared amidst the cold, freezing waves.  Not long after, the tumultuous sea calmed entirely.  The pale figure of the frost wyrm also dove into the depths, so that all that was visible was the bubbling froth from the sinking ship beside the fractured ice berg.

    Seconds past… an entire minute…

    And then, a pool of deep red murk wafted up to the water’s surface.

    Eagle Eye gasped while Ebon Mane grimaced.  Props held a hoof over her mouth and leaned against her uncle, squeaking internally.

    But, not long after…

    Splassssh!  A blurring body soared out of the water.  It ascended rapidly towards the Noble Jury on flapping blue wing.  Then, without hesitation, Rainbow Dash landed back on the plank.  Clank!  She dropped a bloody hatchet on side of the room.  Thud!  A sopping red, twitching luminescent lantern gland landed on the other side.

    “There…”  Rainbow Dash muttered, shaking the frigid droplets off her.  “Think that’ll… be enough to… warm us and our new guests… for a while, girl?”

    Props blinked back.  She then smiled.  “Okay whillikers!”  She flung the bloody organ over her backside and trotted gaily towards the engine room beyond the stairwell.  “This’ll only take a sec!  Thankies, Dashie!”

    The hangar hung in silence for a bit.

    And then…

    “Burn mah beard!”  Prowse grinned from pale ear to pale ear.  “Ah loch thes ship!”

    Zaid smirked while Ebon and Eagle exchanged glances.

    “Mrmmmf…”  Josho rolled his eyes and lurched out of the room.  “Don’t hold your breath…”

		//------------------------------//
		// Some Exposition For Your Tease		//------------------------------//

    Ebon laid a plate of lettuce onto the mess hall table before Elma.

    “Thank you,” said the snapping turtle with a beaked smile.  She took a liberal munch of the greens, gobbled it down, and closed her eyes.  “Mmmmm… it feels so good to bite into something that isn’t dried-out Alexian rations.”

    “Just how long were you both stuck there inside that crashed ship?” Ebon asked as he sat at the head of the table.

    “Oh, weeks… two months?  It’s hard to say.”  Elma bit onto some more lettuce and gulped it down.  “We spent most of the time inside.  We saw very little daylight on account of the cold.”

    “Pffft!”  Prowse gulped onto a wad of straws and pointed with a hook in the crook of his hoof.  “Mebbe ye waur braw wi' yer baltic bluid, Tankette, yer oversized hoofbaa!”  As he dug more into his plate of dried grass, Props sat by the stallion’s side, leaning in and nuzzling him with a contented smile.  “But Ah was warmin' mah anes wi' th' greatest ay aw split second inventions! A communications array 'at can operate at twintie percent efficiency!  An' Ah hud naethin' but thee bundles ay magical filament an' a worn it energy conduit tae bit!”

    “Sooooooo amazingles!”  Props squee’d, nuzzling her uncle harder.  “Leave it to you to take a nothing situation and turn it into somethingtastic!”

    Rainbow Dash squinted from where she hovered across the table.  “What I wanna know is how you got into a nothing situation to begin with.”

    Slam!  Prowse’s metal hoof slapped the table.  “It was those bludy pirates, Ah teel ye!  At a body point, me an' mah team waur cruisin' athwart th' Frizzen Seae aw calm loch, an' 'en th' next moment--WHAM--these gantin freaks in leaither armur board uir ship, strip us ay aw th' Alexian tech, an' threaten tae seel us tae a boorichie ay strangers!”

    “Uhhhhh…”  Eagle Eye turned to glance at the others in the room.  “All I got from that were ‘pirates’ and ‘strangers.’”

    “Hey, Blondie.”  Josho craned his neck to see the mare at Prowse’s side.  “Care to translate?  None of us can speak muzzle oatmealese.”

    “Maybe I can help in that department,” Elma Boreal said, raising a scaled hand.  “Ahem, what the good Professor is trying to say in his usual eloquence is that our ship was hijacked by pirates who then tried to sell us.”

    “Sell you?”  Rainbow blinked.  “To who?”

    “They… uh… they didn’t say.”  Elma fidgeted, her shell rattling slightly.  “They weren’t exactly the friendly type.”

    “Which gart it aw th' easier fur me tae blaw burnin' metal intae their jobby eatin' grins!” Prowse belched.

    “Weeeee!”  Props pumped her hoof.  “Go Unky!”

    Elma sighed, bearing a weary smile.  “Yes, the Professor did force the pirates to shove off with his… penchant for explosions.  Ahem.  But before we were abandoned, the best I could make out from the pirates is that they wanted to sell us to some mysterious group of wanderers who frequented the frozen wastes.”

    Josho glanced at Rainbow Dash.

    “Did… these strangers have a name?” Rainbow asked.

    “Well, I thought I heard something, but it didn’t make any sense,” Elma said.  “Some really silly, passive name, like the ‘lucky’ or the ‘luxury.’”

    “The Lounge,” Eagle asked.

    Elma blinked at him.  “Why… yes.  That sounds about right.”

    Rainbow Dash took a deep breath.  “We’ve heard of them before.”

    “You have?”

    “They don’t exactly sound like nice ponies…”  Rainbow fidgeted in midair.  “Assuming they are ponies.”

    “When you first arrived, we were kind of scared that maybe you were the Lounge, having come to excavate us from the ice!” Elma said.  “Why any group of shady characters would want to get their claws, hooves, or whatever on us is beyond me.”

    “Ach!  Ah ken exactly th' reason wa!”  Prowse spat.  “They're efter uir knowledge ay th' secrit lain ay opportunity!”

    Props gasped.  “You mean Zadubadabu!”

    “Unnnngh…”  Josho rolled his eyes and stormed out of the mess hall.  “Here we go…”

    “Sure!”  Prowse barked after the obese stallion.  “Ye can caa it mince if ye want!  But it's real, Ah teel ye! It's it haur in th' Frizzen Sea! It's what's causin' th' damned Strip ay Flurries! See 'at it isnae!”

    “Do you mean you almost found it?!” Props stammered.

    “If I may interject…”  Elma frowned slightly.  “This expedition into the arctic waters was meant to map out the edge of the Strip of Flurries in order to assist other maritime vessels in avoiding the turbulent waves to begin with!  It was the Professor here who insisted on turning this into some sort of maniacal archaeological pursuit of some nonexistent temple!”

    “If ye didne sass me at every turn, mebbe we'd hae gart some progress by noo, Tankette!”

    “Say, I’ve been meaning to ask…”  Props looked up with a scrunched muzzle.  “Why’s she calling you Professor this whole time?  I thought you gave up engineering school to work the shop at Gray Smoke!”

    Elma gasped, eyes wide.  “You mean you’re not even a Professor?”

    “Sure Ah am!”  Prowse grinned a bearded grin.  “Professur ay kickin' th' world's crease wi' mah mental metal meddle!”

    “Unnnngh…” Elma gripped her head with two trembling hands.  “What’s my life coming to…?”

    Eagle Eye gulped.  “Seems like the expedition was hijacked by more than just pirates…”

    “Ay!”  Prowse frowned at him.  “We waur makin' foo progress until th' bludy pirates cam alang!  So keep yer wee purple beak it ay thes, jobby jabber!”

    Eagle raised a hoof, lingered, fidgeted, and muttered, “I can’t tell whether or not to feel insulted or confused.”

    “Well I’m feeling randy,” Zaid said. Whap!  “Oww!”

    Rainbow lowered her hoof and faced the table again.  “Well, you’re welcome to stay on board where it’s safe.  We’ve got a skystone ship.  We should be able to outrun any pirates.”

    “I would hope so,” Elma said with a nod.  “The only vessels that bother to streak through these clouds are the ones powered by skystone.”

    “Well, you’re in luck!”  Props grinned wide.  “Nancy Jane’s womb is powered by the stuff!  And all of it super shiny and glowy!”

    “Ach!”  Prowse smirked, munching on hay as he ruffled the mare’s golden mane.  “Mmmmfff… Noo there's a bonnie lassie, takin' efter yer uncle wi' th' grease bawbag genes!”

    ‘Heeeeeeeeee I’m the bawbaggiest!”

    “There’s… just one thing.”  Rainbow Dash gulped.  “We’re… n-not exactly heading west on this ship.”

    “That’s fine,” Elma said.

    Rainbow blinked.  “It is?”

    “Of course!”  The turtle smiled.  “I was born across the Frozen Sea.  Alafreo, my home country, is just on the other side of the Strip of Flurries.”

    “Alafreo… huh?”

    “I only cross over to help merchants map the frozen wastes out here.  So, if you’re heading east and you’re kind enough to bring me on board, then I’ll be happy to help in any way I can.”  She shuddered slightly.  “Bleachkkk… anything’s gotta be better than traveling west towards that nasty kingdom with the wars and stuff.”

    “Yeah…” Rainbow Dash exhaled with a calm smile.  “Tell me about it.”

    “Jusssssssst one question…”  Zaid leaned in.

    Elma glanced at him.  “Yeah?”

    “Do they serve grilled cheese sandwiches in Alafreo?”

    Elma Boreal blinked.  “What’s a grilled cheese sandwich?”

    Zaid’s left eyebrow twitched.  He turned to look towards the other half of the mess hall.  “Any chance we can take a quick detour west?”  Whap!  “Oww!”

		//------------------------------//
		// A Message From the Sun		//------------------------------//

    “Ain sae thaur Ah was!”  Prowse smirked from where he leaned over the middle of the mess hall table.  “Surroonded by Xonan mercenaries oan aw sides! Mah trusty boomstick was it ay ammo, an' Ah didne e'en hae a wrench tae flin' at them! Ah kent 'at it was jist a matter ay seconds afair the tattooed jobby takers aw charged at me, horns first!”

    Ebon and Eagle Eye stared, wide-eyed.  Zaid and Josho stood behind the chairs, brows furrowed.

    “What…”  Props gulped.  “What did you do?”

    “Th' only bloody hin' Ah coods hae dain!”  Prowse smirked, flexing his metal hoof.  “Ah mit them, metal tae muzzle!”  He winked.  “In less than it takes fur a coo tae fart, th' whole fluir ay th' room was covered wi' teeth! they sure as heel werenae onie ay mine!”

    “Wow…”  Ebon gasped.

    “Er…”  Eagle winced.  “That’s…”

    “Violent?” Elma spoke up from sipping a mug of water.

    “Damn straecht! Ah gart them bleed it their tattoos loch they waur faucets! That's whit they gie fur attackin' thes auld stallion jist fur walkin' ben toon oan an archaeological mission!”

    “Well, then…”  Zaid smirked.  “One pony’s psychopath is another’s badflank!”  He slapped Josho’s shoulder.  “Eh, fatso?”

    “Eh.”

    “They didn’t send a squadron of ebil ticked off bad bads to skin you alive?” Props asked, eyes sparkling.

    “They cooldnae fin' me e'en if they wanted tae, lassie!”  Prowse smiled proudly. “Want tae ken hoo Ah tint them?”

    “Duaaaaaaaaah!”  Props gasped so wide her cheekbone nearly dislodged.  “Is there ‘nut me’ in ‘minute?’  Dish it out, Unky Prowsy!”

    The group leaned in tighter while Prowse began weaving another tale.

    From a distance, Rainbow Dash hovered, watching the group with calm ruby eyes.  She breathed lightly, her tail flicking beneath her.

    “Floydien swears to Nancy’s internal antlers…”  A certain elk shuffled up from the kitchen.  “Does paint wheel ever touch the ground?”

    “Even when I’m not moving I’m moving,” Rainbow muttered.  She turned to look at Floydien.  “How’s the weather?”

    “Balm balm, but the snow is faint enough for us to burn through.  Floydien would have liked it if Floydien had another pony to check on the winds beside himself and Nancy.”

    Rainbow’s ears folded.  “Err… yeah, sorry about that.  Sometimes I take for granted how much you like to be reclusive.”

    “Just because Floydien likes to be alone doesn’t mean he likes being alone.”

    “Er… right…”  Rainbow’s eyebrows twitched.  “You see, it’s stuff like that.  If you were a book, I’d need the eyes of a dragonfly to read you.”

    “And machete for a bookmark, yes yes?”

    “Whoah!  I wasn’t calling you dense or nothing.”

    “Surely color wheel can spit for humor.”  Floydien gestured his antlers towards the pale stallion.  “What’s with the bearded boomer?”

    “Props’ Uncle Prowse.  The one we saved earlier today?  Oh, and the turtle too.”

    “At this rate, Nancy Jane’s going to get fat.”

    “Yeah.  Sorry about that, dude.”  Rainbow glanced at the elk.  “I dunno what the future holds for Prowse, but Elma there has a home in some place called Alafreo.  It’s on the far side of the Strip of Flurries.”

    “So Nancy’s going to drop a turtle, then?”

    Rainbow sighed.  “Yes, Floydien.  Yes, she will.”

    “Floydien doesn’t care, so long as shelled boomer cleans after herself in the meantime.”

    “I’m pretty sure she’s… erm… sh-shell trained.”

    “More boomers look like they could use the thwack thwack.”

    “Hmmm?” Rainbow glanced curiously at him.

    He pointed a cloven hoof across the room.

    Rainbow squinted.

    Belle sat with Kera.  The mare was far away from the happily chatting group, seated on one of the sofa cushions.  She brushed the dormant filly’s mane with loving strokes.  Not long after, a frail shadow shuffled in.  Pilate strolled into the mess hall from the long narrow hallway beyond.  Feeling about, he gradually made his way to the chairs across from the couch.

    Belle took a deep breath.  Without looking--or even saying a thing--she gently propped Kera on her shoulders, stood up, and walked quietly down the hallway from which Pilate came.

    The zebra froze, his ears flicking to the sounds of dainty hoofsteps.  After a while, he sighed, then continued shuffling forward, making his way towards the kitchen.

    Rainbow Dash bit her lip as her eyes tensed.

    The elk leaned his muzzle towards her ear.  “And color wheel boomer thought Floydien was reclusive.”  With a snort, he shuffled off to the far end of the room, leaving her alone with her flapping wings.

    Rubbing her muzzle in thought, Rainbow Dash stared out the nearby porthole, noticing the sunset glistening off the frozen waters.



    Hours later, Belle lay in the darkness, wide awake.  She cradled Kera’s sleeping figure in her forelimbs, stroking the filly’s shoulders every now and then.  Her moist chestnut eyes gazed into the bulkhead on the edge of the cot. 

    Somewhere in the midst of this perpetual malaise, the intercom inside the room crackled.

    ”Scrkkkk!  Chestnut boomer.  Floydien needs her ears to rise rise.”

    Belle’s jaws clenched tight.  She remained where she was.

    ”Crkkkkk!  Chestnut boomer… It will spit on and on into the night with greater volume.”

    “Nnnnnnngh…”  With a low growl, Belle rose out of bed and slapped her hoof over the intercom.  “Mr. Floydien, you caught me at a bad time--”

    “The boomerette’s time is always bad.  If only Nancy Jane’s spirit could infect all estrogenicon, yes yes?”

    “Uhhhh…”

    ”Floydien assures chestnut boomer that this is a matter of extreme importport.  Nancy Jane’s guide will freeze out here if she waits any longer.”

    Belle blinked.  “Rainbow Dash…?”

    ”Don’t make Floydien come down there.  These antlers aren’t filly-proof, no no. Scrkkk!”

    Belle fidgeted, shook, then sighed.  Hanging her head, she stood in a slump besides the bed, then relented with a defeated groan.  She leaned towards the bed, drew a blanket over Kera’s slumbering figure, and gave the filly a gentle nuzzle.  Fighting back the urge to sniffle, Belle slipped on her leather coat and trotted out of the tiny compartment, shutting the door quietly behind her.



    Belle climbed up the vertical crawlspace and emerged inside the cockpit.  A dim amber light lit the top deck under the black fabric of night.

    “Alright, Mr. Floydien,” the mare grumbled, teeth chattering in the brisk wind as she hugged herself.  “What is it?  Where’s Rainbow Dash?”

    “Hmmmff…”  The elk turned and pointed out onto the open deck.  “Follow the shimmer glimmer.”

    “Mmm?”  Belle turned, blinking.  Her brow furrowed.

    Rainbow Dash hovered just a few feet above Pilate.  The zebra sat on folded limbs, a thick blanket stretched over his figure.  A pale spotlight hung magically over the two, twinkling with lunar energy.

    “Bonjour!”  Rainbow Dash said with a wave.  “And all that fancy crap.  How kind of you to join us, Ding Dong.”

    “Join… you…?” Belle heard a clanking sound.  She spun and looked down.

    Floydien was climbing down the crawlspace.  Not only that, but he was cranking a valve on the inside, thus shutting a metal lid at the top of the vertical chamber.

    “Mr--”  Belle did a double-take.  “Are… are you shutting me outside?”

    “Bite your spittaker!  This is to keep out the cold!”  Floydien frowned.  “Chestnut boomerette shouldn’t be so ridiculous!”  A beat.  Floydien nod.  “But yes yes yes, mostly just you.”  Clank!  The hatch to the Jury’s interior shut behind him.

    Belle blinked, her lips pursed.

    ”Bellesmith, I presume…” a voice carried elegantly along the wind.

    The mare shuddered.  Spinning about, she gulped and murmured, “Princess Luna, Your Highness?”

    A light chuckle lit the cold air.  “Close, but not quite.  My beloved sister has been gracious enough to allow me an evening to speak to Rainbow Dash and her friends.”

    Belle’s pupils shrank.  “Pr-Princess Celestia…?” she stammered.

    ”In the spirit, at least.  It pleases me to speak with such close friends to my royal subject.  Rainbow Dash tells me that we have a lot to talk about tonight…”

    Belle squinted.  She looked at Pilate, whose head was bowed towards the deck, then at Rainbow Dash, who was smirking proudly.

    With a gulp, the mare muttered, “Did she, now…?”

		//------------------------------//
		// Talking Sense With a Princess		//------------------------------//

	"Come on, Belle."  Rainbow motioned with her windblown mane.  "Have a seat."

	Bellesmith took a deep breath.  Eyes darting left and right, she trotted forward until she was within the penumbra of the moon's glow.  As she sat down, her gaze fell on Pilate.

	The zebra's ears twitched slightly to her shuffling limbs, but otherwise he gave no indication of having noticed her approach.  His head remained bowed towards the top deck, his folded limbs curled tightly under a thick blanket.

	"I just got finished telling Princess Celestia about the ponies we've picked up recently," Rainbow Dash said.  "Not just Prowse and Elma, but Zaid as well."

	"You are surrounded by very intriguing characters," the regal voice said, drifting through the enchanted air.  "Not to mention very novel and talented."

	"Yes," Belle said, nodding slightly.  "We are... a varied bunch."

	"And no doubt very cooperative, in spite of those differences."

	Belle said nothing.  She kneaded the ends of her hooves against the deck below.

	"Belle wouldn't be able to tell you much about Prowse and Elma, Your Highness," Rainbow said, staring the mare's way.  "Seeing as she hasn't taken the opportunity to talk with them yet."

	Belle glanced up and squinted at her.

	"All good things come in time," Princess Celestia's voice said.  "At least such is my experience."

	"Time carries with it many other things," Pilate suddenly droned.

	Belle's ears folded upon hearing that.

	Rainbow Dash fidgeted in midair, darting her head left and right between her two friends.  She eventually cleared her voice and said, "Celestia and Luna happen to know a few things about the creatures we saw over in Seclorum's encampment.  Isn't that right, Celestia?"

	"Most certainly," Princess Celestia said.  "As my sister already conveyed to Rainbow Dash, there's a race of equine beings from ancient Equestrian history that are commonly referred to as 'changelings.'  Ever since the old Matriarchs Tchern and Chrysalis corrupted their brood with malevolent energy, these shape-shifting beings fled to the furthest stretches of the physical world, undoubtedly making a home on the dark side where the Sun and Moon fail to reach."

	"It must have been difficult maintaining the Sun and Moon for so many years, Your Highness," Belle suddenly said.  "I can't imagine the sort of strain that must have put on you."

	There was a brief bit of silence, followed by Celestia's voice:  "Indeed.  But it was a labor I endured for a thousand years, as it was required of me in my sister's absence."

	Belle gulped, staring at the deck.  "It must be even harder to keep a chaos rift held shut... while also performing a long distance communication spell..."

	Rainbow jerked a glance at Belle.

	Belle bit her lip before eventually muttering.  "Nopony would bl-blame you if you would rather rest and focus on your harmonic task at hoof."

	Celestia calmly replied, "There are worse rifts in this world than that which plagues Ponyville, my little pony.  As for rest, my soul cannot be at ease while I know that Rainbow and her friends suffer so much anguish."

	"We... are n-not suffering, Your Highness," Pilate said.  The zebra gulped and murmured, "It is a long and exhausting trip over the Frozen Sea, and it's taxed us greatly—"

	"Oh please, Pilate," Belle sighed.  "You're never 'suffering,' especially when you are."

	Pilate's muzzle stretched tight as he grunted, "It's difficult to tell.  I've had nopony around to compare myself too, beloved."

	"Darling, if all you needed was somepony to talk to—"

	"Don't pretend like it would make a difference!" the zebra snapped.  "Most especially not in front of the Princess of Equestria!"

	"Pilate—"

	"Even when I'm in the same room with you, it's like you're miles away, Belle!"

	"So help me if I'm not the strong mare that I was weeks ago, Pilate!" she snapped back.  "I can't be expected to carry you every hour of every day!  You're a grown stallion.  Surely you're dealing with enough frustration of your own!"

	"Mmnnngh..."  Pilate rested his chin on his forelimbs.  "...I just don't bury them in Kera everyday."

	"Excuse me?!" Belle snarled.  She blinked, then looked down to realize that she had stood up in a burst of anger.  Grunting, she collapsed back on the top deck.

	Rainbow bit her lip, then flinched when Celestia's voice broke the silence.

	"Rainbow has... also told me of a most unfortunate turn of circumstances as of late."

	The ponies atop the Noble Jury clenched their eyes shut at that—including Pilate.

	"Such senselessly violent events are terribly tragic.  But the greatest tragedy is the poison that is left over, that which leeches otherwise innocent ponies of their strength and vigor to live harmonically."

	"Heh... 'innocent ponies...'" Rainbow Dash muttered.  She tilted her head up.  "Princess Celestia, it was my job to look out for the safety of the Noble Jury.  By extension, that includes Kera and the ponies who care for her.  What happened in Lerris..."  She sighed heavily.  "I could have prevented.  I should have... h-had the foresight..."

	"To do what, Rainbow?"  Belle gazed sadly at her.  "To have foreseen the future?  To have killed Shell before he ever got to that village?"

	"I had plenty of opportunities—"

	"Not like I did."  Belle gulped, her ears drooping.  "I had him in my grasp, Rainbow.  I... I-I know I should have told you sooner, but I didn't.  I..."  She grimaced.  "I was too cowardly.  In my heart, I knew that what I did to Shell was wrong.  Not because he had any reason to be respected as a living being, but because I used him to destructive means... wh-when I could have used him for self-destructive."

	"It was the most reasonable solution at the time, Belle," Pilate spoke up.  "You wanted to get back to the Jury.  And if you hadn't controlled Shell the way you did, who knows how many more ponies would have died in at—"

	"At Seclorum's?!"  Belle exclaimed, eyes hard-set.  "A place that was already a blood bath?!  Where ponies went to die and they knew it?!"

	"There was so much at stake, Belle," Pilate said.  "The world as we know it and don't know it.  The path of Austraeoh and Nevlamas' reign of chaos—"

	"Pilate..."

	"If you hadn't forced Shell to intervene, there's no telling if Rainbow Dash or the rest of the Jury would still be alive—"

	"None of that matters to me!  Don't you get it?!" Belle stammered, sniffling.  "In the end, it bit all of us in the flank!  And it cost us Kera!  All because of my selfish stupidity—"

	"Dammit, Belle!" Pilate slapped his hooves against the top deck.  "Will you drop it about Kera?!  Everything doesn't revolve around Kera!!"  He frowned.  "What happened to her is terrible!  Absolutely terrible!  But you need to stop counting all of the mistakes that you've made and start to weigh in all of the good, courageous things that you've—"

	"Because it's so easy for a blind zebra with a focus on the 'big picture' to justify the consequences of—"

	"And you need to stop blaming me for Lerris!" Pilate practically hissed.  "I made a judgment call.  It was a bad call—I admit that.  But I did not slay those ponies, Belle.  I did not traumatize our surrogate daughter.  And I sure as the Spark shimmers on..."

	"Pilate, please—"

	"...mm not the one burning this relationship to the ground!" he hollered.

	Belle flinched away from him, shivering.

	Pilate panted and panted, his tense facial muscles loosening gradually.

	"It's neither of your guys' fault..."

	Belle looked up.  Pilate tilted his head skyward.

	Rainbow Dash hugged herself in midair, her eyes wet.  "I... I should have stayed in Lerris.  I should have stuck with you guys all the way through to the end.  I dunno if I could have stopped Shell but..."  She sniffled and sighed.  "At least it would have been something.  Even if we all died that night."  She looked away, her eyelashes beading with moisture.  "Anything would be b-better than this..."

	The other two ponies hung their heads.

	At last, Celestia spoke.

	"I have not felt this sad since I lost my apprentice."

	Rainbow inhaled sharply.  She stared up at the wavering moonlight.  "Your H-Highness...?"

	"This monster that you speak of—this Shell—needs to die.  And he needs to die tonight."

	Rainbow's brow furrowed.  "But... but Princess Celestia..." She wiped her cheek dry with a forelimb and murmured.  "I already told you.  Back in Lerris.  I—"

	"Until you three stop blaming yourselves, he will continue to haunt you.  He will continue to tear apart that which is magnificent.  In the last three months since I first heard from my sister that Rainbow Dash had found herself some new companions, my heart has been filled with joy.  For the first time, I could solace myself with the thought that the last of the Elements of Harmony had found a reason to be loyal yet again... and to be joyful.  This is a blessed thing... or at least it was.  It burdens my heart to witness how frayed everything has become.  Even from miles away, I can feel the fibrous ends unraveling, and I'm telling each and every one of you that you must sort out these demons before they burn your love and trust into inert dust."
		//------------------------------//
		// What Needs To Be Said		//------------------------------//

	"Your Highness, you don't understand," Rainbow Dash spoke with a heavy sigh.  She hung her head.  "It really is my fault.  I should have been there for these guys.  Even after Lerris, I... I've made nothing but mistakes."

	"And do you truly think that I am unfamiliar with the wages of death and anguish, my little pony?" Celestia spoke.  "That I would not have made the same mistakes—if not transgressions a thousand times worse—in all my years?"

	Rainbow Dash bit her lip.

	Belle glanced up while Pilate leaned an ear towards the source of the magical voice.

	"Since the days that the Alicorns first came to this plane, I have endeavored to maintain harmony at all cost.  The price has been exceedingly steep, and even at my greatest strength, I've only been able to keep peace consistent within a small pocket of geographical scale, the land that we know as Equestria.  Do you truly think an immortal life equates to an immaculate one?  It is nigh impossible to keep harmony stable in a land adrift in chaos.  I have ventured to great lengths to protect the interests of the mortals of this plane, and this has inevitably cost the lives of many other mortals.  I have seen dragons turned into mindless beasts.  I have witnessed beloved siblings betraying themselves to darkness.  Countries have fallen into the ash of endless strife and bloodshed while I've been forced to watch—helpless—from afar.  For over ten millennia, I've used my magic for the betterment of Equestrian kind, and while my sister and I have maintained a rich state of equilibrium, there is ultimately one resolution I can make from the entire experience."

	Silence.

	Pilate lifted his muzzle.  "Uhm... what is that, Your Highness?"

	"That there will always, always be events that we cannot control.  Most especially the tragic ones."

	Belle hung her head.

	Celestia continued.  "You three have suffered a terrible fate.  Whether your suffering exceeds that of the ponies of Lerris or darling little Kera, it matters not.  You have survived.  You are the ones who must lucidly deal with that which has taken place, and it does not benefit any one of you to be consumed by the pain that was dealt that day.  If anger and regret exists between you, that is understandable, but you must exorcize it if you are to move on and spread harmony like you were born to."

	"Princess Celestia, I don't..."  Rainbow Dash bit her lip.  A sigh, and then she muttered, "I'm not angry at either of these ponies.  I failed them.  It's as simple as that.  I've... I've kept them at forelimb's distance because I'm just scared that... I dunno... something stupid will happen again."  She gulped.  "That the monster will have its way with them as it's had its way with me."

	"Rainbow Dash, even you can't deny that anger and frustration is far more real than any supposed 'monster.'"

	Rainbow sniffled and glanced up towards the luminous night sky.  "Huh?"

	"How often have you and I spoken during all of the full moons that have passed since your journey began?"

	The pegasus bit her lip.

	"Rainbow, you can fly as far as you want, leaving everything and everyone you know behind.  But I made it clear to you from day one that I will always be here for you."

	"Mmmmf..."  Rainbow folded her forelimbs, suddenly shivering.  "I know that, Your Highness..."

	"And I am more than willing to hear anything that you wish to say."

	"Whatever I needed to say to you has already been said," Rainbow grunted out the edge of her muzzle as she gazed towards the frozen horizoin.  "Back in Silvadel, I let it out.  Remember?"

	"Rainbow Dash..."

	"I forgave you, Celestia.  Nothing's changed, alright?"

	"Forgave me for what?"

	"Dang it!"  Rainbow snapped, spinning in midair.  "I told you I—"  She froze in mid-air, lip quivering.  She gulped and murmured, "Why'd you have to let it happen?  Didn't you love her?  Wasn't she your 'good and faithful student' and all that crap?"

	Rainbow's wings went limp as she landed awkwardly on the deck.

	"Weren't she and all her friends what made the whole 'magic' thing w-work?!" Rainbow sputtered.  "Couldn't you have seen the path that we were gonna cross with Discord?!" She gnashed her teeth.  "You can raise the sun.  You can lower the moon.  But you can't bother to hammer one measly gargoyle statue in your royal garden to bits?!"

	Rainbow Dash stood, trembling, hyperventilating.

	At last, Celestia's voice drifted in a low tone.  "I am so exceedingly sorry, Rainbow Dash—"

	"Well, not as sorry as I am!" Rainbow's voice cracked explosively.  "You're not the one with an expiration date!  You're not the one with nothing to live for but the horizon!  You're n-not the one who h-has to close her eyes every n-night, knowing that she'll see that vision of their faces again... of their screams... their bodies twisted in pain as one by one they... th-they..."  Rainbow's face contorted in a sob as she fell to her belly, weeping into the wooden deck.

	Belle watched with her muzzle agape.  Pilate's ears hung limp on either side of his skull.

	Sniffling, hiccuping, Rainbow Dash gradually pushed herself back up into a standing position.  "I know.  I-I know."  She gulped.  "There was n-nothing you could have done to stop Discord.  Nopony knew just how crazy p-powerful he was... or what the elements would have d-done when they tried to fight him without me.  I... I-I don't want to h-hate you, Celestia.  I never have.  I love you..."  She squeaked, running a hoof over her tear-stained muzzle.  "Oh gosh, I love you.  How c-can't I?  You're all I have left..."

	After a while, Celestia's voice gently drifted over the sound of Rainbow's shuddering voice.  "Am I truly the only one...?"

	Rainbow Dash sucked her breath in, clenching her jaw.  Slowly, she turned around, staring painfully at Belle and Pilate.

	The two ponies sat in reverent silence.

	Slowly, with meager grace, Rainbow trotted closer towards them.

	
		//------------------------------//
		// The Worst Kind of Eclipse		//------------------------------//

	"I love you guys..."  Rainbow Dash took a shuddering breath and stood between Pilate and Belle on the top deck.  "I love you enough to protect you no matter what.  And I love you enough to leave you be when the time comes.  But we all have to understand... th-that there are things that are simply out of my control."  She inhaled heavily, eyes streaming with tears.  "No matter how fast I can fly... no matter how awesome I am... the world is simply too dangerous for me to stop every signle horrible thing that happens.  What happened in Lerris is terrible.  What happened to you guys and Kera is unthinkably bad.  But the only thing I can absolutely guarantee that I can control is my loyalty to you.  And... and I-I've been so very bad about that, lately..."

	She trotted up to Pilate, nuzzling him gently on the side of his head. 

	"I've left you in the dark.  What I thought you needed was a protector.  What you've truly needed is a friend."

	She side-stepped over to Belle, planting her hooves on the mare's forelimbs.

	"I wish you had told me what you knew about Imre, but you aren't the one who murdered her and you aren't responsible for making Shell the monster that he was.  None of us are."

	She shuffled backwards, hanging her head towards the top deck.

	"You all went through something so... so bad... and I spent so much time blaming myself and thinking about my faults that I didn't think of preserving my strength.  And that's my love and commitment to you.  I felt that keeping my distance and focusing on the journey would be enough.  But obviously, it's not.  We're falling apart.  Lerris happened weeks ago, but it could just as well have been yesterday or today.  Nothing's healed, because I've abandoned it.  I've abandoned you.  And I'm sorry."

	Rainbow lifted her head up, gnashing her teeth.  "I'm so... so sorry.  I love you guys too much to let it go on like this.  But I'm not the only one."  She clenched her teeth and spoke in a firmer voice.  "You need to stop this.  Whatever this is.  It must go on no further."

	Belle hung her head while Pilate kneaded his hooves against the top deck.

	Rainbow took a firm step forward.  "You both love each other.  You're practically heads over hooves for each other!  I don't know what it is about Lerris that's gotten you so worked up against each other that the miracle of your survival is like a speck of dust in the wind.  You've been given another chance!  This is your opportunity to make what's best of your lives, Kera's life, all our lives!  Please... please... don't go it alone.  Don't do what I did for so long in my anger, sadness, and hopelessness.  It took my death at the hands of a massive dragon before I found what it meant to enjoy life again.  Don't let something worse happen to you guys as well."

	Pilate bit his lip.  Belle stared off into the starry expanse.

	"Please..."  Rainbow murmured.  She trotted forward, muzzle trembling.  "Please.  I want my friends back."  She sniffled into the gathering wind.  "I want my friends back.  I don't want to seem them dead on their hooves when there's still time to help them..."

	"Rainbow Dash!  There's... something..."

	The sound of Celestia's voice broke Rainbow out of her concentration.  She blinked, realizing that a heavy gale was kicking at her mane and tail.  Pilate gasped in fright, gripping onto the deck beneath him tightly.  Belle tilted her head up and squinted towards the east horizon.

	"...losing the connection... something... with the spell.."

	"Huh?"  Rainbow blinked. She glanced down at her neck.  The pendant was flickering.  What's more, the pale aura of moonlight around her and her friends vanished.  "Princess Celestia!"

	Her voice dissolved in the gradually building winds.  Rainbow looked straight up to see that dark and gray clouds had blocked out the moonlight.  Clenching her teeth, she ran towards the bow of the ship, having to stop two or three times to brace herself against the gusts of cold air.

	"What is it?!" Pilate stammered frightfully.  "What's going on?!"

	"It seems like a storm of some sort!" Belle exclaimed.

	"It's no regular storm!" Rainbow Dash said.  Gritting her teeth, she hoisted herself onto the port side railing of the ship and stuck her hooves out.

	"Rainbow, be careful!" Belle said.

	"What the fuzz...?"  Rainbow murmured.  "This isn't right..."

	"What isn't?" Pilate asked.

	"The clouds..."  Rainbow bit her lip.  "The mist here isn't responding to my hooves."

	"Aren't pegasi endowed with the ability to manipulate weather?"

	"Normally..."  Rainbow nodded.  "It worked in Equestria, and it worked in Ledomare.  But why not here?"

	Belle gasped, then trembled.  "The Strip of Flurries."

	Rainbow Dash glanced back.

	"Seems like we've made our destination sooner than was planned," Belle said.

	"But how's that possible?" Pilate asked.  "We had another two days of full speed at this rate!"

	Rainbow looked at him.

	The zebra's ears folded.  "I may be blind, but I have a good memory."

	"Could it be..."  Rainbow thought aloud, fidgeting.  "...that the weather of the Strip of Flurries has moved towards us?"

	"You mean it's heading west?" Pilate stammered.

	Rainbow said nothing, simply gazing into the thickening storm.

	Belle gulped.  "Perhaps we should turn around.  We can make contact with Luna and Celestia again, then go about planning a way through this mess."

	Rainbow Took a deep breath, watching as the mists grew denser and denser around the ship.  "Something tells me this 'mess' isn't going away anytime soon."  She dried her face with a forelimb and furrowed her brow.  "There's no sense in postponing it.  We have to pierce on through."
		//------------------------------//
		// Prowse and Props, Together Again		//------------------------------//

	"Sae whit yoo're tryin' tae teel me is 'at thes floatin' magical book is what's powerin' up th' ship?" Prowse exclaimed, pointing a pale hoof.

	"Mmmmmm... it's more complicated than that," Props said, trotting proudly around the cage with the floating lavender tome.  "The Ledomaritans of Nightshade Industries rebuilt Nancy's inner workings so that the cage with the book would act as a buffer to the skystone engine.  Apparently Nightshade understood this magical page-turner a lot.  Almost more than Pilate, Bellesmith, and Dashie do.  Whatever energy it runs on, it keeps handsome's ship pumping at full capacity!"  She then winced, blushing.  "Well, normally it'd be pumping at full capacity.  I've been hammering away all month to get it back to working order ever since a bunch of meanie weanie cultist sacked the womb."

	"The what?"

	"The womb!  Nancy Jane's womb!"  Props pointed towards the walls.  "Where we are right now, silly Unky!"

	Prowse rubbed his beard, then stared at the mess of steam pipes and bulkheads around him.  "It's a micht bit broon fur a lady's foal hole, dornt ye think?"

	"Heeheehee!  It's a figure of speech, Unky Prowsy!  Floydien's full of them, in case you haven't noticed."

	"Aye, I have!  Second tae th' big jagged horns comin' it ay th' bastard's heed!"

	"Hey!  Be nice to him!" Props pouted.  "He's a nice bastard!"

	"Hahah!"  Prowse reached over and patted the mare's shoulder.  "I bit he is, lassie. if yoo've gart friends wi' heem, 'en he's okay in th' professor's book!"

	"But I make friends with everypony!"

	"That's wa Ah loch havin' ye fur a niece. Ah dornt need tae make friends. Yoo're aroond tae make friends fur me."

	"But what about Elma?"

	"Ah only notice 'er coz Ah trip oan 'er half th' time."  Prowse gazed at the tome once more.  "Sae, ye hink thes hin' has a connection tae yer colorful winged mate?"

	Props blinked.  "To Dashie?  Yes!  Totally!"  She giggled again, then went silent.  "Wait, how'd you know?"

	"Thes bludy ship is foo ay aw sorts ay magic an' glitter, an' thes book an' yer flyin' filly friend ur th' magicalest an' glitteriest of em all. Teel me, Propsicle, jist whaur is thes Rainbaw Bricht bosomy character flyin' aff tae in sic' a hurrie?"

	"You know, to be honest, I've never quite figured it out!"  Props said with a bright-eyed expression.  "All I know is that she wants to go to the dark side of the world.  I don't understand why; I hear it's super scary there.  Also, no sun and moon—and those are the only two connections she has with home."

	"Th' puir sod's far awa' frae th' ones she loves, huh?"  Prowse scratched his beard.  "That's a tad bit strange, dornt ye hink? if Ah hud wings, eh'd fancy myself flyin' to haem an' nae awa' frae it."

	"That's the nifty thing about Dashie."  Props smiled with a flounce of her blonde mane.  "I figure that she takes 'home' wherever she goes."

	"Hah!  Whit a clever hin' tae say! Nae ferlie Ah shared th' umbilical noose wi' th' stallion fa eventually spawned ye."

	"Yeah.  About Dad.  Is he ever going to thaw anyday soon?"

	"Bloody Spark, Ah hope not."  Prowse grunted as he paced across the engine room.  "Glaikit dobber needs tae learn his lesson abit messin' wi' coolant crystals. Sae, teel me mair abit thes glowin' book hin'."

	"Heehee... enough about my ship, let's talk about you!"  Props leaned in to nuzzle him.  "Tell me more about this Zaba... Zabby... Zabarro—"
	
	Before Props could finish her pronunciations, the ship shook.  The mare gasped, bumping into Prowse.  Prowse steadied her, blinking.  Once more, the ship experienced turbulent, far stronger this time.

	"Plow meh sideways!" Prowse stammered.  "Ur we grindin' against a ben?"

	"Only one way to find out!" Props galloped into the stairwell, motioning Prowse along with her.  "Come on!"  The two dashed out.



	As soon as they galloped out onto the top deck, they had to brace themselves against the ship's railing.  Sheets of rain sliced through the air in random bursts, all the while a punishing wind pelted the coats and flesh of those up top.

	"Hey!" Rainbow Dash shouted from the cockpit far across the deck.  It was so windy that even she refused to linger outside, choosing instead to brace herself within the doorframe to the cramped compartment.  "You crazy?!  Gallop back downstairs!"

	Props hollered against the wind and rain.  "But we wanted to know what was happening—"

	"Then use the intercom!"  Rainbow shouted.  "We're approaching the Strip of Flurries!"

	"Ackies!"  Props gasped as Prowse gripped her protectively.  "Already?!"

	"It seems to be moving towards us!"  Rainbow gestured with her hoof.  "Just go downstairs!  We'll keep you up to date!"

	Prowse and Props nervously complied.  In the meantime, Rainbow turned back towards the cockpit to where Floydien, Josho, Elma, and Eagle Eye were standing.

	"Please tell me you can get us out of this patch of turbulence," Rainbow asked.

	"What the glimmer for?!" Floydien grunted, shooting various sparks from his antlers into the console and controls.  "Just so we can face the shake-shake elsewhere?!  Color wheel boomer wanted to plow Nancy through the storm, yes yes yes?"

	"Of course!  But first thing's first!  We gotta get to a calm spot so that we can figure out just where the passage of the Strip is so we can fly on through with no problem!"

	Eagle Eye raised his hoof, shivering.  "I vote for the calm spot!"

	"As much as I like to do things the meatheaded way, I'd really like to live through this journey long enough to eat a meal that isn't watered down again," Josho said.  "Come on, elkster, park us someplace relaxing."

	"Floydien would love to!"  The pilot grumbled.  "If the boomers would just stop crowding Floydien!"

	"S-sorry..."  Elma shuffled backwards against one wall of the cockpit.  "I forget that some creatures don't like to bump elbows."

	Eagle looked at her.  "Is Alafreo super crowded?"

	"Ohhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh-ho-ho-ho..."  Elma snapped her reptilian beak.  "You have no idea..."

	"Cease the spit for one minute-minute!" Floydien grumbled.

	The ponies on board braced themselves, holding their breaths as the Noble Jury lifted up, up, and emerged from a layer of clouds.  The air above the gray smudge was calm enough for the ship to carry forward at an even glide.  Directly out the cockpit windshield, the Jurists saw rolling plateaus of dark black smoke, and most of them oozing slowly towards them.  It was morning time, and the sun had risen—but the only hint of this was a pale haze that pierced only the topmost layer of the anvil clouds surrounding them, leaving the rest of the world in a depressing smoke-colored lurch.

	"I don't see what you're all getting so worked up about," Elma said in a pleasant tone.  "I've flown in and out of the Flurries for years.  Sure, it's turbulent and scary, but you've got yourselves a skystone vessel!" She smiled.  "You'll manage!"

	"Thanks for the vote of confidence, E.B."  Rainbow smirked tiredly at the turtle.  "But this crew has been through enough to know that you can't ever be too careful."

	Right as she said that, a dark shape lifted up out of the clouds and soared past the cockpit window.  SWOOOOSH!

	"Cat scat!" Floydien gasped, accidentally causing the ship the jerk a little.

	"Criminy!"  Josho added to the explanation.  "Was that a sea serpent?!"

	"At this height?!" Eagle questioned.

	"A m-meteor?"

	Eagle's violet eyes turned thin.  "It was flying up."

	"You guys hear a strange humming?" Rainbow murmured.

	"Don't look now..."  Josho pointed out the back of the cockpit.  The occupants stared over the rain-slick deck in time to see a glossy black sphere of a hovership come to a floating stop off the Jury's port side.  "...but our friends are back."

	"Uhhh..."  Elma stumbled back, her quivering eyes reflecting the red lights flickering across the front of the round vessel.  "Uhmmm..."

	"Yeah?"  Rainbow glanced down at her.  "What is it?"

	The turtle gulped and drew her head back into her cell.  "Those aren't exactly 'friends.'"
		//------------------------------//
		// Cold Never Bothered Them Anyway		//------------------------------//

	The black spheroid of a vessel hovered so close to the Noble Jury's port side that the ponies on the top deck could see their reflections in the dark gloss.  Every expression was contorted, full of dull shock and confusion.  For over five minutes, the strange ship hovered within this anxious proximity—not moving, not drifting, not making a sound.

	All the while, thunder broiled in the east, carried aloft by the bulbous heads of dark rolling clouds.  The early morning sun broke through the Flurries every now and then, but no sheen of light revealed any change in the isolated aircraft.

	At last Eagle Eye leaned into the center of the group and hissed, "Do you think it sees us?"

	"It's not an 'it,' fruit basket," Josho said in a gruff trone.  "If anything, it's likely a 'they.'"

	"Well, they certainly are very comfortable staying as an it."

	"It or they or crap, too closely to Nancy does the glimmer hover!" Floydien growled from the cockpit.  "Floydien has a good mind to give them something to mind over!"

	"Easy there, big fella," Rainbow Dash said, waving a hoof at the pilot without looking.  "No sudden moves.  For all we know, this ship belongs to ponies who are in charge of this place."

	Eagle Eye's muzzle scrunched up.  "In charge of the frozen wastes?"

	"Floydien has seen stranger things."

	"Yeah, well, that much is certain," Josho said with a nod.  "But out here in pointed nipple country?"

	"Elma?"  Rainbow Dash squinted towards the cockpit.  "Elma, what's wrong?"

	The oversized snapping turtle hid from view, shaking her scaled head and breathing heavily.  In the meanwhile, two stallions swiftly climbed up from the floors below.

	"Hey!  Blue Mare Group!"  Zaid shuffled briskly across the top deck.  "Senor Mane and I here totally saw a big black watermelon floating about outside?  You guys see it—Holy Jumarenji!"  Zaid jolted in place at the sight of the sudden ship.

	"Ooof!"  Ebon bumped into the stallion's rear and winced.  "What in the name of croutons?"  His eyes twitched.  "Uhhhhh... guys?"  He gulped.  "What's with the floating bowling ball of death?"

	"It's not here to kill us," Rainbow droned.

	"How do we know that?" Josho retorted.

	"I refuse to believe that everything that exists out here wants us dead!" Rainbow's voice cracked.

	"Then your colored mane's doing a really darn good job of leeching the smarts from your brain 'cuz live and learn, sister!  Out here we is screwed immaculate!"

	"Will everypony just calm down?" Ebon remarked, then took one glance at the cockpit.  "...and turtle."  He cleared his throat and looked at the group again. "I'm with Rainbow Dash.  Let's not assume the worst until the worst happens.  Now, where's Propsy and her uncle?"

	"Yeah!  Let's get Beardo up here!"  Zaid grinned wildly.  "I'm sure he's got a super scope on that boomstick arm of his!"

	"No!  Nononono..." Elma stammered beneath a rattling beak.

	Rainbow turned towards her.  "Why not...?"

	"Just... don't bring Prowse up here.  I have a bad feeling about this."

	"Floydien thinks that shelled boomer has bad feelings about every spit."

	"It's k-kept me alive this long, hasn't it?"

	"Uhm... guys?" Eagle Eye spoke up.  "I think I saw movement."

	"Movement?"  Rainbow turned towards him.  "Where?"

	Phhhhshhhhhhhhhh!  A wave of mist was expelled from the front of the craft.  Josho instinctively unholstered his shotgun while, Eagle Eye levitated a sword and shield.  Even Floydien's antlers were sparkling wildly.  Rainbow Dash had to fly swift circles in front of them, gesturing the group to lower their weapons.  All the while, she had her head turned, ruby eyes staring at the spectacle before them.

	Slowly, the forward front quarter of the ship's dome-like structure rolled back, sliding inside its own shell.  A flat, semi-circular platform appeared, with gray metal surfaces that contrasted greatly with the glossy exterior.  After the initial burst of steam, tiny jets of vapor continuously emanated from the outer rim of the exposed ship.  The Jurists shuddered, their faces and coats pelted by a curtain of heat wafting off of the ship.

	"The crap is this thing?" Josho murmured through a twisted expression.  "A muffin delivery ship?  That thing must be full of ovens."

	"Ooooh!"  Zaid grinned wide.  "I could go for some blueberry!"

	"I was being sarcastic, dumbass."

	"And I was being optimistic, snotcrotch!"

	"Guys!  Knock it off!" Rainbow hissed.  "I swear!  Stallions are such hotheads—"

	In the space of two seconds, seven dark and hooded figures scurried up to the middle of the strange ship's platform and froze in place.

	With a gasp, Eagle Eye jumped into Josho's telekinetic field so that the older stallion could "hold" him.  Josho rolled his eyes and dropped the ex-mercenary with a thud ("Ow!").

	Zaid blinked while Ebon Mane and Floydien gaped.  Elma was nowhere to be seen at this point, even by her fellow peers.

	"Uhhhhhhhh..."  Rainbow Dash could only drone.

	Then, with icy grace, all seven figures rose at once, standing perfectly straight.  Their forward limbs hid within the recesses of their tight, rubbery cloaks.  As they all stared simultaneously towards the Noble Jury, Rainbow Dash could see streaks of glowing yellow light from between the creases of their black outfits.  But that wasn't all she could see.  Within the frame of each hood, there wasn't a face, but rather a mask—silver in color and slick with condensation, like sweating shadows.  A pair of diamond-shaped eyeslits were set within the brow, and the "mouth" was formed out of a solid horizontal line consisting of several vertical metal links that rattled with the minute sway of the ship.  What's more, the very outer edges of the masks—between the silver surfaces and the spongy black material of the robes—there was a deep yellow glow, as if some sort of luminosity was purposefully resonating from within the creatures' suits.  It looked as though their masks' expressions were perpetually grimacing, and yet emotionally neutral.  It was hard for Rainbow Dash to read anything from them, especially since the figures continually stood there, straight up in bipedal fashion, with no jerk or twitch to their icy frames.

	"Er..."  Rainbow cleared her throat, hovering forward a bit.  "Hey there... dudes.  My name is Rainbow Dash.  These are my friends... the crew of the Noble Jury."  She smiled nervously.  "What brings you out to these parts?"

	The seven figures said nothing.

	"Have you... uh... have you gotten lost?"

	The seven figures said nothing.

	"Do you... know any way that we can get through the Strip of Flurries unscathed?  Eheheh..."

	The seven figures said nothing.

	Rainbow Dash exhaled with a shudder.  "Well, then.  This certainly doesn't feel like shopping for pet rocks in the least."

	"Psssst... Rainbow!"  Eagle Eye hissed, leaning towards her while he kept his violet eyes locked on the craft.  "Remember what they described?  In Lerris?"

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow Dash nodded.  "I totally do."

	"So... uhm... what do we do?"

	"I doubt we have anything that's worth trading."

	"Don't tell me that!  Tell them that!"

	"Why can't you tell them?"

	"Because they're creepy as heck!"

	"Oh for crying out—"

	"Hey there!  Uhhh... Yoohoo!"  Zaid suddenly waved his forelimb, speaking above the distant roll of thunder.  "You guys wouldn't happen to have any grilled cheese on you, wouldja?"

	The seven figures said nothing.

	Zaid blanched.  "Yeah.  Right.  Screw these guys."

	"Floydien?"  Rainbow Dash finally took her eyes off the seven.  "Pull us further north, slow and steady—"

	The centermost figure atop the ship suddenly twitched.  His hood's glow switched from gold to a crimson red.  Vapor squeezed through the links of his mask's "lips" as he pulled his forearm out of his vest.  Five elongated digits held a black disc, and with one squeeze, an image of a stallion appeared in flickering holographic glory.

	"This stallion," a voice crackled, like a recorded voice being broadcasted through six sound stones back to back while suffering leyline feedback.  It was difficult to make out the words, and he appeared to know it, speaking in slowly pronounced syllables and elongated verbs.  "Have you seen him?"

	"Huh?"  Rainbow Dash did a double-take as the rest of the crew flinched at the sudden outburst.

	The gloved hand held the hologram higher.  "Have you stumbled upon this stallion in your travels?"

	Rainbow Dash stared.  She studied the hologram's pale coat, red beard, and metal left prosthetic.  She glanced towards her peripheral vision, but Elma was nowhere to be seen.  She cleared her throat.  "No.  I can't say that I have."

	The figure remained frozen in place, holding the hologram up high.  "If you've encountered this stallion, it would be in your best interests to be rid of him."

	"Uhhhh... have you taken a look around, dude?"  Rainbow gestured towards the stormy mess below and on the immediate horizon.  "Either it's farting thunder or it's peeing ice around this place.  I seriously doubt any random stallion is just going to happen to show up."

	"This place is dangerous to foreign travelers," the figure said.  "But there are things hidden in these clouds, things that are far more dangerous.  Malevolent, even."

	"You don't say..."

	"If you give this stallion to us, we will be on our way."

	"Didn't you hear me?"  Rainbow frowned.  She pointed at the figures on the top deck of the Jury beneath her.  "All the stallions on board are accounted for."

	"And mares," Josho said, nudging Eagle.

	"Old stallion!" Eagle Eye hissed.  "There is a time and a place—"

	"We estimate that you have a lot of space on board your ship," the figure said, his suit's red glow giving a bloody taint to the vapors pouring out of his mask.  "He could be hiding aboard and you wouldn't know it.  You could be in great peril."

	"For real..."  Rainbow Dash frowned.  "What's it to you?"

	The figure finally lowered the hologram with a sudden, jerky movement.  "I am Razzar of the Lounge, and the stallion in question is responsible for the theft and murder of dozens of our clients.  For the safety of this passage, and for the integrity of our enterprise, we must have him."


		//------------------------------//
		// Just a Matter of Fact		//------------------------------//

	"A m-murderer?" Ebon stammered.

	Rainbow's tail thwacked the stallion's face from where she hovered in front of him.  Keeping her eyes on the lead figure's mask, she hovered slightly forward and said, "I'm sorry to hear about your clients.  That is most uncool.  And if we could help you, we would.  But, like I've said before, we're just trying to pass through the Flurries."  She slowly shook her head.  "We don't know anything about the stallion you're showing us."

	Razzar, his mask laced with a red glow, stood stock-still.  At last, after many seconds, he raised his hand up in a gnarled fist.  The other six Lounge cohorts fell down on all fours and shuffled backwards.  Slowly, Razzar stepped towards the edge of his ship, shuffling one rear foot at a time.

	Rainbow fidgeted a bit, but eventually met his stride, hovering forward so that the two were face-to-face along the edges of their adjacent vessels.  A cold gust of air flew through them, around them, obscuring their suddenly quiet conversation from the rest of those in attendance.

	"I take it that you're the leader of this group of wandering, flying ponies," Razzar said, his voice calm and serene behind his emotionless mask.  "If not evident in the possession of your wings, it's apparent in your resolve and bravado."

	"Is that the business you 'Lounge' guys are in?" Rainbow asked with a raised eyebrow.  "Drive by compliments?"

	"I am only stating what I observe," Razzar said, his head nodding slightly.  "Now let me state something else.  We have been watching your vessel closely for the past week."

	"What?"  Rainbow frowned.  "What the frig for?"

	"It is our business to know who it is that decides to travel through these Wastes.  We have learned to adapt to these frozen pockets of air in ways that no other group has.  As a result, we have taken it upon ourselves to maintain the safe passage for everyone who is far less lucky than we.  Right now, you and your group are a threat to others as well as to yourselves."

	"What in the hay are you talking about?"

	Razzar leaned forward with a glint to his silver mask.  "We know that you were the last ones to leave that frozen seaship alive.  We know that it was your battle with the Frost Wyrm that sank the vessel and the iceberg to the depths.  Furthermore, we know who it is that you 'rescued' from the ship's hold, and whom you now hide in your possession."

	Rainbow Dash said nothing, her jaw clenched tight.

	"He is not as he seems.  He is a deceiver of the highest order.  What story did he concoct about how he was stranded to begin with?  Pirates?  Hijackers?"  Razzar pointed a sharp, gloved finger.  "It was him who stranded that vessel within the iceberg to begin with.  All of the ponies on board lost their lives because he willed it, exploiting their trust and their weaknesses.  He will do the very same to you if you are not careful."

	"Tell me, bright eyes."  Rainbow Dash leaned her scowling face closer.  "If you're so good at following others around and seeing through everything, then how would you have let this supposed dude remain alive on such a frozen ship?"

	"The Lounge are astute sentries of the Wastes, but we are far from perfect.  We searched the ship all over in hopes of finding him after its crash.  Alas, he somehow managed to escape our notice.  His cunning is undeniably great.  We believe that he only became visible once more when it came time to lure you and your companions into his trap.  Little did we know that we'd be waiting in the wings, taking the opportunity to observe his foolish reappearance."

	"If you ask me, I think you guys are paranoid," Rainbow Dash said.  "If you're such a big help to the Frozen Sea, why don't you stop wasting your time on a pathetic wild goose chase and instead so something helpful?"  She smirked briefly.  "Like showing us a way through the Flurries?  Because—I don't know if you've noticed—but the skies east of here aren't all that friendly, and we could certainly use a few good pointers."

	Razzar slowly shook his head.  "Not while that stallion remains unfettered.  We owe it to the families and partners of those maligned to bring him back to justice."

	"'Bring him back to justice?'"  Rainbow Dash squinted.  "Just what are you guys after?"

	"Enough discourse," Razzar's voice took on a crackling edge as his cloak glowed brighter from within.  The steam came out in rapid bursts now.  "We must have him.  It is imperative that you comply."

	"I don't think you Lounge melon fudges are nearly as altruistic as you let on!"  Rainbow Dash sneered.  "You're just a bunch of bounty hunters, aren't you?"

	Razzar said nothing.

	"Feh..."  Rainbow spat.  "If there's anything I can't stand in this wide, wicked world, it's hypocritical bounty hunters.  I've fought several, converted one, and butted heads with far more than I'd care to admit.  I did not fly two weeks into Hearth's Warming buttocks just to deal with your kind again.  You want to help us?  Fine.  Then buzz off."  Rainbow flung a hoof through the windy air.  "Make like a... a... wh-whatever you are and leaf!"

	Razzar's red-tinted vapors coalesced around his bobbing head.  "I am telling you this absolute truth now, winged pony.  If you keep this stallion on board your ship, you will not make it to the other side of the Flurries alive."  His fingers clenched into gloved fists.  "Of this I can assure you."

	Rainbow's mouth hung agape.  "Is that some sort of threat?"

	"Just a matter of fact."  Razzar took a deep breath, his mask's speaker crackling.  "We are giving you and your comrades five minutes to deliberate.  Once time is up, and you have relinquished the stallion to us, then we shall guide you through the Flurries... or leave you be.  Whichever you prefer."  He made to turn around, but paused.  His mask tilted up towards her again.  "Oh, and if it helps you to know, we have endured not only the harshness of the Frozen Wastes, but the wrath of the Warring Continent as well.  We know the lands behind and beyond the Flurries with utmost clarity.  It would behoove you to not attempt anything foolish right now.  Think of your crew.  That is all."

	With that said, the leader marched away and joined the other six of the Lounge.

	Rainbow, shuddering ever so slightly, pivoted and flew back to the rest of the Jury.

	And thus began the first of five minutes...
		//------------------------------//
		// The Wrath of Nancy Jane		//------------------------------//

	"What did he say?" Eagle Eye whispered.

	"Where's Elma?" Rainbow Dash muttered, flying through the crowd.

	"What did he say, Rainbow?"

	"Never mind that.  We're screwed if we don't give up Prowse to these dodoes in the next four and a half minutes."

	While Eagle Eye gasped, Josho glared towards the Lounge's ship.  "Define 'screwed?'"

	"I don't intend to find out."

	"But we can't give them Prowse!" Ebon squeaked.

	"I know that, Chef Enstallion!"  Rainbow hissed.  "I don't trust these masked hornjobs any further than I can throw them.  Now where's Elma?"

	Floydien emerged from the cockpit, kicking the shivering turtle into view.

	"Gaaah!"  Elma hid behind Josho so as not to be seen by the masked figures.  "Can I pleeeeeeease go down below?"

	Rainbow squatted until she was even with her scaled face.  "These dudes say that they want Prowse."

	"Well of c-course they want the Professor!"

	Rainbow's eyes narrowed.  "Why?"

	"How should I know?!  That's what the pirates captured us for to begin with!  I already told you that!"

	"They claim that Prowse is a liar and a murderer of local passengers."

	"Propsy's Uncle?!" Ebon said through a grimace.

	"The Professor certainly has a short fuse and he's been known to wave a boomstick in a few ponies' faces."  Elma Boreal gulped. "But he's never finished a fight unless somepony else started it!"

	"Are you sure about that?" Josho asked, glaring.

	"He may be a bit nutso, but he's not st-stupid!  The Frozen Sea is no place to make enemies.  We've had enough trouble as it is being bullied by pirates to bother rubbing other travellers the wrong way out here!"

	"Well, whatever the case, Prowse has made enemies in the wrong places," Rainbow Dash said.  She motioned over her shoulder towards the floating ship.  "And now these guys have come to collect."

	"Collect?"  Eagle Eye blinked.  "You mean they're bounty hunters?"

	"Different mouths, the same old spit," Floydien grumbled.  "No sea is the same unless it can run red."

	"Then what do we do?!"  Ebon Mane asked.  "They sure don't look friendly!  What'll happen when the time they've given us is up?"

	"I'm not going to let it come to that," Rainbow Dash said.

	Zaid smiled.  "I say you head-butt them!"

	"What?  No!"  Rainbow frowned.  "We gotta go about this carefully."

	"Go about what, exactly?"

	There was a tapping sound from the adjacent ship.  Rainbow glanced over to see Razzar looking directly towards her.

	"What's that all about?" Ebon remarked.

	"I think we're down to three minutes..."

	"So go on and headbutt him!" Zaid hissed.

	"Floydien, carefully and quietly, turn the intercom on," Rainbow Dash murmured aside.  "Patch us through to the engine room."

	"Yes yes yes..."  The elk shuffled over and stealthily tapped the console on the wall with his rear left hoof.

	"What do you have in mind?" Eagle asked.

	"It's going to be risky, but it'll take all of our concentration and teamwork to pull off."

	"Pull off what, exactly?" Josho asked.

	"Yeah."  Zaid nodded.  "It only takes one pony with wings to headbutt them."

	"Shhhh!  Will you shut the heck up about the stupid headbutting thing?!"

	The intercom crackled.  "Scrkkkk!  Mareshi Mareshi!"

	"Props..."  Rainbow spoke while keeping a trained eye on the seven figures still facing the Jury.  "I'm going to give you a signal.  When I do, I want you to fire the skystone engines into full drive."

	"Whoazies!  The skystone engines?"

	"Dang straight."

	"Isn't the weather too ugly fugglies for doing a test run?"

	"This is no test run," Rainbow said, shaking her head.  "This is the real deal."

	"But Rainbow!" Eagle stammered.  "We can't speed headlong into those clouds?!  The Flurries will tear us apart!"

	"That's a slower way to die than being blasted to bits by whatever friggin' crap they've got trained on us from inside their ship!"  Rainbow hissed.  "Besides, the cloud cover will provide us with the only way to lose them!"

	"To lose who?!  What are we dealing with?!"

	"We've met some friends of Elma's and your Uncle's," Rainbow droned.  "The Lounge."

	There was a great deal of explosive chatter on the other end, followed by Props' nervous voice.  "Uhm... Unky Prowsy wants me to tell you not to trust those guys."

	Josho spoke up.  "Did he explain why?"

	"He... used a lot of four letter words that even I don't understand."

	"Tell your Uncle that I'll talk to him about this later," Rainbow said.  "Right now, we gotta prepare to jump into the skystone drive right when I give the signal."

	"Poor boomers will get sucked into the wind wind," Floydien remarked.

	"Right.  That's why we gotta jump inside as soon as we hit it," Rainbow said.  "Me, Josho, and Eagle Eye will haul flank to the stairwell.  The rest of you follow Floydien into the cockpit.  Shut the doors and buckle up."

	"Won't they chase us?" Ebon asked.

	"I'm guessing you have a plan to knock their lights out," Josho said.

	"Right..."  Rainbow nodded towards him.  "You make them run for cover with your shotgun.  Floydien?"

	The elk blinked.

	Rainbow pointed.  "You give them the zap with your... zappy antlers..."

	"Floydien isn't sure that the glimmer will be enough."

	"Do the best you can.  Shoot their engine—or what you guess is their engine.  Then rush into the cockpit, close the door, and throttle us straight towards the clouds."

	"Hrmmmf..."  Floydien's muzzle twisted.  "Nancy Jane is not going to like this..."

	"You think she'll like being pawed all over by these freakazoids?"

	Floydien nodded.  "Color wheel has a good point.  Glimmer shimmer it is."

	"We'll lose them in the clouds, pull to a higher elevation, and stabilize the ship."  Rainbow Dash took a deep breath and gazed at everypony around her.  "Got it?"

	"Mmmmm..."  Zaid fidgeted.

	Rainbow and the rest glared at him.

	"Fine..."  He sighed, waving a hoof.  "You've got a soft fuzzy head anyways."

	"He's right, of course," Eagle said.

	Rainbow squinted at the stallion.  "How would you know?"

	"Uhhhhh..."

	"My little ponies..."

	Everyone turned and looked.

	Razzar stood on the edge of his ship with arms outstretched.  An errant ray of sunlight glinted off his mask.  "Time is up.  Have you come to your decision?"

	"I don't recall you giving us an actual choice in the matter," Rainbow remarked in a dull tone.

	Razzar icily nodded.  "True.  But I was hoping that your proper wisdom would pull through."

	"Oh yes..."  Rainbow Dash nodded.  "It has alright."  Her nostrils flared.  "Are you ready?"

	"We wouldn't have approached you in the first place if we weren't."

	"Works for me."  Rainbow spread her wings, spun around, and slapped Josho's flank with her tail.

	Snarling, Josho twirled his shotgun out and fired two broad shots.

	The rolling thunder masked the blasts as his weapon discharged on the exposed deck of the Lounge's ship.  The six figures behind Razzar juked and dodged with extraordinary ease.  Meanwhile, Razzar—unfazed—jerked his upper body and slid a ridiculously large double-barreled rifle out from his sleeve.  Kneeling, he slid a slender tail out from his cloak, used it to prop himself in a low squat, and returned fire instantly.

	Josho gasped as a stream of red energy soared straight for his skull.  Cl-Clank!  Eagle Eye's shield flew up, deflecting the blast.

	Panicked, Rainbow hissed out the side of her muzzle.  "Floydien—"

	But the elk was already dashing forward, all antlers charging in full.  "Grrrrrrrrrrgh!  Here comes the magiccccc!"  Bzzzzzzzt!

	Bolts of electrical energy surged into the polished black hull of the Lounge's spherical ship.  Something burst dully from inside, and the ship immediately veered away from the Noble Jury's port-side.  Razzar and the rest of his crew stumbled for an even stance.

	The ponies on board were already scrambling.  Josho and Eagle Eye galloped towards the stairwell together.  Rainbow Dash scooped up a breathless Elma and flew after them.  "Punch it, Props!  Punch it!"  The door slid behind her, just as it slid behind Floydien, Zaid, and Ebon on the opposite end.  Half a second after everyone was inside, the red skystone crystals atop the ship's deck pulsed brightly and the entire vessel rocketed east, skimming its way straight into the clouds.



	"Rrrrrgggh!"  Floydien hissed, his face tense and sweating as he gripped a pair of controls tightly in two cloven hooves.  Behind him, the other three stallions gasped and stumbled as the entire cockpit flounced.  "Forgive your beloved in advance, Nancy!  A darling anniversary this is not!  No no no!"

	"Yeesh!"  Zaid blanched.  "Bouncy enough?!"

	"This is crazy!"  Ebon squeaked.  "At this rate, the bulkheads will shatter within seconds!"

	"Sorry to disappoint the sailboat boomer," Floydien gruntled.  "But Nancy hasn't t-taken a swim yet!"

	"Huh?!"  Ebon craned his head to see over the elk's shoulder.  His ears folded while his pupils shrank.

	The dark wall of the thunderclouds loomed straight ahead at a crooked angle.  They were about ten seconds away from piercing the tumultuous layer.

	"You've g-gotta be kidding me..."  Ebon reached out and hugged the first body he could.

	"Whatever you do..."  Zaid gulped.  "Don't pee on me."

	"Get ready for the shimmer shiver!" Floydien shouted as his body tensed.

	And then the Noble Jury struck the cloud wall.



	"Aaaaaugh!"  Josho and Eagle Eye immediately lost balance, rolling awkwardly down the stairwell as the entire ship buckled around them.  Rainbow Dash gripped Elma with all four limbs as she ricocheted off wall after wall.

	Grunting, Rainbow Dash flew down and collapsed across a stretch of metal floor alongside the two former soldiers.  She rolled Elma upright, stretched her feathers, and fought gravity until she ascended onto the second floor of the stairwell.



	Inside her cabin, Bellesmith gasped, pratfalling out of her cot.  She rolled across the floor, winced, then immediately jumped up to catch Kera as the filly fell limply from the mattress.  Holding the catatonic little pony tight, she braced herself against a wall as the ship rattled all around her.  Panting, she strained to pull herself across the tiny compartment and burst her way through the hallway door.

	Outside, Pilate was already stumbling, his breaths coming in quick spurts beneath the perpetual clamor of the turbulent ride.

	"Belle!  Beloved, is that you?!"

	"I'm right here, Pilate."  Belle reached out to him with one arm while lying on her knees and cradling Kera with the other.  "I think the skystone engines have been activated!"

	"But what for?!  The weather's too unpredictable!"

	"Rainbow Dash must have a good reason..."  Just then, Belle saw movement in the mess hall.  She craned her neck and shouted, "Rainbow Dash!  What's going on?!"

	"It's all under control!" Rainbow sputtered, though her voice was drowned out by the clattering of pots and pans hitting the floor of the kitchen she had emerged from.  Undaunted, she flitted from porthole to porthole, staring out at the churning waves of cloudy chaos.  "I just gotta make sure that we've lost them!"

	"Lost who?!" Pilate gulped.  "Those strangers who pulled up in their ship just now?"

	"They're bounty hunters who're after Prowse!" Rainbow exclaimed.  "And they're willing to blow us out of the sky just to get him!"

	"You sure about that?!" Belle asked.

	Rainbow snapped, "What does it matter?!  With all the crap that's been trying to kill us out here, I don't want to take any chances!"

	Pilate blinked blindly.  "You... you risked everything just for Props' Uncle?"  He gulped.  "Even though you've only known him for a day?"

	"Look, if you don't agree with my decision, that's fine, but—"

	"I didn't say I disagreed!" Pilate exclaimed, his lips curving slightly.

	Belle glanced him while holding Kera tight.

	Rainbow took a breath and looked out the port side windows.  "Anyways, no sweat.  Looks like we lost them."  She exhaled heavily.  "We should be able to pull out of this mess now."  She flew over to an intercom and pressed her hoof against the shaking console.  "Floydien?  We're clear.  You can tell Props to turn off the engines and—"

	"Uhhhhh... Rainbow Dash?" A wavering voice picked up.

	Rainbow grunted.  "Zaid, what is it?"

	"Don't look now... but... uhm..."

	"Huh?"  Rainbow Dash squinted out the porthole.  Just then, a round black shape lifted into view, pulling itself parallel to the ship as it effortlessly pierced the clouds.  The mare gasped.

	"I... uh... really th-think you should have headbutted them."

	Belle backtrotted nervously.  "R-Rainbow...?"

	In the next flash of lightning, a piece of the Lounge's black hull could be seen separating from the rest of the ship, swiveling a full circle, and stopping with a two-pronged cannon aimed at the Noble Jury.  Two tiny holes glowed orange as the weapon charged.

	"Get down..."  Rainbow Dash muttered, spun around, and flew across the mess hall, covering all three ponies with her body.  "Get down!"

	KaPOW!
		//------------------------------//
		// Any Dash In a Storm		//------------------------------//

	"Auccchhh!"  Prowse grunted as his body rolled into the engine room's rattling wall.

	"Oooof!"  Props collapsed on the floor not far from him.  She tilted her head up, reeling, and gasped.  "That felt like a Magnetic Transconductive Crystalline Energy Dishcharge!"

	With two more resounding thuds, the hull of the Noble Jury shook around the Uncle and Niece once more.

	She stammered into the flickering lavender light.  "That was!  That was a Magnetic Transconductive Crystalline Energy Discharge!"  She dashed towards the nearest door and burst out into the stairwell.  "We're being shot at!"

	"Propsicle!"  Prowse sputtered as he struggled back to his flesh and metal hooves.  "Whaur ur ye runnin' aff tae, lassie?! Thes engine is spittin' up steam somethin' fierce!"

	"You can keep an eye on it, Unky Prowsy!" her voice shouted down the compartment.  "Just make sure we all don't explode!"

	"Ye dae realize fa yoo're talkin' tae?!"  Prowse winced, turning to face the mess of glowing, rattling pipes that filled the interior.  "Mmmmmmmmmm bloody hell..."



	All the while, the Noble Jury hurled through the thunderous mess that was the Flurries.  Dark clouds frothed on all sides, spitting lightning and flashes of light in random direction.  Sheets of rain poured in blinding gusts, and yet the skystone vessel hurled itself down the cneter of it.

	Tailing the ship's stern, speeding along at a menacing rate, hurled the Lounge's ship.  The craft bobbed and weaved through the turbulent weather with unmatched grace.  In fact, the only reason it slowed at all was so that it could align its sights with the Noble Jury cruising ahead.  At regular intervals, the bulbous black sphere rotated a cannon along its central access, taking aim and firing bright flashes of murderous light at its target.

	These streaks of energy skirted past the Noble Jury's hull, at least until the stream inevitably made its mark, and then the resulting fireworks would send the Jury spiraling violently deeper into the howling tempest.



	Ebon Mane and Zaid collided dumbly with each other.  Meanwhile, Elma clung desperately to a metal panel while Floydien braced himself against the front end of the buckling cockpit.

	"Grrgggh!  Stop hurling turd glimmers at Floydien's beautiful beloved!" the elk shouted.

	"Crkkkk!  Floydien!" Rainbow Dash's voice crackled from a cluster of soundstones.  "You gotta lose 'em!"

	Floydien spat back into the intercom.  "Well Color Wheel Boomer was the one who found them!"



	"So the job of the losing the death stabbies is not up to Floyd Floyd, now is it?!" the elk's voice cackled.

	Rainbow Dash gnashed her teeth as she looked across the careening mess hall towards where Pilate, Bellesmith, and Kera cowered.

	"You gotta fly more unpredictably!  Try pulling is into a dive to see if they can match!"

	"Does Nancy Jane have blue feathers and a cracking voice?!  Nancy is far more delicate than east farting horse horse!"

	"Well we're gonna be toast at this rate!" Rainbow rasped.

	"Dashie!"  Props' voice ran ahead of her as she scampered out of the kitchen and into the mess hall.  "The baddies are using a—Whoahhhhh!"  She slipped, somersaulted, and rolled like a blonde ball across the room.

	Rainbow pivoted and caught the mare with her legs and wings.  "Oooof!"  They boith slid across the room and landed beside Bellesmith.

	Props shook her dizzied head, then looked down at the pegasus she was straddling.  "—a  Magnetic Transconductive Crystalline Energy Generator!"

	"Uhhhh..."  Rainbow blanched before practically bucking the mare off her.  "Don't know if you've noticed, blondie, but we're being shot at by rogue freaknuts in the middle of Hurricaneville!"  She flapped her wings and hovered in the middle of the rumbling ship.  "If you need spare parts, I'm not really in the position to do some scavenging—"

	"No, don't you get it?!  That's what these ebil ebil guys are using to shoot at us!"  Props gulped, leaning against Pilate and Belle.  "And Magnetic Transconductie Crystalline Energy Generators are highly sensitive to other magnetized materials!  Something tells me these yahoos aren't used to shooting at ponies who can fight back!"

	"Fight back?!"  Pilate stammered, clutching Belle as the ship around them jolted from more energy blasts.  "You mean if we had some magnetically conductive dust to launch at those chasing us?"

	"Or m-maybe strips of energized industrial cobalt!" Belle added with a quivering breath.

	"Darn it, guys, would you listen to yourselves?!" Rainbow hollered.  "I blew it!  And now we're all up to our earballs in pew pew death and lightning!"  She kicked a nearby bulkhead, grunting.  "Where in the heck am I gonna find magnetic sneeze powder or cobalt whatsits at a time like this!"

	"Beats the fluff out of me," Props said with a shrug.  "I mean, aside from the bucketload of industrial cobalt slabs that Roarke bought in Gray Smoke and left sitting and collecting dust in our very own hangar."

	Rainbow Dash did a double-take.  "Buh?"

	"Oh... uhm..."  Props smiled awkwardly.  "I mean we totally have a bucketload of industrial cobalt slabs that Roarke bought in Gray Smoke and left sitting and collecting dust in our very own hangar!"

	Pilate's jaw hung open.

	Belle slowly pivoted her head to gawk at Rainbow Dash.

	"And you didn't think to mention this before, because...?"  Rainbow Dash hissed.

	"Well, you seemed super merry-go-round-cheesed off at Roarke before and after she left, and I never once thought that'd we'd be on the run from a bunch of shady bad guys firing a Magnetic Transconductive Crystalline Energy Generator at our butts while in the middle of a dark magical fate storm—"

	"Scrkkkk!"  The nearby intercom lit up.  "Will you stop spitting and just save Floydien's Nancy Jane already?!"

	"Sorry handsome!" Props squeaked.

	Rainbow flew over and picked the mare up by her shoulders.  "How can I make explosions with strips of chocolate bolt?!"

	"Cobalt!  And it doesn't involve explosions."

	"What?!" Rainbow grimaced.

	"Their ship's gotta be super charged with crystalline energy!"  Props stammered above the thunder and rattling bulkheads.  "If the cobalt slabs were to—say—get in contact with the hull of the bad guys' ship..."

	Pilate finished, "The magnetized metal in the slabs would overload the Energy Generator from the outside!"

	"So?"  Rainbow flashed the zebra a look.  "What's that mean?!  No pew pew?"

	Pilate gulped and nodded.  "No pew pew."

	"Fine!"  Rainbow dropped Props ("Whoah!" Thud!)  and took a deep breath.  "Then I'll grab the slabs, fly out there, and save the day with... erm... death metal!"

	"Rainbow, are you serious?!"  Belle hugged Kera tight with one forelimb and pointed out a flickering porthole with the other.  "Look out there!  You won't survive for one second!"

	"Belle—"

	She frowned.  "You'll be cut off from us in a second!  We can't afford to lose you at a time like this!"  She gulped.  "And after all that your Princess Celestia said..."

	Rainbow Dash clenched her teeth.  Another energy blast struck the ship, forcing everypony in the room to jolt.  Rainbow Dash glanced, panting, at Kera lying in Belle's clutches.  Her ears perked up.  "Maybe I don't have to be cut off at all..."

	Eagle Eye tumbled into the room, clutching to the doorframe to the kitchen.  "Rainbow, I think they're gaining on us and—"  He blinked.  "What's going on?"

	"I'm about to save the day, is what!"  Rainbow darted across the room and shoved Eagle Eye with her towards the stairwell on the other side of the kitchen.  "Come on!  And grab Josho!"

	"Ew.  He'll never let me hear the end of it..."

	"Just move!"



	"I dunno what your treasured ship is made out of!"  Elma clattered through a quivering break.  "But even it can't last this long against the Lounge!"

	"Floydien has a good mind to carve snap snap into a new bidet!"  Floydien grumbled, veering the ship left and right through the pelting wind and rain.  The flashing lightning illuminated the hardened lines in his frowning muzzle.  "Why can't the Lounge make like their name and drink the piss?!"

	"Floydien!  This is Rainbow!  You gotta trust me!  I need you to fly the ship even for a little while!"

	The elk flashed the intercom a horrified look.  "Has the Color Wheel finally lost its paintbrush?!"

	"Hey Rainbow!"  Zaid sputtered, disentangling himself from a thoroughly dizzied Ebon.  "Love hearing your voice!  Why's it sound so sexy and determined all of the sudden?"

	"I'm going to get those jerkensteins off our tail for good!"

	"You are?!"  Ebon murmured as Elma helped him up onto quivering hooves.  "And how?!"

	"The only way!  The best way!"



	Rainbow Dash stood in the ship's hangar, tightening a saddlebag full of heavy, magnetized slabs over her leather coated flank.

	"Stupidity!" she cackled.  Turning back, her gaze followed a tight metal cable wrapped around her body and looping its way towards a steel rig that Josho, Prowse, and Eagle Eye were tightening.  "You done tinkering with that, Professor?"

	"Aye!"  Prowse nodded.  "Yer elk mukker has a braw rig an' aw, but he certainly coods dae wi' a guid few grease monkeys overlookin' his pride an' joy!"

	"Let me worry about the ship!"  Rainbow Dash shouted as the vessel jolted once more.  She pointed.  "Just you make sure that this thing doesn't snap loose while I'm out there!"

	"Leave it to me, daredevil," Josho said as his glowing horn reinforced the cable rig with strong magic.  He finished fastening his and Eagle's fetlocks to the nearby railings while Prowse dug into a nearby bulkhead with a prosthetic of razor-sharp talons.  "I'd go out there with ya, but—face it—without wings, the best I'd be is a wrecking ball."

	"That'll be our second option," Rainbow said with a nod.  "Here's hoping it doesn't come to that."  She turned towards Eagle Eye.  "Wanna start the party, Double-E?"

	The unicorn gulped, then brought a hoof towards an adjacent lever.  "Are you r-really sure you wanna go through with this, Rainbow?"

	"No.  Best to get it over with before I wake up to the insanity."  She looked at the red-bearded stallion.  "Professor, any wise advice before I fly out into the storm?"

	"Yeah!  Try nae tae gie yer nipples bloon aff by lightnin'!"

	"Jee.  Thanks.  Eagle Eye?"

	"Good luck," he said, pulling the lever.  "Don't get killed!"

	"Hah!"  Rainbow smirked and slid goggles over her ruby eyes.  "You forget who you're talking to.  Danger's my middle—"

	FWOOOOOOOOOSH!  A cyclone of blisteringly cold air sucked Rainbow out as soon as the doors opened a sliver.

	"Luna poop!"  Rainbow hollered, legs flailing, as she and the weight of the metal strips went flying out of the ship's stern and into the tempestual flurries.  The cable danced and twirled behind her while the stallions on board clutched to the bulkheads for dear life.

	Eagle Eye winced, his tearing eyes squinting into the maelstrom.  All he saw was lightning... and the dark silhouette of a black orb in deathly pursuit...
		//------------------------------//
		// Don't Try This At Home		//------------------------------//

	"Gaaaaaaaiiieee!"  Rainbow Dash flew out the back of the Noble Jury.  She twirled and toppeled until the metal cable attached around her waist jerked to a stop.  "Hnnngh!"  She grunted, being dragged through the rain-pelting maelstrom in reverse at suicidal speeds.  Through squinting ruby eyes, she saw the black shape of the pursuing Lounge's vessel immediately facing her.

	The vessel bent around a bulbous cluster of dark clouds to stay on its target.  With a mechanical whirr barely heard underneath the perpetual growl of thunder, it swiveled its cannons around and aimed them—glowing hot—straight at the Noble Jury and through Rainbow.

	"Guhhh!"  Rainbow Dash kicked her legs in one direction and flapped her wings in the other.  Her weight shifted dramatically, and her dragged body twirled out of the way of the twin cannon blasts before she could be reduced to ashes.

	The Noble Jury pulled a hard left, bursting through sheets of rain while lightning flashed all around.  Rainbow's body swayed along with it.  Even as she spun on the cable, her eyesight caught her own reflection in the black round hull of the pursuers.

	Rainbow Dash held her breath.  As both ships leveled out, she tilted her wings so that her dangling body would glide towards the enemy.  She brushed past the surface—ultimately swinging hard past it.

	"Nnnnrghhh!"  Rainbow grunted, feeling the weight of the metal strips on her flank rattling with her motion.  "Darn it!  Guhhh!"  She angled her wings once more, gliding sideways until she swept towards the vessel once more.

	Perhaps the Lounge sensed her, or perhaps not.  Either way—as lightning reflected off its glossy surface—the ship spun and whizzed past her, attempting to broadside the Noble Jury.

	Rainbow Dash helplessly gasped.  Squinting through a rain-soaked mane, she watched as the black sphere approached the Jury's starboard side.



	"Not good!" Eagle Eye stammered from inside the ship's hangar.  "They're flying past her!"

	"Just perfect..."  Josho hissed, fighting to keep his telekinetic grip of the cable.

	"Ay!  Elkmeister!"  Prowse shouted into the intercom from where he reinforced the cable rigging with his metal limb.  "They're tryin' tae gie us th' broadside!"



	"Use those fantastical fairy sparks of yours to gain some distance, why don't you?!"

	"Does red beard think Floydien is made of magic and pixie spit?!"  The elk fired several bright beams into the console.

	Ebon braced himself against the cockpit's frame and stammered, "I-I'm sure he only meant to give you a good natured ribbing—"

	"Boomer should have invested in an exoskeleton!"  Floydien shouted and pulled the Jury into a sharp climb.  "Proceed with the butt holding!"

	"Aaaaugh!" Ebon toppeled back into Zaid's body.  "Ooof!"



	Soaring into the howling winds, the Noble Jury ascended suddenly.  The skystone vessel pierced anvil clouds and layers of thunderous mist.  The Lounge darted upwards to match the rapid climb, but it was clear that the Jury had gained more distance.

	Nothing, however, was clear to Rainbow Dash.  She yelped at the sudden change in the ship's course.  Her body swung like a pendulum through the violent rain.  Streaks of lightning darted in her peripheral, and she spat out globules of rain water.

	"Darn it!"  Rainbow Dash coughed and wheezed.  "I told that diet moose to keep us steady or—"  She blinked.

	Her body was currently dangling abreast of the black sphere.

	"Well, that works."  Grunting, she flapped one of her wings and thrusted herself to the side.  Strafing through the deluge, she reached the ship, her hooves making rough contact.  Fumbling, she reached a shivering hoof into her saddlebag and yanked one strip of cobalt out.  She raised the thing high over her head and prepared to slap it down.

	That's when the Jury evened out.  The Lounge did as well, while Rainbow's body jerked up and out of range.

	"Gyaaugh!"  Rainbow gasped as she dropped the precious magnetized metal in her grasp.  "Cruddicon!"  She flailed high above Lounge.  Around that moment, the ship spun its cannons, recharged them, and fired at the Noble Jury.  Rainbow's ship bobbed and weaved, causing her body to sway left and right like an uncontrollable water skiier.  Lightning flashed above, illuminating a tiny pocket of air between her and her target.

	Gnashing her teeth, Rainbow Dash bucked at the air, twirled upside down, and angled her wings so that she dove at the vessel.  The black sphere approached the top of her vision.  When she was within a spit's reach, she twirled again and landed with all four hooves planted against the flying ship's bow.

	Two breathless seconds later, she was pulling another cobalt strip out and slamming it onto the black hull of the vessel.  She gasped—for sparks instantly danced outward from the contact, illuminating the nearby sheets of rain.  Instinctually, she kicked against the hull, putting as much distance between herself and the violent flash of light that the successfully impacted hull was experiencing.

	The Lounge's ship did not veer off course, nor did it experience turbulence of any kind.  However, during the extent of its electrical interference, it did decelerate to a noticeable degree.  Rainbow watched nervously from where she dangled.  Then, after about fifteen agonizing seconds, the sparkling stopped.  The cannon spun around its central axis again and the ship started accelerating once more.

	"Not enough..."  Rainbow flapped her wings, twirled, and descended on the ship from a thunderous angle.

	She saw her approaching reflection in the glossy surface—but then she saw the entire vessel spinning so that its axis aligned with hers.  The cannons spun around, both barrels swinging purposefully towards her like a club.

	"Aw crud—" WHAP!  Yelping in pain, Rainbow flew hard from the blow, flailing wildly into the violent winds far off-track.



	Inside the Jury's hangar, the metal rigging of the cable groaned and cracked on its foundation.

	Eagle Eye gasped, his violet eyes reflecting the columns of steam rising from the apparatus.  "Old stallion!  Keep it steady!  The thing's starting to buckle!"

	"It's no use!"  Josho managed through clenched teeth.  "We gotta get her to come back in!  Or else she's gonna go down like a lead kite!"

	"Hae some bludy faith in th' wee spyug!"  Prowse spat as he spun his body around the metal railing he was fastened to and braced the rigging with his whole body.   "Grrggghhh... she hasnae gotten those jobby eatin' sods aff uir flenk yit!"

	Just then, a loud whistling sound filled the chamber.  Eagle Eye's ears drooped as he felt his mane billowing more and more violently.  "Do... do you feel that?!"

	"Sure as Hell do..."  Sweating, Josho stared nervously out the hangar doors at twirling swaths of angry clouds.  "Uhhh... Space elk?"



	"What's with all the sky indigestion that you're flying us all into?!" Josho's voice crackled over the intercom.

	Floydien, in the meantime, was staring out the cockpit window with a blanching expression.  "Ohhhhhhhh Nancy, when will the next glimmer be our glimmer home...?"

	"Huh?"  Ebon peered over the console then paled.  "Oh sweet salad forks."

	Ahead of the vessel, a ginormous cyclone twirled, spinning counter-clockwise with violently dense clusters of rain and hail.  It was no mere tornado, but an unearthly mile-high behemoth with steel-crushing winds whose howls pierced the water-proof windows framing the cockpit itself.

	"Hey guys..."  Zaid scratched his mane and muttered.  "I spy with my little eye something tall and pony-crushing."

	"Pull a left!" Elma shouted suddenly.

	Ebon looked back at her.  "Are you out of your shell?!"

	"Do it!" Elma exclaimed.  "The only way to escape the Flurries' Cyclones is to anticipate the wind formation and try to shake yourself out of them before you reach the inner core!"

	"Scrkkk!  Wait a second!  Flurries' Cyclones?!  What in the Hell is—?"

	"Time to dance, Nancy!"  Floydien physically yanked left on the vessel's controls.

	Everypony yelped as their bodies were dashed towards the right side of the cockpit.



	Inside the Jury's Mess Hall, Belle and Pilate yelped, tumbling across the floor until they lay on the starboard side wall as if it was suddenly the floor.  Belle grabbed Kera and hoisted the limp filly towards her.  Pilate gritted his teeth and trembled while the ship buckled around him.

	Props, in the meantime, clung upside down to a series of pipes inside the engine room, clutching a wrench in her teeth as she shimmied her way to a burst manaconduit and haphazardly repaired it amidst all the chaos.



	Outside the Noble Jury, it was a whole different story.  Rainbow Dash clenched her teeth and covered her rain-soaked muzzle with a criss-crossing pair of forelimbs.  Squinting through her hooves, she saw the Noble Jury hurdling counter-clockwise around a gigantic column of swirling mists and clouds.  The howling noise of the cyclone was deafening, and Rainbow Dash was powerless to do anything but dangle far off to the right side of the Jury's emergency banking maneuver.

	Breathless, Rainbow Dash looked down and behind her.  With a gasp, she spotted the Lounge's ship.  It too was stuck in a perpetual turning motion, skimming the outer rim of the tornadic currents as it desperately pursued the runaway skystone vessel.

	Rainbow Dash's face jerked from the Lounge to the Jury and back to the Lounge again.  She frowned with determination, then angled her wings in opposite directions.  Her body started twirling, and soon that twirl turned into a broader swaying motion as she dangled wildly along the edge of the cable.  Wider and wider, her body swung, until at last she was cruising left and right like an out-of-control pendulum.  Timing her movements, the soaked pegasus grunted and flung her body on the last inward swing.

	Rainbow broke through the wind, plunged, and sailed down towards the Lounge's position.  Lightning flashed, and she judged how fast she was approaching by the bright reflection glinting across the black hull.  It wasn't until a fraction of a second before crossing paths that she realized she wasn't going to make physical contact with the vessel itself.

	Gritting her teeth, Rainbow resorted to an act of desperation.  She spun around, flung her hooves back, and ripped open all the pouches of her saddlebag.  Every remaining piece of cobalt flew out of her satchel and soared into the winds.  However, Rainbow Dash was ready for this, and she growled as her body spun one last time, bucking half a dozen slabs with well-timed kicks.

	The bulk of the slabs were propelled towards the Lounge's ship below.  At least four made their mark, clinging to the black hull with sparks of electricity.  Less than a second later, Rainbow spotted the trademark yellow glow of the ship's engines flickering out.  The entire vessel spun out of control, noticeable only by the rear fins of the craft whirling like loose blades.  Then, powerless before the winds, the Lounge's ship drifted left... left... and plunged into the cyclone.

	Rainbow gasped, watching as the black sphere became one with the tornadic monstrosity.  For a second there, it looked as though the dark craft had disappeared entirely.  Then—with a nightmarish howl of sliced air—the ship was ejected violently from the heart of the cyclone.  It whizzed past Rainbow Dash—sparkling—and disappeared deep into the depths of the thunderous Flurries below.



	Eagle Eye beamed from ear to ear.  "She did it!"  He looked ecstatically at the others.  "She got them off our tail!"

	"Lollipops!"  Josho grumbled, tugging at the cable with his telekinesis.  "Let's reel her in!"

	"Careful..."  Eagle Eye winced as he too pulled at the metal cord with violet energy.  "Careful..."

	"She's bankin' tay stoaner towards th' cyclain!"  Prowse shouted, his voice vibrating from the jolts to the metal rig.  "We've got tae move uir asses awa' frae th' waterspit!"

	"Ya hear that, Floyd?!" Josho shouted.



	"The dance is over!  Time to go home!"

	"He compacts it into such little spit," Floydien droned as he punished the controls, attempting to break away from the tornado's outer circumference.

	"You can do it, Floydien!" Ebon Mane stammered.  "Just easy does it—"

	"Can it, sailboat!"  Floydien sweated and strained.  "Nancy... doesn't... want to budge!"

	"It's too late!" Elma exclaimed shakily.  "We're caught in the vortex!"

	"Then how do we get out of 'the vortex?!'" Ebon remarked.

	"Well..."  Elma fidgeted in her shell.  "I've done it a few times myself, but usually in ships smaller than this."

	"Out with it already!" Floydien hissed.

	"If we pull a hard left, accelerate, and puncture the eye of the cyclone—"

	"Ew!"  Zaid grimaced.  "On a scale of one to ten, that's Ew eleven!  Maximum Ew!"

	"This ship's sturdy!"  Elma said.  "It'll be bumpy!  But we'll make it!"

	"But what of Rainbow?!  She's like a flying squirrel on a leash right now!" Zaid exclaimed.  "And letting the winds rip her into a thousand sexy pieces isn't going to make up for the one sexy piece she already is now!"

	"Can Nancy survive the twirl-twirl at this rate?!"  Floydien sputtered.

	The turtle winced.  "No.  Most likely not..."

	"Then there's only one way to finish this..."

	"Ahhhhhhhhhh poo."  Zaid grimaced.

	Ebon was practically sprawled up against the intercom.  "Guys!  This is super important!"



	"You gotta haul Rainbow Dash in and close the doors and you gotta do it now!"

	"What..."  Josho strained and sweated, "Do you idiots... th-think we're friggin' doing...?"

	"Just hold on, Rainbow Dash!"  Eagle Eye shouted, his eyes locked on the distant blue shape twirling on the far end of the cable they were dragging through the open hangar doors.  "You're gonna make it through this!  Just you wait and—"

	"Uhm... dornt swatch noo, mates..."  Prowse nervously glanced aside and pointed a flesh hoof at the buckling metal rig.  "But... uh..."

	"Oh for the love of tits!"  Josho growled, his horn glowing brighter.

	"Rainbow Dash!"  Eagle Eye suddenly hollered.  "You gotta fly!  Flap your wings toward us or something!  Anything!  It's gonna blow!"

	Prowse flew muzzle-deep into the contraption, clenching a wrench between his teeth that he used to tighten the loosening bolts as hard as he could.  When that didn't work, he transformed his metal prosthetic into a bunch of talons and tried reinforcing the plate attaching the metal rigging to the hangar floor.

	Meanwhile, the cable being slowly retracted into the apparatus started wobbling and groaning at an alarming rate.  Tiny, dangerous fractures formed all along its taut surface.  And Rainbow...



	...was struggling to pull herself towards the Noble Jury, yanking at the tight cable with one forelimb stretched out before the other.  She gritted her teeth and hissed into the howling winds.  Lightning flashed uncomfortably close, highlighting the frothy outer surfaces of the mammoth cyclone to her left.

	A piece of the hangar's floor shattered and flew loose.  Rainbow faintly heard Eagle's yelping voice, but she was already yanking her head to the side.  With miraculous luck, she dodged the flying shrapnel of debris, blinking at it as it disappeared into the tempestuous chaos.

	For a brief moment, time slowed, and all Rainbow could hear was the throb of her own heartbeat against her ears.

	"Axan..."  She muttered.  "You friggin' pretentious flying crocodile.  Now would be a good time, ya think?"

	Nothing happened.  The howling and the chaos picked up.

	"Hrmmmf..."  Rainbow Dash pulled at the cable some more.  "I see how it is."  From the pit of her being, the tiniest of devilish smirks crossed her rain-soaked face.  "To be honest, I kind of prefer it this way."

	Crkkkkk!

	The cable gave some slack.  Rainbow's body jerked while it was just a few naked feet from the open doors of the Jury's hangar.

	Eagle Eye shouted something, then so did Prowse.  The metal rig shook, jostled, and cracked straight down the center.

	Rainbow Dash's forelimbs were already flurrying around her waist.  With panicked precision, she unraveled the cable from her body and flapped her wings.

	Crackkkk!  The rigging broke loose, along with the dangling cable.  The metal mess flew straight past Rainbow Dash with flesh-slicing force.

	Rainbow twirled like a figure-skater through it all, spread her wings, and flapped one last time, propelling herself like a blue bullet towards the rear doors of the Jury.  Her hooves stretched out as she squeaked into her clenched teeth.

	And she missed the doors by about two feet.

	Rainbow's pupils shrank.  Her body plunged back into the Flurries.



	"Gotcha!" Josho shouted, dangling at the end of his attached cable.

	Rainbow Dash jerked in place, caught in the unicorn's levitation field.

	Eagle Eye braced himself against the old stallion's flank as he added his magic to Josho's.  Together, the ex-soldiers slowly, slowly pulled Rainbow Dash in through the open doors of the ship.

	Prowse was ready, his metal hoof clinging to the lever along the wall.  Once Rainbow Dash was far enough inside, he gave the instrument a jerk, and the doors slammed shut.  Everypony slumped hard to the floor as soon as the air pressure normalized.

	Wheezing, Josho rolled Rainbow Dash off of him and sputtered towards the intercom.  "She's in!  She's in!  Do it!"



	Floydien immediately yanked the controls right and then left.  "Beloved's going to hate Floydien in the morning!"

	"Oh boy!"  Zaid hugged Ebon tight.  "Hurl time!  Cleanup on the other side!"

	"Gaaaaah!"

	Elma cover her eyes while the Noble Jury violently twirled...



	...and plunged left, flying ninety degrees towards the heart of the cyclone.  Lighting erupted around it, illuminating the suicidal path it was inevitably taking.  The moisture along the outer rim of the tornado was so dense that it reflected the red glowing skystone of the approaching vessel.  A high pitched whine filled the air...



	...that was audible even inside the mess hall where Bellesmith, Pilate, and Kera sat.  The mare sat up, her chestnut eyes staring widely out the portholes as the surface of the cyclone approached frightening close.

	She wrapped her arms tightly around Kera.  As the whining reached a fever pitch, she glanced aside and mewled to the cacophonous air.

	"Pilate...?!"

	The Noble Jury struck, and bodies flew.
	
		//------------------------------//
		// The Eye of the Storm		//------------------------------//

	"Nnnngh..."

	"Oh!  Are you feeling alright?  Are you experiencing any pain?"

	"It's... hard to say, Miss Bellesmith.  It's certainly... unique, is all."

	"The runic plate is necessary in order to transfer information between the manasphere and your cerebral cortex.  Aside from actually... uhm... drilling into your skull... eheh... this is the best means we have to create a junction.  As you can imagine, it can't not be a tight fit..."

	"And you're certain that this... this... uh... Optical and Sensory... erm..."

	"Just call it 'O.A.S.I.S.' for short.  Heehee... and to be honest, Mr. Pilate, no, we don't know if it will work.  For the moment, all I'm making sure of is that it will not bring you or your nervous system any harm.  If it integrates—good.  We'll work from there.  For the time being, take it easy, and we'll see next about giving you back some of your sight."

	"I won't be able to see perfectly, then?"

	"I'm afraid not, Mr. Pilate.  At best, this will allow you to read, scan nearby objects, and commit structural things to memory.  It won't replace your eyes, but I think you'll find it a means of continuing your intellectual pursuits."

	"Well, I certainly can't complain about that.  Did you try this device out yourself?"

	"I... I did when I first invented the prototype, yes.  But... I-I'm afraid to say that I'm not entirely a fitting or compatible subject."

	"Why is that?"

	"It's... complicated.  But I'm glad to have this opportunity with you, now.  After hearing what you did on board Ledo's Pride, I think you more than deserve a chance to regain at least a portion of your senses again."

	"Is that why you're doing this, then?"

	"Hmmm?"

	"Is this your attempt to reward me for heroism?"

	"Nopony can properly reward you for what you've done, Mr. Pilate.  Over a hundred ponies are alive now thanks to you.  No, I see this as... as..."

	"Yes...?"

	"A gift, Mr. Pilate.  It's a gift from me to you.  And if it works, then I'll feel like I've done something good... just like you've done something immeasurably wonderful for this world."

	"I... I don't know what to say, Miss Bellesmith."

	"Please.  Heehee.  Just call me—"



	"Belle..."

	Pilate raised a trembling hoof.  He gulped.

	"Belle... where... wh-where...?"

	"Shhhh... Easy does it, Pilate," Eagle Eye said from where he squatted low, cradling the zebra's head.  He gave the stallion's cheek a loving pat and said, "Your beloved's fine.  So is Kera.  A few bumps and bruises, but nothing to be scared of."

	"Then..."  Pilate winced, struggling to sit up.  "What happened?  Did we—?"

	The mess hall shook—as did the rest of the ship.  Wincing, Eagle Eye held Pilate tight while he glanced up at the rain-swept portholes.  "We're still in the Flurries.  We made it past that one nasty wasterspout, but... but..."

	Pilate's clear eyes quivered.  "But what...?"

	With a flap of her wings, Rainbow glided down the mess hall.  "This is wrong..."  She gritted her teeth while her mane still dribbled with rain water.  "Something's not right.  You feel that?"

	Josho looked up from where he knelt beside Bellesmith and Kera.  "How come we haven't done much shaking and jostling?"

	"Th-that's a good thing, right?!" Eagle Eye glanced up.  "We've got the Lounge off our tail and we're out of reach of that cyclone!"

	Rainbow gazed out the window.  She saw swirling mists jetting past the Noble Jury on either side.  "But we're not through the storm."  She gulped.  "If you ask me, it's almost like we're being threaded through a particularly nasty needle-eye."

	"With each passing week, I don't know what gets more colorful," Josho spat.  "Your mane or your analogies."

	"Stay here."  Rainbow Dash darted down the hallway, leaving a trail of rainwater behind her.  "I'm checking on the cockpit!"

	"Rainbow, slow down!"  Eagle Eye squeaked.  "You just went water-skiing through a hurricane!  Don't wear yourself out!"  His voice echoed against the bulkheads.  Frowning, he muttered, "If you stripped her of awesome, all you'd have is 'stubborn.'"

	Belle nodded, holding Kera close.  "You've no idea..."



	Rainbow Dash crawled up the last few rungs of the vertical crawlspace and entered the crowded cockpit.  "Floydien?  Elma?  Can any of you guys tell me just where in the hay we are?!"

	"Grrrrnngh!"  Floydien replied with a teeth-gnashing grunt, his cloven hooves clutching tight to the controls of the ship.  "It's like farting down a glimmer canal!  Each direction I budge ends with shake shake!"

	"It's been like this for the past ten minutes," Ebon Mane spoke up, sweating nervously.  "As soon as we broke through the tornado, this... path formed..."

	Rainbow Dash did a double-take.  "Path?!"

	"I've never seen anything like it!"  Elma exclaimed.  "It's like a tiny jetstream of air, blowing in one singular direction!"

	"Well, screw the air!"  Rainbow Dash frowned.  "Slow down and try and bank out of it!"

	"If it suits the Color Wheel!"  Floydien pulled sideways on the controls.

	"Ah jeez, Floydien!"  Ebon flailed.  "Not again—"

	The ship instantly rattled as if it was running aground.  Zaid and Ebon bumped into each other yet again while Rainbow had to catch Elma to keep her from falling down the vertical passage.

	"Never mind!  Ease off!"  Rainbow spat.  "Ease off!"

	Floydien evened the Noble Jury yet again.  "Floydien tried to tell her!"

	"Scrkkkk!  Handsome!  What's with the rattle in the saddle?!"

	"We're caught in some sort of wind current!"  Elma spoke above the crowd, her reptilian eyes reflecting the jets of rain on both the starboard and port side of the cockpit's windshield.  "Judging from the movement of the precipitation, I'd say we were being shoved forward!"

	"You mean Nancy's become a kite?!"

	"Let's test that."  Rainbow Dash looked at the elk.  "Floydien?"

	"What shimmering idea does the boomer have now?"

	"Think you can cut the engines?"

	"Nnnngh... Nancy needs a vacation."  Floydien spoke to the intercom.  "Blonde boomer!  You heard the feather feathers!"

	"Okies.  Here we goesies."  There was a gulping sound, then the noise of steam pipes hissing.

	The ship jostled once, but continued gliding forward.

	Rainbow Dash squinted out the windshield.  "...Props, did you cut the engines yet?"

	"I sure did, Dashie!  Just thirty seconds ago!"

	"But we're still moving forward," Ebon muttered.

	"How is this possible...?!"  Elma gazed up at Rainbow with a gaping beak.  "No wind current has maintained itself so cohesively and so powerful for this long!"

	"You sure about that?"

	"Look at it!"  Elma pointed out with a scaled foot.  "We're in a virtual tunnel, heading in one direction!"

	"You sure you can't slow us down any, Mr. Floydien?" Ebon asked.

	"Even with sails, Nancy is out of control!"  The elk sneered, "Floydien doesn't like it one bit.  No no no."

	"It's almost as if it wants us to go in one direction," Zaid said.

	Everypony looked at him.

	"What do you mean...?"  Rainbow squinted.  "'It?'"

	The ex-cultist shrugged.  "I dunno.  But you gotta admit it's pretty dang eerie."

	"Could the Lounge be behind this?"  Ebon remarked.  "Some sort of... mana-induced weather control?"

	"No friggin' way," Rainbow Dash muttered, gazing nervously out the windshield.  "I just schooled those guys royally.  I'm sure they're still in one piece somewhere, but they're definitely out for the count."

	"Maybe there are more of the dudes in their big black balls?" Zaid said.

	"Do you see any flickers of yellow skystone?" Props' voice asked.

	The ponies took a few seconds to look.

	"Nope, just normal scary-as-heck lightning," Rainbow droned.

	"Then I can't imagine what else would empower the Lounge to control a part of the Flurries!"

	"We gotta find some way out of here," Ebon said.  "What if pulled a sharp left or right and pierced through just like with the cyclone?"

	"Is sailboat boomer a goldfish?!"  Floydien said, "Nancy tried that minutes ago!  Floydien is not about to tear beloved to scrap scrap!"

	"Maybe if... uh... uh..."  Rainbow Dash bonked her wet head several times, desperately trying to think.  "Maybe if I got outside, stood myself on the bow, and spread my wings to break the airstream?"

	"You really wanna die fabulously today, don't you?" Zaid said with a squint.

	"Didn't you tell us earlier that your pegasus limbs can't manipulate this weather for some reason?" Elma said.

	Rainbow's ears drooped.  "Darn it, you're right.  Just what is this place?"

	"Uhhhhh... bestie friendsies?"  Props' voice crackled over the intercom.  "Why are we accelerating?!"

	Ebon's face scrunched.  "We're accelerating?"

	"We totally are!"

	"Impossible!"  Floydien frowned.  "Floydien didn't tell Nancy Jane to speed up!"  He glanced down at the controls and did a double-take.  "Nancy!  Why do you speed up?!"

	The ship started shaking—gently at first—then building up to a turbulent rattle.

	"Uhhhhh..."  Ebon squirmed, shuffling backwards as hard sheets of rain pelted the windshield harder and harder.  "Guys?  I don't like this..."

	"What's going on?!" Rainbow exclaimed.

	"The wind walls are closing in!" Elma Boreal gasped.  "It's like we're being funneled somewhere!"

	"Oh great," Zaid muttered.  "A sky toilet—Whoadayum!"  He suddenly fell back.

	So did every other pony, for the Noble Jury was taking an inexplicable nose dive.  Air howled through the seams of the bulkheads as the vessel approached incomprehensible velocities.  Floydien tried grabbing his controls, but the sticks jerked and swayed away from him.  Cursing under his breath, he tried zapping all manner of energy bolts into his console, but the ship refused to obey him.

	"The steam pipes are doing a fireworks display down here!" Props stammered through the flickering intercom.  "Unky Prowsie and I can barely hold them together!"

	"What's going on?!  What's going on?!" Ebon mewled.

	"Just don't panic!"  Rainbow shouted above the rattling metal plates all around them.  "There's gotta be a reasonable explanation for—"

	The Noble Jury pulled up, evening out and veering slightly to starboard.  As Rainbow Dash clamored for a hoof-hold inside the careening cockpit, she caught a swift glance of the outside world.  Through the gray haze of the Flurries, she spotted a dark shape looming directly ahead.

	A deep gasp escaped the pegasus' throat.

	Before long, the dark shape spread, becoming several—like gigantic bodies looming in the mists.

	"What..."  Elma sputtered, her head cowardly peering from just beneath the lid of her shell.  "What is that...?!"

	Something flew past the port side at murderous speed.  Rainbow's head swiveled to see it, but all she managed to spot was a hazy streak.  Something else flew past the starboard side, but she was too slow to spot it.  More shapes loomed.  She looked ahead, spotting dark splotches like islands floating amidst the Flurries.

	"Are they ships?!" Ebon breathlessly murmured.  "The Lounge?"

	"No..."  Rainbow shook her head.  "Too large!  If I didn't know better—"

	"Pressure's increasing!  What in the soot is going on out there, you guys?!"

	"Don't look now!"  Zaid exclaimed, pointing ahead with a wickedly bright eyes.  "But I think we're about to hit a wall!"

	Gasps filled the cockpit... until the "wall" turned out to be simply a thick sheet of rain.  Nevertheless, everypony braced themselves as the Noble Jury shot on through.  And just like that, all of the turbulence and rattling ended.  It was quiet enough to hear a pindrop.  A coat of rainwater rolled over the windshield, and when it cleared—Rainbow Dash saw buildings, monoliths, temples, courtyards, marble plateaus—all floating like gray balloons in a drizzling pocket of air.

	Rainbow Dash's jaw fell agape.  Her eyes blinked, and in that blink she imagined sunny skies and a green Equestrian landscape below.  When her eyelids reopened, she saw a massive building soaring past their starboard side.  She squinted, making out ribbed marble columns and tattered banners.  A sculpted figure dribbled with moisture, bearing a long snout, hooves, and a spread pair of wings.

	And then Rainbow felt her pendant rising up against her chin.  Not only that, but her rain-soaked mane was flouncing towards the ceiling.

	"We're falling!" Elma shouted.

	With a grunt, Floydien finally re-gripped the controls.  He yanked back hard, wheezing into the intercom.  "Blonde boomer!  The engines—"

	"Unky Prowsie!  Hit it!  Hit it—Scrkkk!"  Props' voice was cut off by the incessant hiss of steam.

	"Even us out!" Zaid shouted.  "Even us out!"

	"What does boomer think Floydien is trying—?!"

	"Look out!" Ebon squeaked, for a giant marble temple loomed ahead.

	Rainbow gasped, then pointed.  "Aim for the center!  There'll be a large open space!  The Jury should be able to fit through!"

	"How... d-does Color Wheel know—?!"

	"Trust me!  Glide us there!"

	Elma hid her head in her shell while Ebon buried his face in his hooves.

	Rainbow Dash braced herself against the cockpit's ceiling, watching with wide eyes as the dark structure loomed frighteningly close...



	Rain pelted and charred in several places from the Lounge's energy blasts, the Noble Jury plummeted towards the large floating temple.  Sure enough, in between two sets of four marble columns, a large gap loomed.  The Noble Jury fit easily through it.  The rest of the trip, however, was far less graceful.  The vessel's upper skystone made contact first, spitting sparks and tiny chunks of red crystal in every direction.  The ship jolted downwards, and the bottom hull of the gondola struck the marble floor.

	The air filled with the ear-splitting cacophony of scraping metal.  The Noble Jury gradually lost its momentum, careening towards its left side as it slid violently across the hollow temple and careened towards the open space on the other side.  For a full thirty seconds, it scraped along, leaving a frictious trail of shrapnel and crumbled mearble bits in its wake.  At last, well before it could emerge on the other side, the vessel finally came to rest against a pair of marble columns.

	There, the crashed ship lay still, stuck in a forty-five degree lean.  Its skystone shards flickered and died while every light on board the vessel shorted out.  Everything was dormant, with the Jury's windshield and portholes reflecting lightning from afar.



	Slowly, one by one, the ponies inside the cockpit stood up.  Zaid helped Ebon to his hooves while Rainbow Dash knocked politely on Elma's shell.  Miss Boreal stuck her head out while Floydien shook the cobwebs in his antler'd head.

	"Everypony in one piece?" Ebon asked.

	"I could do with a few less gray hairs, but otherwise I'm peachy keen," Zaid murmured, staring out the cockpit at the marble pillars looming on either side of them.  "Yeesh.  Who parked a vomitorium in the middle of birdspace?"

	"Nancy Jane, Floydien loves you..."  The elk muttered, rubbing his muzzle.  "And one of these days, Floydien swears, he's going to buy you some airbags..."

	Josho climbed up, sticking his fat head out of the crooked crawlspace below.  "What in the Hell is going on here?!  Did we make it to the Continent on the other side?  Is this Alafreo?!"

	Rainbow Dash shook her head.  "Far from it..."

	Josho squinted up at her.  "What, you expect me to believe an island just appeared in midair?"

	Rainbow bit her lip.

	"Scrkkk!  Guys?  At least tell me one thing.  Did we head south all of the sudden?"

	Ebon tilted his head towards the console.  "Why's that, Propsy?"

	"Cuz it's really, really warm out there!  The instruments are telling me that we're no longer in the arctic!  But how's that possible?"

	"The temperature..."  Elma thought aloud.  "Whatever that pocket of air is outside, it's... somehow self-regulated?"

	Rainbow Dash gulped.  "Somepony's regulating it, alright."

	"Huh?"

	"I'm going out there."

	"What?!"

	Rainbow Dash was already scurrying down the crawlspace.  "I have to find out something!  Keep watch on the ship!"



	Eagle Eye was just finishing with helping Pilate and his beloved to their hooves when he heard Rainbow Dash's flapping wings.  He spun around, squinting across the gray spotlights that the portholes made through the dark interior.

	"Rainbow...?"

	"Stay here with Belle and Pilate, Double-E."  Rainbow Dash stripped of her rain-soaked leather coat and trotted briskly towards the kitchen.  "I'm going outside to investigate."

	"Investigate what?!  Rainbow, what's going on?!"

	"I said stay inside!  I mean it!"  Rainbow flew on by herself.

	"Beloved... I'm so confused..."  Pilate muttered.  "Where are we?"

	Belle could only stare out the window leaning above them at an angle.  She saw marble, gusts of rainy wind, and more marble.



	With a loud mechanical whir, the hangar doors to the Noble Jury slowly opened.  There was no gust of air pulling Rainbow out.  Instead, everything felt very calm, moist, and humid.  She stepped outside on gently padding hooves.

	Standing upon the crooked plank to the hangar, she paused, glancing left and right.

	The temple interior stretched before her, flanked by marble columns—beyond which nightmarishly chaotic gales of wind blew in every which direction.

	Biting her lip, Rainbow Dash hopped out.  Her hooves clapped as they made contact with the floor—a thing that startled her.

	"That's... that's real marble..."  She furrowed her brow as she shuffled forward.  "Then... h-how in Celestia's name is it staying up?"

	Nevertheless, she pressed forward, trotting away from the Noble Jury as she approached the nearest edge of the temple.  As she came upon the precipice of the platform, she squinted, for a curtain of veiled sunlight bathed her through the gray malaise.

	She looked straight up.

	Dozens if not hundreds of identical structures loomed—many of them marble temples, some of them granite effigies of ponies... ponies with wings.  She was too busy taking in the sights of floating domes and levitating obelisks to gasp at any single one detail.

	Lightning flashed, and the resulting thunder echoed quadruply off the multiple, floating structures.

	Breathless, Rainbow Dash leaned forward, tilting her head to look below.  Through randomly jetting curtains of rain, Rainbow Dash saw more and more granite edifices.  A virtual city loomed within the pocket of cyclonic winds, trapping the structures there... and the Noble Jury as well.

	Shuddering, she leaned back, until she became aware of a structure looming directly above her.  She turned around and glanced up.  Her wings spread in surprise.

	A sculpture of a mare was positioned at the peak of an arch.  Her dark gray features were slick with perpetual rainwater, all dribbling off her muzzle, helmet, and trademark scowl.

	"Commander... Hurricane...?"  Rainbow Dash sputtered.  She blinked, glanced out at the rain and lightning, and blinked again.  A gasp escaped her lips, and she stumbled numbly back into the temple, taking a crooked path back to the Noble Jury.

	There, she spotted several Jurists standing along the leaning entrance to the hangar.  Among the crowd was a pale, red-bearded stallion, and he was jumping for joy.

	"Och mah stars an' garters! it's real! it's real an' it's haur!"  Grinning from ear to ear, Prowse hoisted Props up and spun around with her in his metallic grip.  "Ah kent it! Ah kent eh'd fin' it!"

	"Eeep!  F-find what, Unky Prowsy?!"

	"Whit else dae ye hink, lassie?!"  He dropped her and shouted victoriously into the echoing marble chamber.  "The Secret Lost Civilization of Zadubadabu!  Haa haa haa!"  He did a prancing jig, then leaned down to leer at a certain snapping turtle.  "An' ye thooght it was aw a wild goose chase, Tankette!  Weel, mince 'at in yer lettuce hole an' reek it! Professur Prowse has dain it! Noo an' forever!  Hahaaaa!"

	Rainbow Dash could only blanch.  She plopped down on her flank and ran a hoof through her sopping wet mane.

	Eagle Eye trotted forward to the hangar's edge.  Gazing at the rain-slick temple, he gulped and rested a hoof on Ebon's shoulder to his side.  Ebon tilted his head down and gazed earnestly at the pegasus.  "Rainbow, I... I-I don't get it!  What kind of a place is this?"

	Rainbow swallowed hard and looked back up at them.  "Mythological."
		//------------------------------//
		// It's Just a Myth, Right?		//------------------------------//

	"I don't get it, Unky Prowsy!"  Props remarked, tilting her goggles up over a scrunched face.  "If this is the Legendary Lost City of Zadubadabu, then where are the streets of silver and abundant manacrystal trees?!"

	"Ach, but thes is jist a piece ay it, lassie!"  The red-bearded stallion smirked at her from where the two stood before the open hangar of the Jury.  "Ye saw aw ay th' bloomin' buildings hoverin' it thaur! Fur aw we ken, thaur ur blocks upon blocks nae worn doon by th' elements! Aam tellin' ye, we're sittin' oan a bludy gauld mine!"

	"We're sitting on a floating death trap, is what we're on!" Ebon exclaimed.  "Just what the hay are these buildings flying by?!"

	"There are many things older than written science," Pilate said from the shelter of the hangar above the rest.  "Who's to know what some ancient civilization could have used to make this place possible."

	"Yes, but floating buildings?!" Ebon sputtered.

	"Gray Smoke's a bunch of floating buildings," Zaid said.  "Were you this whiney about it when you lived there with Blondie?"

	"I... it... n-no!"  Ebon frowned.  "But Gray Smoke was different!  They utilized mana crystals and steam!  What's this place got?!"

	"Pure magic, aam tellin' ye!"  Prowse hopped around with a victorious clatter of his metal limb.  "An' beneath it aw, a glitterin' pot ay knowledge an' information! Ye eatin' yer words yit, tankette?! Coz th' fat quine has officially sung!  Wooo!"

	"Everypony just chillax!"  Rainbow Dash grumbled.  "This place is just a pegasus city.  Nothing more."

	"Rainbow..."  Belle looked on from the hangar where she sat beside Pilate.  "Are you seriously comparing this place to Cloudsdale and Las Pegasus?"

	Rainbow Dash looked at her.  She then turned and glanced the other way, eyeing where Josho's and Eagle Eye's hooves effortlessly trotted over the granite, rain-slick surface of the temple.  Taking a breath, she said, "Okay, so it's different from any other pegasus city I've seen, or even heard about, but it's totally got my kind blood written all over it.  I'd know it like the back of my hoof."

	"Heh..."  Zaid smirked.  "You say that as if you were born in such a place."

	Rainbow Dash sighed out her nostrils.

	Zaid blinked.  "Oh.  No wonder you act like you're high all the time."  Whap!  "Ouch!  Dangit!"

	Josho lowered his hoof and glanced at the others.  "As much as I'd love to sit, mingle, and do the whole tourist thing..."  He turned and pointed at the body of the Noble Jury leaning at a forty-five degree angle against a series of columns.  "The ship barely made it here in one piece, and we've got a friggin' typhoon making love to the atmosphere directly outside.  Can we start a vote over how soon we can get the Hell out of Dodge?  Because I'd like to officially shove my name so far down the hat that it'll poop out dead rabbits."

	"I think it's no big secret that I'm not a fan of this place."  Ebon gulped and raised his hoof.  "Can we please... please find a way off it?"

	"I share your sentiment," Elma Boreal said with a nervous nod.  "But I don't see how we can."

	"Why not?" Eagle Eye asked.

	"The Flurries brought us here," the turtle explained.  "Well, more like viciously dragged us here.  If you were to ask me, I'd say that something about this place has... erm... m-mechanized the weather to bring us to where we are now."

	"Mechanized it?!"  Ebon stammered.

	"She means that this place was built to draw us here in the way it did," Pilate remarked.  "And it stands to reason that if we tried to leave, we'd only be drawn back just as harshly if not more so."

	"It could destroy the Noble Jury," Eagle Eye said.  "Even from here, I can see it."  He gulped.  "It's like a solid shell of dense winds is perpetually spinning around this place.  Flying into that could rip us to shreds."

	Props glanced nervously towards the ship.  "Handsome isn't all that happy to be stuck here as is.  I doubt he'd want to risk Nancy any more."

	Josho shrugged wildly.  "Then how in the Hell do we get out of here?"

	"Ach, come off it!"  Prowse pouted.  "We jist got haur! We cannae pass aff thes opportunity tae explair!"

	"You can explore your anus!"  Josho spat.  "I don't care how many explosions you can make with that boomstick crutch of yours!  This place ain't for us!  We need to hop off this cyclonic turd and make for the continent east of here like originally planned!"

	"Bollocks to your plan!   Ah sit it tae fin' Zadubadabu frae th' get-go!"

	"Fine!  Go ahead and merry it!  I'm sure you'll have a bunch of handsome, red-furry, marble poop children together!"

	"Guys!  Please!"  Eagle Eye raised his trembling hooves.  "Let's not fight about this!"  He turned towards Props' uncle.  "Mister Prowse—"

	"Professor!"

	Eagle's lavender ears folded.  "Pr-Professor."  He cleared his throat.  "I know how much this place means to you.  But you gotta understand, the rest of us have been through a lot of straits as bad as this if not worse.  And what we've learned is that it's not conducive to a healthy, long life to stick around one of these kinds of messes for very long!"

	"Ach, yoo're jist a namby pampy sodder!"

	"Well, maybe I am."  Eagle Eye frowned.  "But I care for these ponies, and if they all want to leave this place, then I am with them.  There's more to life than pilfering from lost cities in the sky.  You have any doubt of that, then ask our niece!"

	"Dornt brin' 'er intae thes ye bapit coward!"

	"Unky Prowsy..."  Props rested a gentle hoof on the stallion's shoulder.  "He's right.  I-I'm glad that you found this place, but this isn't exactly the snazziest situation, ya know?"  She smiled crookedly.  "I barely got the Jury working in time for us to make it here.  Our resources are limited.  What's more, we've got those nasty-wasties on our tail!"

	Elma's beak rattled.  "Good heavens, you think the Lounge are still out there?"

	"Goddess willing, we've scared them into adopting a better name!" Zaid said with a smirk.

	"Unnnghhhh..."  Prowse groaned into a metallic palm.  "Ye aye ken th' way tae make yer auld uncle crumble, Propsicle."  He reached out and patted her shoulder.  "Eh'd gie everythin' tae hae thes city under mah hooves—everythin' but ye. If stayin' haur means tearin' ye apart, 'en i'll flin' aw th' dreams in th' naf bin."

	She smiled at him with rosy cheeks.  "No need to give up all hope, Unky Prowsy.  At least you know the place exists, right?  There's always a way to make an excursion back!"

	"Perhaps, lassie.  Perhaps..."

	"One thing at a friggin' time..."  Josho paced through the group.  "How in the blazes are we going to fly away from this thing?"

	"We could always try flying straight up or down!"  Ebon courageously uttered.  He twitched.  "R-right?"

	"Look, it's a masquerade ball!"  Zaid reached over and squeezed Ebon's shoulders.  "And chef here wants Floydien's Nancy Jane to dress up as a burning comet!"

	"Well, I wanna see you come up with a better plan!"

	"I could come up with a dozen that are sexier!"  Zaid nodded, then blinked.  "Too bad none of them would work."  He turned about.  "Rainbow?"

	The pegasus looked over.  "Hmmm?"

	"You've gotta have a brilliant plan to all this."

	"Pffft.  You're looking at the wrong pony."

	"You sure?"  Zaid smirked.  "Cuz you're the only mare around these parts with wings!"

	Rainbow Dash bit her lip, looking away from the group.

	"Rainbow..."

	She glanced up.

	Belle looked over Kera's shoulder as she cradled the filly.  "You... you know what this place is, don't you?"  Her chestnut eyes glinted.

	Rainbow sighed.  She rubbed a hoof through her mane and muttered, "Everypony in Cloudsdale grew up believing in... in..."  She mumbled the word out.

	Elma leaned forward, blinking her reptilian eyes.  "Whazzat?"

	"Stratopolis," Rainbow grunted.  "It was just a silly myth, an old mare's tale."  She sighed and tilted her face up towards the rainswept heights of the temple above.  "Until now..."

	"I'm guessing where you come from, myths were made to be proven," Zaid said.

	"Or broken."  Rainbow kicked at the marble floor and paced slowly towards the nearest marble columns, squinting out at the gray and wet world beyond.  "Every pegasus household in Equestria has this age-old story about the fate of Commander Hurricane."

	"Commander who?" Ebon remarked.

	"He sounds super brave to have a name like that!" Props bounced.

	"Yes.  She was," Rainbow muttered.

	Props winced, blushing.  "Oh."

	"She was one of the six founding leaders of Pre-Classical Equestria," Rainbow Dash said.  "If it weren't for the important decisions she and her fellow cohorts made, our civilization would never have gotten over their differences and come together.  Before the founding of Equestria, unicorns, pegasi, and earth ponies lived in separate tribes, untrusting and wary of each other."

	"What changed?" Elma asked.

	"Heh.  The weather did."  Rainbow pointed at the drizzly nastiness beyond.  "Imagine this, but colder than the Frozen Wastes, with never-ending snow."  She turned and trotted back towards the group.  "Turns out a bunch of nasty windigos were responsible for the blight."

	"Windigos?" Eagle remarked.

	Rainbow nodded.  "And they continued to plague the founding ponies of Equestria until they got over their differences and joined under a courageous bond of love and commitment."

	"I've read of such creatures before," Pilate said with a nod.  "They're elementals in the form of equines who feed off the despondence and dissent of large populations."

	"Could... could windigos be responsible for this place?" Ebon asked with a nervous shiver.

	"Hard to say," Rainbow said with a shrug.  "When Equestria was founded, all of the windigos were driven away."  She squinted.  "All except for in one place."

	"Oh?" Eagle blinked.

	"Yeah.  Turns out there was a patch of snowy clouds far to the north that refused to dissipate.  So Commander Hurricane led a batallion there to investigate.  She claimed that she found a city roughly size the Pegasopolis, but with... with..."  She gulped, glancing nervously about the temple.  "With darker buildings and strange obelisks connecting the bigger structures."

	Zaid took one glance out the temple, and then back at the pegasus.  "You don't say...?"

	"What happened then?" Ebon asked.

	"Hurricane was almost certain that the windigos would return if the city was not dealt with.  It was too big to destroy and yet too dangerous to invade.  So, instead, Commander Hurricane and a choice group of elite pegasi flew towards the city with the intent of... taking it over."

	"They were going to hijack a city?" Elma remarked.

	"A floating city," Rainbow Dash said.  "Commander Hurricane left General Pansy behind to take care of pegasus affairs in the new kingdom of Equestria.  Soon after, all traces of the windigos disappeared, as did the mysterious cluster of clouds to the north."

	"Whew..." Zaid whistled.  "Sounds like she got the mission done."

	"We can only guess..."  Rainbow rubbed one forelimb with another.  "The Commander... uhh... n-never returned."

	Props' blue eyes sparkled.  "She d-didn't?"

	Rainbow shook her head.  "It's one of the biggest losses in pegasus history.  For decades after that, Equestrian pegasi broke off in small companies, flying east and west.  They attempted searching for the fate of the Commander's expedition.  As they did so, they did their best to describe the fabled city to every culture they met, using one name to describe the mysterious place."

	Pilate nodded.  "Stratopolis."

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow sighed.  "And just now, after we landed, I saw a sculpture that looks like Commander's Hurricane's image."

	"No way..."  Ebon exhaled.

	"For real."  Rainbow nodded.  "I'm guessing that she was successful with her mission.  Maybe a little too successful."  She looked up at the temple ceiling.  "This place... this lousy place... it must have become her home."

	"Well, there's no way in Hell it's becoming our little hole in the sky!"  Josho frowned.  "There's gotta be a way to shut down the typhoon... the windigos... the leprechauns—or whatever's keeping us landlocked on this floating turdipelago!"

	"Gonnae-no pissin' aw ower thes place's braw nam, mucker!"  Prowse frowned at the obese stallion.  "It's got character!  Antiquity!  Grace!"

	"It's got you by the balls!  But not me!"  Josho looked towards Props.  "Yo, grease monkette, could there be something here—like some sort of crazy mana machine—that's controlling the weather all around us?"

	"I suppose... some sort of machine could be responsible," Props said with a shrug.  "Though it'd be some really fancy shmancy machine!"

	"And what if that machine were to be turned off?"

	Props blinked.  "The wind could conceivably go 'bye-bye!'"

	"That's a gross oversimplification if you ask me," Elma said.

	"The way I see it—it's a start!"  Josho grinded his hooves.  "And I don't intend to stand around here and watch ourselves turn to prunes from all this damned rain!"

	"First thing's first..."  Rainbow Dash flapped her wings and lifted up.  "Let me go out there."

	"Go out there?!" Belle stammered.

	"Huh?!"  Eagle Eye blanched.  "Rainbow, no!"

	"Somepony's gotta do reconaissance.  Might as well be the only pony with wings."

	"The wind will blast you to bits!"

	"I've given the place a good long look.  The air's pretty darn manageable for someone as fast as me—so long as I don't try to fly beyond the outer border.  I'll be fine."

	"But... b-but..."

	"Look..."  Rainbow sighed and gave the rest of the group a weary smile.  "If I'm right about this lousy place, then this is something I gotta do."  She gulped and gazed out past the columns.  "I'm the only Equestrian out this far."  She bit her lip.  "This place was practically made for me..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Something of a Fool's Errand		//------------------------------//

	Eagle Eye finished fastening the saddlebag to Rainbow's flank while the two stood along the floating temple's edge.  Tightening it shut, he looked over her shoulder with a compassionate expression.  "You sure you don't want to be wearing that leather coat for this flight?"

	Rainbow Dash shook her head.  "It's not even remotely cold out there..."  She bit her lip.  "Er... in here, I guess."

	"It could have something to do with rapid convection within the clouds surrounding us!" Elma Boreal said.

	"Or maybe it's linked to the fact that we're stuck in the heart of a Spark-forsaken flying city from Hell!"  Josho grunted.  "Rainbow, wherever you go and whatever you do, could you go about it quickly?  I wanna get off this flying vomit stain in the sky."

	"What's th' matter, ye ben grease tyke?" Prowse stepped up with a bearded smirk, slapping the unicorn's shoulder with his biological hoof.  "Dornt want tae check it th' sights fur fear 'at they micht be checkin' it ye?"

	"A unicorn doesn't belong in the air."

	Eagle Eye blinked.  "But you've been riding with the Jury for months!"

	"Yeah, well, the Jury feeds me!" Josho grumbled, leaning back and folding his forelimbs.  "I don't see this flying sewer hole shoveling me fresh daisy sandwiches!"

	"Hrmmf..."  Ebon rolled his eyes as he trotted by.  "You're welcome..."

	"If ye ask me, lassie, tak' aw th' time 'at ye want!"  Prowse pivoted to face Rainbow.  "Somewhaur in thes place is likely th' key tae hoo we can gie it ay haur, but there're bigger an' brighter keys tae far mair sparkly opportunities, by aw!"

	"What I'm concerned about is the whole group, Prowse,"  Rainbow Dash said, sliding a pair of goggles down over her eyes.  "We've been through a lot, and I owe it to them to get us all out of here."

	"Not like you made this city ensnare us to begin with, Rainbow," Eagle Eye said.

	"No.  But I feel a responsibility, Double-E."

	"What for?"

	Rainbow sighed.  "There're so many nasty things in this world, and all of them felt foreign to me.  But this place?"  She tilted her head up into a gust of moist wind, squinting against the rain and drizzle.  "It's been through Equestria before.  And if the images of Commander Hurricane are any indication, then it's carried a piece of who and what my kind are out into the far reaches of the world."  She gazed sadly at the unicorn.  "It'd be really, really uncool to find out that something pegasi did is responsible for a lot of nasty crap out here in the Frozen Wastes, ya dig?"

	"You're doing good stuff with each passing day, Rainbow," Eagle Eye said.  "Fly safely, and know that we believe in you."

	"Yeah, that's awesome enough."  Rainbow flapped her wings and hovered up by a few feet.  "For now.  Soundstone?"

	Josho tossed her one.

	She gripped it in the crook of her hoof, slid it between her pendant and her neck, and nodded.  "Well, here goes a super wet won."  Holding her breath, she valiantly turned tail and soared off into the water-drenched hurricane force winds.

	Eagle Eye sat back, shivering slightly.  Ebon trotted up and rested a hoof on the young stallion's shoulder.

	"She knows what she's doing."  Ebon smiled nervously.  "She's done the solo thing before."

	"Yeah, but still..."  Eagle sighed.  "It's gotta be lonelier knowing your friends are just a sneeze away..."
		//------------------------------//
		// There's a Better Home Awaiting		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash flew against the blinding sheets of rain.  Gnashing her teeth, she veered a little bit to her left, attempting to skirt around the jetting gale.  In so doing, she nearly propelled herself into a hovering black obelisk.

	Gasping, she twirled sideways just in time to avoid the structure.  Its tall marble face blocked the wind, forming a tiny patch of still air.  Rainbow Dash chose to hover there, breathing with relief.  She stared at the structure, marveling at how it wasn't being swayed at all by the heavy winds.  In fact, it seemed altogether impervious.

	Staring from the base to the top of the slender structure, Rainbow saw thin lines glowing with otherworldly sparks of mysterious energy.  Upon closer inspection, the obelisk's exterior appeared smoother than the marble surfaces of the temples and buildings levitating in every direction.  Rainbow Dash ran a hoof along the black shell, her jaw agape in wonder.

	"So pristine," she murmured.  "Almost like... the machine world..."

	Shivering slightly, she turned and looked over her shoulder.  Through the swirling mists of the hurricane force winds, she spotted several more obelisks identical to this one, all hovering at equidistant points.  The buildings of pegasus architecture floated in relatively close clusters to these curious towers, and Rainbow wondered if perhaps there was a connection of some sort.

	Tilting about, Rainbow looked towards the center of the storm, forward and above her.  About eight hundred meters skyward at a forty-five degree angle, the largest building of all loomed.  It as built like a giant, stout cylinder, with the makings of a dome that flattened out towards the top.  The entire circumference was lined with typical marble arches, but Rainbow couldn't make out any of the interior from the deep shadows that the pillars made.

	Holding her breath, Rainbow Dash tightened her goggles, planted her hooves against the obelisk behind her, and kicked off.  She shot like a blue bullet into the rain, knifing her way through the currents in order to approach the large building at maximum speed.



	"You can go inside, you know," Elma Boreal said as she shuffled over to Bellesmith's side.  "You and the filly don't have to be out here."

	Belle sat on the bottommost corner of the leaning hangar doors to the Noble Jury.  A gray haze of light cascaded over her features as she lay Kera by her side, gently stroking the sleeping foal's mane.  "Kera's not a fan of pitch black darkness," Belle muttered.  "I always keep a lantern lit dimly to soothe her.  So, while Props and her uncle struggle to get the power to Floydien's ship back on, I think she'll enjoy being out here more."

	Elma blinked.  She gazed out at the rain-swept temple, dribbling with moisture, and then the swirling clouds beyond.  She glanced back.  "No offense, but... h-how can you tell?"

	Belle merely bit her lip.

	"I-I'm sorry..."  Elma winced, squatting down beside the mare.  "That wasn't a fair thing to say.  But still, I must say I'm rather concerned.  Did... did something happen to the filly to... to cause her to be like this?"

	"Yes, you could most definitely say that," Belle said through a frown.  She closed her eyes, shuddered, and straightened her bangs.  "Forgive me.  Things... j-just haven't been the same since a few weeks ago."

	Elma smiled awkwardly behind her beak.  "I couldn't help but notice.  I've been on several airships in my time, seen several different crews.  The ponies of the Noble Jury seem... decidedly on edge."

	"Yes, well, we have good reason to be," Belle said.  "There are dangers in this world that you simply can't walk away from without limping.  There was a terrible tragedy in a town called Lerris where Kera, Pilate, and I attempted to settle.  Kera was... f-forced to witness a lot of horrible things.  She used to be talkative, playful, sassy... and h-happy... but now?"  Belle sighed, stroking the filly's mane.  "A foal her age shouldn't have to be subjected to such a nightmare.  The last thing I ever want to do is leave her side."

	"I do believe I can see that," Elma said, nodding.  "Has she gotten any better since... er... the incident?"

	Belle was silent.

	The turtle shuffled where she sat.  "Ms. Bellesmith, I am... well acquainted with the horrors of this world."

	"Are you?"  Belle flashed her a frown.

	Elma looked back.  Nevertheless, she smiled—gently.  "Indeed.  Just because I'm a talking turtle doesn't mean I haven't lived as extraordinarily long as tortoises that don't."

	Belle blinked at that.  Eventually, with folded ears, she gazed down at the metal plank of the Noble Jury.  "How... h-how many years...?"

	"I lost count at one hundred and twenty," Elma said.  "Life has its joyous occasions, Bellesmith, but when you throw that many decades into the mix, it's inescapable to see loved ones die... and twice as many float away into the darkness unsung."  Her reptilian eyes gazed towards the swirling mists beyond the temple's edge.  "There's a saying amongst the turtles of Alafreo:  'Let shadows collect only beneath a crowd.'  It means that while our many, many years go by, our only means of battling the darkness is to usurp it with the warmth and intimacy of each other."

	"I... didn't realize that reptilian creatures were... uhm... capable of such—"

	"Sincerity?"  Elma chuckled.  "Ms. Bellesmith, I am cold-blooded... not cold."  She took a deep breath and said, "What's happened to Kera is most terrible, and I am very sorry to hear about it.  But perhaps it would be a good thing for you both to mingle someplace that's warmer, rosier, even happier."

	"I'm giving her everything, Miss Boreal," Belle said through a quivering lip.  "Warmth, companionship, love... she's receiving all that I've got to give."

	Elma's eyes narrowed.  "And was Kera the... only pony who was damaged by the trauma of what happened in this 'Lerris' place?"

	Belle stared blankly past her.

	Elma slowly nodded.  She reached over and patted Belle's shoulder.  "Your loyalty to Kera is noble.  But I do think the filly needs more than that.  But, more importantly, so do you."

	Belle gulped and murmured through a trembling muzzle.  "Loyalty... is all th-that I've known as of late..."

	"All that you know or all that you've chosen to know?"

	The mare winced, shivering slightly.

	Elma glanced at the few ponies gathered about the temple, then back into the hangar of the Noble Jury.  "This place just... feels so unnecessarily empty."  She smirked.  "And from someone with a shell, that's saying something.  If I were you, Miss Bellesmith, I'd take advantage of something that I personally haven't had in nearly thirty years."  She stood up.

	Belle glanced up at her.  "And what's that?"

	Elma paused, then turned back to wink at her.  "A husband."  And she shuffled off.


	On her way to the super structure, Rainbow Dash found it hard to breathe.  The constant jets of rain meant opening her nostrils—much less her muzzle—for a single second risked legitimate drowning.  The fact that she was still airborne could be chalked up to her sheer strength and experience as a versatile flier.  Nevertheless, the wear and tear of the inclement weather was having its toll on her, and she feared she couldn't made it to the building at this rate.

	Luckily, something loomed towards her right.  She shot a glance over, seeing a large wall of granite roaming in her general direction.  Rainbow wasn't startled; instead she banked right, twirled, and glided towards the lower platform of the wandering temple.

	Her hooves touched down on the granite balcony with a splash.  She shuffled forward until she was shaded by two stories of polished rock and marble.  Shaking the copious amount of raindrops off her body and saddlebag, she took a long, wheezing breath and relaxed her muscles.  With a slight shiver, she turned about, tilted her neck, and gazed out over the edge of the temple.

	She could see obelisks moving through the hazy precipitation, while the pegasus temples and buildings moved faster.  This confused Rainbow Dash for a moment, until—after wincing from a flash of lightning—she surmised that the obelisks were, in fact, staying still.  It was the temple she was on that was moving, along with the other pegasus structures themselves.  The fact that the obelisks looked like they were floating about was simply an illusion brought upon by her perception.  This contributed to her growing assumption that the obelisks were somehow responsible for animating the entire city.

	Turning around, Rainbow Dash trotted into the dark depths of the small building she was in.  Rubbing a hoof over her pendant, she summoned a ruby glow that cast a dull crimson glint off of every wet surface.  She saw no signs of furniture, draperies, tools, or any sort of small movable items whatsoever.  She guessed that untold years of being suspended in the belly of a hurricane had stripped the interiors of these buildings to their bare essentials.

	Still, the eeriness of the whole situation was not lost to Rainbow Dash.  Aside from the black marble and the barren decor, it undoubtedly felt like she was navigating the inside of a typical pegasus dwelling in Cloudsdale.  The building was built without enclosed walls, so that air could breathe easily through the marble columns and cornerstones of the place.  Even the steps—which stretched up in a pair of zig-zagging stairs in the center of the structure—were drawn apart with vertical spaces for the rain water to dart through.

	Rainbow Dash reached the top floor with quiet hoofsteps.  As thunder rolled in the distance, she stared out onto the bright gray sprawl of floating buildings.  She could see the large cylindrical structure looming a little bit above her.  She could tell at this point that the round building was undoubtedly the center of the storm, even though she couldn't spot any obelisks located around it.

	Looking down, Rainbow spotted the temple where the Noble Jury had landed at a distance.  From far away, it appeared so tiny and fragile, and its movement through the wind gusts looked decidedly weak and unpredictable.

	Wincing, she forced herself to look away from where her friends were.  Gazing up, she spread her wings and darted towards the building, holding her breath this time so that she could make the distance in one succinct glide.
		//------------------------------//
		// Let's Go to the Kitchen		//------------------------------//

	By flickering candlelight, Ebon Mane shuffled across the leaning interior of the Noble Jury's kitchen.  Muttering slightly to himself, he scooped several pots and pans and utensils from the floor, shoving them into their respective places inside cabinets with widely dangling doors.

	The candle suddenly went out with a gust of air.  Ebon cursed under his breath and fumbled blindly for the matches.  Just then, a lavender light lit up the room four times as brightly as the single candle.  Blinking, Ebon turned and looked up.

	Eagle Eye stood within the open doorway leading from the stairwell.  "Sorry..."  He blushed a bit.  "I-I guess I brought a bit of the hurricane inside with me."

	"It's fine," Ebon said with a sigh, glancing lethargically at the kitchen floor.  "I wasn't getting much work done anyways."

	"What makes you say that?"

	"Unnngh... I gotta wash off all these dishes and junk!  The darn things have been lying on the floor ever since we did battle with the Lounge!  But I can't very well scrub them when the power's out!  Besides, even if we somehow took off from this thing and flew victoriously to Alafreo, there's no telling what amount of turbulence would just propel them back onto the floor in the end!"  He groaned and pulled at his mane.  "So what's the use..."

	Eagle bit his lip.  "I-I could help you, y'know!"  He smiled nervously.  "One horn is better than eight hooves, where I come from."

	"The only thing I'd need help with right now is fixing a group salad with tomato slices..."  Ebon grumbled.  "That needs a lot more light than what you've got."

	"Uhhhhh..."  Eagle Eye turned, illuminated the breezy stairwell, and then pivoted to face Ebon once more with a crooked smirk.  "Considering where we are n'stuff, I really doubt the Jurists have munching on their mind."

	"Feh.  Josho does.  Don't deny it."

	"Josho can jump off the edge of my tail!"  Eagle winked.  "Big fat old stallion only knows how to do two things:  fart and complain."

	"Then why do you love the moron so much?"

	Eagle giggled.  "Somepony that plushie is impossible to not hug."

	"Grrgghhh..."  Ebon kicked at a clattering pot and slumped against a slanted cabinet.  "I'm just so sick of this!"

	Eagle squinted.  "Sick of what?"

	"It feels to me that—like—ever since we left Gray Smoke, I've been fumbling and stumbling to do anything right around here!"  Ebon sighed heavily.  He slid down to the floor and hugged himself.  His eyes softened as he murmured, "I just... I-I just want to be useful, that's all..."

	"Ebon, buddy, you are useful!"

	Ebon sniffled.  "Then why is it that everypony on board seems to h-hate me!  I'm just the 'Sailboat Boomer' who can't prepare a soup right, I swear..."

	Eagle smirked as he shuffled over.  "Ebon, you're the ship's cook."  He sat down right beside Ebon, slumping against the same cabinet.  "I promise, there's nopony on board who hates you."  He finished with a giggle.

	Ebon raised an eyebrow.  "Floydien hates me."

	"Yeah, well..."  Eagle scratched his neck and shrugged  "That elk hates everyone.  But I think that's his only way of loving everyone."

	Ebon's face scrunched.  "That doesn't make any sense."

	"So, what about the magic space antlers that shoot electricity into stuff?"

	Ebon nodded.  "You have a point."

	"Yes, and it's a good thing that it glows," Eagle squeaked before letting loose another giggle.

	Ebon glared at him, then leaned his head back against the cabinet as he stared at the slanted ceiling.  "You're really nice to try and cheer me up and all, but you don't need to bother, EE.  I just... get into these crazy funks and I can't really pull myself out of it.  It can't be helped."

	"Why's that?"

	"I dunno..."  Ebon shrugged.  "I guess I just go with the crowd."  He gulped.  "I feel it in my gut that this ship has just... been so miserable as of late.  It keeps me awake at night, and I feel powerless to change any of it."

	Eagle Eye blinked.  "What about Zaid?  You think he's miserable?"

	"Idiots don't count."

	"Good point."

	"I feel like there's something that I should be doing to change all of it, but I can't."  Ebon bit his lip as his eyes watered.  "More than anything, I hate just... feeling so useless."

	Eagle Eye shifted, his eyes darting to the cluttered floor.  "Would you... like to be useful to me?"

	"Hmmm?"  Ebon's ears twitched.  "Yeah, how?"  He felt a soft mane against his neck.  Blinking, he glanced aside.

	Eagle was leaning his head on the stallion's shoulder.  His violet eyes reflected his burgundy muzzle like that of a foal's.  "Try not to look so sad."  Eagle smiled weakly.  "I really, really hate it when you've got a long muzzle."

	Ebon stared at him.  His face twitched, and he broke out an awkward smile.  "Thanks."

	Eagle immediately said, "For what?"

	Ebon's skin pulsed from a jerk to his heartbeat.  "I... I-I'm not sure yet..."

	Dead silence fell across the room, during which neither stallion said anything.  Calming down, Ebon leaned his head to his side, so that eventually the petite bodies of the two ponies were peacefully supported by one another.  The wind howled outside, but the stallions took no notice of it.  Neither did they realize exactly when it was that Eagle's light went out.
		//------------------------------//
		// That Which Hangs Off Cliffs		//------------------------------//

    Rainbow touched down at last on the edge of the large round building.  She almost slipped immediately on the slick wet stone.

    “Wh-whoah?!”  She spread her wings for counterbalance, but this was nearly her undoing.  Errant gales of hurricane force wind shoved her forward, nearly plowing the pegasus into a marble column.  With expert agility, she flipped, contacted the pillar with her hooves, and bucked off of it.  Gliding with the wind, she came to a stop under the large overhang that wrapped around the building’s circumference.  Here, the bulk of the structure’s outer shell finally acted as a wind buffer, and she could actually walk evenly.

    Panting, she picked a random direction and trotted it, shuffling counter-clockwise around the outer rim of the building.  As she did so, she looked to her left, staring at the wall of marble that was perpetually slick with rain water.

    She could see patterned tiles, forming a mosaic of an ever-evolving image.  Squinting, Rainbow saw mountains, forests, trees--and above it all a blue and purple sky with swirling bands of cloud and nebulae.  But that wasn’t all.  There lay a foundation beneath it all, or at least there once was.  From what Rainbow could tell, somepony or ponies had chipped away the tile pieces that made up an entire layer beneath the illustrations of earth.  It looked too neat a cut to have been done accidentally by nature or the elements.

    “Somepony didn’t like the machine world…”  Facing forward, Rainbow Dash muttered against the howling winds.  “Hurricane, just how much did you know, girl?”

    She suddenly stopped in her tracks, speechless.

    A large body was blocking her way--a hunk of rusted metal with splayed mechanical parts.

    Rainbow Dash blinked.  She looked to the left.  The front of the huge bulky structure lay flat against the inner wall of the building.  She looked to the right.  A pillar or two had been knocked aside, careening on either edge of the slender metal object.  If Rainbow didn’t know any better, she would have guessed that this thing had crashed into the building.  How long ago, she couldn’t say.

    With pensive steps, she trotted around the thing.  In so doing, she saw the tell-tale signs of a gondola, complete with rudders, masts, and the skeletal remains of a support structure.

    “A zeppelin…”  Rainbow Dash muttered as she squinted through a shattered porthole, staring into a compartment full of waterlogged junk and moldy interior furnishing.  “How in the heck did it get up here?”

    Her voice had a strange, confined echo to it.  So she turned around, staring further down the edge of the building’s curved wall.  She spotted not one but two more structures, both having impacted the building’s inner face just like the zeppelin before.

    In a brisk pace, she galloped towards the two objects.  Sure enough, both were airships.  The hulls were in various states of decay, and she had seen enough vessels to know that one used a different kind of propulsion than the other.

    “Okay… getting weirder…”

    Rainbow walked along, and as she did so, she found more and more airships, all having crashed into the building’s side--evidently bow-first.  She also found spaces where the marble floor of the building’s outer rim had been scraped and damaged, suggesting that even more ships had crashed there before, but over time they had either fallen off the edge or disintegrated from decay.

    This pattern continued and continued.  To break the monotony, Rainbow Dash paused in her counter-clockwise trek to stare out at the floating “city.”  It was then that she discovered that other floating temples--some large and some small--were littered with airships themselves--be they whole entire derelicts or just the pieces of old metal carcasses.

    “Luna Poop…”  Rainbow Dash winced.  “The Noble Jury isn’t one in a million after all…”  She turned to gawk at the bulk of the structure she was traversing.  “How long has this friggin’ place been gobbling up ships?”

    It was then that Rainbow noticed a space of open stone to her left.  She suddenly realized that the wall stopped curving, giving way to a wide partition that stretched nearly sixty feet across.  Curious, she trotted past an inner layer of pillars and approached the chamber, surprised to see that no vehicle parts littered the space.

    And then her hooves came to a scuffling stop.  She looked straight up at the dead-center of the wall.  Her mouth hung agape, and after a good solid minute, she lifted her rain-slick goggles to stare at the thing unimpeded with her natural born eyes.

    “Huh…”  Her expression hung between a grimace and a smirk.  “Well that’s different.”

		//------------------------------//
		// Where's the Damned Hint Book?		//------------------------------//

	"What I'm trying to tell you, handsome, is that it's not a matter of Nancy's womb being fried!"  Props gulped before speaking across the cockpit.  "If we were to take off right now, we'd fly directly into a mess of howling winds!  I'm afraid the steam ports aren't enough to stabilize us with that degree of turbulence!  All we could do is circle around with the skystone engine at suicidal speeds!  And I don't think Nancy Jane's lucky enough to crash land twice in a row without going kersplodey!"

	"Well, Floydien isn't a fanatic addict for sitting here and collecting glimmer dust!" Floydien grumbled.  "Color Wheel isn't here to help blonde boomer's uncle with an excursion diversion!  Floydien needs to get Nancy and the rest of the boomers out of this mess!"

	"I'm all with you, but you gotta understand..."  Props smiled awkwardly.  "Until we can figure out what makes this place tick, there's no sense in making the Nancy Jane tock, ya feel me?"

	"Mah niece has got a point, ye hyperactife space elk!"  Prowse remarked from where he leaned against the rain-drizzled doorframe to the leaning ship's top deck.  "Yoo've got a mighty braw ship haur, but dashin' it tae bits jist coz ye feel a tooch ay th' cramps abit thes waterlogged place doesnae make much sense."

	Floydien's red eyes narrowed.  "How is it possible for a boomer to exist that spits more sideways than Floydien?"

	"Crkkkkk!  Hey, guys?!"  The sound stone in Props' possession crackled.

	"Oh jeezies!"  Props hopped in place.  "Dashie's calling!"  She bellowed out the doorframe.  "Hey guys!  Dashie's got something to say!"  Hoofsteps galloped closer as the mare leaned back against a crooked wall and spoke into the stone being cradled between her hooves.  "Rainbow?  Propsy here.  What's new?"

	"I wouldn't call it 'new,' exactly.  But old.  Super... super old..."

	Josho trotted up with Pilate leaning against the stallion's side.  "Go on ahead, Rainbow," he said with a slight shudder.  "We're all ears."

	"Well, for one thing, I've found a bunch of crashed ships."

	Josho's face scrunched.  "Like what kind of ships?"

	"Everything you can imagine.  Steam-powered, skystone, regular zeppelins.  A whole bunch of them look smashed to all heck, not to mention pretty dang old.  I think this floating city's been collecting aircraft from the Flurries for a crazy long time."

	"Ah kent it!"  Prowse sneered through clenched teeth.  "Zabubadabu isnae naethin' tae play aroond wi'! It explains wa sae mony ships disappeared in th' depths ay these bludy freezin' cloods!"

	"I didn't find any ponies, though.  I mean, with that many ships, you'd think there'd at least be some bodies lying around."

	"In an environment as inhospitable as this, I highly doubt any ponies would have survived for long," Pilate said in a cold tone.  "The same could be said of their corpses."

	Props shuddered at that.

	"Other than that, I've seen more evidence of Commander Hurricane having lived here.  Granted, that would have been several thousands of years ago."

	"Astoondin', isnae it?"  Prowse grinned.  "Thes place was ance a haven fur flyin' ponies! Aam tellin' ye, we've struck gauld!"

	"Yes, and we've got the proverbial concussion to prove it!"  Josho frowned.  "Say, Rainbow, have you found any thing that can get us off these floating sky turds?"

	"No, but I have found a bunch of murals that must have once illustrated the world from the perspective of those who built this place.  A lot of the images are missing.  I've got a theory or two behind that, but nothing to go on.  Oh, and I kinda sorta found something else... something big..."

	Pilate's metal brow furrowed.  "What kind of something?"






	Rainbow Dash stood before the large wall, staring up at the intricate lines forming the circular patterns above her.

	"It's a very large pattern," she said.  "Imagine a large circle, only it's sliced up into twelve pieces.  And—like—there are two smaller circles just like it, one inside another.  Three large segmented circles total.  And between the joints of the twelve different plates, there are these small spheres, set on the inside curve of the broken circles."

	All was wind and howling...

	And then Pilate's voice replied, "Twelve segments to each circle, you say?"

	Prowse's voice crackled on the other end.  "Is thaur supposed tae be some sort ay bloomin' significance tae 'at?"

	"It falls into a pattern that we've observed since our journey from Blue Shelf began.  Rainbow Dash, it would seem, has ties to a long-forgotten history that is stored within the machines that lay hidden in the belly of this earth.  Both Rainbow and my beloved have experienced visions of a world—far larger than the one we live in—that is made up of twelve separate parts, like portions of an enormous ring."

	"Bludy heel. ur ye tryin' tae suggest 'at thes city is a key tae a prehistoric genesis?"

	"Well, you could argue that Rainbow herself serves such a purpose.  I can't possibly comprehend what connection this floating city might have."

	Props' voice lit up.  "Maybe it was built by flying ponies, much like Dashie and the old Equestrians who apparently found it once upon a time?"

	"I've got an even stupider question," Rainbow Dash said, eyeing the circles within circles.  "Given what you, me, and Belle have learned so far, Pilate, just why would I be looking at three broken rings inside of one another?"  She gulped.  "I was only ever aware of one ring."

	All was silent on the other end.

	"I do not know, Rainbow," Pilate's voice said.  "We have to consider the likelihood that, in spite of all the visions and truths we have encountered, there is still a great deal we have yet to learn and understand."

	"I didn't fly all this way to get another migraine."

	"Neither did any of us.  I must admit that my curiosity abounds, but I suspect we have more pressing concerns."

	"I couldn't learn much on my lonesome anyways," Rainbow Dash said, squinting at the wall between the spheres and lines.  "I see a whole bunch of words carved into the stone here."

	"What kind of words?" Josho's voice said.

	"To be perfectly frank, they look... Xonan," Rainbow said.  "Or Xonanese?"

	"Better yet, perhaps the same ancient language that the Xonans based their dialect on," Pilate said.  "Belle and Phoenix witnessed that when they first met Kera and she saw the book of runes you found."

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow sighed.  "Too bad the poor scamp's on the fritz.  I wouldn't mind having an adoracute living cheat sheet in my pocket."

	"Yes, well..."  Pilate's voice took a breath.  "We must make do with what we have..."

	"Or what we don't have," Rainbow muttered quietly.

	"Hey Dashie!"  Props' voice chimed. "Not that we're in a hurry to get out of this scary mess before we all die of drowning, aphyxiation, or madness... but any chance you can try and find the energy source of what's keeping us here in the eye of the storm?"

	"Right..."  Rainbow Dash nodded and turned away from the wall of carvings.  "I saw some corridors leading into the heart of the largest building where I'm at.  I'll go do some exploring and keep in touch."

	"Just be careful, ya paint bucket!" Josho's voice grumbled.

	"Heh... you know me..."  Rainbow's nostrils flared as she trotted back the way she came.  "Of course I won't..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Bring Me the Blue Dashes		//------------------------------//

	As Rainbow Dash entered one of several corridors leading to the center of the large round structure, the hiss of wind and rain dulled to a low roar.  All had become darkness and echoing hoofsteps.  After a brief pause, a ruby beam of light emanated from her pendant, illuminating the narrow marble walls on either side of her.  She glanced left and right, her blue hooves splashing in tiny puddles as she made her way towards the far end of the passageway.

	She came upon a junction of tiny intersecting hallways.  She sniffed the air with her fuzzy muzzle, squinting left and right across the shadows.  Muttering under her breath, she took a pensive left turn and followed a long, curved corridor.  As a minute limped by, she judged that this hallway followed the generally circular shape of the building's outer walls.  On her left and right, doorframes opened to small, cramped corridors.  She took a moment or two to glance in, and for once she saw some semblance of former civilization.  Broken pieces of old pottery and delapidated furniture littered the floors and corners of the cramped compartments.  Curious, she wandered into one, picking up a piece of curved plaster that must have once been an urn of some sort.  Across its dusty surface, she made out the faded images of winged ponies in pre-classical Equestrian armor.

	"Hmmm... Pegasopolitan..."  She stared up at the ceiling, spotting cracks where streams of moisture bled through, trickling noisily to the floor.  "I bet Twilight would have gotten a real kick out of this place, the friggin' egghead."  She paused for a moment, and her mouth hung between a grimace and af rown.  "Heh... bet she'd get a real kick out of me."

	She dwelled on that for a little too long.  With a barely audible grunt, she taused the piece of pottery uncaringly to the floor.  Turning away from the shattering noise, she trotted back into the curved hallway and resumed her slow, exploratory journey.

	It wasn't long until she came upon a hallway to her right that was significantly bigger and significantly longer than the compartments she had stumbled upon previously.  Judging that it must lead towards the center of the building, she proceeded on through.  She sniffed the air, noticing a staler smell than in the previous interior sections.  The deeper she traversed towards the heart of the building, the colder and deader the atmosphere felt.  She felt a sharp chill run across her body, and she wrapped her wing feathers around her sides for a smidgeon of added insulation.

	"Brrrrr... no way in heck Commander Hurricane could have been in charge of this place," Rainbow Dash muttered aloud.  She glanced back at the darkness behind her.  "Any self-respecting bird-brain woulda piloted this rainy hunk-a-junk to the tropics where it would have warmed up."

	She bumped into the pointy end of a spear.

	"Ow!" Her voice cracked.  She turned and stared down the hollow nostrils of a horse skull.  "Gaaaah!"  Hopping back, she shielded her wincing face with her wing, then nervously peered over her feathers.

	A pony skeleton lay, its spine and ribcage propped up against a stack of moldy, imploded wooden crates.  Several sharp pikes lay in a solid barricade along with the body.  The equine's forelimbs faithfully held a staff at a forty-five degree angle to the ceiling, pinned against its decayed frame.

	"Uhhh... h-hey there..."  She craned her neck and blinked with wide eyes.  "...sister."

	A pair of pegasus wings dangled from the skeleton's sides.

	"That's not crazy or anything."  Rainbow leaned closer, squinting through the ruby haze of her lit pendant.  "It... it couldn't possibly be the Angels that Khao yapped on about, could it?"  She tapped her chin, then glanced aside at a second pegasus—then did a double take.

	Much like the previous skeleton, this pony's remains were situated along the front end of a crumbled barricade.  Not only was it equipped with a jagged spear, but rusy bits of armor lay around its decrepit side.  Rainbow's eyes traced and re-traced hauntingly familiar helmet motifs.

	"So, Commander, you weren't alone."  She gazed at the barricade as a whole, spotting three more skeletons, frozen forever with gaping jaws.  "Your batallion followed you to the bitter end."  She took a deep, proud breath.  "Talk about loyalty."  Squinting, she peered down the far end of the corridor.  "Just what were you guys all protecting...?"

	Her murmuring voice echoed across the dark walls.

	Curious, Rainbow Dash crept forward.  Her muscles strained harder to trot, and that's how she knew that the floor was tilted upwards at an incline, like a ramp.  As she moved along, she became aware of a faint light straight ahead of her.  She heard a pitter-pattering sound, like that of rain cascading across thick glass.  Eventually, the light was strong enough that she could dim the glow of her pendant.

	Right about this time, the ascending hallway ended, and it opened up to a massive, massive chamber.  The tiniest of shuffling hoofsteps sent frightful echoes across the place.  Rainbow Dash saw curved walls with segmented columns and arches, all surrounding a spacious interior filled with scattered stone-like structures about the height of an average pony.  But the most noticeable detail was the granite ceiling—or rather a lack thereof.

	Upon entering the room, Rainbow realized that the very center of the building formed a shallow dome, and the innermost circle was comprised of an elaborate stained glass window with several circles within circles of panoramic designs.  It was difficult to make out any of the jagged illustrations, on account of the gray light of the world outside being refracted by copious ribbons of rain water sloshing all across the outer shell.

	Rainbow squinted, her face bathed in the prismatic kaleidoscope of waterlogged light.  Determined to see better, she flapped her wings and hovered up until she was a spit's distance from the stained glass ceiling.  Here, she spun in slow, slow circles, taking in as many details as her beleaguered mind could.

	The outermost rim of the circle showed a starry expanse.  Comets and nebulaic bodies and constellations filled up the long curved panels with translucent purples, blacks, and violets.

	The next circular panel looked as if it had been blacked out, until Rainbow looked harder and realized she was seeing a pure ring of metallic browns and grays.

	Next, she saw what must have been the "machine world," complete with its gold and platinum platforms, sweeping pendulums, rolling conveyor belts, and endless streams of gears and levers.

	The layer within that is what caught Rainbow's attention the most.  Here, she saw landscapes, clusters of earth, forests and valleys, seas and deserts.  Not all of it was green—some landscapes were brown, gray, blue, and even odd colors such as purples and yellows.  But what made Rainbow Dash gawk in confusion was the nature of the illustrated creatures living within this layer of the window.  She saw quadrupeds, to be sure, but also bipeds, simeons, reptiles, and some creatures with limbs she couldn't even recognize.  What was more, each of these creatures congregated around one particular section of the panel, corresponding to a different landscape.  Rainbow counted, and she ultimately discovered twelve distinct sections.

	Strangely enough, none of these sections depicted ponies—or at least that's what she thought at first.  Hovering higher, she studied one part of the panel that was considerably darker than the rest.  It wasn't until closer inspection that she realized the panel wasn't dark—but rather it had been damaged in such a way that the light from outside was too scattered to properly break through.  She flew until she was within a breath's distance, studying the cracked parts of the glass from the uncracked.  Drops of moisture dripped through from the rain outside, and after a few flashes of lightning, she finally spotted something that caught her eye.  She saw feathers, and wings, and the flanks that they were attached to.

	"Pegasi..."  Rainbow Dash muttered, then gulped.  "The angels."

	Sure enough, that part of the panel was populated by winged ponies.  Why it was damaged, Rainbow couldn't properly guess, until she surmised that the cracks could easily have been formed by one or two well-aimed Pegasopolitan spears.

	"Guessing they weren't all that they were cracked up to be, eh, Khao?"  Rainbow Dash ran a hoof through her wet mane as she glanced down.  "Hurricane, what did you figure out about them...?"

	From this height, Rainbow could spot several clusters of delapidated junk cluttering the room's otherwise pristine floor below.  She glanced out towards the perimeter, and thus discovered twelve passageways total, all leading out from the large chamber.  Each passageway was barricaded with all manner of junk, pikes, and rusted chunks of armor.  No small amount of pegasus skeletons dotted the "bastions."  They all faced out, armed to the teeth, fending off some invisible foe into eternity.

	"This was a last stand," Rainbow murmured aloud as she descended on limp wings.  "They all died holing themselves up here."  She perched on one of the stone structures, giving the walls a cockeyed glance.  "But wh-what?"

	Her cracking voiced echoed against the dusty granite lengths of the place, accompanied by the dull pitter-patter of rain against the glass above.  Rainbow Dash glanced straight up, studying the very center of the stained glass ceiling from below.

	Set within the center of the dome beyond the "surface world" were two final panels.  One, a swirling effigy of clouds and skies—both sunlit and moonlit.  Then, within the very center, she spotted what looked like a ruined panel of stained glass, until she realized that the small circle was nothing more than a ribboning spiral of prismatic colors, occupying the entire spectrum from red to green to violet and back.

	"Hrmmmf... Rub it in, why don'tcha?"  Rainbow Dash tilted her head back down with bored eyes.  It was then that she noticed an equine shape to her far right.  Jumping a bit, she pivoted to face it directly.  A statue of a horse's head loomed above a marble slab—only the slab was considerably different than all the rest.  It wasn't part of the room's structure, but rather a neatly arranged pile of rectangular stones fastened together like an ark.

	Trotting towards it, Rainbow took notice of the horse head's features.  The muzzle was curved and the neck was slender—the tell-tale traits of a pony mare.  What's more, her determined face featured undeniable battle scars.

	"Commander Hurricane..." Rainbow muttered aloud.  Her eyes fell to the slabs beneath the effigy.  She bit her lip.  "Are... are you in there?"  She turned to look back at the skeletons guarding the twelve entrances, then at the tomb once again.  "Ah jeez.  And I thought I lived an awesome life."  She gave a bittersweet smirk, then blinked...

	For there was a series of black staves sticking out of the ground not that far away.

	Curious, Rainbow Dash trotted past the tomb and approached the forest of slender vertical rods.  There were dozens of them, and all situated around a circular stone in what Rainbow Dash realized was the very center of the room.  Sure enough, as she stood upon the stone and gazed straight up, she saw the rainswept center panel of the stain glass domed ceiling.  Glancing down at the base of the rods, she saw long deep grooves in the floor, all pointing towards the centermost stone.  Looking at the rods' tips, she saw black shards, lock vulcanic obsidian.  As a matter of fact, from the slender crystalline structure of the shards, they almost exactly mimicked the—

	"Obelisks..."  Rainbow Dash breathed.  "Just like the big ones floating outside."  She squinted.  "That couldn't possibly be a total coinkydinky."  She reached a blue hoof towards one.  "Pffft.  That would just be plain stupid—"

	Flash!  The obelisk glowed to the touch, then slid slightly away from her.  Rainbow Dash gasped, instantly hovering on twitchy feathers.  She heard a grinding noise, then glanced down to see dust flying out of the groove as the entire staff traveled slightly towards the center stone.

	Not long after, there was another grinding noise—two, actually.  Rainbow Dash spun around to see two of the stout granite slabs moving towards her and the center of the room.

	The entire thing lasted for about five seconds.  As soon as Rainbow removed her hoof from the shard at the top of the staff, the staff itself stopped moving.  In turn, so did the two slabs behind her.

	All was silent once again, save for the hush of rain and the muffled rolls of thunder.

	"Hmmmmm..."  Rainbow Dash narrowed her eyes.  She pivoted towards the staff yet again.  She touched it.  The crystal glowed.  Gripping the shard in her hoof, Rainbow looked behind her as she pulled the staff back.

	The two slabs moved in perfect sync.

	Rainbow pushed the staff forward.

	The slabs approached her and the center of the room.

	Licking her lips, Rainbow Dash flew forward, pushing the staff the rest of the way.

	With a noisy grind, the two slabs swam past their siblings and came to a stop just outside the ring of vertical staves.  This happened at the precise same time Rainbow found that she couldn't push the rod any more; it had reached the very end of its groove, stopping just short of the circular stone in the very center of the chamber.

	Rainbow Dash released her hoof from the horn.  She rubbed her chin in thought.  "Wait a second..."  Her eyes brightened.  "Wait a second... wait a second!"  Breathless, Rainbow Dash darted out of the chamber, flew past the collapsed skeletons, and zig-zagged her way through the shadowed corridors that led to the outer ring.



	Emerging once again in the sheets of rain and howling wind, Rainbow Dash perched sideways on one of the circular balcony's many-many pillars.  She squinted, staring out into the thick precipitation and stormy haze.  Undaunted, she flew sideways, darting over and under crashed airships until she found what she was looking for.

	One obelisk was suddenly levitating so close to the large building's edge that Rainbow Dash could practically kiss it.  What's more—it wasn't alone.  Two temples of varying sizes hovered along with it.  She judged that any pony with a lick of athleticism could easily jump the tiny, rainy gap that now loomed between where she was and the edges of the two temples.

	Blinking, Rainbow gazed out at the hovering depths of Stratopolis.  She spotted each obelisk, and she now realized that they numbered just the same as the rods that stood in the center of the room.  With a gradually growing smile, Rainbow Dash flew towards one edge of the building until she looked out onto a particular section of the floating city.  She spotted the temple where she knew that the Noble Jury and its beleaguered crew were quietly waiting.  Counting the obelisks between it and the one she had just "pulled," she immediately flew back into the heart of the large round building behind her.



	"I'm telling you, man."  Zaid grinned, leaning casually against a tilted mast on the Jury's top deck.  "Just grab an open jar of mayonnaise, sandwich it between a pillow and your bed mattress, and then go to town.  Best thing ever, guaranteed."

	"Uhm... er..."  Eagle Eye stared at his own hooves, blushing furiously.

	"Heh... I know, right?"  Zaid yawned and closed his eyes shut.  "You can thank me later, dude."

	Just then, the entire ship shook... along with the temple around it.

	"Whoah whoah whoah!"  Zaid gasped, flinging his eyes open.  "Not now, you stud!"

	"Something's h-happening!"  Eagle Eye stammered.

	Ebon Mane galloped out of the stairwell, breathless.  "Are we f-falling?!"

	"Hold on, boomers!"  Floydien shouted from the cockpit as he fired an array of sparks into the control instruments.  "We're getting off this evil rock of float float!"  He spat into the intercom.  "Blonde boomer!  Give Nancy power—"

	"Scrkkkk!  Don't you sweat your antlers off, buddy.  I've got this..."

	"Blonde boomer?"  Floydien's brown muzzle scrunched.  "Why so crack-a-squeak?"

	"Because this is Rainbow, you red-nosed-reindork!  Pay attention to the sound stone and take a good long look!  Port side!"

	"Ehhh?"  Floydien craned his neck to see.  Around this time, Josho and Prowse climbed up to the cockpit to look as well.

	The temple, an obelisk, and another building in the distance were all coming together, hovering towards a fixed spot of rainy air alongside the edge of Stratopolis' largest building.  As the temple housing the Noble Jury cruised to a slow stop, a blue figure darted out, hovering between two pillars and a crashed zeppelin as she spread her forelimbs victoriously.

	"Tadaaaaaa!  Neato keano, isn't it?"  Rainbow's teeth grinted in a flash of lightning.

	Eagle Eye and Ebon cooed.

	Meanwhile, Zaid spat out the edge of his muzzle.  "Pffft.  Hax."  The temple jolted to a stop, throwing him into the Jury's mast.  Thud!  "Crackapoop!"
		//------------------------------//
		// Meet at the Instance Gate		//------------------------------//

	"A control room?" Josho shouted across the wind and rain.

	"Yup!"  Rainbow Dash jumped the gap between the circular building's balcony and the adjacent temple.  She landed a few feet in front of the Noble Jury's dormant bow.  "In that it seems to control the buildings that are floating around here."

	"And..."  Belle squinted from where she stood with Kera alongside Elma.  "...the core that runs this place?"

	Rainbow Dash took a deep breath.  "I... haven't had quite as much luck finding that," the pegasus muttered.

	"Hrmmmf..."  Floydien rolled his red eyes.  "Assuming such a glimmer wad exists."

	"Hey!"  Rainbow frowned and pointed a hoof.  "I'm gonna find it!  Okay?  I've just got... y'know... more places to search."

	"Seems like an awfully large building," Eagle Eye said, squinting through the constant drizzle.  "Could take hours to explore... days even..."

	Ebon blinked.  "What if we split up?"

	Zaid scowled at him.  "Were you friggin' born yesterdouche?!"

	"I was j-just suggesting something!"  Ebon bit his lip with folded ears.  "In the interest of time..."

	"If ye ask me, aam raither glad tae hae aw th' time in th' warld tae explair thes magnificent waterlogged bungaloo!"  Prowse said with a bearded grin.

	"Yes, we all know that," Rainbow Dash muttered.  "But we've gotta set our priorities."

	"The faster we get out of here, the safer we'll all be," Belle said.

	"An' jist whit makes ye certain ay 'at, Miss Paranoia?!" Prowse barked.

	Belle frowned across the way at him.  "You're not the only pony here with a doctorate."

	"Let's all try to calm down and not bite at each other," Pilate said, his voice raised above the thunder.  He waved his forelimbs as he spoke towards the hissing weather.  "Rainbow Dash, you've found evidence of mechanical purpose to this place, yes?"

	"Right."  The pegasus nodded.  "There're a bunch of poles inside the centermost piece of the place that control the floating obelisks.  It seems as though two or three temples are—like—somehow magically attached to these dark structures.  When I move the poles, I move the obelisks, and then the temples float along with them."

	"So you have access to the entire city?!"  Props remarked, bright-eyed.

	"Seems like it."

	"Hrmmmm..."  Prowse rubbed his fuzzy chin with a metal prosthetic.  "Main be some sort ay prehistoric leyline aura manipulation buffer...."

	"Or just a bunch of fart physics," Josho grumbled.  "I, for one, say that we go in search of the core."

	"Would we even know what to look for?" Ebon asked.

	"Rainbow, this place with the levers that manipulated the floating buildings," Props spoke.  "Where were they inside this big-big building here?"

	"In the center..."  Rainbow jolted and pointed.  "T-towards the top!  Like, it's right beneath this glass dome thing."

	Props glanced at her uncle.  "If I was an ancient race of mysterious sky ponies..."

	Prowse nodded back.  "Eh'd fancy buildin' mah energy cair in th' huir uv a center ay th' most important structure."

	"Seems kind of presumptious, don't you think?" Belle said.

	"If I can make a suggestion," Pilate said.  "Perhaps if Rainbow Dash led a group back to the control room beneath the glass ceiling, everypony can work together to find evidence of where the central energy core of this Stratopolis is."

	"What's the point in doing that?" Zaid asked.

	"Whoever built this place must have exhibited a great deal of intelligence and creativity," Pilate said.  His ears twitched in the wet wind.  "It stands to reason that there would be patterns interwoven in their work," he remarked.  "If you look in one important control room, you'll likely find evidence for where to locate another important energy junction."

	"Makes a big auld buckit ay sense tae me!"  Prowse smirked.  "Ah loch ye, zebra! Yoo've got iron an' brains in atween them stripes!"

	"I... dunno if I can recognize any such patterns," Props said.

	"But I know somepony who can."  Rainbow Dash smirked.  "Pilate?  Feel like coming along?"

	Belle did a double-take.  "What...?!"

	"I..."  Pilate gritted his teeth, fidgeting.  "I would just be a burden.  I mean, without O.A.S.I.S..."

	"But you can still envision stuff in your head, now can't you?"  Rainbow Dash flew towards him and placed a hoof on his shoulder.  "Blinders on or off, you're the sharpest knife in this zany little drawer of ours.  So how about it?  We could really use your pointers on the inside."

	Pilate stammered.  "You... y-you really think I can be useful?"

	"Dude, when haven't you been?"  Rainbow Dash smirked.

	"Striped boomer is the best compass Floydien's ever had," the elk remarked with a nod.  "Nancy Jane would approve too."

	Pilate took a shuddering breath.  Clenching his jaw shut, he nodded.  "Alright.  Count me in."

	"Wicked sweet!"  Rainbow Dash helped Pilate towards the edge of the temple.  "I'll be having to fly us over one at a time.  Might as well give you a lift, first..."

	"Rainbow, w-ait!"  Belle exclaimed.

	Pilate jerked to a stop.  Rainbow stared over the zebra's shoulder.  "Something the matter, Ding-Dong?"

	Belle's muzzle hung open.  She twitched... twitched again, then drew back into the temple's shadows, holding Kera close.

	Rainbow blinked, then turned to face the rest of the group.  "Anypony else wanna stretch their legs in a super creepy building filled with ancient skeletons and surrounded by rainstorms?"

	"I bet I could be of some help," Props said, trotting forward.  "You've seen one smexy machine, you've seen them all!"

	"An' there's nae way in bludy heel aam sittin' thes a body it!"  Prowse reached back and tugged a certain snapping turtle along with him.  "Hop along, Tankette!  It's Zabubadabu or bust!"

	"Wh-whoah!  I... uhm..."  She gulped.  "Do I have a choice, Professor?"

	"Please. yoo're a livin' sheel, lassie. Whaur arenae ye safe?  Hmmm?"

	Miss Boreal sighed long and hard.  "Just don't use me to bash any doors in."

	"Ew, he does that?" Zaid remarked.

	"Only one time!"  Prowse frowned, then fidgeted.  "Hoo was Ah tae ken Mintian monks locked aw ay their oothooses?"

	"Guess I'd better haul my butt with you guys too," Josho grumbled, shuffling forward.

	Eagle Eye did a double-take.  "What?!  Old stallion?!  Why?!"

	Josho swiveled around, levitating his shotgun.  "Just because."  He shrugged.  "After all, you never know when or if a water golem or Ledo knows what else might decide to spring out of this place's ancient butt cracks and give us all a headache."

	"Two glasses of shotgun keeps the doctor away, huh?"  Zaid asked.

	"Just be glad that I've not yet used you for target practice."

	"Right.  Erm... shutting up now."

	"So it's settled, then?"  Rainbow Dash asked.  "If so, then let me start flying us over there one at a time—"

	Pilate suddenly gasped.

	"What?"  Rainbow looked at him.  "I know it's a little rain, but I can manage!"

	"Do you h-hear that?"  the zebra stammered, his ears twitching.  "Rising slowly in pitch from the distance?"

	"The heck are you even talking about?" Josho throated.

	"No..."  Ebon Mane winced.  "I hear it too..."

	"Guysies!"  Props gasped, pointing straight down into the lightning-riddled clouds.  "Looksies!"

	Everypony (and elk [and turtle]) craned their necks to see.  It looked like a dark splotch at first, like a thundercloud bubbling with extra dense precipitation.  But then it shot out of the mists like a cannonball, spinning with a high-pitched whistle.  With random pulses of yellow light, the Lounge's ship spiraled out of control, flew into the heart of Stratopolis, and crash landed deep into a large temple several hundred meters below.  Dust flew, and chunks of marble fell into the gray expanse below.  But then all of the chaos of the impact was swiftly swallowed by the rolling thunder of that dank, dank place.

	Belle bit her lip, hugging Kera hard.  Ebon and Eagle Eye exchanged glances.

	"Hmmmf..."  Zaid gulped.  "Bummer."

	"Uhhhhh..."  Rainbow Dash grimaced.

	Floydien glanced at the assembled group.  "All of the time in the world, bearded boomer says?"

		//------------------------------//
		// Dash You Like A Hurricane		//------------------------------//

	"Do you see any movement, Eagle Eye?"

	The petite stallion kept his expert gaze trained on a distant temple hovering through Stratopolis below.  He levitated a sword and shield on one side of his body and a sound stone on the other.  Wiping the rainwater off his muzzle, he took a step back beside the Noble Jury and spoke into the enchanted shard.

	"Not a thing.  If I didn't know better, I'd say they all bought it."

	"We can't know that for sure, kid."

	"I know..."  Eagle Eye sighed.  "But here's hoping."  He turned and glanced at the large round building hovering in front of the Noble Jury's temple.  "That room you're in has control of the obelisks floating these buildings around, right?"



	"Yeahhhhh..." Josho said from where he paced with the levitating shotgun and sound stone.  "What you getting at?"

	"Well, maybe you could give the lever controlling the Lounge's crash site a good shake.  It could toss their ship loose, y'know?"

	"Or send them all running, scurrying, or flying towards us," Josho said.  "As much as I don't like those creepy-masked dudes, I'd rather keep them at leg's distance."

	"Right," Rainbow Dash said from where she floated over the heads of the group.  Her voice echoed across the domed chamber.  "Besides, from the look of the rods here, the obelisk connected to their crash site is at its furthest distance from the heart of Stratopolis.  I don't wanna bring them any closer to where we are or—more importantly—where the Noble Jury is."

	"That works for me."

	"Keep an eye out, fruit basket," Josho said.  "If you see any weirdness, give us a shout, and we'll come running."

	"Will do.  You try not to get yourself hurt too badly, old stallion."

	"Yeah, yeah."  Josho dimmed the soundstone and shuffled back towards the center of the room.  "Yeesh, that prima donna worries too much about me."

	"I think it's a charming trait," Pilate said.

	"Go soak your head in charm for all I care, braymeister."  Josho rested the shotgun over his flank as he nodded towards the array of rods.  "What's going on here?"

	"Apparently, a whole lot ay bludy naethin'," Prowse said.  He squinted at his neice.  "Propsicle?"

	"Mmmnnnghhh..."  Props licked her lips and tensed her forehead as she stroked and rubbed her hooves around one of the many black-spiked staves.  "No luck!  It won't budge!"  She turned to gaze up at Rainbow Dash.  "It won't even glow!"

	"How about you give it a go once more, Miss Dash?" Elma said.

	"Uh huh."  Rainbow Dash flew down and lightly tapped the edge of one shard.

	With a loud grinding noise, it shifted ahead, causing two slabs of granite to slide along with it. Rainbow Dash stopped moving the staff before a dim glow could shimmer across the room.

	"Yeesh!"  Props slumped back on her haunches, her ears folded.  "It does it for you almost right away!"

	"Well, I think the reason is rather obvious," Elma said.

	"And what's that, Tankette?"

	"It must respond to winged ponies," the snapping turtle explained.  She turned to blink at the others.  "This is a city built and run by Rainbow's kind, is it not?"

	"That remains to be determined," Pilate said, leaning against the reptile.  "From what Rainbow's discovered, her ancient native ancestors occupied this place, but it doesn't seem likely that they built it."

	"What about the 'Angelic Host' crap?" Josho stated.

	"The What Crap?"  Prowse squinted.

	"Pilate," Josho said.  "Tell 'em about all the Herald junk we ran into."

	"What my colleague is referring to is a group of modern day zealots who are of the firm belief that an ancient race of pegasi acted as the founders of the known world," Pilate explained.  "Or, at least, this part of the world..."

	"This... part...?"  Prowse blinked awkwardly.

	"There's a big ol' machine dwelling beneath all of us, Unky Prowsy!"  Props giggled.  "Smexical, isn't it?"

	"From the evidence that Rainbow has gathered throughout her travels, and from visions my beloved has shared with the knowledge gained by Nightshade Industries, it would seem there's plenty of data to support this fact," Pilate said.

	"Don't forget the book I got from that skeleton in the... erm... giant centipede hole..."  Rainbow Dash rubbed her chin.  "Or was it a millipede?"  A sigh.  "Meh, whatever.  I kicked its thorax either way, I'm sure."

	"Ye mean techt 'at glowin' lift book 'at ye hae caged up in th' heart ay th' elk's skystain ship?"

	"Yup yup up!" Props proudly chirped.

	"Weel i'll be bloon tae blaze's bathroom!"  Prowse smiled wide.  "Zabubadabu gits snazzier by th' minute!"

	"Yes, a regular vacation spot," Josho droned.

	"Perhaps this city floated over Rainbow's homeland in the past," Elma Boreal thought out loud.  "And her ancestors—being pegasi—piloted it far away so it wouldn't rick the local populace."

	"You're saying Commander Hurricane and Company sacrificed themselves to escort Stratopolis out of Equestrian airspace?" Rainbow remarked.

	"That makes some squeaky sense!" Props said.

	"I wish there was a way to test that hypothesis..."  Elma spoke aloud.

	"There may in fact be a way," Pilate said, pacing in a tight circle.  "Rainbow Dash.  You said that there are several pegasus skeletons in here?  Scattered abroad?"

	"Er... yeah...?"

	"Being the only pegasus in the room, might you take offense to us... erm... borrowing a bone or two?"

	Rainbow Dash blinked, then shrugged.  "Knock yourselves out.  I'm pretty sure after so many dang centuries, the spooky scary pony ghosts are too flippin' bored to be disturbed."

	"So what do we need, Pilate?" Josho asked.

	"I suspect a single legbone will do."

	Prowse was already trotting over towards a decayed body lying beside a barricade.  With a shuddering breath, he converted his metal left leg into a thin blade.  "Nopony e'er said archaeology was clean as a whistle..."

	Props gulped and stammered, "Sorry about this, Mr. Skeleton Buddy."

	Crackkk!  With one fell swoop, Prowse lopped a legbone off.  He passed it to Props who nervously trotted across the room and shuffled to a stop beside Pilate.

	"Now..."  The zebra motioned in a vague direction with his head.  "Have it make contact with one of the rods."

	Props did so, wincing slightly.

	Tap.

	The bone was resting against the black shard on the top of a rod.  Silence ensued.

	"Nothing's happening," Props murmured.

	"Huh..."  Elma squinted her reptilian eyes.  "So maybe it doesn't work with all pegasi."

	"Or, more logically, it only works with living ones," Pilate said.

	"Or maybe it only worked with Commander Hurricane," Rainbow Dash said.

	Everyone turned around.

	"Huh?" Josho blinked.

	Rainbow pointed towards the granite slabs lying beneath the stone effigy of the battle-hardened mare.  "Check this out.  This is the tomb that I told you about."

	"And..."  Props shuffled closer, eyes bright and blue.  "You think your beloved Hurricane is sleeping here?"

	"In the only sleep she'll never wake up from," Rainbow said with a nod.  "I mean, it totally matches the way tombs are set up in the old, old districts of Cloudsdale.  You see, Pegasopolis no longer exists," she explained with a shrug.  "Many of its temples were absorbed into the bodies of newer and younger cloud cities.  The remnants of Commander Hurricane's military base are part of Cloudsdale today.  But there's one thing that's not to be found there."

	"A sepulcher," Pilate said.

	"Right.  Besides..."  Rainbow Dash pivoted around, gesturing towards the corridors on the far ends of the room.  "All of the pegasi here look like they were really, really desperate to defend this spot until they kicked the bucket."

	"That's rather honorable," Elma said.  "To protect the remains of their leader far beyond her death."

	"Yeah, but for how long?" Props said.

	"They had a lot of pegasi guarding this place when things went down," Josho said.  "And they were still in formation when they dropped.  Whatever killed them, I think it was sudden.  What's more, I'm pretty sure they had no friggin' expectation of it."

	"Loch a bludy gas barrage?!"  Prowse remarked.

	"It could have been anything," Josho said.  "Maybe they were here for weeks after she died.  Maybe years.  Maybe whole friggin' generations..."

	"Whoah..." Rainbow Dash rubbed her scalp, shuddering.  "That's crazy."

	"Assuming that was the case," Elma said, "Why entomb Hurricane here?  And in this room?  I mean, it doesn't seem to make too much sense, unless—"

	"—both the room and Commander Hurricane were super important!"  Props remarked, blinking.  "Like, perhaps they were inseparable for some reason!"

	"Whit in th' cruddy boomsticks ur ye ramblin' abit, propsicle?"

	"Rainbow Dash...?"

	Rainbow spun about, realizing that Pilate had trotted halfway across the room on his lonesome.

	The zebra was feeling up the statue above the tomb, touching Hurricane's stone features with gentle hooves.  He gazed into nothingness as he said, "This is the effigy in question, I presume."

	"Right on the money, Stripesy."

	"I can't help but notice..."  Pilate rubbed his hooves together, then furrowed his brow.  "...there seems to be a fine layer of sediment over this."

	"Well, yeah, Pilate."  Rainbow fluttered over him.  "I know you can't see it, but this place is old as all friggin' get-out."

	"I think this is important," Pilate said.  He leaned forward, rubbing his hoof across the very front of the tomb just beneath the statue.  "I sense that there's something beneath the surface... like fine impressions..."

	"You mean like engravings?" Josho said.

	"Perhaps.  Do you see what I'm talking about?"

	"Uhhh..."  Rainbow Dash squinted.  "Barely."

	"There's too much dust on it," Elma said.  "It's impossible to read."

	"Hauld oan, wee jimmies an' burds."  Prowse stepped forward, cracking his living joints.  Clak-clak-clak!  His left limb turned into a metal cylinder.  "Ah hink i've got jist th' solution we need. Propsicle? Coods ye support th' wee statue oan th' other side?"

	Props rushed up, gripping the muzzle and ear of Commander Hurricane's effigy.  "Got it, Uncky Prowsy!"

	"Micht an aw dae yerself a favur an' cowre yer gob while yoo're at it."  Prowse's eyes narrowed with concentration.  His forelimb vibrated with a constant, steady hum.  Props swiftly slid her goggles over her eyes and tilted her wincing expression away.  Elma, Josho, and Rainbow Dash watched as the stallion's instrument shook the excess grime and sediment of time off the statue's surface.  A fine cloud of dust rolled across the room in a invisible breeze.

	"You're doing it, Professor!  It's working!" Elma exclaimed.

	"Yeesh..."  Josho exhaled, his eyes narrow.  "That's a lot of words."

	"There we go..."  Prowse stepped back, converting his limb into a normal brace.  "'At shoods be clear as day, noo."

	"Are the words legible to you, Rainbow?"  Pilate asked.

	"Uhm..."  Rainbow Dash hovered until she was barely an inch off the floor.  She blinked at the engravings.  "Believe it or not, yeah!  This is some crazy-old form of Equestrian Basic!  But the words totally make sense to me!  Huh... imagine that—"

	"Uhmmm..."  Props fidgeted.  With an audible gulp, she trotted back, pointing at the effigy.  "Dashie?"

	"Hmmm?"  Rainbow glanced at her, then at the statue.  "What—?"  Her ears instantly drooped.

	With all the dust cleared off, the statue had exposed its true colors—complete with a faded paint job across Commander Hurricane's muzzle, eyes, and ears.  The most noticeable detail was the granite mare's mane, more specifically its different hues—all seven of them.

	Elma's beak hung agape.  She glanced at Josho, and then both of them stared at Rainbow Dash.  Everypony but Pilate was staring at Rainbow Dash.

	"Huh..."  The pegasus blinked.  "...well that's groovy."
		//------------------------------//
		// Hypothesizing Through Dashes and Stripes		//------------------------------//

    Josho shuffled closer to the grave of Hurricane.  He squinted at the effigy, turned to blink at Rainbow, then stared at the statue again.  “Looks like you two dipped your heads in the same toilet.”

    “Derm…”  Rainbow Dash fidgeted.

    “I do not understand,” Pilate murmured aloud.  “What’s just been revealed?”

    “Dashie and Hurricaney totally have the same maney!”  Props exclaimed, staring wide-eyed at the spectral arrangement of the granite equine’s hair.  “They’re practically sisteroos!”

    “The resemblance is certainly uncanny,” Elma Boreal said.  “And that’s not just my personal bias as a talking snapping turtle.  Heh.”

    “Whit ur th' odds ay thes sort ay guff unpeelin' itself frae th' proverbial wall, lassie?” Prowse remarked.

    “Hey, don’t look at me!”  Rainbow Dash grunted.  “I just fly here!”

    “Listen, Paint Bucket.”  Josho pointed at the statue with a frown.  “You can’t just ignore this shiznet!”

    “Considering everything we’re learning about this place, I think it begs the question, Rainbow Dash,” Pilate said.  “How much do you know about this… Commander Hurricane?”

    “Dude, what is there not to know?!”  Rainbow Dash tossed her forelimbs as she hovered before the tomb.  “She was the leader of Pegasopolis!  She helped found Equestria back when windigos ravaged the landscape!  She fought griffons and wyverns and cyclopses and all manners of bad dudes across the pre-classical skies of my homeland!”

    “Yes, but what her specifically?”  Pilate’s metal brow furrowed.  “Did she have any physical descriptions?  Any relations?  Heirs?  Descendants?”

    “I… uh… I’m afraid I can’t h-help you there,” Rainbow said with ears drooping.

    “Pffft.  Terrific.”  Josho rolled his eyes.  “The one pegasus from Equestria and she sucks at her history lessons.”

    “Choke on your own fat, lardo!”  Rainbow frowned at him.  “Hurricane’s a friggin’ household name where I was born!  Every pony with an ounce of feathers knows all about her legacy and career!  Her private life, however, was hers and hers alone!  She disappeared in obscurity, and the whereabouts of her final resting place has been a huge mystery in Equestrian society!”  She sighed, staring dully at the tomb.  “Until today…”

    “So there’s no description at all about her physical traits?”  Pilate asked.

    “Or that she looks just as adoracute and colorful as Dash-Dash?” Props asked.

    “Hey, don’t push it,” Rainbow Dash grunted, pointing at her.  Rainbow turned towards the tomb once more, shrugging.  “There’ve been statues of her, but all of the ones that survive to this day were built well after the Pre-Classical era.  There’s no written records of--like--what her mane looked like.”

    “Alright, Rainbow, then perhaps I have a more appropriate question for this situation.”  Pilate fumbled a bit before he blindly paced towards her side.  “How many… uhm… pegasi are born like you?”

    “Pfft.  Never.”  Rainbow Dash smirked.  “Come on, Stripesy. You can do better than that.”

    “Please, Rainbow, be a bit more receptive here.”  Pilate leaned closer.  “Your mane color.  Is it a common trait in Cloudsdale?  Or in all of Equestria for that matter?”

    “Jee, I dunno.”  Rainbow Dash shrugged.  “I never given it much thought…”

    “Given what much thought?” Josho asked.

    “Well, I mean… no.  There aren’t any other ponies in Equestria with my mane color.  None that I’ve seen, at least.  With one exception, of course.”  Rainbow Dash fidgeted.  “My dad.  But… uhm… I b-barely have any memories of him.  He didn’t exactly hang around much.”

    “Drap them an' lae them, huh?” Prowse remarked.

    Rainbow’s eyes sliced his way like ruby daggers.  “He died, ya beardborg.”

    “Oh…”  Prowse rubbed a flesh leg with a metal hoof, avoiding her gaze.

    Sighing, Rainbow looked towards the others.  “And don’t get me started on my mom, cuz I’ve honestly got nothing to go by.  I kind of… grew up on my own.  I really didn’t like attention at first--at least not the kind everypony gave me.  Tons of ponies were gushing all over me, full of pity n’crap.  I think that’s why I decided that the only way to live was awesomely, cuz then I could earn everypony’s praise, y’know?”  She smiled awkwardly.  “Boy, did I tick a lot of pegasi off in those days.  But it was worth it.  I stopped being a charity case and became a legend pretty darn quick, y’know?”

    “What a pleasant life story,” Josho droned.  “Can somepony tell me where we’re going with this?”

    “Do you remember any striking details ponies gave you about your mane color, Rainbow?” Pilate asked.

    “Ugh.  Please.  I grew up with older mares wanting to turn me into a diva left and right!”  Rainbow rolled her eyes.  “They said that I had ‘the most beautiful and rare mane in all of Equestria’ and that ‘it was a shame for me to not go into modeling’ or some junk.  Brbrbrrbrbrbbrrr.”  She shivered from head to tail.  “Even Rarity gave me a bunch of that same crap.  I just did my best to ignore it.”

    “Any doctors or physicians state that there was legitimacy behind the rare trait?”

    “So maybe at a physical or two I was told that I was a one-in-a-gazillion case!  What’s the big deal?!”  Rainbow Dash flung her hooves towards the tomb.  “What’s this got to do with anything?”

    “Rainbow Dash, let it not be denied that you exist for a purpose,” Pilate said.  “It would go against everything you, myself, and Bellesmith have discovered to ignore the ramifications of Austraeoh and being Austraeoh.  Now, I am a scientist at heart, and yet I’ve given into believing the elements of prophecy we have extracted throughout our journey due to sheer exposure.  But, pragmatically speaking, if there was an actual empirical explanation for what you are and what you’re destined to do, then it’s safe to hypothesize that you’re not the first one equipped with the faculties to do it.”

    “The hay are you getting at, buddy?” Rainbow’s voice cracked.  She pointed at the tomb.  “That Hurricane was… was…another me?”

    “Or vice versa; you are another her.”

    “Pffft.  Come onnnnn…”  Rainbow smirked.  “True, so maybe I’ve always fancied Hurricane the most whenever I was forced to watch a Hearth’s Warming pageant, but that never meant we were anything alike!”

    “Aren’t you?”  Pilate faced the pegasus’ general direction.  “You both ended up flying east, did you not?”

    “Yeah, but--”  Rainbow Dash froze, blinking.  She turned towards the tomb, fidgeting in midair.  “...balls.”

		//------------------------------//
		// The Game Is Always Changing		//------------------------------//

	"Look, Ah enjoy a guid roon ay 'guess th' rainbaw pony's genealogy' as much as th' next stallion," Prowse rambled.  "But woods ye kindly fancy lettin' it drap fur a moment an' insteid tak' a gander at these words engraved reit haur?"  He pointed a metal hoof at the carvings just beneath Hurricane's effigy.

	"For once, I'd say Beardo's making perfect sense," Josho said.  "Rainbow?"

	"Uhm... right..."  Rainbow Dash touched down, squinting at the chiseled characters.  "Just gimme a sec.  This stuff is pretty archaic..."

	"Assuming that all of this speculation about Commander Hurricane is correct," Elma Boreal spoke, "Then what kind of implication does it have about what brought her from Equestria to here?"

	"Undoubtedly she had the best interests of her kingdom in mind," Pilate said.  "Although, if it stands to reason that what drew her this far east is the same as what's driven Rainbow Dash this far east..."

	Props finished the thought.  "It couldn't be a total coinkydinky that Dashie's here!"

	"Precisely."

	"Unnngh..."  Boreal rubbed her scaled head.  "And here I thought it was the fluctuating barometric pressure getting to my skull..."

	"Hmmm..."  Rainbow Dash hummed, her brow furrowing.

	Pilate tilted his head about with twitching ears.  "What is it, Rainbow?"

	"Lemme see if I can break it down to ya guys..."  Rainbow took a deep breath, then spoke while scanning the carved lines with her ruby eyes.  "'Here doth lie the Wings of the Three Tribes, brandishing the Sword of Solstice, Her Majesty's burning gift of righteousness, that the vile phantoms of the sky may forever be vanquished.  Commander Hurricane liveth forever in spirit, while her body and her children's children remaineth faithful to her cause, dwelling within this forsaken city's...'"  She blinked hard.  "The last word's kind of hard to make out."

	"How do you mean?"

	"Wait, I got it.  'Hold,'" Rainbow Dash said.  "'This forsaken city's hold.'"

	"What made it so hard to read?" Props asked.

	Rainbow shuddered, leaned back, and pointed at the last word.  "Take a look for yourself."

	Props leaned in, blinking through her thick goggles.  "Is that... red stuff...?"

	"It's blood, alright," Josho said with a nod.

	"Yoo've gotta be pullin' mah leg!" Prowse exhaled.  "What's left ay them!"

	"I'm no stranger to evisceration, buddy," Josho muttered.  "I've seen my fair share.  And not only is that blood..."  He pointed, speaking in a low tone.  "But that stuff is pretty fresh."

	"Fresh?!" Pilate remarked.

	"At least a damn sight fresher than hundreds of years, or whatever the Hell we're dealing with when it comes to Rainbow's ancestor here."

	"She's not my ancestor," Rainbow grumbled.

	"Ya sure about that, bright eyes?"

	Rainbow said nothing.

	"Whit in th' nam ay hay stalks coods hae leaked bluid oan th' ootwith ay thes tomb?!" Prowse exclaimed.

	"I've got an even better question," Josho said.  "What would have bled on only one word and one word in particular?"

	'You're certain of that, Josho?" Pilate asked.

	"I wish you could see it for yourself, buddy," Josho grunted.  "It's that last word—'hold.'  The thing's practically soaking in it, almost as if it's highlighted."

	"Perhaps..."  Elma fidgeted as she thought aloud, "Perhaps there's a purpose to that."

	"Like what?" Props asked.

	Rainbow Dash was already hovering higher from the tomb, rubbing her chin.  Blinking, she pivoted about and faced the center of the large, round room.  The floor was covered in wavering light from the refracting rainwater against the glass dome above.  In the very center was the round stone, surrounded by the many vertical rods with black shards on their ends.

	Narrowing her eyes, Rainbow flew over, staring straight down at the round stone.

	Elma shuffled past Pilate and stood beneath Rainbow.  "It's... it's the same shape as this building," the turtle said.  "The stone, that is."

	"Right... Which makes sense," Rainbow said.  "'Cuz all of the rods around it control the obeslisks floating throughout Stratopolis."

	"But... why is this so important at the moment?"

	Suddenly, Rainbow smirked.  She pointed at one spot on top of the circular stone.  "That's why."

	Elma Boreal squinted.  She blinked in surprise.  Meanwhile, Josho shuffled over, staring at the same spot.  "Blood," the old stallion said.  "Just as bright as the stain on Hurricane's tomb."

	"Ew, really?" Props remarked, squirming.

	"Whit dae ye suppose 'at means?" Prowse asked.

	Rainbow glanced at the others.  She smirked.  "Wanna bet that's where a certain pegasus 'hold' is located?"

	Everyone exchanged glances, save Pilate, of course.

	"What are you suggesting, Dashie?" Props asked.

	Rainbow Dash was already counting the number of rods between the stained part of the circular stone and the staff that had been pulled all the way towards the center of the room.  "I'm suggesting..."  She flapped her wings harder and flew towards the corresponding corridor leading out of the chamber.  "...that we go see what happened to Hurricane's 'children's children...'"



	The trip through the heart of the building took a great deal longer than Rainbow Dash had anticipated.  The temple suddenly felt ten times larger on the inside than it looked on the outside, and with each twist and turn that the group made, their ears constantly popped from the varying pockets of pressurized air being funneled in and out by the turbulent weather outside.

	"Forgive me for voicing my pessimism," Elma murmured.  "But is there even a point to this venture?"  She fidgeted, her shell rattling.  "This place departed Rainbow's homeland eons ago.  What are the chances that any of her pegasus forebearers would still be alive, guarding this place?"

	"You saw the blood on the tomb and the rock," Josho said, walking at the head of the group with his shining horn.  "Whatever left that marker for us had to have been here recently."

	"How recently would you estimate?"

	"Recently enough to make me believe we're not the only ones holed up in here," Josho said.  "Wouldn't you agree, Pilate?"

	"To be honest, Mr. Josho, I'm rather lost."  The zebra gulped and leaned on the obese stallion in mid-stride.  "Rainbow?  What are you thinking of this moment?"

	"I'm thinking that whatever's in this 'Hold,' alive or dead, it's the next best way to getting answers about this place."  Rainbow took a deep breath.  "If Commander Hurricane chose to die here, it had to have been for a darn good reason.  She likely brought a bunch of important secrets to her grave.  Such as what she was truly guarding.  And—more importantly—how to get rid of this place once and for all."

	"'Get rid of this place?'" Pilate stammered.  "Why, whatever for, Rainbow?"

	"I know you can't see this place with your own eyes, Stripsey, but trust me.  It's bad news.  All of it.  Between all of the crashed zeppelins and the creepy murals and the plain deadness of each and every hallway..."  Rainbow Dash shuddered, her teeth showing.

	"Something the matter, Dashie?" Props asked.

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow muttered.  "I haven't felt this creeped out about a place since Silvadel."  She gulped as she down the tight hallway.  "Hurricane's stone isn't the only burial site.  I think this whole city is one giant floating tomb, and we all flew right into the heart of it.  I wanna get us out of here.  But, more importantly, I wanna make sure that I make it so that no more ponies—or even Lounge—get stuck here ever again."

	"How do you intend to do that?" Elma asked.

	"I'm not sure.  One thing at a time, Myrtle."

	"Ah keep thinkin' an' thinkin'," Prowse muttered.  "Whit dae ye suppose 'at 'Sword ay Solstice' is 'at th' grave's words spoke abit?"

	"Beats the heck out of me," Rainbow said.

	"Yoo're th' a body pony 'at knows anythin' abit commander hurricane," Prowse remarked.  "Yoo're tellin' me yoo've nae scooby abit thes bludy 'gift ay righteoosness' naf?"

	Rainbow squinted aside.  "Why's it a big deal all of the sudden?"

	"Everypony, head's up!"  Josho exclaimed, holding a hoof out as he stopped in his racks.  "Something's in front of us!"

	"Wh-what is it?" Pilate remarked.

	Rainbow Dash hovered in place, squinting ahead.  She brought a hoof up to her pendant and gave it a circular stroke.  A ruby spotlight formed in front of her, illuminating the jagged edges of a thick barricade constructed out several random zeppelin parts and metal engine chunks.

	"Holy sprockets..."  Props exhaled out loud.  "Take a look at that, Unky Prowsy!"  She glanced aside, smiling a dumb smile.  "It's like an airship vomited all over the place!"

	"Mair loch a dizzen different airships, Propsicle," Prowse remarked.  "An' gantin ones, tae bit."

	"I..."  Josho blinked, wincing in confusion.  "I-I don't think pegasi did this."

	"Me neither," Rainbow Dash said.  She flew towards the wall of junk and gave it a light shove... then a strong, budging shoulder.  "Nnnngh..."  She leaned back, panting.  "The stuff is packed dense.  Whoever did this, they wanted to keep us out."

	"Us?" Pilate asked.  "Or something else entirely?"

	Silence.

	"Well, what now?" Elma asked.

	"I don't know about you guys, but I didn't come down all the way here just to bump my head against a wall of turds."  Josho cracked the joints in his neck and glowed his horn brighter.  "I say we make ourselves at home."

	"Ponies, please..."  Pilate shifted nervously.  "There's gotta be another solution."

	"Just what, exactly?" Rainbow Dash smirked.  "I'm not a fan of being stuck here forever, Stripsey.  If there're answers to this place in that 'Hold,' then I'm all for kicking the door down.  Whatever it takes to get us out of here."

	"Remember..."  Elma gulped.  "We've got the Lounge on our tails."

	"Perhaps, but—"  Pilate began.

	"No more horsing around."  Josho gently pushed the zebra back so that he had a clear view of the barrier.  "Let's get this over with."

	"Fancy tearin' 'at wall doon oan yer lonesome, buddy?" Prowse asked.

	"I could certainly use a hand, if you catch my drift."

	"Consider it caught, locked, an' loaded."  Clak-clak-clak!  Prowse converted his left metal prosthetic into a cannon and aimed at the barricade.  "Oan yer mark."

	Josho's horn glowed brighter and brighter as he braced himself beside the bearded stallion.  "Three... two... one... Shoot!"

	KAPOW!  A fiery salvo was launched at the barricade, a projectile accelerated by Josho's thunderously powerful telekinesis.  In a bright burst, the discharge utterly obliterated the thick layer of metal bits in front of the group.  Josho's telekinesis switched on, sheltering the group from flying bits of shrapnel.

	At last, as the dust and thunder cleared, Rainbow Dash flew ahead, shining beams of ruby light through the settling haze.  Not far beyond the blasted chunk in the metal wall, the thin corridor opened into a wide chamber with a low ceiling.  It felt as if they had descended into the basement of the round structure, and the marble walls were suddenly replaced with craggy brick and ancient mortar.  What's more...

	"Light..."  Props murmured allowed.  "I see torchlight!"

	"Torchlight?"  Pilate remarked, hobbling after Josho.

	"What in heaven's name is this place?" Elma asked.

	Rainbow gulped, flying slowly, cautiously ahead of the group.  "Uhm... h-hello?"  Her voice echoed ahead of their trotting limbs.  "Hello?!  Is anypony there?"  She fidgeted in midair, feeling her heartbeat in her neck and mouth muscles.  "Any... fly-flying ponies, perhaps?"

	"Rainbow..."  Pilate breathily murmured.

	"Don't..."  Elma winced, reptilian eyes darting back and forth against the brick walls.  "D-don't like this..."

	"Rainbow, I-I think maybe we should—"

	"There!"  Josho rasped.

	Rainbow turned to look.  A shadow had darted in the torchlight from around the corner.  It was swiftly followed by two more shadows, then the sound of limbs splashing in shallow puddles.  Then silence.

	Rainbow Dash hovered in place, holding her breath.  She held a hoof out, signaling mutely for Josho to hold his position.

	He nodded, levitating his shotgun by his side.  He kept it trained on the corner while Rainbow Dash hovered slowly around, eyes locked on the turn in the mortar-constructed partition.  At last, she entered an adjacent temple, eyes squinting.

	Several metal barrels were lit with continuously flickering flames.  What's more, tattered canvas tarps hung over rusted aluminum lean-tos.  There were metal chests spilling over with moldy rations, engine pieces, and blunt weapons.  In a far corner—smelling with a rank stench—was a makeshift lavatory.

	Rainbow's lips pursed.  She turned and looked towards another part of the chamber.  She saw several sleeping mats lying back to back.  "Just... h-how many ponies are holed up in here—?!"

	P-Pow!  A crossbolt ricocheted off the wall to her side.

	She spun, dove low, and skidded to a stop on grinding hooves.  Less than a second later, several bright beams were being projected across her muzzle.  She gritted her teeth, squinting into a series of bright lights.

	"Hold it right there, monster!"

	"Rekkha mensruhmmen trenna drawlt!"

	"Hranna thiul drenna dien!"

	"That's as far as you go!"

	Rainbow became vaguely aware of equine shapes pouring out of the darkness with every manner of weapon trained on her petite figure.

	"Look!"  Rainbow's voice cracked.  "We got stuck here!  We just came to figure out what's going on in this place—"

	A metal weapon cocked loudly.  "A likely story!  Back to the shadows, shape-shifter!"

	Rainbow blinked into the blinding light.  "Shape-shifter?!"

	"You heard me!"  One shadow moved closer, the blinding light staring Rainbow down.  "If you came here hauling more victims in, you'd best toss them into the Wastes!  It'd be doing them a favor!"

	"The heck are you even talking about—"

	Bl-Blam!  A blast rang out from behind Rainbow Dash, followed by two more successive shots.

	One by one, the bright beams broke off from Rainbow as Josho charged in, expertly blasting the weapons out of the ponies' grips.  Rainbow saw haggard stallions and mares stumbling in the muzzle flash.  Two squatted low, firing levitating crossbows in a return volley.

	Josho ducked, rolled to the side, and fired at a metal shack besides the pair.  The structure shattered, spilling over the gasping duo as they succumbed to the weight.

	Three tattooed ponies galloped up with levitating scimitars.

	"Uh uh!"  Josho swiveled, cocking his shotgun with a menacing glare.  "Any closer and you'll be drowning in mana!"

	The warriors skidded to a stop, gritting their teeth and hyperventilating.  Their limbs were thin, their faces pale and emaciated beneath their swirling coat patterns.

	"Friggin' Xonans..."  Josho sneered, stepping closer to Rainbow Dash's side while keeping his weapon trained on the mysterious group.  "Why does it always have to be Xonans?"

	"Thanks for the save, big buddy," Rainbow muttered as he flapped her wings and hovered again.  "But let's take a moment to survey the situation..."

	"What's to survey?"  Josho grumbled.  "It's a den of snakes.  Plain and simple."

	"Look, will you friggin' put your testosterone on the shelf for a single Celestia-bucking moment?!"

	"Mehkshuul thiul rannadren, Ledomulien trenna tanne!" one warrior spat.

	"Rainbow?!  Josho?!"  Pilate hobbled in with Props and Elma.  "What's going on here?!  And..."  He gulped.  "...did I just hear what I thought I heard?"

	"How many are in this place?" Elma murmured.

	"I..."  Rainbow stammered, her eyes widening as more and more bodies shuffled out of the shadows.  "I-I can't tell.  Dozens?  A hundred?"

	"Everypony, just calm down," a stallion's voice said from where he trotted into the torchlight, helping ponies up to their hooves—tattooed and not.  "Look, they can't all be shape-shifters!  Look, one of them's using telekinesis!"

	"Hey!"  Josho shouted at the pony in question.  "I'm the one with the shotgun here!  Stop moving, dammit!"

	"Don't you get it?!"  the stallion shouted back.  "We're on the same side!"

	"How do you know that?!" sputtered a shivering mare from the shadows.  "It's a trick!  Just like before!"

	"They're trying to ensnare us!" another stammered.

	"Menna'sethulienna masta'ranna drenna'dennu trenna'sien," spoke a rather large Xonan in the center of the group, frowning.  "Feluusen mara'ttan clennu Lasairfion Xon-Nagu'n."

	"Will you relax, Arcshod?!  They're not here for her!  Can't you see they're just as confused as we are?!"

	Rainbow's head jerked at that.  Her mouth hung agape as she stared at the tall Xonan currently scowling at her.  "I've... I've seen him before... but..."  Blinking, she glanced towards the very rear of the room.  A tall, slender mare with a pronounced horn and a flowing mane peered out from the shadows.  As soon as Rainbow's eyes made contact, a thick line of tattooed ponies formed a tight, protective circle around her.  "No friggin' way..."

	"Please, everypony just calm down..."  The stallion stepped away from Arcshod, waving his forelimbs.  He was an earth pony with a shaved mane and a dirty blue coat covered in several places with dark spots.  "There's no need for all the gun-waving.  Let's just have a talk and—"  He froze in place, gawking at Rainbow Dash's wings.  "A... fly-flying pony?"

	Several ponies murmured in the distance.

	"Rekkha seniul brenna surumm threatta!"

	"She's one of th-them!  She has to b-be!"

	"The storm brought her to finish us all off!"

	"I didn't come to finish anypony off!" Rainbow shouted.

	"For Ledo's sake!"  Josho hissed, staring down his shotgun.  "Will somepony just tell us what you're all doing here?!"

	"That's a very good question, old friend."

	Josho twitched, his pupils shrinking at the very sound of the voice.  His head cocked to the side.

	A frail figure limped out of the shadows.  "Just what are you doing here?"  An old stallion stood, his thin face squinting under a fine mane of silken gray hairs.  "Of all the places for you to show up after all these years—a forsaken city of floating death traps in the middle of the frozen wastes?"  He slowly shook his head.  "It's far too great a coincidence.  Arcshod's right to be paranoid.  You're nothing but imposters."

	Josho's mouth hung agape.  "Secchy...?!"

	Seclorum breathed melancholically.  "If only it were truly you, old friend."

	"This is bullshit..."  Josho snarled, then shouted, "I watched you die!"

	"How dare you."  Seclorum's eyes narrowed over a frowning muzzle.  "You've used fascimiles of my very own soldiers against me.  But this?"  He shook his head.  "This is simply pathetic."  He glanced aside at the other ponies.  "Go ahead and shoot them."

	"No!"  The blue stallion shouted at his cohorts before they could scramble for their makeshift crossbows.  "No more blood!  Let's try to make sense of this!"

	"Enough talk, Aatxe!" Seclorum growled.  "You're a nice kid, but not a very bright one!  Can't you see they're spitting in our faces!"

	"We're not trying to spit at anypony!"  Props exclaimed, stepping ahead of Elma.  "Honest!  Trust a mare who's worked alongside a handsome elk!  We're totally and utterly spit free!"

	"Pr-Propsicle...?"

	Props gasped sharply.  Her goggled eyes blurred towards the side.

	A frail shape hobbled out of the shadows.  Coming into the light, a stallion with a pale coat and scarlet stubble stood before her, leaning on a crutch.  "Is... is that you, m-my niece?"

	Rainbow Dash blinked, then glanced down at Props.

	The blonde mare peeled her goggles up, staring wide-eyed.  "Unky Prowsy...?"

	The stallion blinked blearily at her across the torchlight, his eyes glistening.

	Gaping, Props mewled, "But... but..."  She spun around, shivering.

	Elma, Josho, and Rainbow spun with her.

	"... ... ..."  Professor Prowse stared back at the group.  He was silent and still... until a wicked grin flashed across his face.  "Hnnngh!"  With a flash of green fire, he jumped backwards, tossing his metal prosthetic like a club.  It rattled on the floor in between everypony, where it proceeded to emit a high-pitched whine beneath the sound of retreating dragonfly wings.

	Before Props could shout, Seclorum was dashing forward, grabbing her in two forelimbs and tossing the two of them behind a stack of metal crates.  "Everypony, get down—!"

	"Crud—!"  Josho plowed into Pilate's and Elma's sides.

	The chamber filled with flame and shrapnel.  Ponies screamed in various tongues, diving out of the way of the concussive force of the exploding prosthetic.  Rainbow Dash's wings caught the full brunt of the vaporously heated air.  She flew backwards, breathless, and slammed hard into a brick wall.  When she collapsed, layers upon layers of stone crumbled along with her, utterly blocking the hallway they used to get there and filling the entire interior with soot and dust.

	Then all was blackness.
		//------------------------------//
		// Into This House We're Born		//------------------------------//

	A dull bass reverberation boomed across the windswept air.  Ebon Mane's and Eagle Eye's heads instantly turned from where the two ponies had set up a bonfire on the temple floor alongside the Noble Jury.  Floydien peered curiously through the cockpit while Bellesmith and Zaid rushed up to the edge of the ship's tilted upper deck.

	Rainwater was rolling off the balcony of the large round building immediately facing them.  The heavy vibrations continued, culminating in a stream of dust that fell from one particular spot along the big structure's underbelly, followed by a column of loose bricks that trickled towards the distant temples hovering through the storm below.

	At last, the rumbling ended, and the Jurists heard nothing but the consistent howl once again.

	"Was..."  Ebon stammered.  "Was that thunder just now...?"

	"No..."  Floydien said, trotting out from the cockpit and peering over the ship's edge for a better look.  "That was a different kind of glimmer."

	"It came from inside the central temple," Eagle Eye thought out loud.  He turned and glanced worriedly at the others.  "I could have sworn..."

	Belle's pupils shrank as she held Kera tighter.  "Pilate..."

	"Oh jeez..."  Ebon Mane hissed through clenched teeth.  "What could they have gotten themselves into?"

	"Zaid?!" Eagle Eye exclaimed in a panicking tone.

	The lanky stallion was already speaking into his sound stone.  "Rainbow Dash!  Rainbow Dash, this is the Noble Jury!  Come in!"

	Belle's eyes wandered twitchingly towards the temple floor as her blood went cold.  Her breaths came in shallower and shallower bursts.



	"Rainbow?!  This ain't funny, girl!  Say something!"

	The sound stone broadcasted Zaid's voice in distorted waves, on account of the fractures that had formed in the enchanted shard's surface.  The weight of several layers of mortar was crushing down on it, and Rainbow Dash wasn't any luckier.

	"Nnnngh..."  The pegasus stirred, opening her eyes to dust and dimness.  Her ruby pendant illuminated a claustrophobic grave of bricks and ancient rock.

	"Come on!  Give us something!  Let us hear your sexy voice!"

	"Snnkt..."  Rainbow inched forward, squirming through the rubble in a trembling attempt to reach the sound stone.  She stretched a tender hoof ahead of her.  "Don't... leave the Jury..."  She wheezed and hissed.  "Changeling... Prowse is... a ch-changeling..."

	"Rainbow?!  Is that you?!  We can barely make out what you're saying!  What was that loud noise just now?!"

	"Darn it..."  Rainbow growled. She stretched her wings, stretching the space out a bit more so she could have room to shimmy upwards.  "Just st-stay where you are and don't... d-don't trust—"

	A strong hoof suddenly reached down and snatched Rainbow by her forelimb.

	The petite pegasus gasped, feeling herself yanked out of the rubble and into the hazy torchlight.  Rainbow wheezed for breath, teetering with the weight of her pendant and saddlebags.  "Unnngh... Thanks.  Where're the others?  Is anypony hurt—?"

	The hoof immediately reached back, produced a tiny shiv, and sliced Rainbow across the fetlock.

	"Gaaaah!"  Rainbow immediately jerked back.  Half a second later, she savagely bucked whoever it was in front of her.  "Friggin' melon fudge!"  She clutched her sliced forelimb, hissing like a kindergarten foal.  "What was that for?!"

	Seclorum stumbled backwards, catching his breath.  He gripped the dagger while battered ponies helped each other to their hooves behind him.  "Show us your hoof," he said.

	"I'll show your muzzle your own sphincter, you dirty sonuva—"

	"Show.  Us."  He glared while two stallions stood alongside him—a Xonan and a Ledomaritan.  "Your.  Hoof."

	With a perplexed frown, Rainbow held her bleeding limb out.  "There!  For Luna's sake!  Feast your eyes!"

	Seclorum squinted at the blood leaking out of her wound, then stared closely at the red liquid on the edge of his shiv.  His nostrils flared.  "She's clean."  He turned to look across the rubble-strewn interior.  "Check the others."

	Rainbow's mouth moved.  "'Check... the others?'"  She turned and instantly gasped.  "Hey!"

	Arcshod was levitating a tiny Xonan ceremonial dagger beside himself as he helped Pilate up.

	"R-Rainbow?!  What's going on?  Where did Prowse—?"  The zebra's face contorted in pain as he felt the cold kiss of a knife across his forelimb.  "Aaaugh!  Spark alive, that hurts!"

	"Hey!"  Rainbow rocketed across the compartment and rammed into the Xonan's side.  "Buzz off!  What's the big idea?!"

	Arcshod fell on his flank, stunned and blinking.  He snarled Rainbow's way and stumbled back up with a glowing horn.  "Suliu'enna drennalakkan dressul thien, trenn'tessa!"  Seclorum and another warrior held him back before he could charge the pegasus.

	"Easy there, numb tongue," Seclorum muttered, his eyes glancing between Arcshod's dagger and Pilate's wound.  "Also clean."  He turned his head.  "The rest?!"

	"Secchy," Josho grumbled, shrugging off a pair of ponies as he stood up with a glare.  "You'd better have a good explanation about this, old friend."

	"All in good time."  Seclorum motioned with his hoof.  "The blonde one."

	"For the love of soot, Seclorum!"  An awkwardly familiar voice exclaimed.  Rainbow Dash turned to see a thinner, weaker Prowse leaning his stub of a leg against a crutch.  "She's my bloody niece!" the stallion snarled.

	"That remains to be seen."

	"Please, everypony..."  Aatxe shuffled up to Props, snatching the shiv from a pony in front of her.  He glanced back at the huddled equines with a sympathetic expression.  "It's not like we have to butcher them."  Sighing, he grasped Props' hoof and held the tip of the blade to it.  "Sorry, sweetie.  This will hurt a bit."  He slashed swiftly.

	"Ghhh!"  Props clenched one eye shut, squirming noticeably.  "Owie owie owie owie..."

	Aatxe stared closely at the blade, his breaths coming and going quickly.  After the blood stayed red, he exhaled with relief.  "She's exactly who she looks like."  He backtrotted and motioned towards the pale stallion behind him.  "Congratulations, Prowse, on your happy reunion."

	"Oh, bless my blighted beard..."  Prowse lurched, limped, lunged forward, dropping his crutch and sweeping Props into a deep hug with one forelimb.  "I never th-thought I'd see you again, lassie!  You're a sight for this stallion's sore eyes..."

	"I... I..."  Props stared at him, lips quivering.  "But, Unky Prowsy, I don't understand..."

	"I imagine you don't..."  He leaned back, smiling.  But that grin soon faded.  "The fact that you're here means that you've been deceived."  He gulped, and frown hardened across his emaciated face.  "And in the worse way."

	"That..."  Props gazed at the pile of rubble that the exploded prosthetic had made.  "That other you was... was..."

	"I never wanted this sort of rubbish to befall you, Propsicle."  He caressed her mane as his eyes glazed over with tears.  "What are you even doing out here?!  Why didn't you stay home in Gray Smoke?"

	"The shop was closed, Unky Prowsy!" she exclaimed, blue eyes wide.  "Everything was cleared out!  The ponies all around said that you had gone off on your long-awaited expedition!  You..."

	Prowse slowly, slowly shook his head.

	Props blinked, her breath thin.  "Y-you never meant to leave Gray Smoke, did you?"

	"I went on a trading errand, Propsicle," he said.  "I was captured, robbed of all my tools, and throttled unconscious.  The next thing I knew—I was on a derelict zeppelin with several other ponies... most of which you see here."  He gestured towards far ends of the firelit chamber.  "We crashed into this bloody nightmare in the sky before I had a chance to take over the ship's controls.  A lot of us didn't survive..."

	"All this time..."  Props winced.  "I thought that he was you!"  She gritted her teeth.  "He looked like you... smelled like you... even talked like you!"

	"Was he really me?"  Prowse narrowed his eyes.  "Or something that made you think he was me?"

	Props blinked.  "I... I..."

	"Propsicle, lassie..."  He smiled slightly as he caressed her chin.  "'Th' lest time Ah talked loch thes was when Ah needed tae squeeze it a wee bit ay profit each week tae compete wi' th' bapit sooters frae th' Roost District'"  He took a deep, deep breath, then said, "You were always, always proud of my salesponyship."  He gulped.  "Maybe a little too proud."

	Props shivered, then hung her head, striking it several times with a hard hoof.  "Unnngh!  I'm such a stupid Props!  Stupid stupid stupid stupid Props!"

	"Shhhh-shhh..."  Prowse shoved one of her forelimbs down and hugged her once again.  "Don't be so hard on yourself, Propsicle."  He sniffled, looking wearily over her shoulder.  "You're not the first one to be fooled by these merciless tykes..."  He shuddered.  "And you won't be the last."

	"Josho?"  Seclorum marched firmly across the room.  "Old friend?  You're being awful hesitant..."

	"Because I don't like being sliced and diced up outside of battle!"  Josho stood his ground before the many ponies, folding his forelimbs with an angry expression.  "Ledo's toilet, Secchy!  Only time you ever drew a blade on me was during shore leave in the Blue Bordello—"

	"I don't care what you remember and how detailed those memories are," Seclorum said, his eyes hard like the daggers the ponies were holding.  "Until you show me a sign of trust, you are no trusted companion of mine."

	"Don't push him too hard, Seclorum," Aatxe said.

	"Bite your tongue!"  Seclorum sneered aside, his eyes continually trained on Josho.  "You know as well as I do that some of them are more ignorant than us."

	"Oh, I get it alright!"  Josho frowned.  "This whole 'blood-runs-red' thing: it's to make sure we're not changelings.  Doesn't take a tubeworm to understand that—"

	"You don't get anything," Seclorum grumbled, shaking his head.  "I can make you bleed in a hundred different ways, Josho."  His horn levitated a crossbow by his side.  "And over half of them from long range."

	"Unnngh..."  Josho rolled his eyes.  "For the love of—"

	"Josho..."

	Josho looked over.

	Rainbow Dash stared at him from where she supported Pilate's trembling body.  "Just get it over with."

	"Rainbow, we just found these creepazoids!  You can't honestly expect—"

	"Josho."  Rainbow stared icily.

	The stallion blinked, his lips pursing at that.  Frowning, he flashed his horn and yanked a blade out a gasping mare's grip.  "Fine.  At least let me do it myself."  He sliced across his upper forelimb, then turned his shoulder into the firelight for all to see.  "There.  Red.  You happy?"

	Seclorum's nostrils flared as he lowered the crossbolt by his side.  "Always the drama queen, Josho."

	"Buck you."  Josho flung the knife forward.

	Clank!  It embedded into the frame of Seclorum's crossbolt.  "Wonderful."  The Ledomaritan looked up with bored eyes.  "I actually found the world a lot more comfortable with the thought of you actually being dead."

	"Likewise, ya gray-assed mule."  Josho shrugged the ponies around him away as he marched over towards his companions.  "At least you're not magicless and locked up in a friggin' fetish cage."

	"Huh...?!"

	"Long ass story."  Josho stood by Rainbow's side.  "Maybe you'll hear it, seeing as we're trapped down here with you and all."

	"Belusuu'naa rekkharasso fem'keema thiulen ranna'theem," Arcshod muttered, glaring daggers over his shoulder at the group.

	Aatxe sighed at the Xonan.  "They're no more guilty of 'stupidity' than the rest of us that got stuck here, Arcshod!"  The stallion frowned.  "And the same can be said of your Princess!"

	Arcshod snarled at him, having to be held back by his fellow warriors.  "Fe'mulien restro trenn'ett!" he spat.

	"Wait, so if that dude is here..."  Rainbow Dash pointed at the ponies as she squinted at them from a distance, one after the other.  "And Lasairfion is here... and Seclorum and Prowse are here..."  She winced as if from a resounding migraine.  "...then what brought them all the way east from the main continent?"

	"Are you asking me?" Josho huffed, his eyes rolling.  "Or the 'freakish shapeshifter Josho who can somehow still perform magic and wield a shotgun before your bird-brained eyes?'"

	Rainbow retorted, "Look, will you get over that?!  Something big is going on here!"

	"Uhm... everypony?"  Pilate's muzzle scrunched as he tilted his ears about.  "What ever happened to—?"

	"The only big thing I see is the doofuses who have been cooped up here for so long that they think they run the place!"  Josho grunted.  "I'd be lying if I said that I didn't want a second chance to speak with my long-lost friend, but I'm not down with Secchy being part of the Spontaneous Hoof-Slicing-Club!"

	"I'm not too keen of it either, boyo," Prowse said from where he hugged Props close.  "But, as you can imagine, it's our only way of testing ponies to see if they bleed the real thing or the juice that runs through an imposter."

	"Yeah, and I get that!"  Josho hoarsely replied, leaning in.  "But why hole yourself up in here to rot away in the dark?!"

	"You really don't understand, do you, old friend?"  Seclorum trotted up, squinting.  "What brought us here wasn't a small group of shape-shifting freaks.  Oh no..."  He pointed back at the regal unicorn standing at a far distance with her loyal protectors.  "If they could bring the Spark-forsaken Queen of Tattoo-Land to this place, then we're dealing with a full-fledged army of monsters!"  He frowned.  "Spark only knows what they'd be capable of!  They could restructure the entire political structure of the world!  They could even change the war in Ledomare!"

	"Secchy, the war is over!" Josho shouted.

	Seclorum doubled-back at that.  A shrill gasp flew through the crowd.

	Arcshod blinked, his tattooed face stretched in shock.

	Ledomaritans exchanged awkward glances while Xonan warriors gazed in stunned silence at their Princess.

	Josho took a fuming breath.  "These so-called monsters that brought you all here have already done their fair share of damage, but we stopped them before they could do the absolute worst!"

	Rainbow Dash hovered forward, acquiring everypony's attention as she spoke.  "Lasairfion was replaced with a version of herself that took power and started a Xonan civil war."  She raised her voice over the ensuing gasps.  "Seclorum was replaced with a crazed general who held a suicidal line along the eastern front of the Ledomaritan conflict!  During all of this, the shapeshifters must have somehow weaseled their way into the Xonan high command, 'cuz they took advantage of a Divine, a powerful dragon named Nevlamas, who had been corrupted throughout the ages by chaos magic!  They convinced masses of eastern unicorns that Nevlamas was actually the Goddess Nagu'n and attempted to corrupt the very heart of this world!  Everypony on either side of the war was nearly wiped out in a single day!"

	Ledomaritans muttered in shock, meanwhile most of the Xonans broke out in shivers and sobs.  Arcshod stared numbly into torchlit space, his lips hanging open.  "Haranna thiulen res'trunnul messu, Xon-Nagu'n..."

	"But... but it's okay!"  Rainbow Dash said with an awkward smile.  "I mean..."  She instantly winced.  "No, tons of ponies lost their lives on both sides.  I'm talking about thousands of Ledomaritans and Xonans alike.  But... but..."  She gulped and said, "The war is over.  Nevlamas was defeated; the shape shifters were exposed.  The battle stopped just before everypony had the opportunity to wipe each other out.  And now—from the last we've heard—there's a permanent cease-fire.  Don't you get it?"  She grinned hopefully.  "Your continent's been saved!"

	Silence.

	Then, a series of graceful hoofsteps.

	"Ehm... excuse it, for it is most full of the curious," spoke a velvety soft voice, in spite of the thick accent.

	Rainbow jerked her gaze aside.

	Lasairfion was trotting forward despite the insistence of her closest subjects.  Her eyes pierced across the darkness, resting on Rainbow's hovering face.  "It speaks of the salvation of a land covered in blood.  Might it ask of it... who was the savior?"

	Rainbow opened her mouth, hesitated, then glanced aside.

	Josho and Props nervously fidgeted.  Pilate, despite his blindness, almost appeared to be looking straight at the pegasus.

	"Uhm..."  Rainbow gulped and looked towards the regal Xonan.  "I... I guess you could say I was."

	Lasairfion's eyes narrowed.  "And yet... is has somehow arrived here... in this place with so many children of loss and woe..."

	Rainbow was silent.

	With a melancholic breath, Lasairfion said, "Does it think this is of the pure and coincidental?"

	Pilate bit his lip.

	Rainbow's wings stopped flapping.  She touched down on numb hooves, her face blank.



	"It's simple, guys," Eagle Eye said.  "We have to get over there."

	"Get over there?!"  Ebon Mane stammered, squinting across the rainswept space between the edge of their temple and the round structure.  "How?!"

	"Yeah..."  Zaid nodded.  "Rainbow's not here to carry us.  And I mean that in the most literal way possible."

	"A good running leap should just about do it," the ex-mercenary said.  "And if that fails, I know of at least a dozen ways that my telekinesis could provide a boost."

	"For what—yourself?"

	"I'm sure I could bring another pony with me," Eagle said.  "But... no more.  That'd be risking too much."

	"You're risking enough just by suggesting you even leave this spot!"  Ebon Mane said.  "I won't let you do it!"

	"Won't let me?!"  Eagle Eye blanched at him.  "Ebon, you heard that noise just like the rest of us!  Something terrible happened across the way!  An explosion or a collapse or something even worse!  And now that we try to get through to Rainbow Dash's party, nopony answers!  They're our friends and they deserve to have whatever happened investigated!"

	"I know that, but—"

	"Floydien agrees with lavender lumps," the elk said from where he stood close to the ship's hull.  "Striped boomer is over there, blind and weak, and yet he is just one of many boomers that need the fetch-fetch."

	"I just don't like the idea of splitting us up any further!"  Ebon said, then struggled to squeak forth, "And I d-don't want you to be galloping into blind danger?"

	"Why not?  Striped boomer did."

	Ebon stamped his hoof.  "That's not the point!  Rainbow Dash is with them!  Who knows!  Maybe they're safe!"

	"As awesome as that may sound, buddy, we know that not everypony is perfect."

	"How about we pilot the Noble Jury closer so that all of us can drop down onto the building's balcony and look as a larger group?"

	"In these winds?!  Floydien's Nancy Jane would be lucky to fly in circles without kersplodey pops!"

	"Well, there's gotta be a better idea!  Let's think of something!"

	All this time, Belle had been staring into the rain-swept vistas of Stratopolis.  Her ears twitched to the sounds of the stallion's rising voices.  At last, she took a deep breath, and spoke firmly.  "I'll go."

	Everypony looked at her.

	"Belle...?" Eagle Eye blinked.

	"My beloved's in there.  If he's in trouble, then I want to make sure he gets out of there safe."  Belle took a deep breath.  "The same can be said for Rainbow Dash and the rest of my friends."

	"Belle, please, you don't have to—"

	"Yes, EE.  I do."  Belle stroked Kera's mane a few more times.  "Please, let's not wear out what everyone here is already thinking.  I can only take so much in a single week."  She gazed down at Kera, closed her eyes, and took a deep breath.  When she reopened them, she was staring at Zaid.  "Zaid..."

	"Erhm... Hello, gorgeous?"  The stallion smiled nervously.

	She gulped and trotted towards him.  "I... I-I'm going to need you to take care of Kera while I'm gone."

	His jaw fell open.  "Buh?"

	"Yes, yes... I know..."  Belle muttered as she gently raised Kera and cradled her limp body in his forelimbs.  "You're crude, tactless, and you possess an unhealthy obsession for needless junk."  She sighed, her glossy eyes cherishing the foal's placid face.  "But, more than that, I know that nopony else could better take care of her."

	"I... uh..."  Zaid chuckled drly as he held the foal to his shoulder, rocking her slightly.  "Eheh... I didn't realize you felt that way about me."

	"That's because I didn't," Belle said, frowning.  "And in a lot of ways, I still don't.  But... I can't let that get in the way of what needs to be done right now."

	"And... that is...?"

	"Pilate, my beloved."  She gulped.  "And Rainbow Dash.  I need to have faith that they're okay..."  She shuddered as she finally turned towards Eagle Eye.  "And I need to have faith that they can still need me.  EE, I'll join you.  But I'm going to need your help in getting over."

	Eagle Eye nodded with a soft smile.  "You know you can always depend on me, Belle.  All you gotta do is ask."

	"Well, that's what I'm doing now.  Asking."  Belle turned to glare at Zaid one last time.  "If I come back and she has one single mark on her beautiful tattooed body—"

	"Hey!  Heyyyyy..."  Zaid chuckled, waving a forelimb.  "I get it.  You don't have to make it any clearer."  He patted Kera lovingly as he smirked.  "Believe me, bunking with the Herald?  Khao threatened me tons of times about spontaneously becoming a eunich."

	"Bouncing boomers better hurry," Floydien said, nodding with his antlers towards the large structure ahead of them.  "Who's to know what manner of bleed bleed threatens Floydien's friends."

	"Right..."  Eagle Eye levitated his sword and shield over from the campfire.  "Belle, I'll hop over first.  Then I'll help pull you over with my floating shield.  Trust me.  It'll be a lot simpler than it sounds."

	"That's okay, EE.  I have full faith in you."

	"Likewise."

	"Eagle Eye..."  Ebon winced, staring down at his squirming hooves.  "I..." He winced. "Please forgive me.  I didn't want to sound like a coward.  It's just that—"

	"Shhhh..."  Eagle Eye was suddenly in front of him, resting a hoof on the earth pony's shoulder.  "It's okay.  I get it.  And besides..."  He smiled.  "Nopony elects himself as the ship's only cook and pretends to not be brave."

	Ebon smiled awkwardly.  His eyes fluttered, and his head drifted forward—only to jerk back suddenly.  "Erm... ehhh..."  His muzzle flushed a deeper burgundy.  "That... uhm... th-that totally wasn't... wh-what it looked like it was about to be.  I was just—"  His lips stopped moving.  It may have had something to do with Eagle's muzzle locking suddenly with them.  Either way, he froze in place with an inward squeak.

	Floydien raised an eyebrow.

	Zaid blinked.  Quiet as a rock, he covered Kera's catatonic eyes.

	Eagle Eye leaned back, smiling warmly at Ebon.  "It takes a lot to be brave," the petite stallion said.  "Trust me.  I'm learning with each and every day."

	"I... erm..."  Ebon trembled, speechless.  "Derp...?"

	"It's alright."  Eagle Eye winked.  "When we get back with our friends, you can test your bravery too."  He patted Belle's shoulder.  "Okay.  You ready?"

	"Uhhhh..."  Belle's chestnut eyes darted between the two stallions.  "Are you...?"

	"Figure I could do with a cold shower," Eagle sing-songed, and skipped out into the streaming rain.  "Wait for my lead, girl!"

	Belle nodded.  She trotted after him, but not without pausing to pass a sly glance Ebon's way, and then both were gone.

	Ebon plopped down on his haunches besides Floydien and Zaid, his chest palpitating.

	"I know this might be weird timing and all, but..."  Zaid leaned in, cradling Kera.  "Think you can make us both some brunch?"



	"I'm sorry, but..." Seclorum looked across the torchlit space with jaded eyes.  "I'm not convinced that you actually saved anything, bird-pony."

	"Unnngh!"  Josho groaned towards the ceiling.  "Secchy, old friend!  Did you hear a single word that she said?!"  He frowned from where he stood by the fresh rubble.  "She single-hoofedly stopped a freakin' chaos dragon!  Her actions exposed the shapeshifters and put an end to their plot!"

	"That's simply too good to be true," Aatxe said, staring lethargically at the group.  "These monsters have been planning their subterfuge for far too long and on such a grandiose scale that all that could have been accomplished on your end was a minor setback."

	"How do you know that?" Pilate asked.

	"Because I've been here a long... long time," the stallion said.  "My name is Aatxe.  I was once the captain of a large manaship, the Tarkington, that crash-landed into one of the lower temples of this storm.  Our ship remained in one piece, but the engine had died out.  So myself and at least a dozen of my surviving crewmmates went looking for materials to salvage the core.  We made it to this structure through much trial and error.  It was then that these... changelings ambushed us and whittled our numbers down to three.  The transports that brought us here were wrecked, and we had to escape to these lower corridors in order to form a last stand.  We were the first ponies of this group to end up here in living condition.  As time went by, more and more joined our sides—those who spoke our language and those who didn't.  Eventually, we ran into ponies who shared the same calendar with us.  That's how we've come to realize that we've been marooned here for at least seventeen years."

	Rainbow Dash's jaw fell.  "Seventeen years...?"

	"And believe me, if the changelings wanted to finish us off, they would have," Aatxe said.  "But, for some reason, they kept us alive... even going so far as to leave us food for sustenance.  At first we rejected it, but time and hunger does a number on one's pride.  Still, we never hesitated to murder a shape-shifter as soon as we figured out who was who underneath the fake skin."

	"And even after they lost their own kind to you..."  Pilate tilted his head aside.  "...they still didn't murder you senselessly?"

	Aatxe shook his head.  "They don't think or act like you or me.  They have no love for single individuals among their brood.  They'll gladly sacrifice massive numbers of their own kind just to accomplish their putrid will.  Sometimes this sacrifice means sending their drones to slaughter.  At other times, it means something much... much more sinister."

	"Like what?" Props asked.

	"Selective brainwashing, lassie," Prowse said to her with a sad expression.  "While some of their kind impersonate us on purpose, it's not always enough to get the job of deception done."

	"So they make a select few of their drones forget who and what they are," Seclorum muttered.  "And in exchange for being part of the hive mind, they take on the full consciousness and personality of the pony who's form they've taken."

	"Their drones have no idea that they're not really changelings," Aatxe said.  "Maybe now you all can understand why we... wh-why we had to forcibly 'test' you."

	"That..."  Josho's brow furrowed at the thought.  "That explains why the Seclorum we killed was so surprised..."

	"Wait..."  Seclorum blinked.  "You killed the other me?"

	"Was that not clear?" Josho droned.

	"Heh..."  Seclorum folded his forelimbs.  "No wonger you're so far from the Queen's country.  You should be a regular fugitive by now."

	"Sorry to break your bubble, but it wasn't from slaughtering you.  You're just not that important."

	"Tell that to the changelings."

	"So wait..."  Props squinted into the torchlight.  "So if these nasty wasties knew that they might be losing control of Nevlamas and all that jazz way back west in deathland..."  She glanced up at Rainbow Dash.  "Then why go through with it to begin with?"

	Rainbow Dash's eyes darted about.  She thought out loud, "'Hate is just another form of love...'"

	"Huh?"  Aatxe glanced over.

	"It's something that the changeling posing as Lasairfion said to me," Rainbow Dash uttered.  "Or else... something like it."  She glanced up.  "And I had posed her a very similar question.  'What was she expecting to accomplish?'"  She paced about, her pendant rattling around her neck.  "According to Princess Celestia, ancient changelings were empathic, and they feast off of emotions—most commonly love.  But... but what if hate and love could feed a modern changeling all the same?"

	"All of the dying and the bleeding," Lasairfion's voice drifted sadly from afar.  "Ha'lanna siulen trennadren Xon-Nagu'n.  The blessed children of Nag'un..."

	"If what you're trying to say is that pain and devastation is right up these creatures' alleyway, then you'll hardly find us surprised," Aatxe said.  "This place is practically a monument to their malice."

	"No... It's not a monument.  It's a prison," Rainbow Dash said, swiveling to look sharply at the group.  "They brought each and every one of you here so they could study you, impersonate you out in the field, and then accomplish some stupidly crazy master plan!"  Rainbow Dash gnashed her teeth as she punched one hoof against another.  "The question is—just what's the big picture?!  And how's it going to help their Queen Chrysalis?!"

	Seclorum did a double-take, his eyes wide.  "Where did you hear that name?!"

	Rainbow Dash blinked.  He squinted back at him.  "Where did you?"

	The room fell deathly silent.

	Just then, a mountain of rubble shifted towards the side.

	"Eeep!"  Props jumped into Prowse's embrace as both shifted away from it.

	"What in the...?!" Josho spat.

	"Nnnngh..."  A beak emerged from the shifting debris.  "Thank goodness I was born with a hard shell!"

	"That..."  Pilate shifted.  "That sounded like..."

	"Elma!"  Rainbow Dash darted down, grabbing the turtle's legs and hoisting her out of the mess.  "OmigoshOmigoshOmigosh!  Speak to me, girl!"

	"Unnngh..."  Elma wheezed.  "Do I have to?"

	"I'm so, so sorry!  Are you hurt?!  Things got heated and there were knives involved and... and..."

	"It's okay... r-really..."  Elma waved a scaled hand, reeling dizzily.  "I've been through rougher straits, believe me.  Especially while surviving alongside the Professor—"  Her eyes widened as she gasped at Rainbow.  "The Professor!  What happened?!  One moment, he was tossing his metal leg, and then the next—!"

	"Whoah.... whoah... easy, Elma," Rainbow Dash said, patting her head and smiling.  "We're still trying to figure it all out ourselves.  The bad news is—we're kind of stranded here cuz the creep posing as him caused the hallway to cave in."

	"Really?!  No way..."  Elma stammered.  "How could none of us have seen it coming?"

	It was around this time that Props realized she was suddenly standing alone.  "Unky... Prowsy...?"  She turned and looked over her shoulder.

	The thin stallion was leaning over towards Arcshod and Seclorum, whispering something lightly.  Arcshod's eyes widened while Seclorum gravely nodded.  While Rainbow and Elma spoke, the three shuffled stealthily towards the scene.

	"Something big is going on here, Elma," Rainbow Dash said.  "But don't you worry.  We're going to get to the bottom of it... right after I find a way to get us out of here."  She glared at the rubble blocking the entrance way.  "Somewhere out there, the Noble Jury is waiting to hear back from us.  And pretty soon, they'll have no choice but to—"

	"Excuse me for interrupting," Seclorum said as he trotted right past Rainbow Dash.  "Ma'am, what's your name?"

	"Uhm..."  The snapping turtle glanced up.  "Elma.  Elma Boreal."

	"You don't look like you're from around here, Ms. Boreal."

	"Joshooooo...?"  Rainbow droned, her eyebrows dead straight.  "What's your worst-best-friend doing?"

	"Uhm... Secchy...?"

	"I..."  Elma squinted.  "Why, I'm from..."

	"Alafreo?"  Prowse remarked, hobbling back by Props' side.  "Born and raised in the eastern continent?"

	"Why..."  Elma nodded.  "Yes."

	"And do you know where it was that you died?" Prowse asked, his eyes hard.

	Elma's beak hung open.  "...what?"  That's when Arcshod grabbed her from behind.  "Aah!"

	"Hey!"  Rainbow darted forward, only to be yanked to a stop by Aatxe.  "Lemme go, creep!"

	"I'm so sorry," Aatxe stammered.

	"For what?!"

	"Tell me, old friend," Seclorum spoke to Josho as he marched forward with a levitating dagger.  "When was the last time..."  He cave a massive scrape to the turtle's backside.  "...that you saw a turtle's shell bleed?"

	"Augh!"  Elma yelped in pain.

	"Seclorum!"  Josho snarled.  "For Ledo's sake, stop—!"  His voice stopped as soon as he saw the blade floating before his eyes.  A dollop of viscous green liquid dribbled off the shiv's pointed end.  "...mother of Spark."

	"Oh no..."  Pilate muttered blindly, his ears drooping.

	Rainbow flashed the zebra a look, then gaped at Elma.

	"What...?!"  Elma struggled in Arcshod's grasp.  "What... is everypony... looking at..."  She stopped in mid-speech, feeling a warm liquid running down her shell and over her head.  It ran between her eyes, sticking to her beak like emerald tree sap.  "What... where did that...?"

	"It's just like we said, old friend," Secolrum droned.

	Arcshod dropped Elma to the rubble and galloped aside.  He let loose a shout, and a line of Xonans rushed up, crossbolts trained on the "turtle."

	"The worst weapons of the changelings are, in fact, victims themselves."

	Elma brought a foot up to her head, dipping it into the hot colored slime.  She stared in horror, her breaths coming in quick pants.  A flicker of light darted through her eyes.  Suddenly, she could see through her limb, for it had turned thin, porous, with a glossy black exoskelton.  "This... th-this isn't..."

	"They're planted among us—inside and outside this place—to study us closely and figure out what makes us tick.  Then, once they're returned to the hive mind, they pass on the knowledge of how to become us."  Seclorum turned to look at Rainbow Dash.  "You haven't saved anything, my dear.  So long as these monsters are in the world, everypony that exists is in a prison."

	"Elma...?"  Props mewled, her eyes misty.

	"No... it's not... I'm not..."  Elma hyperventilated, her voice wavering, shrinking, suddenly accompanied with a deeply resonated buzz, like a pathetic purr.  Her beak was replaced with fangs while her wounded shell shrank into thin haunches with folded gossamer wings.  "I... I-I've laid eggs..."  She shrieked; she sobbed.  "I have ch-children!"

	"This is worse than I thought," Aatxe muttered.  "Two shape-shifters planted in one group?"  He glanced aside at Arcshod and Seclorum.  "What could they have wanted so bad that they would have steered this winged pony and her friends here?"

	"R-Rainbow..."  The bleeding creature curled into a fetal position, staring up with quivering green eyes.  "Rainbow... please... h-help me...!"

	Rainbow grimaced.  She looked at her hooves, and she gasped.  Wincing, she darted over towards the survivors.  "How long would it take for these creeps to copy your body?!  Your inner essence?!"

	"I... I..."  Aatxe shook his head.  "I don't—"

	"You've been stuck here for seventeen years, pal!"  Rainbow Dash frowned.  "Don't tell me you haven't gotten a clue!"

	"Honestly, they could make themselves look like anything they want!  But to literally become you?"  Aatxe shrugged.  "They would have to have been exposed to you emotionally and mentally for a prolonged period of time!  Then, theoretically, that information would be channeled into the hive mind!  Into all of them!"

	"Then... then all of Chrysalis' brood could become me."  Rainbow Dash blinked aside.  With a look of horror, she turned towards a certain zebra.  "Pilate..."

	He was already speaking the same thought.  "The control room."

	Rainbow's ears folded.  "Oh Luna poop..."



	Inside a vast chamber illuminated by refracted rivulets of rain water, a dark shadow flitted over the tomb of Commander Hurricane.

	In the center of the room, a body hovered low over the many-many rods sticking out of the grooves in the granite floor.

	A black, porous hoof descended upon a dormant shard at the top of one staff.  Then—with a band of emerald fire—that same black hoof turned fuzzy blue.  It lowered and contacted the shard, which illuminated immediately upon touch.  With unimpeded ease, the rod was shoved across its groove and towards another staff.



	"Nnngh!"  Eagle Eye landed on the balcony of the round structure.  Almost slipping on the water-slick surface, he caught his breath and spun around, facing the temple floating just a few naked feet away.  "Alright, Belle!  You ready?"

	The mare stood precariously on the temple's edge.  She winced against the pelting wind and rain.  "Ready as I'll ever be!"

	"Good!"  Eagle floated his shield alongside himself and held it high for the mare to see.  "I'm going to toss you my shield!  But don't worry!  It's still in my levitation field!  Grab onto it and make like you're jumping the gap!  I'll carry you the rest of the way!  Got it?!"

	"Got it!"

	"And a one... and a two... and a..."  He held his breath as he tossed the disc towards her.

	Lifting herself up on her rear hooves, Belle effortlessly caught the thing.  She exhaled with relief, gripping on tight.  "Okay!  Here goes!"  Biting her lip, she courageously kicked off the temple's edge.  Stifling a shriek, she drifted forward, being carried by Eagle Eye's enchanted shield.

	The stallion licked his lips, concentrating hard as he brought Belle across the gap.  In less than five seconds, she joined him on the balcony's edge.  "Gotcha!"  He grabbed her by the forelimb and hoisted her onto an upper level besides a collapsed zeppelin.  "There!"  He smiled.  "Now that wasn't so bad, was—?"

	One of the floating obelisks pulsed brightly.

	Belle gasped.  Eagle spun about, blinking.  "What in the Spark...?"

	The temple with the Noble Jury was floating away, and at an alarming speed.  The obelisk that brought it there was retreating towards the rainswept depths of Stratopolis.

	"It's moving..."  Bellesmith said, then repeated her exclamation with a loud shout.  "It's moving!"

	"Hey!  Heeeeeey!"  Eagle Eye waved his forelimbs and shouted towards the temple.  "Guys!  Your temple!  It's floating away!"

	Three bodies congregating around the Noble Jury glanced awkwardly at the two ponies.

	"Why is this happening?!"  Bellesmith stammered breathlessly.  "Why would Rainbow Dash be moving our platform further back?"

	"I don't know, but from the looks of it—"  There was another pulse of light.  Eagle craned his neck to the right, and instantly his ears flattened.  "Oh heavens, no."

	"What?"  Belle turned to look.  Her eyes widened.



	"What in the spit?!"  Floydien growled, pacing back and forth.  "What in the spit—What in the spit—What in the spit spit?!"

	"Just calm down!"  Ebon exclaimed.  "There's gotta be a reasonable explanation for this!"

	"Reasonable?"  Zaid cackled from where he stood on the Noble Jury's top deck, cradling Kera.  "More like ridiculous!  Seriously, Rainbow Dash picked a bad time for granite musical chairs—"  He caught a flash of light in his peripheral vision.  Spinning about, the stallion blinked, then hugged Kera tighter.  "Ohhhhhhhh crikey."

	"Huh?!"  Ebon craned his neck to look.

	While the Jury's temple was flying outward, the next two closest obelisks were traveling inward, and they were carrying large buildings along with them... buildings that were hurling in a crash-course straight for them.

	"Get in Nancy!"  Floydien shouted, already galloping towards the rear hangar, his cloven hooves splashing through the shallow puddles.  "Get in Nancy!"

	"Oh crud oh crud oh crud!"  Ebon squeaked, stumbling after him.  He would have heard himself shrieking next, if it weren't for the explosive sounds of two random temples colliding a hundred meters off their left side, hurling stone and granite debris into the murderous winds of Stratopolis... and sailing towards them.
	
		//------------------------------//
		// Into This World We're Thrown		//------------------------------//

	"Elma...?"  Pilate stammered, his face tilted in the direction of the weeping changeling.  "Elma, wh-what's happening to you?"

	The shape-shifter choked on a sob, burrying its fangs in a pair of black-webbed forelimbs.  Nothing but indecipherable squeaks came out.

	"Please, speak to us—"  The zebra took a step towards her, only to be yanked back by a pulse of telekinesis.

	"Pilate, give it up!" Josho exclaimed.  "She's nothing like she seemed!  She's worse off than Prowse!"

	"But... but she couldn't possibly have known that—"

	Rainbow Dash flew in, inadvertently knocking Pilate to the ground as she gripped Josho's shoulders.  "Josho!  You gotta teleport us out of here!"

	"Huh?!"  Josho exclaimed.

	"Wh-what?!" Seclorum stammered from a few feet away.  Arcshod and Aatxe glanced over in concern.

	"Don't you get it?!"  Rainbow's voice cracked.  "There's another me out there—a false me—and she's gonna be trashing the Noble Jury the first chance she gets!"

	"Rainbow, even if that was true, I can't just randomly port us out of here—"

	"Yes you can!"  Rainbow shouted.  "You have to!  As long as we're stuck here, our friends are screwed!"

	"I have no clue how this whole stupid place is built!" Josho roared.  "We could materialize in pure rock or in a bolt of lightning—"

	"Dang it, Josho!"  Rainbow Dash growled.  "Think of Eagle Eye!  You want him being torn to bits while we wait here, arguing!"

	Josho's teeth clenched tightly as he anxiously contemplated that.

	"Old friend..."  Seclorum stumbled forward, squinting.  "Don't tell me that you're thinking of—"

	"Alright, but if we explode into pony oatmeal, I'm putting the blame on you!" Josho exclaimed.  He gripped Rainbow's forelimbs while his horn started to glow.

	"No!"  Seclorum shouted, rushing forward.  "Don't do it!  Don't separate from us!  That's exactly what the changelings—"  A peach-colored hoof tripped him.  "Gaaah!"  The stallion fell hard to the ground.

	"Propsicle!" Prowse gasped.

	Props pulled her hoof in and spun towards Rainbow and Josho.  "Go, Jurists!  Work your magic!  Snappity snap!"

	"Hold your breath," Josho wheezed as his horn glowed to a blinding degree.  "There's no telling how much this is going to suck—"

	FLASH!  Before the survivors shocked faces, the two ponies disappeared...



	...and materialized upside down in a mess of stormclouds.

	"Gaauchkkkt!"  Josho hissed, sputtered.  He fell instantly, along with Rainbow Dash.  Lightning struck, throttling their ear drums as they plummeted through the hurricane winds and rain.

	Rainbow Dash shouted something, but couldn't hear over the ringing of her ears.  Rolling about, her eyes settled on a dark circular spot above them—when in fact it was below them.  Wheezing, she spun around, spotted the flailing figure of Josho in her peripheral, and propelled herself directly towards him.  The winds tore at her feathers and a consistent gale shoved her sideways.

	Nevertheless, with tearing eyes, she sliced the air sideways, diving towards Josho's figure as it flew like a living anvil towards the largest building's rooftop.



	"Hurry hurry hurry!"  Ebon Mane's voice rattled down the rattling bulkheads of the Noble Jury.  He clamored after Floydien as the elk made his way towards the front crawlspace.  "Mr. Floydien, we gotta take off!  We're seconds away from turning to dust—"

	"Sailboat boomer means Floydien has to get out of here!"  The elk shouted as he threw himself into the vertical crawlspace.  With strained hooves, he pulled himself towards the cockpit above.  "Get to the womb of Nancy Jane with the sailboating!"

	"Wh-what?!"  Ebon skidded to a stop, wheezing.  "The engine room?!  But... wh-why me—"

	"If some boomer doesn't fire up the glimmer shimmer, Nancy Jane dies, and Floydien's friends along with her!"  Floydien glanced down once to shout, "You are blonde boomer now!  Make with the quick quick!"

	Hyperventilating, Ebon dashed forward, kick-slid along the floor, and dropped like a stone down the crawlspace opposite of where Floydien was climbing.  He nearly slammed into Zaid while scrambling to gallop down the belly of the ship towards the stern.

	"H-hey!  Are we taking off or what?!" Zaid exclaimed above the rattling noise of the bulkheads.

	"What!" Ebon shrieked, then flung a hoof towards him.  "You find a secure place for yourself and Kera and hunker down!  This is about as bumpy as it's ever going to get!"

	"Wait, are you the engineer now?!" Zaid wheezed, hugging Kera close.

	"M-maybe!"  Ebon was already tossing himself into the engine compartment.

	"Awwwwwwwwwwwwwww boogers."  Zaid flung open the curtain to the observation room and practically tossed Kera into one of Rainbow's hammocks.  Next, he gathered all the pillows from every netted bed and piled them around the filly.



	"Oh blessed Spark..."  Belle sat on her haunches atop the round building's balcony, chewing on the edges of her hooves as she watched two looming buildings soar towards the temple where the Noble Jury was.  "Oh please... oh please oh please oh please!"  Her voice wavered, on the virge of tears.

	Thoroughly rain-soaked, Eagle Eye squinted through the howling window.  Above the thunder, he heard a high-pitched whistle.  Nervously, he wrenched his eyes off the doomed Jury and blinked skyward.

	Through the swirrling eddies, he spotted two tiny dots—a pair of flailing bodies that plummeted through the storm.

	He sucked his breath in.  "Rainbow...?"



	"Josho, hang on!"  Rainbow Dash finally resorted to coiling her wings at her sides and aiming her body like a living torpedo.  She plummeted at a diagonal angle, plowing into Josho's belly with a full-on tackle.

	"Ooomf!"  The unicorn grunted.

	Rainbow Dash twirled with his weight.  She saw the world spin, and in a blink spotted the domed roof of the circular structure.  The pegasus hugged her friend tighter and dragged a wing out.  She gave the two of them last-second lift, so that they approached the rooftop at a nearly-even angle.

	Wh-Whud!  The two bounced off, flew, came down again, and slid across the water-slick surface.  Rainbow gnashed her teeth and grunted from the careening movement.  There was little friction, so when the two reached the building's edge, they shot off like cannonballs.  Rainbow gasped, helpless to slow their descent.

	That's when Josho's horn glowed.  In desperation, he telekinetically tugged at the first thing that he could reach with his magical grip.  It turned out to be the rusted chassis of a crashed zeppelin against the far side of the building's round balcony.

	The two braked in mid-air like a ball tethered to a rusted pole.  Josho's horn started to short out, and Rainbow saw it.  With a grunt, she flapped both wings, shoving against the hurricane winds.  Before Josho's telekinesis could wear off, she succeeded in shoving the two of them onto the precarious edge of the balcony.

	"Ooof!" Rainbow Dash grunted as she landed, sprawled out onto the water-soaked ledge.  She barely had a moment to breathe when she heard an obnoxiously loud grinding sound.  The pegasus looked up to see that the hulking piece of aircraft had cracked down the center from Josho's anchoring tug.  Before her ruby eyes, the thing split in two, and a large chunk of rusted metal inevitably plunged off the balcony ledge... and towards them.

	"Josho, roll!" Rainbow kicked him in the fat flank.  The two tumbled in opposite directions, avoiding the grinding chunk of metal by mere inches.  With a brief vomit of sparks, the wreck slid past them and plunged violently into the depths below, where it eventually collided with two buildings that were already smashing into each other on account of their converging obelisks.

	Breathless, Rainbow Dash stumbled up to her hooves and sprinted towards Josho.  "You okay?!  Speak to me!"

	Josho hissed, gagged, and curled up.

	"...Josho?" Rainbow Dash shook his shoulder.

	"Hrgghghhllllghl!"  The stallion hurled, vomiting up a bucketload of rainwater.  His eyes rolled back as he let loose a low, sickly grow.  "Ledo's scrotum, I hate blind teleports—"

	"Just hang in there!  I'll get you someplace dry—"

	"Balls to that!"  The stallion snarled, shoving at her hoof.  "Get your ass to the control room!  Save our friends!  I didn't throw myself into vomitland for nothing!"

	Rainbow nodded... then nodded again.  "R-right.  Right!"  She spun and took off in a burst of air, hurling herself down one of the corridors beyond the balcony's edge.  "Try not to get washed up!"

	Josho wheezed, crawling limply towards dry cover.  "A little... t-too late..."



	Ebon panted and panted, rushing from instrument panel to instrument panel in the lavender-glowing engine room.  "Come on, Ebon.  Come on..."  He gulped and trembled, fiddling with a dozen levers every ten seconds.  "You've seen Propsy do this a million times!  What turns the whole thing on?!  What?!"

	"Scrkkkk!  Sailboat boomer?!"  Floydien's voice echoed from the nearby intercom.

	"I'm working on it!" Ebon growled.



	Floydien stared out the wind-swept top deck of the Noble Jury.  At an angle, his red eyes spotted the approach of two massive temples as they converged on the floating building where they were stranded.

	"Now would be a good time!" the elk throated, his expression wincing.

	Just then, the temples struck.  A crumbling wave of imploding stone rippled towards the Noble Jury.  Floydien's cloven hoof slapped a button, shutting the cockpit's rear door to the deafening thunder and wall of destruction.  He spun about, hopped the vertical crawlspace, and gripped the controls.

	"Come on, worthless sailboat!  Spark the Nancy!  Spark the Nancy!!"



	"Hey, uh, Ebon?!"  Zaid's voice rang down the bottommost corridor as the entire ship shook like the heart of an earthquake.  "Now might be a good time to rethink your cooking career!"

	"Got it!" Ebon shouted through a grinning muzzle.  "I found what switches on the skystone!"  He clamped his hooves over a lever and gave it a crank.  "Hnnnngh!"  The lights along the rim of the engine room flickered on and off.  "Come on!  Hrrrghh!"  He yanked and yanked and yanked and—

	A tongue of flame erupted around the caged tome, then shrunk back into the runic pages.  A loud hum erupted through the ship's manaconduits.



	Up in the cockpit, Floydien saw his instrument panel light up.

	"The skystone drive...?!"  He gritted his teeth.  "It's not the steam thrusters, but it'll do!"  He shoved a throttle forward.  "Hold on to boomer butts!"



	Sparks splashed across the leftover granite floor as the Noble Jury rushed forward in a scraping burst, outflying the wave of crumbling devastation behind it.  The temple lost cohesion, plummeting into the thunderous clouds.  As a result, the Noble Jury spat out the far end, launched from the thin space of the collapsing building like a limp bullet from a lopsided gun.

	When it emerged into open space, the vessel had lost much of its acceleration.  It twirled, toppeled, and drifted sideways with chaotically sparkling skystone bits.  Then, to add insult to injury, the temples behind it exploded from the cores of their weighted bodies colliding in bulk.  Chunks of debris flew outward in every direction, including one massive chunk that struck the broadside of the Jury.



	CLANKKKK!

	"Graaaugh!"  Floydien shouted, his antlers sparking at random while the heavy impacted jolted him off his hooves.  His grip slipped from the controls as the Noble Jury spiraled out of control.  Feeling weightless, the elk toppled backwards... and plummeted down the crawlspace.

	Whud!  His body slammed against a ladder... Th-Thwack! and then pinballed off the wall on the other side of the narrow passage.



	Zaid was leaning over the hammock where he had laid Kera, covering the filly with his trembling body.

	Thud!  A brown figure collapsed like a huge chunk of meat on the bulkhead directly outside the observation room.

	Zaid spun to look, breathless.  "Mr. Floydien...?"

	The elk lay dead-still, his antlers dim, his limbs limp.

	Zaid panted, eyes widening.  "Elkster?!"  He gulped.  "Buddy—?!"

	He could only gasp, for the unpiloted Jury was instantly swept up in a hurricane force gail.  Zaid's body rolled away from the hammock and collapsed hard against the opposite bulkhead.



	"Oh no..."  Eagle Eye stammered, his eyes locked on the plummeting image of the Jury as it disappeared in the thundering mess below.  "...Ebon..."

	Bellesmith hyperventilated.  Her eyes teared against the wind as a growing grimace consumed the golden contours of her face.  "I left her... I... I-I abandoned—"

	"Bellesmith!"

	The mare jerked in place, feeling the warm grip of Eagle's hoof on her shoulder.  Both ponies looked up.

	More and more temples collided, their obelisks flinging them into suicidal paths.  With each successive explosion, a broader and deadlier array of stones were being shot skyward.  Suddenly, a merciless rain of rocks and granite chunks were plummeting their way, accelerated murderously by the hurricane winds of Stratopolis.

	"Quick!"  Eagle Eye shouted, pulling at Belle's forelimbs.  "Inside!  Run inside—"

	But it was too late.  The rocks rained down, thunderously pelting the balcony of the round building in dozens of different places.  Columns shattered.  The crashed shells of airships imploded.  Rivulets of cracked fissures formed everywhere, spreading the stone platform beneath the ponies until—

	"Gaaah!"  Belle tripped, as did Eagle Eye.  Gripping on for dear life, they watched in horror at the ground beneath them split apart, breaking off into the chaotic winds beyond...
		//------------------------------//
		// The Gravity of This Situation		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash skirted around the balcony of the large structure.  Twirling about, she dashed low and threaded through the columns and airship parts blocking her way towards the building's interior.

	Right as she was about to enter the depths of the structure, she heard loud whistling in the air.  Glancing back, she gasped.

	Several chunks of shattered temple parts were flying in her general direction.

	Beating her wings harder, Rainbow Dash rocketed herself into the nearest corridor, evading the impacting pieces of granite by a hair's breadth.



	Bellesmith and Eagle Eye weren't quite so lucky.  They clung precariously to the balcony's ledge, a ledge that was growing increasingly fractured with each millisecond.  Several hulking bits of granite struck all around them, causing the cracks and fissures to spread further.

	Belle's grip was slipping.  Her rear legs dangled into the rainy air.  "EE...!" she began shrieking.

	Breathless, Eagle Eye glanced at the fractured chunk of marble beneath them.  With a grunt, he stabbed his sword straight into the material, anchoring himself in place.  "Grab ahold of me!"

	The mare complied without hesitation.  Within two seconds of hugging him from behind, the piece of granite they were on cracked completely, breaking off from the rest of the structure.  With a combined yelp, the two plunged loose into the deathly winds with Eagle Eye clinging to the shard with his one sword.



	"Unnngh!"  Ebon Mane tumbled across the engine room floor and slammed into a wall for the umpteenth time.  The Noble Jury had finished another plummeting rotation.  "Grnnngh... Floydien!  There's gotta be a way to fly us straight!"

	Silence came from the intercom.  All was rattling bulkheads and sparks.

	Ebon's sweaty face glistened in the lavender light.  "Mr. Fl-Floydien...?!"

	More silence.

	Panicking, he crawled across the turbulent aircraft's interior and fought to swing the door to the navigation room open.  "Zaid!  I-I think we have a problem—"

	"Scrkkkk!  Don't I know it, Burgundude!""

	Ebon's eyes twitched.  He tilted his ears towards the intercom.  "Zaid...?!"



	"More like Scaredy McCrapMySaddle at the moment!" The ex-cultist grunted, his hooves gripping the cockpit controls tight.  "Do a sexy bachelor a favor and rush into the observation room and make sure Kera's still doing the Safety Swing!"

	"What happened to Floydien?!"

	"Oh, y'know..."  Zaid stammered, his wide-eyes locked on the chaos in front of him.  "What spits up must spit down.  As for me..."

	Beyond the windshield, all was tornados and loose building shrapnel.

	Zaid whimpered, "A little glad you didn't cook me brunch like I asked earlier."  Gulping a dollop of bile down, he clenched his jaw and swerved hard with the controls.  "Hold on!  Things are about to get really kaizo!"



	Caught in a murderous clock-wise spin through the maelstrom, the Noble Jury nevertheless managed to gain altitude under Zaid's novice ministrations.  It was a good thing too, for it narrowly threaded between two halves of loosely twirling temple parts before veering its way around a pair of shimmering obelisks.

	A trio of temples collided overhead, sending waves of dust and gravel into the air.  The rocky pits violently pelted the ship's bow, covering the front face with dents and cracking the windshield in several places.  Gnashing his teeth, Zaid guided the rocking ship along its cyclonic path, mindful of three ginormous boulders sailing down at him from the lofty collision.

	With a burst of steam, the Noble Jury twirled, its hull and crimson skystone gleaming with rain water.  Against the backdrop of lightning flashes, its sleek body plowed through the dust and spiraled safely around the three huge shards falling towards it.  As thunder rolled, the vessel ascended briskly through the cacophonous tempest, leveling out to a considerably less hazardous altitude, and yet still forced to orbit the heart of the chaotic storm.

	Far down below...



	...Belle and Eagle Eye plummeted through the flickering squall, surrounded on all sides by rain, temples, and the scattering pieces of temples.  In the haze of an enchanted obelisk streaking by, they saw swirling bands of debris knifing their way directly below.  The rock that they were on plunged on a suicidal course towards the mess.

	"Eagle—!"

	The stallion was already jerking his head about.  He saw a large structure looming to their right.

	"Hold tight!"  Eagle shoutted, then gritted his teeth while his horn shimmered like a beacon.

	Belle's wet mane flounced.  She gasped, realizing that they had slowed in their descent.  She looked down to see that the rock they were on was encased in lavender energy.

	Eagle hissed, his forehead scrunched in agony.  Nevertheless, he succeeded in forcing the rock's fall into a diagonal glide, headed straight for the solid two-story platform to their side.

	"Almost there, EE..."  Belle sputtered against the rain and thunder.  She wrapped her forelimbs around him while he clung to the embedded sword.  "Just a little f-further..."

	"Ghhnngh... mmmff..."  Eagle Eye's face contorted in pain.  Blood trickled out of his ears as his entire body trembled beneath Belle's grip.  His horn flickered, starting to short out.

	At last, they were so close that they could hear the rattle of hailstones against the temple's roof.

	"Guhhh!"  Eagle's body went limp—so did the rock they were on.

	Th-Thud!  The ponies' rock collapsed on the edge of the roof and went sliding across the wet surface.  The couple slumped like ragdolls in opposite direction, catching their waterlogged breaths while the storm raged above them.

	"Eagle Eye... that was incredible..."  Belle stood up on weak knees.  "Are you okay?!"  She flashed him a worried look, having to speak below the booming thunder.  "Your leylines would have fried your nervous system at the rate that you were—"

	Eagle Eye couldn't hear her; he was too busy gasping.  Behind Belle's figure, an obelisk glided icily donwards from the storm's heights.  It carried with it a massive temple on a collision course with the structure they had landed on.

	"Eagle Eye...?" Bellesmith stammered, her face full of concern.  Th-Thap!  A shield flew into her chest and she grabbed it with two forelimbs.  "Ooof!"

	"Nnnngh!"  Eagle Eye rushed forward, spun, and bucked her clear off the rooftop with two rear legs.

	Belle fell back into the hurricane winds, shrieking.

	Eagle twirled and flung his forehead over the roof's edge, aiming his horn at her body.  With adrenalized concentration, the petite unicorn enchanted the shield in her grasp, pushing it—and her—in a cascading glide towards a lonely temple floating safely below.

	Once he had pushed her with enough force, Eagle backed up, his lavender body covered by the shadow of the immense temple plummeting towards him.  Panting, he limped towards the opposite end and yanked his sword out of the loose rock along the way.  Eagle then broke into a desperate gallop, sliding at random as his hooves fought for traction on the roof's slick service.

	Seconds later, the gliding temple struck, tearing the second story of the platform into shreds, five meters per second.  A wall of sundered rock and debris trailed Eagle Eye, catching up to the unicorn with murderous speed.  With nowhere else to go, the ex-mercenary scampered towards the end, eyed a flimsy platform hovering far below, and jumped with a desperate shout.



	"Ooommf!"  Bellesmith landed atop the temple where she had been heroically thrown.  The shield slipped from her grasp and rattled to a stop in the nearby puddles.  Grunting, the mare stirred in pain, attempting to push herself back onto her hooves.

	She heard a loud blast—but it was too close and localized to be thunder.

	With wide eyes, Belle swung her watersoaked head skyward.  All she saw of the two colliding temples was an explosion of gigantic rock chunks—the largest blast since the chaos began.  Violent granite projectiles flew in every direction, carried aloft by the winds to the furthest parts of the maelstrom.

	"Eagle Eye!" she howled, tearful and shivering.

	Up above, three or four of the loose temple parts sailed like cannonballs towards the circular structure at the heart of Stratopolis.



	Inside the survivors' hold, the many ponies wobbled on their hooves.  Distant explosions sent deep reverberations through the building's frame, causing the bricklaid corridors to quiver, raining dust down on Xonan and Ledomaritan skulls alike.

	"Kala'skunnen thiulen rannas'alabien threatta!" Arcshod stammered.

	"What was all that?!" Props squeaked.  "Are we being fired at?!"

	"That's not cannonfire," Seclorum muttered, his graying face hard and grim.  "This whole floating city is going to Hell."

	Aatxe shuddered.  "Then she was too late.  She couldn't get to the control room in time..."

	"Let's not give up hope!" Prowse exclaimed with a frown.  "She and the fat horse went off to do something about it, didn't they?!  Have some bloody faith!"  He turned towards the rubble.  "Mr. Zebra sir..."

	Pilate was limping across the shaking floor, feeling with his hooves until he found a pair of curled forelimbs.  "Elma...?"  He crawled over, shaking her exoskeleton.  "Miss Boreal, please, you have to calm down..."

	"Nothing..."  The changeling whimpered, its eye sockets fuming with tiny puffs of green smoke.  "It's all n-nothing..."  Fangs clattered as it hid its face from the blind stallion.  "I loved them... I loved them all... m-my children..."

	"Then focus on them!"  Pilate insisted, shaking her frame.  "Find your center!  Don't slip any further!"

	"What's the p-point...?!"  Elma squeaked.  "None of the memories are real!  I'm... I'm useless..."

	"You're real!"  Pilate snarled.  "And nopony is useless, do you hear me?!  Don't give into the pawn they made you to be!"

	"But... but..."

	"Listen!"  Aatxe gasped, bracing himself against a torchlit wall.  "Do you hear that?!"

	Everypony froze in place, craning their necks to the air.  Lasairfion tilted her horn about while her close subjects shivered.

	Arcshod was the first to gasp.  "Xon!"

	"Incoming!"  Seclorum shouted above the sound of a rising, deathly whistle.  "Brace yourselves—"

	Less than a second later, the floor exploded with a splash of bricks.  A chunk of granite ripped its way through like a giant dagger, piercing the ceiling above.  Before anypony could register the sound of their own shrieks, a second chunk of granite impacted a few feet away, knocking ponies onto their flanks.

	Then, with horrific swiftness, those same chunks of temple-rock receded, flooding the compartment with howling wind and rainwater.  The low pressure sucked air out from the hold, and all manner of objects flew into the gaping, gray-lit abyss.  Stallions and mares shrieked as they slid helplessly towards the new opening.  Earth ponies grabbed whoever they could while unicorns telekinetically tugged the remaining victims.  With manic teamwork, everypony was successfully whisked away from the calamity, everypony except—

	"Pilate!"  Props shouted, clinging to a column of brick and mortar.

	The zebra in question clung to a chunk of debris from where the hallway had collapsed earlier.  He wasn't alone.  The shapeshifter-that-was-Elma huddled beside him, its gossamer wings beating in the billowing vacuum of air.  With a resounding cry, the changeling tried climbing further up the damaged wall—but failed.  It slipped, tumbled backwards, and plowed into Pilate's side.

	"Ooof!"  The blind stallion's grip broke off a chunk of debris.  He tumbled once, rolled twice, and fell straight through the hole, disappearing like a striped pebble into the hurricane winds below.

	"Pilate!"  Props screamed, her eyes streaming with tears.  She lunged forward, only to be pulled back by Prowse's one-legged grip.  "Nnngh!  No!  Unky Prowsy!  Not h-him!"

	"I'm so sorry, Propsicle!"  Prowse held her tight while Seclorum and Aatxe yanked the two of them back to safety, away from the gaping hole.  "I'm so sorry..."

	Props struggled and fought, ultimately lying limp in her uncle's grip as she sobbed indecipherably against the deafening gale.



	The large building shook, throwing Rainbow's flight off course.

	She grunted as her body was thrown into one wall and then another.  Flapping her wings, she struggled for balance, then continued her speeding flight up the zig-zagging hallways.

	Frowning into the glow of her pendant, she ascended the final granite slope.  The gray light of the central control room loomed ahead.  With rigid feathers, she angled her wings and sped forward like a bullet towards her destination.



	
	Hard raindrops.  Knifing from every direction.

	Pilate's flesh was too numb to register the pain.  Once the blood rushing through his head had localized, he realized he was still alive.  The sensation was brief, replaced instead by the altogether vomitous sense of weightlessness.

	He was still falling.

	"Gnnngh... Sp-Spark...!"

	His hooves bucked and thrashed, as if searching for an earth to gallop on.

	"I c-can't... I don't..."

	Images flashed through the darkness, visions of a life lived before the veil.  Sunny skies and desert plains and purple twilight lingering beyond propeller blades of a Ledomaritan airship.

	But none of these sights warmed his cold, panicked heart.  His ears twitched against the lull of gravity, and for the briefest of moments he felt the warm breath of her once-loving voice.

	His gray eyes closed, squeezing tears out into the wind and howl.

	"...I love you so much..."

	Almost instantly, a whistling noise shot straight towards him.

	Pilate gasped, for he was no longer falling.  He was dangling.  Blood rushed into hanging legs, then rolled back into his upper body.  He felt a cold pair of hooves around his upper shoulders.  Trembling, Pilate reached one hoof up and felt the shell of his savior, feeling the porous holes collecting rainwater.

	"...M-Miss Boreal?"

	Right then, he was dropped.

	"Gaaah!"  He fell again—but this time for three feet.  "Ooof!"  He rolled across what felt like a water-slick surface.

	Rainwater pitter-pattered on all sides of him.  The thuds of colliding temples lessened and lessened, giving way to the calm roll of distant thunder.

	Pilate pushed against the smooth granite surface, standing up straight as he felt the wind shifting around him.  The sound of dragonfly wings flitted in a curved path, then settled to a stop just a few feet ahead.

	"Elma...?"  He gulped and fumbled forward, slipping almost immediately on a shallow puddle.  "Unngh!  Guh..."  Panting, he nevertheless stood up once more.  "Elma... please..."

	A shuffling noise.  Then silence.  Then the dragonfly wings flitted again.

	"Elma!"  Pilate yelped.  He shuffled forward, galloped forward.  "Elma!  Don't leave!  You helped me!  Let me help you!"

	It was too late.  The sound was gone, swallowed up by cyclonic noise and precipitation.

	Pilate realized there was no telling when the platform ended.  He skidded to a stop, slipping and falling on his haunches.  He sat—hyperventilating—in the wet, wet darkness.  "Elma...?!"

	Nothing.

	"R-Rainbow?!  Rainbow Dash?!"

	More nothing.

	Pilate gnashed his teeth, collapsing on bent knees as he sputtered and howled, "Somepony!  Anypony!  Please...!"

	His voice took on a growling tone, then collapsed into angry, frustrated bellows as he collapsed in the rain water, lost in the storm.

	Useless.



	Swooosh!

	Rainbow Dash flew the last few meters between her and the innermost control room of the building.  When she emerged upon the refracted light of stained glass dome above, she came to a stop in mid-air, gasping.

	Beyond the tomb of Commander Hurricane, the floor of the compartment was littered with broken staves.  What's more, the black enchanted shards on their tips had been smashed to crystalline dust.

	Flying in the center of the room was a blue pegasus with a spectral mane, and she was presently in the process of moving the last remaining rod, then bucking it down the center.  Crack!  She immediately plopped down and crushed the very last glowing shard with her hooves.  Once that was done, she tilted her face up, staring across the room with ruby eyes.

	Rainbow's muzzle hung agape.

	The doppelganger gazed back.  Its eyes scanned Rainbow Dash up and down, before narrowing in concentration.  Then, with bursts of green flame, a Loyalty Pendant and a midnight blue saddlebag appeared on its body.  The pegasus smiled.

	Rainbow gritted her teeth.  She flapped her wings and angled her body to tackle the imposter from afar.  However, at the last second, something moved in her peripheral vision.  Rainbow froze in place, then tilted her head to the side.

	There were twice as many pegasus corpses lying at the barricade behind her.  In a blink, the bodies leapt up, gliding towards her on dragonfly wings.

	"Ooof!"  Rainbow Dash was speared from behind.  Two changelings shoved her to the control room floor, shoving her past shattered granite blocks that had collided during the time it took for her to speed her way there.  "Grrrr-Raaaugh!"  She bucked the shape-shifters off of her and kipped up to her hooves.

	More and more bodies flew in, dropping camouflage as they leapt off the walls, ceiling panels, and barricades of the place.  Suddenly, Rainbow Dash was surrounded by no less than four dozen changelings, all of them slashing at her with jagged forelimbs and nipping with glistening fangs.

	"Hnnngh!  Grnngh!  Get off!  Get off, you smelly jerkroaches!"  Rainbow bucked and thrashed and shook with all her might, but they had effectively piled up on her, converting their forelimbs into long segmented pinchers that bound her limbs in place.  "Guhhhhh!  Hrkkk!"  She panted and sweated, pinned helplessly to the floor.  The veritable shell of insectoid equines buzzed all around her with intermittently flitting wings.  She felt a shadow looming over her exposed face, and she looked up.

	The other Rainbow Dash hovered low, the shadows of its fuzzy face darkening as it sneered at the captured prey.  "Shhhh... Mother needs her secret weapon delivered to the Twilight Lands..."  It converted its right forelimb into a razor-sharp scythe of curved ivory.  "...and you're going to be its key, even if we have to carve it out of your chest."

	Rainbow Dash's lips quivered.  "M-Mother...?"

	"Don't worry," the other her said, lowering the blade to Rainbow's chest.  "Your consciousness will rest lovingly in her embrace forever, as will the memories of your dead friends—"  This sentence came to an abrupt end, as did the changeling's skull.  A bright yellow beam sailed in from the room's edge, instantly decapitating the shape-shifter with a splatter of green slime.  The rest of the thing's corpse fell to the ground, twitching and writhing until its onyx legs curled up to its glossy chest.

	Rainbow sputtered, her eyes darting to the far edge of the room.

	Six figures in dark robes and silver masks stormed in from a barricaded hallway.  At the front, Razzar scurried on four limbs, then purched atop Hurricane's tomb.  The thin spaces around his mask and sleeve glowed with amber light as he shouted, "Neutralize and contain, brothers!"

	The air lit up with yellow manafire.

	Shrieking, the ball of changelings leapt off Rainbow's body like baby spiders fleeing a nest.  Over ten of them dropped instantly, their bodies blasted to slimy ribbons by the Lounge's gunfire.  The rest scattered in every direction, flying too swiftly for even the expert agents to target.  Spreading apart, they fled down separate hallways, disappearing into the depths of the building.

	"Nnnngh... mmmff..."  Rainbow Dash stood up on wobbly legs, rubbing the shallow cut the doppelganger had started to make in her sensitive chest.  "Holy crud on a crud bike..."  She panted and panted, smiling nervously in the Lounge's direction.  As Razzar walked over, she smiled awkwardly.  "I never thought I'd be happy to see you guys—"

	Razzar flicked his wrist.  A five-digit hand produced a yellow rod which he shoved straight into Rainbow's Neck.  The mare's rainbow mane stood on end as she experienced a severe electrical shock.

	"G-g-g-g-g-grkkk!"  Rainbow's ruby eyes rolled back, and she fell hard to the ground.  Whump!  She twitched, her vision growing fuzzy upon the virge of unconsciousness.

	"Check her," Razzar's voice hissed through his mask.  "If she's one of them, you know what to do.  The rest of you, secure the perimeter.  Lay out manaflares and shoot anything that moves."

	"Guhhhh..."  Rainbow twitched once, twice, then saw nothing but black.
		//------------------------------//
		// Zaid Spins You Right Round		//------------------------------//

	Struggling to catch his breath, Ebon Mane trudged out of the Noble Jury's engine room and limped through navigation.  He had to hop over a flood of books and maps that had fallen off their various shelves from the ship's numerous rolls.  At last, he made it to the base of the vertical crawlspace right before the observation room.

	"Floydien!"  As the ship veered at a slight angle with regular turbulence, the earth pony knelt low and stirred the elk's upper body.  "Mr. Floydien, say something!  Anything!  'Spit this' and 'spit that!'  Come on!"

	The elk lay silent, his antlers dim and his limbs still.

	"Nnnngh..."  Ebon hissed through clenched teeth.  "Darn it... darn it!"  He leaned over, pressing an ear to Floydien's chest.  After a few blinks, he exhaled with relief.  Nevertheless, he sat up and muttered in a low tone, "He's out cold.  Worst timing, too..."

	"Scrkkkk!"  The intercom in the observation room crackled to life.  "Where the heck are ya, Burgundbro?  Did the engine room blow up or something?!"

	With a gasping breath, Ebon tripped over Floydien, floundered through the doorway, an entered the gray-lit chamber.  The bubbled windows splashed refracted light all over his body from the waves of rain pelting against the glass.  "Gnnngh!"  Lunging forward, he slapped his hoof towards an intercom hanging high along a bulkhead.  "Wish I was flippin' taller... or had wings."  At last, his hoof made contact.  "Hello?!  Zaid?!"

	"Hey!  You're alive!  Zippo!  Where in the heck are you?"

	"Uhm... the observation room!" Ebon shouted.  The stallion stared pensively out the windows, watching as waves and waves of obelisks and temple debris streaked past the port and starboard sides of the cruising manaship.  "How'd you get us flying even?!  That's incredible—"

	"Crkkk!  Never mind that crap!  Check on Little Comatose Annie!"

	"Huh?!"

	"Kera!"  Zaid's voice barked.  "Is the little squirt still squirting?"

	Ebon rushed towards a thick hammock.  His eyes bulged, for the thing had twisted around itself four times.  Nervous, he unraveled the thing and spread the pillows piled within.  Kera's limp figure lay inside.  Her nostrils flared while her eyes twitched somewhat.

	He exhaled with, "She's okay!"  A gulp, and then, "As okay as ever, I guess."

	"Hot damn!  I told Bellesmith I'd kinda-sorta keep her alive.  I'd hate for my track record as a nanny to be ruined on day one."

	"Zaid, I... I think Mr. Floyd is hurt badly," Ebon said, glancing nervously at the elk as the ship continued its speeding course.  "It's hard to tell, exactly.  He's lying dead as a doornail."

	"But is he deader than a doornail?  Or, y'know, dead—dead?"

	"No, thank goodness!"  Ebon nodded, then trotted out to shout up the crawlspace.  "And thank goodness you took the controls of the ship!"

	"Yeah, well, don't thank me yet!" Zaid's clear voice shouted down.



	The stallion tilted his sweating face up towards the hurricane mess beyond.  He winced, having to jerk the controls slightly left and right to avoid bits of floating and wind-blown debris along his cyclonic path.

	"We're caught in a crazy-ass circle!  It's taking all of my concentration just to avoid crashing into something!"

	"Well, how about getting us out of this 'crazy-ass circle?'"

	"Are you kidding me?!" Zaid shouted once more over his shoulder.  "I was never allowed to pilot any of the Herald's ships!  All I know from airshipping is from watching other ponies do it—and only half the times sober!"

	"Well, what can you do?!"

	"Keep us alive by flying at this regular velocity!"  Zaid exclaimed.  "Landing on one of the surviving temples?  That's a whole 'nother situation altogether.  I mean, I could try, but odds are we'd all blow chunks out our stomach after the hulls of Floydien's Nancy Jane blow shrapnel chunks into us!"

	"And if we slow down..."

	"...then we become mince meat in these winds!  I dunno how much you can see from the observation room, but this is like trying to swim a fly—"  He had to grunt and jerk the controllers in time to avoid a flying piece of a shattered airship.  With a shudder, he exhaled, "—through an alphabet soup of death!"

	"Well, with Floydien down for the count and the others unaccounted for—"

	"Look, all I can do right now is keep us in one piece!" Zaid exclaimed.  "Whatever went down in that doom-and-gloom temple, we owe it to the rest of the Jurists to keep our one single piece of transportation intact!  Maybe—I dunno—they can shut the magic wind muscle down from the inside out or something!  Whatever the case, I'm sure it's going to involve Rainbow Dash and a whole lot of flank kicking!"

	"What if she's dead?!"

	"Then, buddy, I hope you can cook a good last meal."



	Ebon Mane sighed, bowing his head towards the floor of the crawlspace where Floydien lay.

	"Right... read you loud and clear," the earth pony mumbled.

	"I'd rather you read Rainbow Dash loud and clear!" Zaid's voice rang down.  "I've got my hooves full!  I need you to—"

	"Keep an eye on the Engine Room?"

	"You've been around Blondie long enough to know a lick of sense in that department, sure, but couldja at least try spamming our friends' sound stones?"

	Ebon nodded and galloped briskly back towards the stern while the ship veered and rattled. "On it!"

	"Try and get them to respond!" Zaid's voice rang.  "I'd give everything to know that they're still sexy!  Also alive!  But mostly the sexy part!"

	Meanwhile, Ebon scrambled his way back into the engine room.  Keeping an eye on the flickering lavender tome, he slapped a hoof over Props' communications array and spoke into the quivering mic.  "Rainbow Dash!  Pilate!  Josho!  Is anypony there?!"  He fidgeted, bit his lip, the stammered, "Eagle Eye?  If you can hear me... we'd really like to hear back from you right now..."



	The Noble Jury glided in and out of cloud cover, hurling itself against the howling winds.

	Josho saw this from a distance as he struggled to slide his obese self down the sloped rooftop of the circular building.

	"Hey..."  He waved his forelimb.  "Hey!"  He waved both legs.  "Heeeeeeeeeey!  Crack a window and take a look, ya melon fudges!  We need some pick-ups!"

	The stallion's cries were left unheard.  The familiar skystone ship blurred on, stuck in its clockwise rotation as it disappeared beyond the frames of half-destroyed temples and obelisks..

	"Hrnnngh..."  Josho's nostrils flared.  Using his shotgun like a staff, he slid himself the rest of the way down the domed roof.  "I swear, I need an airbag for how many dayum times my life hits the bedrock of Hell."

	Something soared straight past him, too quiet to be a granite shard, too light to be a normal pony.  Josho heard the flitting of gossamer wings, and then wind once more.

	He paused, looking up the roof from which he came.  Rain pelted his coat, sending rivulets of water dribbling off his horn and muzzle.

	After a sputtering breath, he returned to his task.  "One of these days, I wanna have a death-defying adventure at a beach resort."  And, with a grunt, he jumped down to the rubble-strewn balcony below.
		//------------------------------//
		// Skip, Skip to the Lounge		//------------------------------//

    “Mmmmfff…”  Rainbow’s muzzle stirred as she lay on her side across the granite floor.  “Gnngh… don’t… d-don’t stick around here for too long… it’s t-too dangerous…”  Her tail flicked as her eyelids stirred.  “Mmmmff… so what?  Leave the hair clip on, Gold Petals.  It looks fine…”

    A five-finger’d gloved hand raised her hoof to a blade, then sliced a tiny slit in her flesh.

    “Aaaaugh!”  Rainbow Dash shot up, bucking the cloaked body off her.  “Friggin’ stop it, ya melon--Oh.”  Her ears drooped from where she hovered.  “It’s you guys.”

    Razzar stared at the red blood dripping off his blade, then tilted his mask up towards her.  ”Do you realize what you’ve done?” his voice crackled through a grimacing mouthpiece.

    “Ugh… yeah…”  Rainbow Dash brought her hoof up to her mouth and suckled on the shallow cut.  “Had another friggin’ dream about a blonde.”

    Other Lounge members strolled behind him, examining the lengths of the rubble-strewn control room while their leader leered up in her face.  ”Well, this is no ordinary nightmare you’ve caught us all in!  Because of your arrogance, you’ve endangered your crew and mine!  Now we’re stuck in a purgatorial place with no chance of--”

    “Whoah whoah whoah whoah whoah!”  Rainbow Dash frowned, waving her hooves.  “Hold the sound stone, buddy!  All I wanted to do was protect my friends--”

    ”From what?!”  Razzar’s suit glowed brighter in the seams around his mask.  ”You had an imposter with you the entire time!  A treacherous fiend whom you should have given up to our custody when we asked--”

    “You knew, didn’t you?!”  Rainbow Dash frowned.  “The way you came rushing in, zapping all those bug-ponies off my back like it was regular hunting season?!  You knew that Prowse was a changeling the whole time!”

    “It did not change the fact that he was wanted by several concerned parties throughout the Wastes--”

    “The least you could have done was friggin’ told us instead of being all mystifying and threatening from the get-go, pal!”  Rainbow jerked.  “No, I take tht back!  The least you could have done was not chased us with pew pew death lasers into the storm!”

    ”You gave us no choice.”

    “Like you gave us one?!”  Rainbow Dash’s voice cracked.  She bucked at a crumbled piece of stone with a grunt.  “Grrgggh!  I swear!  Is Equestria the only land to warm-blooded creatures of sense?!”

    To that, Razzar merely sighed.  A device attached to his belt flickered, and he tapped it with a pointed finger.  ”What’s your report, Vaughan?”

    A deep voice crackled on the other end.  ”I’m still having difficulty with the skystone core, Razzar.  In theory, I could utilize a lightning rod to channel some electricity into the engine, but that will depend on both time and luck.”

    Razzar nodded.  ”We appear to be in short supply of either.”

    ”Then I will have to work with great diligence.”

    ”Do your best, brother.  We are depending on you.”

    ”Understood.  Vaughan out.”

    Once the frequency ended, another Lounge from the fringes of the room turned towards the leader.  ”No sign of the shape shifters, Razzar,” he hissed beneath his mask.  ”Knowing them, they could be blending in with the walls and floor.”

    Rainbow’s ruby eyes bugged.  “They can do that?”

    Razzar ignored her, turning instead to the other figure.  “Load extra crystal charges into your rifles, brothers.  We’ll have to perform manasweeps of the hallways as we make our exit.  Alternate rifles so that we can equally conserve our ammo.”

    ”Yes, Razzar.”

    “Wait wait…”  Rainbow Dash squinted.  “The heck are you guys planning?”

    Razzar turned towards her.  ”Nothing, thanks to you.  We’ve never been inside the eye of the storm before, for fear of how inescapably turbulent the winds are.  The act of sabotage you did on our vessel stalled it on one of the lower temples.  We were lucky not to be in one of the structures destroyed recently by the shape-shifting hoard.  Until our engineer Vaughan can get the skystone drive back online, we are stranded here--and even then we have no guarantee that the winds won’t slice the hull of our ship to ribbons.”

    “What do you mean you’ve ‘never been inside the eye of the storm before?’”  Rainbow blinked.  “Did you know about this place too?!”

    ”We know enough about it to realize it’s a dangerous, inescapable trap.”

    “Balls to that!”  Rainbow frowned.  “Stratopolis has claimed dozens upon dozens of airships for nearly two decades!  I’m willing to bet that most of them happened on your watch, bucko!”

    ”Call this place whatever you wish,” Razzar said.  ”We have endeavored to protect the passengers of the Strait to the best of our ability.”

    “Pffftchyaa… and what a fine job you’ve been doing at it, too!”

    ”A job that will be accomplished by no one now that you have thrown your crew and mine into jeopardy!”

    “What?!”  Rainbow rolled her eyes.  “For crying out loud!  If you had just had the good sense to--”

    ”It matters little.”  Razzar trotted past her, eying the tomb of Commander Hurricane through his mask.  ”Perhaps this turn of events was somehow predestined.”  He tilted his head up towards the rain-slick stained glass above.  ”Judging from both the architecture and the corpses that define this place, it would seem as if it has a common connection with you.”

    “Just what are you going on about?”

    With a jagged finger, Razzar pointed at the corpses along the barricades, then at Rainbow Dash.  ”Winged ponies.  If you ask me, it is too much of a coincidence.”

    “That’s a freaky trend I’m noticing a lot lately,” Rainbow Dash said with a wary gaze.  “What’s it to you?”

    ”Must I state the obvious?  Your group and mine have our differences, but there’s a far more dangerous threat that needs to be met.  As much as I hesitate to suggest it, working together is our best option.”

    “And what makes you think I can trust you?”

    ”Please…”  His voice hissed as his gloved hands formed dual fists.  ”I am risking enough by even suggesting I put a fraction of my brothers’ lives into your hooves.  As chaotic as this place may look, it stands to reason that somewhere inside is a key to controlling it and the weather around it.  And now that I find that you may have some connection with the ponies who populated this place before…”

    Rainbow simply hovered in place, her muzzle clamped shut.

    Vapors exhaled out of the yellow light of Razzar’s suit.  ”Perhaps there are others surviving in this place who would be more willing to assist us?”

    Rainbow flew down, glaring at his level.  “What are the odds that you chased them in here as well?”

    “Not as slim as our chances of surviving separately.”

    “Heh…”  Rainbow Dash smirked.  “Why is it that I feel that’s the only honest thing you’ve told me since I woke up?”

    ”Would you rather deal with the shape shifters?”  Razzar cocked his neck.  ”And on your own?”

    Rainbow Dash bit her lip, avoiding his masked gaze.

    ”I would give anything for the sanctity of my crew,” Razzar said.  ”We’ve both seen what can happen to a pony as strong as you on your own.  Please, at least let me help you reunite with them, and then we can work out a plan from there.”

    Rainbow Dash took a deep breath, then hovered closer to the ceiling.  ”Fine. But only because I’m worried over their safety more than anything.”

    ”As I’m sure you do,” Razzar droned coolly.

    Rainbow squinted at him, then cleared her throat.  “It’s a nasty journey to the Hold where most of the survivors are hanging tight.  I’ll take you there, but it’s up to them if whether or not they’ll shake… uh… hands with you.”

    ”Perfectly understood.”

    “And it’s not gonna be an easy trip on foot,” she said, flapping her wings for emphasis.  “Just saying…”

    ”I do believe we can adapt.”  The speaker in his mask clicked as he turned and gestured towards his cohorts.  In perfect synchronization, all six Lounge members pressed a button on their wristbands.  The backs of their cloaks flared out, revealing twin shafts that vented out yellow manadust.  With a low hissing sound, the six figures levitated side by side.

    Rainbow Dash blinked, then sighed.  “Now I know why all the pegasi outside Equestria died off…”  She frowned and floated down the nearest corridor, followed by the Lounge.  “They all got shown up by freakjobs.”

		//------------------------------//
		// Ah, Crap, Not This Game		//------------------------------//

	"I think..."  Aatxe shuddered, leaning just far enough to stare into the gaping holes that the impacting temple shards had made with the floor of the building's lower hold.  "I-I think the worst is over with."  He turned and gazed at the other survivors.  "The structures have stopped colliding with one another."

	Arcshod glanced warily at the rest.  "Gil'sanna kiulem messa threatta k'neen?"

	Seclorum shook his head.  "There's no way to tell.  Maybe she got to the control room, or maybe the shape shifters just stopped the chaos themselves."

	"What about the Tarkington?" Prowse asked from where he stood far from the invading winds, holding a distraught Props close.  "Is the wee temple holding that ship still intact?"

	"Believe me, I wish I knew," Aatxe muttered.  "But I can't see it from this angle to be able to tell."

	"Maybe if we sent somepony to the surface, then?"  Prowse remarked.  "Took a gander from the balcony?"

	"Blaa'kensiel!"  Arcshod frowned.  "Yul'henna thiulen drenna trennde!"

	"He's right," Aatxe sighed.  "The game has changed.  With the arrival of this pegasus, the changelings are one step closer to acquiring something."

	"And what's that, exactly?" Prowse asked.

	"I'm not sure," Seclorum grumbled.  "But I certainly do not wish to find out."

	"Hraak suun veel!" a Xonan warrior shouted from where he and two Ledomaritans were rummaging through the nearby rubble.  "Rekk theem laak seen, Arcshod Xon-Nagu'n!"

	"Jaat'sanna klehm!"  Arcshod hollered back, gesturing with a hoof.  "Ree'nostra threnna seemh!"

	"What... wh-what's going on?" Props murmured through quivering lips.

	"Seems as though the most recent shakedown loosened the rubble blocking the hallway, lassie," Prowse said as his one forelimb stroked her mane.  "We might actually have a way out of here."

	Props gulped.  "Or they might have a way in."

	Almost immediately, the stallions around the rubble backed up, shouting in mixed tongue.

	Xonans forced Lasairfion to back up to a safe distance.  Meanwhile, Seclorum and Arcshod levitated crossbows and immediately galloped towards the hallway.  They aimed through the fresh niche formed in the corridor.

	"Freeze!"  Seclorum bellowed, squinting down the sight of his weapon.  "Not another move!"

	"Oh, for crying out loud..."  Josho grumbled, his glowing horn illuminating his obese figure in the middle of the bricklaid passage.  "Look, Secchy, it's me!  I'm back from the party upstairs."  With a shuddering breath, he limped forward.  "Have any of you melon fudges seen Rainbow Dash yet—?"

	Thwifft!—PING!  A crossbolt embedded into the mortar just an inch from Josho's left hoof, freezing him in place.

	Seclorum snarled while reloading his crossbow.  "Not.  Another.  Step."

	"Dammit, Secchy!  It's me!"  Frowning, Josho pointed at his glowing horn.  "I'm doing magic, see?!  Real unicorn right here!"

	"Kenn'astra lemmehn trennda'dren," Arcshod hissed.

	"What's he vomiting about?!"

	"Changelings can mimic unicorn magic," Seclorum said.  "They are what they become.  It won't fool anypony."

	"Because I'm not trying to fool anypony, Secchy!"  Josho growled.  "If I was a shapeshifter, would I do something as deliberately stupid as march straight down here to greet you guys?!"

	"My old friend wasn't one for winning spelling bees," Seclorum said, crossbow trained.  "That could easily be mimicked as well."

	"Unngh!  Fine."  Josho frowned and gestured with a hoof.  "Twenty-two years ago, back in our station at Blue Chasm, you and I started a yearly contest that we didn't tell anypony about—"

	"Let me guess..."  Aatxe strolled up, squinting down the corridor at the supposed stallion.  "You drank a bunch of rum and saw who could urinate into the ravine the farthest?"

	Josho did a double-take.  "How did you—?!"

	"Because a changeling shaped like you tried that on us over a year ago," Seclorum said.  "And if something that obscure is committed to the hive mind, then there's no trusting anything that you have to dredge from our collective memory."  The old stallion exhaled heavily.  "Nice try..."

	"Damn it to Spark's abyss, what do I have to do to convince you I'm harmless?!"

	"You can start by trotting back the way you came..."

	"Secchy, I'd be insect food if I stay out there!  At least tell me if Rainbow Dash made it back or not!"

	"Rainbow Dash?!"  Props craned her neck.  "Josho, did you see her—Mmmfff!"

	Prowse shook his head, holding a hoof over her mouth.  "Best not to be barkin' up this tree, lassie."

	"Mmmmmffff!"

	"Alright... Okay!  Josho waved his forelimbs.  "The blood test, right?  Toss me a knife."

	"Just leave and don't come back."

	"Nuts to that!  Toss me a dagger!  I'll do the damned blood test—"

	A voice grumbled from the shadows, "I bet you would want to get ahold of something to gut them with, ya filthy creep."

	Josho spun around.  With a gasp, he levitated his shotgun by his side.

	Josho stood several feet away, already training his identical manaweapon.  As soon as the other obese stallion floated his shotgun, he looked at his double in shock.  "Oh, come the buck on!  How's that even possible?!"

	"You're not fooling anypony, bugjob!"  The first Josho exclaimed.  "I got here first!  Everypony saw it, freak!"

	"Oh, no."  The second rolled his eyes.  "We are not even remotely doing this crap!"

	"Then let me have it!"  The first glared down the barrel of his boomstick.  "Splatter my bug guts all across the walls of this floating turdtropolis!"

	The second gnashed his teeth.  "Don't tempt me.  From this angle I'd hit Secchy and the others."

	"Hah!"  The first smiled devilishly.  "That's a cute trick!"

	"Well, I don't see what's holding you back!"

	"I have a better idea..." a voice crackled from further up the hall.  "Let us shoot you both."

	Both Joshos turned to look.  Streams of bright yellow mana flew across the dark corridor, consuming them both.  There was a stifled scream, followed by the splash of hot fluids across the wall.  Seclorum and Arcshod ducked for cover while the survivors inside the Hold gasped and fled with fright.

	Razzar and two other Lounge members stood, firingly wildly down the hall.

	"Dang it, no!  Stop!"  Rainbow Dash plowed them over from behind, knocking their weapons to the floor.  "Are you friggin' crazy?!"  She hovered up, gazing with horror down the corridor.  "Josho!"

	As the smoke cleared, Rainbow spotted a single black body, half-melted and leaking green juices everywhere.

	She felt the urge to vomit.  Just then—in a flash of bright light—Josho materialized behind her.

	"Unnngh..."  The obese stallion collapsed from the strain of his impromptu teleportation spell.  Rainbow did her best to support his weight as he panted for breath.  "Guh... I can sm-smell the damned thing's friggin' insides..."

	"Josho!  Are you okay?!  Speak to me!"

	"Ow..." He hissed, rubbing a bleeding shoulder that was scarred from where a manabeam grazed it.

	"Whew..."  Rainbow slumped across from him, her ears folded.  "I thought I'd just lost a flabby grumpy friend, buddy..."

	"You weren't alone..."

	"Which... uh... which of the two Joshos were you?"

	"I... uhm..."  Josho's brow furrowed while his face went pale.  "You know what?  I'm not all that sure anymore."  He pivoted his head and squinted at the cloaked figures helping Razzar up to his feet.  "Uhm... are you sure you're you, Rainbow Dash?"

	Snarling, Rainbow turned towards the Lounge.  "You!"  She flew forward, snarling straight into Razzar's mask.  "What in Celestia's name was that all about?!  You nearly killed my friend!"

	"In the time we would have wasted attempting to determine who was real from who was fake, we could instead have been—"

	"No, don't gimme any of that crap!"  Rainbow jabbed a hoof into his cloaked chest.  "You nearly turned my pal into a manasponge!"

	"Much like you harmed my crew back in the storm?"

	"Dude, you chased us with mana lasers!"  Rainbow barked.  "What the heck is this?!  I thought we were working together!"

	"And we most certainly are," Razzar said.  "And I am not about to let any shapeshifters complicate such an endeavor."

	"You want complications?!  I'll give you complications!"  Rainbow Dash shook a hoof.  "I'll send a complication right up your—"

	Seclorum cleared his throat loudly.

	Razzar and Rainbow looked into the Hold.

	Seclorum glared.  "Give us all one good reason not to fill your bodies with crossbolts."

	"Oh, for Pete's sake!"  Rainbow yanked the shoulder of a wincing Josho into view, pointing at the red blood trickling out.  "There!  Not a changeling!  You happy, now?!"

	"Partially..."  Seclorum motioned with his crossbow.  "As for the rest of you?"

	Before Rainbow Dash could open her mouth—

	"Gladly."  Razzar held up a fist, then gestured towards his cohorts.  "Brothers?"

	In synchronized motion, the six figures pulled their right gloves off, revealing rust-colored scales and yellow claws.  Without hesitation, they unsheathed tiny daggers from within their cloaks and sliced a tiny cut across their arms.  They held their hands up, revealing the dribbling red blood in the light of Josho's horn.

	Rainbow Dash blinked.  She turned to look into the Hold.

	The survivors' gaze fell on her.

	With a sigh, Rainbow pulled her saddlebag open and rummaged inside.  "I swear, at this rate, Belle and Eagle Eye are gonna think I've gone all depressed."  She pulled her trusty hatchet out, bit onto the handle with her teeth, and—wincing—made a tiny incisision across her forelimb.  Grunting slightly, she spat the blade back into her midnight satchel and held the bleeding wound up for the group to see.  "Voila.  Totally not Rainbug Dash."

	"Good..."  Aatxe shuffled up.  "Now you can start by telling us just who in the blazes these new characters are."

	"I would be glad to oblidge—" Razzar began.

	"No."  Aatxe pointed at Rainbow Dash.  "Let her speak.  We trust you slightly less than we do her at the moment."

	"Jee, how flattering," Rainbow muttered.  "Well, guys, you see, it's... like... this..."  Her eyes drifted to the side, reflecting the shuddering figure of a melancholic mare.  "...Props?"

	The engineer sniffled, avoiding Rainbow's gaze.  She bit her lip as she shivered at Prowse's side.

	"Props, what's the matter, girl?  Why are you so—?"  Rainbow stopped speaking.  Her ears instantly folded as her jaw fell agape.  A dry gulp, and she droned:  "What's happened?"

	A tear ran down Props' face. She looked up, muzzle all a'quiver.  "Rainbow Dash... I... I-I'm so sorry..."  She choked on a sob.  "There's nothing I-I could have done!  I-I would have fallen too!  Unky Prowsy—he saved me!  I wanted to dive after them... but... but..."

	"Where... where's Pilate?" Rainbow Dash asked.

	Props hissed through clenched teeth.  "He's dead, Dashie..."
		//------------------------------//
		// The Last Pegasus of Stratopolis		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash stood in stunned silence, her muzzle pronouncing the cold, bitter word.

	Props sniffled, leaning her weight against her Uncle as she fought the urge to collapse.  "He was trying to comfort Elma... or what was left of Elma, when the floor fell apart beneath them."  Props pointed at the gaping holes howling with hurricane winds.  "It h-happened so suddenly.  It's a m-miracle that more of us weren't sucked out.  But... but..."

	"He fell?"  Rainbow stammered.  "During the brief fart in time while I was gone?!"  Her teeth showed as she spontaneously snarled.  "Are you kidding me?!"

	"Rainbow, I'm sorry, I—"

	"Somepony please tell me there was a temple or a platform beneath us at the time!" Rainbow rushed forward, voice cracking.  "Or Elma!  The.. th-the changeling had wings, didn't she?!  Maybe... j-just maybe she could have..."

	"It's as grim as it sounds, lassie," Prowse said as he kept a protective arm over the blonde mare's shoulder.  His head shook with a somber expression.  "Sure wish we could say otherwise."

	Panting, Rainbow stepped fearlessly before the gaping holes, gazing down into the pale, stormy mess.

	Josho shuffled over, swallowing a lump down his throat.  "Rainbow, I... I-I know this absolutely blows chunks, girl, but we've got to keep it together..."

	"Keep it together..."  The pegasus muttered.

	"We've been lucky not to have any of us drop dead ten times over until now.  But with all of the deadly weather and shape-shifting freakjobs around every corner—"

	"Josho, I can't even keep my friends together!"  Rainbow flashed a frown back at him.  "If I can't protect what's closest to me anymore, then what do I have left?!"

	"Pilate knew the risk by stepping out of the Noble Jury!"

	"And so did I!"  Rainbow shouted.  "But that doesn't change the fact that I owe him more!  That I owe Belle m-more!"

	"Will you quit the friggin' waltz of guilt while you're ahead?!" Josho barked.  "We're in the middle of a crisis and we can't afford to have you stumbling over something you couldn't have prevented!"

	"What, like a good soldier?!"  Rainbow spat.  "Josho, I never ever wanted to fight in any of your continent's stupid wars!  And yet violent crud and mayhem seems to follow me wherever I go!  How many friends will I lose before I finally do the smart thing and give up?!"  Grimacing, she spun towards the holes and spread her wings.

	Josho squinted.  "What the Hell are you doing?!"

	"I have to find him."

	"Rainbow, he fell!"

	"Never stopped him from living before!"  She plunged into the hurricane winds.

	"Wait!" Seclorum shouted.

	Josho was already yanking her in place by a telekinetic tug to her tail.  "Rainbow, don't!"  Josho shouted.

	"Buck off!" Rainbow howled.  "He needs me—"

	"I need you!" Josho loudly retorted.  "Props and the rest of the ponies here do!  This place is a hellhole and only you have the edge to make any sense out of it!"

	"You tell that to Belle when we come back empty-hoofed!"

	"Rainbow, the Noble Jury is—"

	"Grnnngh!"  Rainbow wrenched her tail free, smacking Josho across the face.  The stallion fell back, losing his magical grip.  A clap of thunder rolled across the chamber as Rainbow Dash descended with the force of a meteorite, rocketing straight down into the heart of the storm.

	Props hung her tearful face while Prowse looked on.

	Across the way, Razzar adjusted the sleeves of his glowing suit.  "She's a creature who thinks with her heart.  A most peculiar trait."

	"Go sit on an iceberg and rotate," Josho grumbled, staring dully through the gaping crevices.



	Rainbow Dash flew wildly through the swirling mess of Stratopolis.  There were too many shards of granite flying through the howling maelstrom to make sense of.  Dangling bits of rock and mortar orbited the glowing obelisks in limp trajectories, losing bits and pieces of craggy sediment as the merciless winds chipped them gradually away.

	Hyperventilating, Rainbow flew through the chaotic debris field, shouting at the top of her lungs.

	"Pilate?!"

	Lightning flashed.  Thunder swallowed the exclamations from her howling mouth.

	Squinting into the wet sheets of rain, Rainbow Dash thrust her shoulder against the gales and flew haphazardly.

	"Nnnngh... Pilatttttte!"

	Temple pieces collided with each other, spraying ash and pebbles over her head like stray bullets.

	Palpitating harder and harder, Rainbow Dash zig-zagged her way around the shrapnel bits and continued her desperate cries.



	Pilate lay in a puddle, his back pelted relentlessly by drowning sheets of precipitation.  His muscles quivered as he fought for the strength to crawl forward.

	Just then, his ears twitched.

	Something melodic stood out against the raging thunder.  He made out two syllables, stabbing his heart into beating faster.

	He tilted his head up, ears twitching in the soaking rain.

	"Rainbow...?"

	More thunder.  Once more, the voice cried out, sounding more distant this time.

	"Rainbow!"  Pilate sputtered, then stood up straight on wobbly legs.  "Rainbowwww!"  Wincing, he galloped forward, blindly persuing the echoes of that warm voice.  "I'm here!  I'm over here!  Rainbow, I—"

	The zebra winced, skidding suddenly to a slippery stop.  He stood, panting, his head tilted to the side as he listened to the air in front of him.

	The sheets of rain weren't pitter-pattering just a few feet ahead.

	Nervously, Pilate squatted low and felt a hoof forward.  It ran across a slick surface, then plunged into open air.  He was less than two trots away from the precarious edge of the platform.

	Panicking, he fell back on his haunches and scooted away from the deathly plunge.  By the time the blood stopped throbbing in his ears, he realized the shouts of the pegasus had grown fainter, disappearing entirely.

	"Rainbow...?!"

	No reply.

	Pilate gnashed his teeth, stifled a growl, and ultimately hollered, "Rainbowwww!"



	"Mmmmffngh!"  Bruised and wincing, Eagle Eye leaned his shoulder against a granite column.  He sputtered rainwater from his muzzle, tossed his lavender mane back, and stared out from the platform he was on.

	The piece of temple that served as his perch was a sliver of its former glory.  It hovered at a precarious angle around an obelisk, constantly twirling about so that Eagle Eye had to scamper across its surface for even hoofing like an insect atop a rolling orange.  For the time being, he was in a safe position, at least until the platform rotated about once more.

	The motions of the granite structure were frighteningly fast, and Eagle found himself soaring past other large pieces of debris populating his particular pocket of Stratopolis.  While bits of rock collided loudly above and below him, he struggled to keep calm, taking the moment to survey his situation.

	It was then that he thought he spotted a familiar blue shape flying around the belly of the large round structure above.

	He gasped, stepping forward and leaning on his sword like it was a cane.  Squinting, his expert eyes spotted the tell-tale signs of blue feathers and a prismatic mane.  In a flash of thunder, Rainbow's figure darted from cloud to cloud, lost in the debris field of endlessly floating shards.

	Eagle Eye opened his mouth to shout—when he heard a different kind of thunder.  The air roared around him.  Nervously, he spun around and looked past the nearest column.

	A bronze hull soared by, along with the rain-slicked words spelling out "Noble Jury."

	"Hey!  Heeeeeeey!"  Eagle Eye scampered towards the edge and shouted, flickering his horn like a beacon.  "Guys!  Over here!  I'm here!  Hey!"

	It was too late.  The Noble Jury soared past him as swiftly as it had appeared.  It spiraled along its grand, clockwise arc, trailing the edge of the swirling storm.

	Eagle Eye slumped against a column, his ears folded as he murmured into the moist air.  "Ebon..."

	The stallion sniffled, closing his eyes for a sad, contemplative moment.  Then, eyes opened, he glared into the swirling mess.  His head tilted up, and he saw what looked to be a peculiar pattern of rocks floating directly overhead, leading upwards towards a lofty temple that was mostly intact.  In a way, the shards vaguely resembled stepping stones.

	With a deep breath, Eagle Eye gripped the hilt of his sword in his teeth and climbed the nearest column of his platform with determined hooves.



	"The Tarkington?" Razzar remarked.

	"Yes," Aatxe said with a nod.  "It's a sturdy vessel, capable of carrying a crew of one hundred and fifty.  It's more than enough to handle the survivors we've got held up here... or... well..."  The stallion sighed, slumping against a brick wall of the hold.  "It once was."

	"How do you mean?"

	"The last time I set hoof upon the deck of my ship was nearly two decades ago," the stallion murmured.  "At the time, all it was missing was an active engine core.  But it's been so long.  Who's to know if it's still operational... or even in one piece?"

	Razzar glanced at his fellow cohorts through his mask.  He turned back towards the stallion.  "During the flight from our ship to this building, we spotted a large vessel with a dark blue hull stranded on a lower temple."

	Aatxe's ears twitched as he looked up with a gaping expression.  "With copper lateral fins and a steel-reinforced cockpit?"

	"Indeed."

	"Then..."  Aatxe's eyes glistened as he stood up straight.  "Then it survived the calamity j-just now!  It m-may still be able to fly!"  He grinned wide.

	Razzar tilted his head.  "You seem extraordinarily ecstatic..."

	"He has reason to be," Seclorum said as he shuffled up.  "The Tarkington has been our silver bullet for a long time now."

	Arcshod nodded.  "Fesa'lanna creminium le'saranna kyo'taarkan."

	"What is this that the Xonan speaks of?" Razzar asked.

	Seclorum glanced at the furthest edge of the compartment where Lasairfion sat with her closest subjects.  "The Queen's ponies are adept at detecting energy sources.  Believe it or not, Xonans are about more than tattoos and fancy tongues.  They're natural born mana-sniffers."

	Arcshod frowned.  "Ranna'krenmar, Ledomulien trent'erm..."

	"You're welcome."  Seclorum faced Razzar again.  "Their Queen in particular has sensed an energy beacon in the heart of this building."

	"And energy beacon..."

	"They think it's some form of mana crystal... but unlike any of the kind crafted and used by Ledomare or Xona."  Seclorum gulped.  "Something more potent... more powerful."

	"The Tarkington was built to run off of mana-crystal energy," Aatxe said.  "If there's something like it inside this structure, then it could conceivably refuel my ship and give us all an avenue of escape."

	"It would have to be a sizable energy source indeed to allow you to pierce the winds of this place," Razzar said.

	"That's what we're hoping," Aatxe said.  "But we won't have any real idea until we get our hooves on the energy source."

	"What's kept you from doing so?" Razzar asked.  "The shape-shifters?"

	"To some extent, yes.  However..."  Aatxe fumbled for words.

	"What is it?"

	Seclorum sighed.  "There's a barrier... a closed door to the inner recesses of this building."

	"Meaning...?"

	"So long as it's in the way, we can't enter the innermost chambers of this structure.  We always felt it was a hopeless cause."  The Ledomaritan officer glanced once more in Lasairfion's direction.  "However, if we had a key of sorts to gain access to what's inside—"

	With a rush of air and rainwater, Rainbow's blue figure darted back up the hole and planted wetly on the chamber floor.  Various survivors gasped while a few of them nervously picked up their crossbows, training it on the pegasus.

	"Dashie!"  Props exhaled from Prowse's side.

	Rainbow said nothing, glaring ahead into the firelight.

	"Rainbow..."  Josho sat up from where he was sitting against a pile of rubble.  "Did... uhm..."  He fidgeted, his face grimacing apologeticlaly.  "Did you...?"

	She strolled past him on heavy hooves.

	"Hey..."  Seclorum looked her way.  "Hey!" He frowned.  "Are you forgetting something?"

	Rainbow kept marching.

	Aatxe nervously bit his lip.  Arcshod and Seclorum rushed over, levitating their crossbows as they blocked the pegasus' path.

	"Not one more step until you—" Seclorum started.

	"Rrrrghh!"  Rainbow Dash suddenly had the graying stallion shoved against a wall.  She shoved the still-fresh wound of her forelimb into his face.  "See?!  Still bleeding, jerkwad!  Give it a lick if you doubt me!"

	Seclorum sputtered, frowning.  "We've been in this mess longer than you, lady.  The least you can do is show a little respect—"

	"For what?!"  Rainbow snarled.  "You think you're actually in charge here?!  What can you do to get these ponies out of this mess?!  What have you done?!"  She dropped the stallion with a grunt and shook the moisture off her shoulders.  "You want off this rock and someplace safe?!  Then take a long look!  I'm the one real thing to swing by this place since Commander Hurricane died!  Rainbow Dash—the last pegasus of Stratopolis!"  Grunting, she tossed her mane and trotted towards the far corner of the place.  "Take it or leave it, folks."

	Everypony watched as she stormed off.

	Seclorum hobbled back onto his hooves, assisted by Arcshod and Aatxe.

	"Uhm..."  Aatxe bit his lip.  "Somepony should... uh... pr-probably keep an eye on her."

	"Dreit."

	Before Seclorum could open his mouth again—
	
	"Give it a rest, Secchy," Josho muttered, then shuffled tiredly after the pegasus at a distance.  "She's my pal.  I've got it covered."

	Seclorum was quiet.  Props and Prowse hung their heads while the Lounge watched on in silence.



	Rainbow Dash rounded a corner on her lonesome.  Once she was beyond the glow of the hold's torchlight, she shuffled to a stop, heaving with deep breaths.

	Her face contorted into a frown. Swiveling about, she planted her hooves against a dusty brick wall.  Her eyes clenched shut as her body rocked back and forth.  Stifling an inward grunt, she tapped her forehead against the brick... then slapped it... then headbutted the wall several times with hissing squeaks of pain and frustration.

	Suddenly, she stopped, her body wracked with shivers.  Rainbow's face quivered, melting into a perpetual grimace as sniffling breaths fountained from her nostrils.  She heaved, heaved again, and slumped down to her knees, bracing herself against the wall as tears trickled down her face.  She curled her forelimbs against her chest, feeling the rattle of her pendant with each pent-up sob.

	"Celestia... Celestia, I-I can't..."  She whimpered, her teeth gnashing beneath clenched eyes.  "Not anymore... I don't know how... I-I don't know..."  She moaned into her forelimbs.  "Why am I here?  Why am I even h-here?  It doesn't... d-doesn't..."

	Her words trailed off, and yet she heard an echo to the sobs.

	Sniffling, Rainbow rubbed her cheeks dry and opened her puffy eyes.

	The sobbing continued, this time at a distance.  To Rainbow's twitching ears, it sounded like it was just around the corner.

	Gulping, Rainbow stood up on weak hooves.  Pensively, she trotted around the bend, following the melancholic noise.  A tiny torch flickered into her eyes.  She squinted, her face scrunching at a terrible stench.  She heard the buzzing of flies and the rattle of chains.

	At last, Rainbow came completely around the corner.  A dark shape lay beneath her, but it was too solid to be a shadow.

	Fettered to the wall, surrounded by its own filth, an emaciated changeling sat in shackles. Sobbing, it looked up at Rainbow Dash.  In a brief moment, its green eyes turned to ruby pupils and back again.  "Please... I-I'm sorry," the changeling whimpered.  "Just stop... st-stop waving it in front of me..."

	"What..."  Rainbow squinted, her sorrow replaced by shock and confusion.  "...the buck?"

	"So much love..."  The changeling's flesh turned blue and fuzzy and went back to its black shell.  It curled over, clutching its chest as it avoided Rainbow's gaze.  "It's too much.  It hurts... h-hurts to hunger..."

	Rainbow sat down across the wretched creature, her eyes glued to its chains, then to the green bloodstains along the brick wall surrounding it.  "What... how...?"

	"Please tell her I-I'm sorry," the creature sobbed.

	Rainbow cocked her head aside.  "Tell who?"

	"Mother..."  The changeling hissed.  "Mother, I'm s-so sorry for hungering..."
		//------------------------------//
		// With the Torchlight and Tears		//------------------------------//

	"What... I mean..."  Rainbow Dash slinked forward on trembling hooves, her thin eyes studying the injured changeling up and down.  "Why are you here?  Who did all of this to you—"

	"N-no!"  The changeling slid back on rattling chains.  "Mother d-doesn't... nnnnghhh... d-doesn't approve!"

	"Approve of what?!"

	"No love... positively none..."  The changeling shook its head, stifling a sob.  "If I feed... I'll connect to Mother... and th-they'll find her..."

	"Who...?"  Rainbow Dash leaned forward.  "And who's this 'Mother?'"

	"Please... I'm so sorry..."  The changeling gripped its skull, shivering.  "No more.  I-I can't..."

	"Look, will you just chillax?  I simply wanna understand more."  Rainbow tried a weak smile.  "I'm not going to hurt you."

	The changeling spoke with a muffled tone.  "How can I believe that..."  A flash of green flame.  An orange face with freckles gazed up at Rainbow.  "...when all you do is hurt yourself, sugarcube?"

	Rainbow's eyes went wide as saucers.  She scuttled backwards on jittery hooves, bumping into a large body.  With a gasp, she jerked and looked up.

	Josho braced himself with a hoof on her shoulder, grimacing at the creature.  "What in Ledo's wide-wide hips is this shit?!"

	"Forgive me!" the changeling wailed.  Its face turned lavender with flowing locks of silken hair as it reeled away from the stallion.  "Too much love!  All I do is taste!  Mother, I'm so sorry!"

	"I... I-I just found him... her... it like this!" Rainbow sputtered.  "It keeps rambling on about 'Mother' and how 'sorry it is' for wanting to 'feed on love!'"

	"Dayum thing looks wasted," Josho exclaimed.  He squinted at the miserable creature.  "Are those... bloodstains on the wall?"

	"The nasty little wretches have a terrible habit of leaking," droned a voice.  Josho and Rainbow spun to see Seclorum standing cooly in the bend of the corridor.  Aatxe leaned awkwardly against a wall behind him, avoiding the sight of the ghastly creature.  "For all of the skins and scales that they can mimic, it takes surprisingly little force to squeeze something out of them."

	"Squeeze something out of them?"  Josho turned to look at the quivering creature once again.  "Secchy, were you torturing this friggin' bug thing?"

	"Information is priceless on the battlefield, old friend," Seclorum replied, pacing towards the corner.  "Don't pretend in all your years of defending the Queen's interest that you never drove the spurs in."

	"I've killed soldiers and set fires to camps left and right—but I've never resorted to torture!"  Josho frowned.  "That's Council of Ledo bullcrap right there!"

	"Oh please, Josho."  Seclorum turned to glare at him.  "You've set fire to more than just enemy encampments.  Don't try to deny it."

	Josho gnashed his teeth, but ultimately bowed his head in a defeated pose.

	Rainbow Dash saw it.  Blinking, she swiveled her gaping expression towards Seclorum.  "What I don't understand is how—?"

	"It was one of the drones delivering us food," Aatxe said, squirming slightly.  He still refused to look at the creature.  "Arcshod and Seclorum laid an ambush for them.  Most got away, but not this one.  Trapped, it flew itself towards the torches—presumably to end its own life.  We bound it up before it could.  I thought it would end there.  But... well... for what it's worth, I was one of the few ponies who voted against..."  He gestured blindly towards the corner.  "...this."

	"Well, why don't you tell me?!  Cuz I'm all ears!"  Rainbow frowned.  "Just what is this worth?!"

	"It's simple," Seclorum said.  "The monster's connection with the shapeshifter's hive mind gave us a window into what they knew, including some of the things they were planning."

	"The Xonans' Princess sensed a magical energy source inside the heart of this building," Aatxe added.  "This changeling revealed that its shapeshifting brood knows about this.  In fact, they knew about it for a long, long time before ever making a 'nest' in this city."

	"That's about the most pertinent information we got out of the creep," Seclorum said.  He swiveled around with a frown.  "Until it decided to disconnect itself from the hive mind!"  He gave the thing a nasty buck across the head.  Thud!

	"Hey!"  Rainbow Dash jerked forward, shoving Seclorum back.  "Cut it out!"

	"Please..."  Seclorum hissed.  "Don't defend this creature!  It feels nothing!  It consumes emotion!"  He snarled at the quivering thing's shell.  "All this rambling nonsense about 'love' and 'pain' and 'mother.'  It's like a spoiled infant begging for milk.  It's an animal... and a very unclever one at that, at least when stripped of the ability to leech from innocent ponies!"

	"Animal or not, think rationally for a dang second!  I mean, don't you guys get it?!"  Rainbow frowned.  "Stab and prod a living thing all you like.  Of course it's going to tell you what you want to hear!  You think somepony's going to do or say something truthful when all it wants is for the pain to stop?!"

	"It's given us invaluable information months before you or Prowse even came here," Seclorum said.  "We know that the changelings are waiting for something special... or somepony.  Somehow, I'm beginning to imagine it's you."

	"Don't drag me into this garbage!"  Rainbow snarled.  "All you know is all that you've bled from this friggin' guy through brute force!  You think that's anything to actually go by?"  Her eyes narrowed.  "Has it ever occurred to you that the head of the hive mind expected for its drones to get caught?  It could have planted disinformation, dude!"

	Aatxe spoke up, "But many of the things this drone has said coincide with what the Xonans have been sensing about this temple—"

	"And you think that's suppose to excuse this?!"  Rainbow frowned.  "I'm sorry, but when I butt heads with a bad guy, I like to make sure I'm the good guy, inside and out!"  She glared at Seclorum.  "And ruthlessly torturing a creature isn't what I call being a good guy."  She swung that glare back at Aatxe.  "And just standing aside and letting it happen ain't much better either!"

	Aatxe winced.  Seclorum, however, kept glaring.  "I know that you're not thinking very reasonably right now.  Honestly, I can't blame you for your hysterics—"

	Rainbow rolled her eyes.  "Oh, come the buck on—!"

	"You've just lost a close friend of yours," Seclorum droned.  "Maybe more.  Hell, maybe all of them."  His eyes narrowed.  "Would you honestly stand by and let disaster befall more innocent ponies just because you had a moral qualm that you couldn't cross over?"

	"Dude, don't even go there," Rainbow practically hissed.  "I crawl out of Loyalty's friggin' womb every morning.  This pegasus is not about to be lectured on what it means to do the heroic thing."

	"Then neither do I expect to be set aflame for taking the measures required of me in this crisis situation."  Seclorum trotted forward, speaking almost into her ear.  "Think of it this way.  They've kidnapped us, stolen our identities, and left us all here to rot while going off to infiltrate the innermost circles of our families, friendships, and comrades."  He frowned.  "Do you honestly think that something like torture is beneath them too?"

	Rainbow's jaw remained clenched.

	Seclorum took a deep breath.  "We need to have a talk with you—the whole of us, those masked figures as well—about how we're going to get out of this nightmare.  In the meantime, if you think you can learn anything from this wretch through means that doesn't mean exacting the same cruelty to them that they've dealt to us... then be my guest.  Just don't come whining to me when it doesn't work."  He shuffled off, tapping Aatxe's shoulder along the way.

	Aatxe flinched, but nevertheless sighed and shuffled after Seclorum.

	Rainbow Dash and Josho stood alone in the corridor, being serenaded by the changeling's soft sobs.

	"I swear to Celestia," Rainbow Dash uttered.  "The further I fly from home, the uglier it gets."

	Josho was silent.

	Rainbow craned her neck in an attempt to read his expression.  "Well?  Big guy?  What are you thinking about all of this?"

	He shifted uncomfortably.  "I think..."  He glanced up at her.  "...that nopony's going to weep for this once it's full bled out."

	Rainbow's ears folded back.  "Oh, Josho, come on!"

	"Rainbow Dash, I'm upset concerning Prowse's double, I'm confused about Elma, I'm friggin' mad over Pilate.  But that doesn't change the fact that there are ponies here who need to get home and you're the first pegasus to mean a damn thing to this stupid place."  The stallion shrugged.  "Secchy's right, y'know.  I've done horrible... horrible things to stay alive.  But at least I'm alive."

	"Josho, you know that's not all that I have going for me," Rainbow muttered towards the walls.

	Josho trotted over and rested a hoof on her shoulder.  "Well here's something you still have.  The Noble Jury's in one piece."

	Rainbow's face jerked up to look at him.

	Josho nodded.  "I saw it while on my way here.  I wanted to tell you earlier before you went searching in vain for Pilate."  He stepped back, staring softy at her.  "Our friends are alive, Rainbow Dash, and they need us.  More importantly, we all need you, because—like it or not—you mean something to this place, and this place means something to you."  He glanced at the changeling, then back at her.  "Once you've figured it out, let me know.  I'm off to learn what I can from Secchy and the rest."

	That said, he shuffled off, leaving Rainbow Dash alone with the torchlight and tears.
		//------------------------------//
		// In Love at First Sight		//------------------------------//

	Pilate trotted through the storm.  Slick rivulets of rain cascaded down his striped coat.  He teetered dizzily left and right, stretching a hoof forward to feel for any breaks in the platform.

	He tripped multiple times, but it wasn't until ten paces forward that he slipped hard enough to fall chest-first against the granite.  "Ooof!"  He winced, his muzzle grimacing under a dull plate of runes.  He bent his aching limbs in an effort to shuffle forward, but collapsed again with an exhausted sigh.

	On the verge of tears, the zebra lay there, curling his legs up as his body lingered in the puddle while hurricane winds howled overhead.



	On a faraway platform, Bellesmith trotted through heavier winds, bracing Eagle Eye's shield ahead of her in order to force her way through the gales.  She struggled up a slanted crevice formed from when the temple collided with another platform.

	At last, through trial and error, she forced her way beneath a half-collapsed overhang being supported by cracked columns.  Once free of the howling winds, Belle plunged forward, pratfalling onto the floor with a stifled yelp.  Eagle Eye's shield clattered, rattling to a stop, echoing in her ears with metallic reverberations.

	She winced from the noise.  However, as the rattling faded, she heard something softer, gentler taking its place.  Curious, she squinted one chestnut eye open, then the other.  She blinked, her muzzle hanging agape.

	A figure lay in open view several feet away, clinging to the bottom ridges of an ancient marble colum.  The sheets of rain beyond gave the tiny thing a shivering silhouette, like a swatted fly dying against a window pane.

	Belle blinked, her eyes narrowing.  Cautiously she reached over and slid the shield back into the crook of her hoof.  She shuffled towards the figure on three legs, approaching with caution.

	The closer she got, the more pronounced the sobs became.  Belle saw a figure in constant flux, its limbs expanding and contracting every other second.  A black exoskeleton gave way to a solid shell.  Scales appeared before vanishing once more into a glossy obsidian.  In bursts of green flame, dragonfly wings spread and then shrank from sight.  All the while, the only constant thing was a deep cut that lingered across the back/shell of the creature, leaking with green slime.

	Breathless, Bellesmith stood above the shape-shifting creature, her eyes turning glossy with shock.  "...Elma?"

	A beak appeared on the mouth of the thing, replaced swiftly by fangs.  Tears evaporated into emerald smoke, and all the creature could do was stammer, "My children... my precious children..."  She curled up, her reptilian/equine legs fluctuating beneath her.  "Home... I-I want to go h-home..."  A hissing breath, followed by a moan.  "I can't... I-I just can't... oh my little d-darlings..."

	Belle's face grimaced.  "Oh Spark..."  She seethed, her eyes lingering on the grotesque contours of the pained beast.  She nevertheless shuffled forward, clenching her jaw tight.  Finally, she sat directly beside the creature.  Her gaze fell upon a vulnerable spot in its neck.  Bellesmith's hooves gripped the shield tighter, angling its blunt end downwards.  Sucking her breath in, Belle turned her head away and slowly began raising the bludgeon up... up...

	"Mmmmfnngh... b-beloved..." the changeling spat.

	Bellesmith froze in place, her eyes widening.  She peaked at the monster from around the raised shield.

	"I... I love..."  It sputtered, sobbed.  Its head turned towards the ceiling as stripes formed across its exoskelton.  Clear eyes twitched beneath a runic plate.  "He loves... he loves you so much..."  Fanged teeth appeared beneath the dark muzzle, then vanished again.  "That's why... th-that's why I saved him..."

	Belle's lips parted.  "Saved... h-him...?"

	"I could not let him perish..."  It a burst of flame, the zebra's face disappeared, replaced by the wretching changeling as it buried its face into its porous forelimbs.  "I had to b-be sure... I had to know that somepony's love was real!"

	Bellesmith stared, panting in stunned silence.  The changeling spoke, and she listened.



	"Pilate!" Props screamed, lunging forward.

	It was too late.  The stallion plummeted from the base of the large building.  Blindly, the breathless zebra spun and spiraled.  His legs kicked at the air as the wind carried him aloft, flinging him towards the temples exploding throughout the depths of Stratopolis...

	Seconds before he could be smashed to a pulp, a pair of black forelimbs gripped his shoulders.

	Pilate gasped, sputtering rain water out his muzzle.  Above him, a wincing, bleeding changeling flew on intinctive dragonfly wings, carrying the stallion towards the first platform within sight.  Dropping him without ceremony, the thing that was once Elma stumbled across the rain-slicked granite, quivered in distress, then took off in a dark blur, leaving the surviving zebra behind.



	Belle fell back on her haunches, exhaling with a squeaky tone.

	"I know now that love is all th-that matters..."  The changeling whimpered.  "But it's not for me.  It's not for an imposter... a monster..."  She nuzzled the granite floor of the temple, exhaling vaporous breaths of green smoke.  "Geughhh... don't deserve... d-don't deserve to live... to t-take the name and b-body of my children's mother... Elma's children... oh blessed heavens what am I?"  She fell into a fit of uncontrollable wailing.

	Bellesmith wasn't paying attention to her anymore.  Her eyes were elsewhere.  Her mind was elsewhere.  Her chest rose and fell with increasingly heavy breaths.  Her pupils shrank as she ran a hoof over her quivering mouth.



	Slowly, with quiet spasms, Pilate tilted his head up.  He faced the pelting rain, his ears perking up straight, as if hearing something from beyond the wind.

	With an inward groan, he sat up, wiping the moisture off his muzzle as he panted into the constant drizzle.

	"Bellesmith..."

	He gritted his teeth while his face flexed vulnerably.  His blind eyes twitched.



	"Doctor Bellesmith...?"

	"Shhhh.  I'm activating the manasphere now, Pilate."

	"How will I know if it's working?"

	"Heehee... trust me.  You'll know."  A slight whining noise.  "Okay... and... brace yourself..."

	Flash!  The choker around the zebra's neck pulsed brightly.

	The stallion gasped, sitting up straight in his hospital bed.  The runes across his skull flickered one after another.  His gray eyes blinked several times and darted around.

	"Shhhhh-shhhh..."  A yellow hoof graced his shoulder, then his chin.  "Not with your eyes, but with your mind."

	"My... m-my mind?"

	"Yes.  No doubt you have a brilliant one."

	"But... but how...?"

	"We've talked about this.  Simply... push your consciousness towards the sound of my voice."

	"Push... my consciousness..."

	"That's right."

	Pilate bit his lip.  His face tensed.  A few seconds later, the sphere positioned against his choker unhitched itself and floated forward.  The ball twirled left and right, flickering a bright beam everywhere.  "Enngh..."  He winced.

	"Slowly... concentrate..."

	"It's... it's just so much..."

	"My voice, Pilate.  Remember?"

	"Right..."  He took steadier breaths, and in slow order the O.A.S.I.S. sphere drifted towards the side of the bed.  It bumped into a mare's chest.  "Whoops," he murmured.

	"Heehee... It's okay.  Now, have a look.  Hmmm?"

	Pilate sat perfectly still while the runes on his forehead's plate pulsed back and forth.  The floating sphere levitated perfectly in place, then proceeded to scan the mare sitting next to his bed.

	"I... I'm seeing..."  Pilate thought aloud, his face awash in awe.  "I'm feeling..."

	"Good... good..."

	"A fuzzy coat... a chin... a muzzle..."  He slowly smiled.  "Long, flowing mane.  Doctor, it's working!"

	"Hmmmmm..."  Belle's lips smiled once the light beam crossed over it.  "I do believe we have a breakthrough."

	"I'll say!"  Joyous, Pilate sat up further, twirling the O.A.S.I.S. sphere around with his mind.  "I see the bedframe... a cabinet... the lab equipment.  Doctor, I sense the whole room!"

	"Easy, now."  Belle patted his shoulder.  "It was only built for close-range.  Don't overload the neural connections."

	"I-I can even read the medical report on the table here!"  Pilate practically giggled like a young colt.  "It has today's date and everything!  Oh, Doctor, it's a miracle!"  He swung the sphere towards her again.  "You're a miracle worker—"  His muzzle hung open in mid sentence and his ears folded back.

	Belle sat still, smiling gently.  The manasphere's light had cascaded over her forehead, illuminating the contours of a stubby horn wrapped under tight bandages.

	Pilate's lips quivered.  "You... you're..."  His sphere floated over the empty bed behind her then back to where the mare sat on the stool by his side.  "You're a patient here?"

	"That I am, Pilate."

	"But... but how... why?"  He sucked in his breath.  The manasphere almost collapsed, forcing Belle to catch it.  "The zeppelin crash.  At Mountainfall."  He grimaced.  "You... you were h-hurt, weren't you?"

	A warm pair of hooves placed the sphere back into place against his choker, then gently took his forelimbs in hers.  "I was blessed, Pilate.  I was fortunate enough to utilize my talents in ways I never had the opportunity to do before."

	"But... h-how can you say that?!"  He shivered, gnashing his teeth.  "All th-this time!  You were just as hurt as me!"

	"I've not been blinded, Pilate—"

	"Doctor, your horn!  I..."  He grimaced.  "I'm sorry... I-I'm so sorry!  If I had known..."

	"Shhhh..."  Belle stroked his hooves.  "Don't be sorry.  You've given me something very special, Pilate."

	He gulped.  "And what in Spark's name is that?"

	"Hope," she said softly, though her voice shook somewhat.  A sniffling sound.  "And faith that I still had something to accomplish."  She chuckled slightly and squeezed his hooves again.  "You are that proof, Pilate.  My life has plenty of experiments left, thanks to you."

	The stallion shuddered, tilting his head towards the bed as he focused on the feel of their hooves touching.

	"Now... think you're up for some more testing?"  Belle smiled.  "Soon, I should be able to teach you how to sense even the tiniest fractures in a solid surface."

	"Uhm... sure..."  He nodded, all the while bearing a crooked grin.  "Though, to be honest, your gorgeous face is a hard act to follow..."

	Belle blinked, then snickered.  "Why, thank you.  Y'know, you're not too shabby yourself, handsome."

	"Heheh..."  The stallion's stripes turned a little rosy.  "Much oblidged, Doctor."

	"Please..."  She patted his hooves lightly.  "Call me 'Belle.'"



	A tear rolled down her face.  She hunched over, clutching a pair of hooves over her quivering muzzle.  After several dry heaves, she mewled into the misty air.  "Pilate... my beloved..."  She gritted her teeth hard.  At last, she looked up, staring at the changeling through blurred vision.

	The shapeshifter was standing up on wobbly hooves.  Its turtle shell disappeared long enough for it to spread its dragon wings into the random gusts of wind.  Suddenly, a pair of yellow forelimbs wrapped around its petite shell.  The changeling gasped and struggled, falling back into Belle's embrace.  "Guhhh!  Don't... d-don't!  Let me go!"  It shrieked in and out of multiple voices, its eyes flickering with emerald flame.  "I'm a monster!"

	"No."  Belle held on tight.

	"Stop it!  I'll only... only h-hurt—"

	"I'm not going to leave you, Elma," Belle said, anchoring the creature in place.  She nuzzled the back of its skull.  "I'm going to get us out of here.  Do you hear me?"

	"But..."

	"The two of us!"

	"I'm nothing!" the thing shrieked, fighting to slither out of the mare's grasp.  "They tr-tricked me!  I'm not Elma Boreal—"

	"Yes you are!"

	"The mother from Alafreo is dead—!"

	"All I know is that the friend I made on the Noble Jury... the soul who reached out to me and saved my beloved from death is right here in my hooves."  Belle nuzzled her again, sniffling.  "And she is real, and I am not about to abandon her when she needs me!  I'm going to get you out of here, Elma.  And you're going to live your own life... a life where you get to be who you want to be and enjoy what you deserve to enjoy."

	"Don't..."  The changeling wept, laying limp in the mare's embrace.  "Please, don't..."  With flashes of green energy, stripes appeared and disappeared across her body.  "You have n-no idea.  The love.  It hurts.  I'm so confused and all the love does is hurt."

	"I know," Belle said.  She sniffled and clenched her tear-stained jaw.  "And I'm sorry.  But I'm not going to let you die out here.  I'm not going to let you give up."  She turned the limp creature around and stared into its face.  "We must never give up.  Do you understand me?"

	The creature stared at her, its eyes round and its shell rattling.  "Do you?"

	"I'm starting to..."  Belle gave a bittersweet smile.  "Thanks to you."

	The shape-shifter blinked.  Its body stayed the same, but its eyes formed soft reptilian slits.

	Belle took a deep breath.  "Can you walk?"

	"I..."  Elma gulped, trembling.  "I c-can fly, but the rest of me feels... f-feels so weak... I... I c-can't even stay in one shape..."

	"Then don't try," Bellesmith said.  "And rest your wings."  She heaved the shapeshifter onto her backside with a slight grunt.  "Can you grab ahold?"

	"Y-yes..."

	"Good.  Stick close to me."  Belle picked up the shield and used it as a crutch as she carried the two of them towards a careening granite staircase, ascending to the next level.  "One way or another, we're going to find our way to the rest of the Jurists."

	"And th-then what?"

	"Let me worry about that.  I'm good at thinking on my hooves."

	"Really...?"

	Belle smirked devilishly into the wind and rain.  "You haven't seen me when I'm stupid."



	Pilate stared blankly into the chaotic depths of Stratopolis.  His breaths grew longer, fuller.  His nostrils flared and flared again.  At last, he stood straight up, impervious to the pelting rain.

	"This is nothing..."  He trudged fearlessly forward, grunting in anger more than discomfort.  "All of this is nothing!"

	He marched with heavy hooves.  As soon as he felt a break in the rain, he galloped forward a few steps, relishing in having discovered an interior portion of the floating temple he was on.

	"We will find each other," he snarled, he roared.  "Blindness be damned.  I've fallen from greater heights and lived."  He felt his way forward, finding a hallway that he swiftly navigated, shuffling across the fractured granite wall leaking with precipitous moisture.  "The Noble Jury has no hope of finding me... because—by Spark—I'm going to find it first."

	As Pilate shuffled bravely on, he was oblivious to the sheets of rain cascading outside... along with the dark shadow positioned against the waterfall, standing dead-still, watching him silently from afar.


		//------------------------------//
		// Back to the Boring Scenes		//------------------------------//

	With a jerk of his teeth, Prowse pulled the tarp off a complex rigging, in the center of which lay a complex mechanical prosthetic in the gradual stages of being contructed.  "Feast your eyes, lassie.  The latest and greatest from your Unky Prowsy."  Nevertheless, the stallion sighed, leaning against a wall.  "Ach, if only it was a mighty bit prettier for all my troubles..."

	"I think it looks just fine," she said, trotting towards it with a soft smile.  Firelight glittered off her goggles as she slid them higher over her blonde bangs, giving the apparatus a natural look-over.  "And a pretty smexy accomplishment for a stallion with three hooves!"

	"Yes, well, I could have gotten further with it."  Prowse rolled his eyes and glared towards the bricklaid walls.  "Only, I've been a wee bit distracted as of late."

	"Jee, I wonder why."

	"Between the Xonan chatter and Seclorum's incessant beehive mouth, I've been having to juggle my own noggin for fear of my brain running away if I just leave it still."

	"You certainly landed yourself with a bunch of cookie creeps!"

	"Eh, they're not all bad, lass," Prowse said.  "Aatxe has a heart of gold, the poor sod.  And the Queen of them tattooed noseblowers is a sight for sore eyes.  Still, as long as I lay in this damnable prison, the only pony I could think of was you."

	"Awwwwwwwww..."  Props cooed, then smiled.  "For what it's worth, I'm glad that I've gotten two chances to be with you again, even if one of them turned out to be a total fluke that put the entirety of my team in jeopardy."

	"Erm... yeah..."  Prowse winced.  "I'm so sorry for that, lil' darlin'.  If I had known that things would end up like this, I'd have jumped over the bloomin' side of Gray Smoke."

	"Uhm..."  Props' ears drooped as she sighed into the shadows.  "Please, don't put it that way, Unky Prowsy."  She gulped.  "I've had all I can take of ponies close to me jumping to their deaths."

	Prowse bit his lip.

	Props gazed at the half-finished prosthetic again.  "What's with the hollow manachamber?"

	"I ran out of manacrystal actuators to complete the working model," he said.  "I had hoped we'd stumble upon some derelict ships with working shards for me to fill in the grooves between pneumatic stabilizers—"

	"Hee-hee-hee!  Are you silly?"  Props stuck her tongue out.  "You've got enough crystals in here to make it work!  All you gotta do is form a Ledomaritan Helix pattern!"

	"Ledomaritan... what?!"

	"Something I learned while I was cooped up in this boring place called 'Nightshade Industries!'"  Props grinned from ear to ear as she fished her hooves into the stallion's prosthetic and began fumbling around with the inner pieces.  "This super smart duderooni named Jasper Clark taught me all about them!  We designed a killer augment to a skystone ship, and I was lucky enough to find that very same aircraft and fly it around!"

	"Well, look at you..."  Prowse smiled.  "Gettin' smarter by the hour, lil' lassie, I swear.  You're just like your Mum."

	Props bit her lip, blushing slightly.  "Yeah, well, Mom was the Sootiest of the Sooters.  I can't get her grit out of my blood, or her hugs out of my skin."

	"She'd be proud of how well you've managed for yourself," Prowse said with a smirk.  "Spark knows I am."

	Props sniffled, then cleared her throat.  With a determined smirk, the mare said, "Don't be proud of me yet, Silly Unky!  With a bit of tweaking, I'll get this fourth leg of yours working in no time!"

	"I'm much oblidged, lassie."

	"And then we'll get you and your friends out of here so you can live your life, start dating again, and work on your fifth leg."

	"Hah!"  Prowse cackled towards the ceiling and gave his niece a swat on the shoulder.  "Now there's the Propsicle I know!  Go for the gold, ya grease monkey!"

	"Heehee!  I'll go with the grease—but not so much the poop flinging!"

	"Goddess, I've missed ya."

	"Heh..."  Props grinned and licked her lips in the firelight while she sweated over the metal limb.  "I've missed me too."



	"Hello again, old friend," Seclorum muttered from where he sat in a corner of the hold, piecing together and reparing a worn-in crossbow.  "Come to nibble a bit more on my neck after biting my head off?"

	"I'm a bit full at the moment," Josho said as he shuffled up.  "Things have been rather crazy, and—as odd as it may seem—we appear to be having a lull at the moment."

	"So...?"

	"Well, slit my throat for trying, but I figured you and I could catch up a bit."

	"What's to catch up to?" Seclorum remarked.  "You're screwed.  I'm screwed.  Nopony is happy.  We all want to get out of here."  He grunted.  "Feels like just any other moment of the same ol' war."

	"Only that war is over, buddy," Josho said.

	"Heh.  Maybe outside, it is," Seclorum uttered with a bitter smirk.  "But in here?  The battle wages on.  So long as my identity is not mine, I don't see how I can afford to rest.  Hell, I don't deserve rest."

	"Secchy, war is all you and I have ever known," Josho said with eyes squinting.  "I'd say it's what dayum well defined our friendship.  But it doesn't have to be that way forever.  We can move on.  Hell, you can move on."

	"I don't see what the point is."

	"There's gotta be a tomorrow after all this crap," Josho said.  "The world you go back to isn't going to be the same as when it was when you were captured and whisked away to this place.  Xona's sheathed their swords and Ledomare's pulled back from the front."

	"Heh..."  Seclorum spat into the shadows.  "Friggin' crazy."

	"What's so wild about that idea?"  Josho squinted.  "You've settled in rather nicely with the tattooed ponies here.  Surely a part of you can perceive doing it in the long run."

	"Just because I can get along with one measly queen and her closest goons doesn't mean I can forgive the whole lot of them for all of the merciless things that they've done."

	"Need I remind you that you and I have done some pretty nasty stuff ourselves?"  Josho gritted his teeth.  "Secchy, you're a tough stallion... but it takes an even tougher one to learn to let it go."

	"What?"  Seclorum narrowed his eyes on the obese pony.  "Like you did?"

	"I'm dry, Secchy."

	"Hah!  I'm willing to bet!  As fat as you've become, I doubt you've gotten your horn wet in years—if you catch my drift."

	"I mean I've kicked the bottle," Josho said.  "For good."

	Seclorum's eyes fell on him for a few seconds.  "Yeesh, Josho, you shoulda just killed yourself."

	"I sorta have, in a way..."  Josho wandered over and had a squat beside his old friend, sighing.  "Getting caught up with that damn pegasus and all of her colorful friends, I started to see who I was and what I was doing in a really nasty light.  Ain't nothing pretty about what we were doing, Secchy—not the missions we ran, the tasks we were given, the uppity mare in a diamond girdle whom we all worked for..."

	"Criminy!"  Seclorum chuckled, loading a crossbolt into his weapon and cocking it.  "Almost sounds like you discovered you had a bastard son and turned a new leaf!"

	"Not too far from the truth, in a manner of speaking."

	Seclorum blinked, then turned to gaze dully at him.  "Not all of us can afford to go soft, old friend.  But, for what it's worth, I'm glad for you."

	"I'd like to be glad for you too, Secchy," Josho said quietly, his eyes warm.  "It's a new world waiting for you out there.  It'd be a damn shame to buck it up as soon as you're out of this place."

	"Hmmm... have you taken a good look around you?"  Seclorum leaned forward with a glare.  "Have you seen the nastiness that fills this place?  The conniving ways of the broodlings that stalk us?"  He slowly shook his head.  "Oh no, old friend, everything is and shall always be 'old world.'  And if you think having limped through this hellhole day in and day out is gonna make me 'soft,' well you've got another thing coming."  He stood up, wincing from his aching old bones.

	Josho frowned up at him.  "Just because hating is easy, old friend, doesn't make it courageous."

	Seclorum shuffled to a stop, then swiveled towards him.  "It's not about courage.  It's about strength.  You and I both know the world doesn't have the balance to stand on anything else for too long."  He marched off.

	As the stallion left the obese pony's sight, Josho could see several cloaked figures standing in a solid line at a distance, with at least half of them staring his way.

	Josho leaned back, blinking.

	Razzar was still.  Then, in eerie silence, he pivoted his mask and turned to face his comrades.  The edges of his hood glowed as he presumably discussed the present situation with them.  The six figures stood in close proximity to the hold's brightest torches.

	Josho rubbed his chin, his nostrils flaring as he stared and contemplated.



	"Hey..."

	Aatxe turned around and did a double-take.

	Rainbow Dash shuffled towards him.  "Do you have some water?"

	"Uhm..."  Aatxe squirmed slightly.  "For consuming purposes or... excreting purposes?"

	"Look, does it matter?"  Rainbow frowned, motioning with her hoof.  "I just need—like—a small jar's worth."

	"I can manage something like that."  Aatxe shuffled over towards a series of metal barrels positioned against the wall.  He grabbed one of several tin cups and uncapped a spicket, pouring a liberal volume of water into the container.  "Here..."  He passed the cup to her.  "If you're about to drink it yourself, be warned.  It's gonna have a weird, metallic taste.  Lots of newcomers are worried after their first sip.  Now, if you're going to give it to the shape-shifter..."

	"Lemme worry about that," Rainbow muttered, turning around with a frown.  "Ponies like you and Seclorum have done enough.

	"Wait!" Aatxe stretched a hoof out.

	The pegasus jolted to a stop, turning to look dully at him.

	Aatxe bit his lip.  After clearing his throat, the stallion avoided her gaze and said, "I think your show of compassion is a good thing.  I'd like to help in anyway I can, I just don't... don't..."

	"What?"  Rainbow glared.  "Don't believe in doing things the peaceful, harmonic way?"

	The stallion sighed.  "No."  He gulped.  "But I'd like to... again..."

	Rainbow Dash blinked at him.

	"Where—if you don't mind me asking—exactly do you come from?"

	"It's..."  Rainbow fidgeted slightly.  "It's a land called Equestria."

	"Equestria..."

	"If you used to fly your airship around these parts, I doubt you heard of it," Rainbow said.  "All the ponies around here ever seem to want to do is wage war and kill each other."

	Aatxe shook his head with a weak smile.  "Not me.  I did the bulk of my work along the frozen coasts of Alafreo and the Southern Straits.  Ponies are in small number along the shoreline, so my crew and I resorted exlusively to being traders.  As soon as the locals saw us, they knew we only wanted to do one thing: barter and trade.  We... we made lots of merchants happy to see us, because we only ever brought profit in our wake.  It was... it was a really warm feeling, to know that we were making things better for the landscape, week after week."  He gulped and glanced into the shadows.  "Something I dwell on a lot these days..."

	Rainbow Dash slowly nodded.  She gave a prolonged exhale, loosening the tension in her angry muscles.  "It was wrong of me to snap at you, and I apologize.  But still..."  She glared once more.  "I can't excuse what's been allowed to happen to that battered creature in the other room."

	"I'm not proud of it myself," Aatxe said.  "I'm not proud of a lot of things.  But we had to do what we did in order to survive."

	"And when the day comes that you finally make it out of here..."  Rainbow narrowed her eyes.  "Will you be ready and willing to live with yourself?"

	Aatxe shook his head.  "No."

	Rainbow twitched at that.

	With a sigh, Aatxe spoke.  "Miss Rainbow Dash, I... I-I've been here for seventeen years.  As much as I want to relish in the hope that somepony like you brings to this place, I... I-I feel that I just can't."  He winced slightly.  "This place is my prison.  And yet... it's also something of a home now."  He looked up.  "I want to get back to the Tarkington and power it up—so that, if nothing else, these poor mares and stallions stuck here with me can finally find freedom and peace.  But me?"  He slowly shook his head.  "I don't know what life the future could hold for me.  I'm almost scared to find out."

	"Yeah, well..."  Rainbow took a deep breath.  "Take it from a pony who's been lucky enough to do the exact opposite of you.  It's totally worth it to be constantly flying again.  That's a home in and of itself—an awesome home."

	Aatxe sighed.  "I wish I could believe you.  But it doesn't matter."

	"Dude, come on—"

	"I am glad for one thing," he said with a weak smile.  "Now that I've met you, I know that I'm not alone."

	She blinked at him.  "What do you mean?"

	"In the last few years, everytime I've looked at my reflection, I've seen a ghost of my past self, somepony who's died slowly day by day for having been forced to do things that he's never wanted to do."  He gazed at her.  "I see your face... and I see the same pony, and yet you've managed to remain heroic and thoughtful in spite of that?  How... j-just how does that work?"

	Rainbow blinked.  She jerked slightly, hearing and feeling the rattle of her loyalty pendant.  A slight grumble, and she said, "Tell you what, I'll show you."

	Aatxe blinked.  "Show me?"

	"But first thing's first."  Rainbow spun, clutched the cup of water in her hooves, and flew back towards the furthest niche of the hold.  "I gotta have a talk with somepony..."
		//------------------------------//
		// A Whole Lot of Love		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash fluttered into the tight alcove, carrying the can of water.

	The fettered changeling immediately jerked away, its fanged mouth warped into a sharp grimace.

	"Shhhh..."  Rainbow Dash murmured.  She stopped flapping her wings, touching down softly on three hooves.  "It's okay."  She shuffled forward, sliding the cup of water towards the creature.  "Here.  I brought you some water."

	"It'll just..."  The changeling squeaked, its dragonfly wings twitching.  "Just bleed out... j-just bleed out of me... forgive me, Mother.  I d-deserve it... I deserve it all..."

	"Hey."  Rainbow Dash knelt down low, catching the creature's gaze.  "Look at me."  Her eyes narrowed.  "Nopony deserves the kind of stuff that's happened to you.  Do you understand me?  Nopony."

	The creature's shell rattled as it tilted its head up.  "Do you really b-believe that?"

	Rainbow smiled slightly.  "Yes."

	A hissing sound.  The changeling grew chin hair while an antler and a horn protruded momentarily from its skull.  "Liar."  It immediately winced, drawing further back into the corner with a whimper.

	Rainbow's smile faded.  She glanced at the floor, clearing her throat.  Nevertheless, she scooted forward and squatted right in front of the trembling specimen.  Behind her, Aatxe shuffled around the corner, watching nervously from a distance.

	"I was hoping that you might be able to help me," Rainbow Dash said.  "You see, my best friends and I have been dragged here... into this trap.  Some of us..."  She winced, her voice wavering as she stammered, "Haven't been so lucky."  She gulped hard.  "The others—well—I don't know for sure whether they're alive or dying.  But... I'm here, and I'm with you.  And if there's anything you know that you can tell me... that can shed some light on what the changelings want with Stratopolis, then it would help me a great deal to know."

	"Hit... it hits it..." the changeling whimpers as it took on Arcshod's facial tattoos.  "It responds to the pain.  It feeds off it.  Dreit.  Delivery more unto it..."

	Rainbow slowly shook her head.  "No.  Not today.  I've no pain to give you."

	"None?"  The changeling twisted hits head up at an angle.  Red dragon scales flickered across its cheek while two rows of teeth formed in its mouth.  "None whatsoever?"

	Rainbow squinted at the creature.  "How... do you do that?"

	"It hits it..."  The creature whimpered as its body fluctuated all over with a dozen different Xonan markings.  "Hrakkan semnul drenna drensen zeminulien trennte!"  It gasped sharply, raising its head up with regal unicorn eyes.  "Blessed children of Xon know only how to curse."  Seclorum's gray mane flickered across its scalp.  "Spark's fire is everlasting."

	"I don't bring fire and I don't bring curses."  Rainbow slid the cup of water forward.  "But I would still like to know more."

	"You have all that you could want to know..."  The creature fell over on its side, kicking its legs like a canine in labor.  "Hrkkkk... bleed me.  You know you want to."

	"No.  I don't."

	A pair of fiery green eyes narrowed at her.  "Why not?"

	Rainbow took a deep breath.  "Because I know what it's like to be a monster, chained up against her will."

	Aatxe raised his eyebrow at that.

	The changeling hissed long and hard, its face evolving into Aatxe's.  "Somepony doubtsssssss youuuuuu..."

	Rainbow smirked straight at the creature.  "I didn't ask him, now did I?"

	The changeling reverted back to its insectoid self, shivering awkwardly.  It glanced back at Aatxe, then at Rainbow again.  With a jerk of its forelimbs, it dragged the metal cup suddenly toward itself.  Water sloshed out, but that was of no consequence.  The thing lapped thirstily at the contents of the container, making tiny gurgling noises.

	Rainbow Dash waited patiently.  She fidgeted a bit until she was squating on folded limbs.  Finally, she spoke, "Better?"

	The changeling said nothing.  It froze in place, hiding its face behind the emptied container.

	Rainbow Dash's lips curved.  "Bet it's been a long time since you ever felt the urge to say 'thank you.'"

	"I will be cracked in half..."  It batted the container away and curled up against the wall, turning its face away from Rainbow.  "Mmmmfff... my insides sucked clean.  The pulp will go back to Mother.  Nnnghhhmfff.... supplement the hatchlings..."

	"But why?"  Rainbow Dash asked, leaning forward.  "Why do you expect to be punished?"

	"So sorry... so sorry, Mother..."

	"Is it because you were captured?"  Rainbow Dash asked.  "Is she mean to the drones that get caught?"

	"No..."  It quivered, stifling a sob.  "The flame burns both ways.  They know.  And we know.  All is knowledge, and all is complete.  Mother feeds and nourishes the young."

	"The Hive Mind..."  Aatxe stammered, his jaw agape.  "Seclorum figured it was too injured to communicate back with its kind.  But... but if—"

	"Shhh!" Rainbow Dash insisted.  She furrowed her brow and slid forward.  "Did... your Mother want you to be captured?"

	The creature's wings twitched.  It shivered and hugged itself with porous hooves.

	Rainbow Dash spoke.  "What kind of a loving Mother would do that to her child?"

	"No..."  The thing hissed.  "Not loving.  The ultimate cruelty would be to starve us."

	"I... I don't understand," Rainbow Dash said.

	"Love is weak," the changeling spat, its shoulders shaking.  "It is a refuge of the days before the Migration.  The plains are ripe with chaos, both light and dark.  Only a fool would feed on love."

	"Then... it is pain that you seek?" Rainbow asked.  "Pain?  Strife?  Bad stuff?"

	"Do not tempt m-me..."

	"Well, what is it?"

	"I said..."  The creature spun, brandishing Collins' face, amber eyes flaring.  "Do not tempt me!"

	Rainbow Dash instantly doubled-back, wincing.

	"You've prevented nothing!"  Collins' face was replaced with Sam Rose's.  "Saved nothing!"  The creature jerked, gargled, then breathed out long and hard.  Its features turned to a wrinkled coat.  "Tell me, young filly," Cold Canter wheezed, looking sad and dazed.  "Are you happy... are you fulfilled on your lonesome?"

	Rainbow gritted her teeth.  "You think all I am is pain and regret?"

	"Snkkkkt...!"  The changeling rolled upside down, laughing hysterically with Bellesmith's voice.  "Shouldddddd a monster know anything else?!"

	"You shouldn't have to fear your Mother punishing you."  Rainbow's eyes narrowed.  "Because she did.  By giving birth to you."

	"What's the matterrrrrr, Rainbow Crash?!"  A stallion snarled before flashing a dark spectral mane and midnight eyes.  "Doth thy temper betray thee?  The worst kind of nightmare is the one thou liveth."

	"And just who's keeping score, huh?"  Suddenly, Rainbow flung her hoof forward and gripped the changeling's forelimb.

	The creature instantly gasped, its green eyes billowing flame as it shivered from the grasp.

	"Miss Dash!"  Aatxe seethed, rushining forward to grab her shoulders.  "What are you thinking?! Don't—!"

	Rainbow spread her wings, knocking him back.  "What's the matter?" she spoke firmly, keeping her eyes locked on the changeling.  "Lost your spine?  Do you bug ponies even have spines?"

	"Please... don't..."  The creature tugged and struggled to yank its hoof out of Rainbow's grip.  "No... sh-she'll punish... punish..."  It choked on a sob and clenched its eyes shut.  "She hates... hates..."

	"You know what I think Chrysalis does?"  Rainbow Dash grinned.  "She lies to you.  There's something stronger.  Something more potent than hate.  She only hides it from you as a means of controlling her brood, making them think that hate is all that's worth foraging.  And you know why?"  Rainbow leaned forward.  "Because she's a coward.  Looking for love in the world?  It's a lot harder.  But it's also a lot cooler.  And—believe me—you can't have pain without it.  A life with nothing but agony on your palette is lame.  Wouldn't you agree?"

	"Please..."  The changeling whimpered, crouching low and burying its face against the hard brick floor.  "It's too strong.  She will see... she will know."

	"How can she?" Rainbow Dash asked.  "Something tells me she hasn't had a good taste in years.  Especially if her kids haven't."

	The changeling shivered, continuing to hide its face.

	Aatxe looked on nervously, his lips pursed.

	"So..."  Rainbow Dash took a deep breath, clutching the changeling's limb with a second hoof, kneading the rigid exoskeleton gently.  "You hungry or what?  Cuz this is all I'm going to give you."

	The changeling trembled... trembled... then relaxed.  Its body went limp.  With a strong breath, it folded its dragon wings together.  The gossamer material turned to gold, forming thick blonde fibers with a red hair-tie.  By the time the orange coat had spread throughout its figure, Rainbow was already struggling to hold her ground.

	Applejack looked up, her eyes teary as she murmured with a dazed expression.  "It's a might bit warmer than I expected..."

	Rainbow Dash clenched her jaw tight, struggling to maintain eye contact.

	Applejack sniffled, rubbing her freckles with her other forelimb.  Chains rattled as she sat up straight, squirming slightly.  Her green eyes blinked, turning brighter and brighter—along with the sheen that made up her gorgeous coat.  "Land's sake... I-I feel like I just gorged myself on a kitchen full of Granny's apple pies..."

	"Yeah..."  Rainbow's voice cracked.  She cleared her throat and struggled to say, "You and me both..."

	Applejack blinked curiously at Aatxe, glanced across the surroundings, then finally narrowed her eyes on Rainbow.  "Sugarcube?"  She gulped.  "Reckon there was somethin' you were fixin' to ask me?"

	Rainbow took a deep breath, then uttered, "Where is Chrysalis?"

	
		//------------------------------//
		// The Strength to Come Back		//------------------------------//

	Pilate struggled his way up a flight of crooked stairs.  He leaned to his left, constantly grazing a slanted wall of slick granite.  He gnashed his teeth with each step.  A thin sheet of water trickled down the stairs, making every hooftrot more perilous and awkward than the last.

	At last, slipping only once or twice, he ascended to the upper level of the temple platform.  He pulled himself forward, gripping onto shards of battered granite in the process.  There was a break in the ceiling, and Pilate emerged upon a solid sheet of drowning rain.

	Sputtering, he nevertheless pressed on, squatting low as he threw his shoulder into the gale force winds.  As he proceeded on his own, the air around him billowed with tempestuous waves of moisture and precipitation.  It wasn't until about halfway through his trek across the upper platform's floor that something happened.  A shadow streaked past the zebra, leaving errant splashes seattling thrugh the collective puddles around him.

	Pilate shuffled to a stop.  He stood up straight, holding his breath in the pelting rain.  His head cocked to the side while his ears flicked against the moisture.

	He heard nothing beyond the constant roar and hiss of the monsoon.

	Clenching his jaw tight, the blind stallion nervously inched forward, keeping his shuffling steps deliberately slow.  When he continued to hear nothing, he accelerated his movement, stumbling towards a break in the rain where he heard less drops falling—a sign of ceiling cover.

	Unbeknownst to him, a shadow darted past yet again, inching closer and closer with each pass.



	Bellesmith winced.  While the changeling's tiny figure shivered on her backside, the mare crawled up until she was even with a shattered pillar and peered directly over the edge of the platform that she was on.

	The temple had revolved around the central structure twice, during which its whole body had twirled around.  At this point, the outer edge—including the precipice upon which she perched—was jutting at its furthest reach from the center.  She guessed that she was three temples' length from the edge of the circular building where she and Eagle Eye first fell, not to mention where she last saw Rainbow Dash and Pilate disembark.

	The gap was too impossible to jump.  Even if she had a running start, Belle would barely make it one one-hundredth of the way before plunging into the my murderous winds.

	However, some things were less impossible than others.  As Bell glanced to her left, she saw a smaller temple gliding past her on a perpendicular course.  It didn't take long to realize that jumping onto that would give her a much closer pedestal to her destination.  However, the platform was dramatically smaller than the temple she was on, and it was gliding by at an alarming rate.  Belle felt her heart beating rapidly even as she contemplated what had to be done next.

	"Elma, I'm going to need you to hold on, darling," Belle said.  She was already trotting backwards, kneading her hooves tighter against the platform's slick surface.  "I mean it.  Grip tight.  This isn't exactly going to be fun."

	"Nnnngh... don't... d-don't..." The changeling whimpered, clinging to her back.  "You'll... w-we'll never make it..."

	"Jee, thanks for the vote of confidence..."  Belle took a deep breath, then an even deeper one.  "Spark help me, I love you, Pilate."  Then, with gnashing teeth, she galloped ahead at full force.  The platform's edge disappeared beneath her.  Breathlessly, she propelled herself into the howling winds.

	The wet, wet world became weightless.  Belle plummeted towards gray nothingness.  She clenched her breath and had faith.  There was a reason why she jumped earlier than expected.

	Sure enough, the winds blew her towards the left.  By the time she fell towards the temple's level, it had magically drifted into the right spot to catch her... although it didn't do so smoothely.

	"Ooomf!"  Belle landed and instanstly pratfalled, collapsing onto her side.  The momentum of her leapt sent her sliding like a torpedo across the slick rock surface.  Halfway through the careerning glide, she opened her aching eyes.

	A gasp escaped her lips; she had lost a great deal of weight.  Or rather...

	"Elma!"  Sputtering, Belle stood up and looked behind her.

	The frail changeling had slipped off upon impact and was rolling like a loose paper bag towards the flying temple's edge.

	"Hold on!"  Bellesmith hollered, immediately sprinting towards the helpless creature.  Puddles splashed and thunder rolled.  She plunged forward, sliding on her belly and clasping the shapeshifter's body with two strong forelimbs at the very last second.

	With a gasp, the changeling dangled from her grasp, her legs and wings flailing in the temple breeze.  Not long after, she was hoisted into Belle's embrace.  The two fell over across the surface of the platform with Belle protectively wrapping her legs around her.  Following a dreadful shiver, the changeling buried its face into Belle's chest and sobbed.

	"It's okay..."  Belle murmured, caressing the changeling's neck and shoulder. "I got you, Elma.  We're okay.  A little shaken up... but we're okay..."

	"No..."  The changeling quivered in her grasp, its exoskeleton flickering to reptilians scales and then reverting back to black.  "It's not okay.  Stop calling me that... st-stop calling me that which I'm not..."

	"You mustn't give up hope, Elma," Belle said with a slight frown.  "I know you're in a bad place, but I'm going to help you live so that you can find yourself a good place."

	"Why...?"  The changeling tilted her head up.  A peach coat lingered under dark tattoos.  Green bangs framed a sad face with green eyes as the filly whimpered, "Why do you love me?"

	Belle's muzzle fell open.  She sniffled as a tear rolled down her cheek along with the rainwater.  "Why wouldn't I?"  She caressed Kera's cheek.  "Elma, you don't have to do this.  Please... just try to relax—"

	"How can I not relax when I'm around you, beloved?"  Kera's voice deepened as her eyes went clear and the tattoos morphed into black and white stripes.  Pilate leaned forward, stifling a sob as he nuzzled Belle close.  "Please, just stay with me.  I forgive you, my love.  I forgive you for everything.  Let's never be apart again..."

	Belle panted and panted.  She clenched her eyes shut, hissing through grinding teeth as she felt the stallion's loving touch.  "Elma, don't..."  She squeaked, fighting the urge to hyperventilate.  "Elma... st-stop it... you're..."  She felt her body go numb while a fire burned in her chest.  "You're robbing me... d-devouring my strength...!"

	The blind zebra blinked.  Tossing its head aside in a plume of green fire, the changeling reverted back to its insectoid self.  The wings on its back buzzed strongly while it nevertheless reeled from the shattered contact.

	Belle caught her breath, sitting up again as she rubbed her aching head.

	The changeling shuffled backwards, wincing.  "I'm a monster, Belle.  Just leave me be.  I don't know what's happening... but your heart... your feelings are so delicious."  It gulped with a clatter of its shell.  "At this rate... I-I'm going to reduce us to nothing..."

	"No..."  Belle gripped its hoof, pulling it back towards her as it kept the creature anchored in place.  "We can do this.  We need each other, Elma."

	"Just stop it..."  The monster whimpered.  "Stop calling me—"

	"It's the you I remember.  And until we're somewhere safe, that's what I'm choosing to call you."  Belle frowned, wiping her tears clean as she forced the changeling to look back at her.  "As far as I'm concerned, you're worth a thousand of the real Elmas.  So stop whining and help me get us to where we need to go.  I can't do all of this on my own."

	The changeling winced.

	"Are you feeling... stronger now?"

	It looked at its porous black hooves, trailing with green smoke.  "Y-yes, actually..."

	"Good.  Then maybe you can walk with me.  We'll move faster without one of us having to carry other."

	"Belle, just why..."  The changeling sighed.  "Why are you doing this?  Why go so far for a monst—..."  It clenched its fanged mouth shut.  "Why do all this for me?"

	"Because I have to know, Elma."

	"Know what?"

	"That you can make it back from the brink."  Belle sniffled.  She glanced back and gave the creature a bittersweet smile.  "Because then it means that maybe I can too..."



	Pilate shuffled under the protective cover of an overhang.  Once free from the rainfall, his watersoaked body shivered.  He limped forward until he brushed into a chunk of loose debris.

	"Unngh!"  He caught himself before he could completely collapse.  He felt around, hearing the rattle of loose chunks of granite.  With a sigh, he pivoted to his sigh, shuffling forward, feeling for a clear path towards the furthest end of the enclosure.

	About a full minute into his movement, he came to a stop.  He froze in place, barely daring to breathe.  In a flash, he swiveled around, facing the rainy world from which he came.

	Pilate's lips pursed, his head craned to the side while his ears tilted forward and then from side to side.  His breaths came in tiny shallow bursts as he endeavored to make sense out of the distorted sound of falling rain drops.

	Dead ahead of the zebra, blocking the gray light of Stratopolis, a cloaked figure stood, its hood and sleeves laced with a dull amber glow.  It stood just as still as Pilate, shadowing the stallion.

	Pilate listened and listened.  He gulped, his teeth clenching tighter.  Slowly, he pivoted back towards the corner of the enclosure, moving his limbs to drift ahead.

	The Lounge member crouched low, coiling its muscles.  The glow intensified as it prepared to spring forward.

	Without warning, Pilate threw his head down, clamped his teeth onto a chunk of granite, and spun back around—wielding the small boulder like a club.

	Smash!  It met the charging figure's silver mask with a loud clank!  The Lounge member reeled back momentarily.

	Panting for breath, Pilate galloped forward.  He slammed into a wall, cursed under his breath, then shuffled along the barrier, following the sound of rain water.  There was a roll of thunder, masking the Lounge member's footsteps so that it sprang upon the stallion from seemingly nowhere.  Pilate felt arms surrounding his chest from behind, wrestling him hard to the floor with a murderous suplex.

	"Ooof!"  Pilate wheezed, rolling onto his backside.  "Hnnnngh!"  He bucked hard, knocking the knee out from the creature.  But with blazing speed the thing slipped around Pilate's weight in the splashing water, wrestling the stallion hard to the ground and pressing its elbows into his back.  "Gaaaugh!  Hmmmphghh... g-get off—"

	Pilate was answered with a metal rod shoved into the back of his neck.  Electrical currents surged through the zebra's body.

	With a violent spasm, Pilate gasped.  His blind eyes rolled back in his head, and he fell limply to the wet floor with a dull thud.  And then he felt nothing.
		//------------------------------//
		// Of Chaos, Mothers, and Love		//------------------------------//

	"Our Mother..."  The face of Applejack quivered under lanternlight.  The changeling shifted back in her chains, curling away from Rainbow Dash.  "...she is everywhere.  She is in all of us..."

	"Who, Chrysalis?" Rainbow leaned forward with an inquisitive gaze.  "Or Tchern?"

	"No..."  Applejack shook her head.  "Not the Night Mother.  She waits on the dark side for her beloved sister to return."  She gulped.  "And return with strength and glory."

	Rainbow Dash blinked.  "So it is Chrysalis who I met."  She rubbed her fuzzy chin, then twitched.  "Wait... wait.  'Return with strength and glory?'  You mean Chrysalis is trying to return to the other side of the plane?"

	"She can't yet... we can't yet," Applejack buried her freckles into her forelimbs.  "There ain't enough power.  There ain't enough misery..."

	"For what?"

	"It's all too much, sugarcube..."

	"Hey..."  Rainbow reached forward and gently grasped the pair of orange hooves before her.  "Look at me."  She held her ground as the moist green eyes looked her way.  "It's okay to tell me.  What is Chrysalis making her brood devour misery for?"

	Applejack sniffled.  "We must be strong.  We must have a heapin' helpin' of might if we're to help the Night Mother win the War."

	Rainbow's lips pursed.  "What War?"

	The changeling's black exoskeleton showed for a moment, then waxed back to fuzzy orange.  "Why, the Trinary War, sugarcube."

	Rainbow Dash could only blink at that.  She turned to look back at Aatxe, but the stallion could only shrug.

	"Mother's been feedin' and feedin'..."  Applejack shuddered into the lamplight.  "Xona was mighty easy for us to get our vittles.  But now it's time to fall back..."

	"Fall back to where?"

	"We would have gone west, but Mother changed her mind.  There was nothin' left for her brood to feed on there."

	"West...?" Aatxe murmured.  "West, where?"

	Rainbow raised her hoof to silence him.  She craned her neck the changeling's way.  "Why was going west no longer an option?"

	"There was no point in exploitin' the peace," Applejack stammered.  "Chaos consumed harmony all on its lonesome.  Mother sensed it, and her children out in the field witnessed it first hoof.  It was a famished land, no longer worth the trouble.  But..."

	Rainbow gulped.  "But what..."

	The mare looked up with teary eyes.  "Mother sensed that Chaos was comin' her way.  If she just had us wait where we were, then the final ingredient would saddle up to the table in Xona."  She choked back on a sob.  "We got all that we needed, sugarcube.  Death... pain... misery.  It all worked out as Mother intended it."

	Rainbow Dash was silent.  She stood up and paced between the bricklaid walls, staring down at her hooves.

	Aatxe stared at her worriedly.

	"Don't be mad, darlin'..."  Applejack smiled painfully, rolling over to her side and rattling the chains.  "Mother knows all.  She chained the mighty Divine of Magic.  She carved a continent in two.  All falls into place with her plan, for she is beautiful and godlike."

	"But not very merciful..." Rainbow muttered to the wall.

	Applejack shivered.  "Why... sh-should she be?  She is a powerful and wise Mother..."

	"And she cares for her children because she feeds you guys, right?"

	The changeling shook its head.

	"Tell me..."  Rainbow Dash slid down onto her hooves and grasped the changeling's forelimbs.  "Look at me and t-tell me..."  She gulped and reached forward with a trembling hoof, ultimately caressing Applejack's cheek.  Her voice cracked, "Have you ever been fed like th-this?"

	Applejack gazed up into Rainbow's eyes with a trembling muzzle.  Slowly, her orange coat turned darker, and her long blonde mane was replaced with a violet swath of hair.  "No..." Scootaloo whimpered, shaking her head.  "No... never..."  Tears fell from her violet eyes in little green bursts.  "It's too much... f-far too much..."

	Rainbow Dash clenched her jaw tight.  "What kind of a Mother would rob her child of this?"

	The changeling was at a loss for words.  Scootaloo's legs curled to her chest and she collapsed with bitter sobs.  Rainbow reached forward and held the petite thing close, weathering its sobs as it surrendered to her embrace.

	With a cold exhale, Rainbow gazed into the torchlight beyond.  "I don't know about you, kiddo, but I'm starting to realize why it is that Tchern—the Night Mother—kicked out her sister."  She turned and glanced back at Aatxe's nervous figure.  She patted Scootaloo's back.  "One of the former alicorns had its priorties right, and the other didn't."

	"B-But she wants to end the Trinary War!"  Scootaloo's muffled voice whimpered.  "She has to!  She loves the Night Mother!"

	"Then tell me..."  Rainbow Dash held Scootaloo back, staring at her tear-stained face.  "Why doesn't she love you?"

	Scootaloo bit her lip, gazing nervously at the floor.

	"Look at me."  Rainbow Dash tilted her head up.  "You said that Chrysalis has now pulled back.  She couldn't go west.  So... where did she go?"

	Scootaloo sniffled, then glanced down at her curled forelimbs.  "Val Roa."

	Rainbow Dash raised an eyebrow.  "Val Roa...?"  A blink, and she turned back at Aatxe.

	He was already clearing his throat.  "It's... a... It's a kingdom far east of here," he said.  "Dead center of one of the Shattered Continents."

	"You've been there?" Rainbow asked.

	"No."  Aatxe shook his head.  "But anyone who's done trading as far west as Alafreo has heard about it."

	"Lemme guess..."  Rainbow Dash's ears folded atop a lethargic expression.  "They're ravaged daily by war as well..."

	Aatxe's face contorted with a grimace.  "Heck no!  At least..."  He fidgeted.  "It wasn't around seventeen years ago when I was still flying!  The place is the last bastion of civilization before the Grand Choke, after all.  It'd be a shame for them to get involved in a petty conflict!"

	"The Grand Choke..."  Rainbow Dash murmured.

	"But... but if this 'Chrysalis' character weaseled her way inside..."

	Rainbow Dash turned towards Scootaloo.  "Do you know what your Mother is doing in Val Roa?"

	Scootaloo bit her lip and shook her head.

	Rainbow's nostrils flared.  "She impersonated Princess Lasairfion in Xona.  Is she going to do the same in this eastern kingdom?"  Her eyes narrowed.  "To wreak havoc and chaos?"

	"There is much... much misery left to feed on," Scootaloo said.  "All th-that's needed is to bring the prison there to contain the vessels."

	"The prison?"

	"Rainbow Dash..."

	The pegasus glanced back at Aatxe.

	"This place," he said softly.  "Chrysalis needs this place."

	"Yeah, no kidding."  Rainbow frowned.  "But how can she expect to move Stratopolis?  It's not like she's related to any of the ancient pegasi who—"  Her ruby eyes widened.  A pale sweat formed along her brow.  She turned towards Scootaloo.  "Your Mother wanted me to be here for a reason, didn't she?"

	Scootaloo squeaked, "Chaos is the quickest way for Mother to feed us..."

	"Look at me..."  Rainbow Dash caressed the filly's mane and leaned forward.  "Do I really... really strike you as an agent of chaos?"

	Scootaloo blinked.  A tear rolled down her cheek, and she smiled.  Sniffling, she leaned in, nuzzled Rainbow Dash's chest, and looked up.  She smiled again.
		//------------------------------//
		// A Hop, Skip, and Jump		//------------------------------//

	"Blast it..."  Bellesmith hissed between her teeth.

	"What?!"  Elma stammered, halfway between two different equine forms.  A pair of bright green eyes winced under pelting raindrops.  "What is it?"

	"This gap is too large," the mare replied, staring across the space between their rotating temple and the circular structure in the center.  "All it takes is one leap... but I'm afraid it's a leap I can't make."

	"Maybe..."  Elma gulped, its fangs showing with a nervous wince.  "Maybe if we wait long enough, this platform will bring us past another structure that's closer to our goal."

	"Or it could smash us into another careening temple altogether."  At the sound of thunder, Belle stared up towards the swirling summit of Stratopolis.  "This place is so chaotic as it is.  I'm afraid of waiting for too long."

	"But you said it yourself," Elma stammered.  "It's not a space that you can jump."

	Belle blinked.  "Not me, no..."

	"Bellesmith...?"

	With a grunt, Belle lowered her body.  Elma slinked off of her, leaning back on its haunches.  She jerked in surprise when it felt the mare holding its hooves delicately.

	"Elma... I've asked you to put faith in me.  Now I think it's time I put some faith in you."

	"Huh...?"  The changeling gulped.  It glanced at the looming structure, then at the tempestuous winds between them and their goal.  "Oh, Bellesmith, no!"

	"Every second we waste is another second closer to death.  If we want to see our friends again—if we want to make it out of here safely, then we have to move and move now."

	"But I-I can't!"  Elma quivered, her shell rattling as she stared fearfully at the gap.  "I can barely hold myself up!"

	"Yes, you can, Elma," Belle said.  She smiled hopefully.  "You single-hoofedly carried my beloved to safety, did you not?"

	"Y-Yes!  Of course!  But..."

	"But what?"

	"That was d-different!"

	"How so?"

	Elma winced, avoiding Belle's gaze.

	"In what way, Elma?"

	"I just..."  Elma whimpered.  "I-I just don't want to give anyone more reasons to h-hate me anymore..."

	"Look at me."

	"Somewhere, someplace, Miss Boreal's family is waiting for a turtle who will never come home and—"

	"Elma..."  Belle tilted the creature's chin up.  Their eyes met.  With a soft smile, Belle said, "Does this feel like hate?"

	The wings on Elma's backside twitched.  It exhaled shudderingly.  "No..."

	"You are as strong as you need to be," Belle said.  "Even stronger.  I wouldn't believe in you if that wasn't the case."

	Elma gulped.  Half of the changeling's face developed stripes while the other side formed tattoos.  "You r-really... haven't given up on me?"

	"No, Elma."  Belle gently shook her head.  "Neither have I given up on them."

	Elma nevertheless twitched.  "How... h-how could somepony be so loyal?"

	"I'll give you one guess," Belle said.

	Elma's shivers stopped.  The changeling blinked, and immediately its shell morphed to a fuzzy blue coat.  Sniffling, Rainbow Dash frowned, sprouting muscular wings in a burst of green flame.  "Pffft.  This is foal's play."

	The pegasus stood up straight and grasped Bellesmith's shoulders. Her wings spread as she faced the inner structure on their platform's tightest turn.

	"That's more like it, Elma!" Belle said in earnest.  "Just a hop, skip, and a jump—"

	"Please."  Rainbow smirked devilishly as she began flapping her feathers.  "As if I'm not that amazing."

	Belle stifled a giggle.  "Not quite the right word, but it's close enough."



	"Mmmfnngh!"  Eagle Eye threw himself onto a craggy platform's edge.  Wincing, he pulled with every inch of his forward muscles, rolling himself slowly onto even ground.  He slumped on his back, panting.

	Lighting flashed, illuminating the puddles around him in a bright strobe of heated energy.  The crackle of thunder felt too close, and he immediately winced.

	"Blessed Spark, one of these days, would it be too much to ask that I wake up with wings?"  He sat up, levitating his sword beside his skull.  "I promise, I'll mostly use them for accessorizing."

	Suddenly, his eyes twitched.

	"Bombastic ballerinas!!"  He scampered towards the platform's edge and stared down below at a steep seventy degree angle.  "Hey!  Heeeeeeeeeeey!  Belle!  Rainbow!  Up here!"

	Far below, two bodies could be seen lunging from one platform to another.  Gliding through the air for the space of five wet seconds, they landed safely on the outer rim of the large circular structure.  Without hesitation, the two mares scampered for cover, taking shelter beneath the outstretching balcony.

	"Hey!  Look up!  Look up!  It's Eagle Eye!  The cute one, remember?!"

	It was too late.  As thunder rolled and the magical currents carried Eagle's platform further from the central structure, he realized there was no chance in making visual contact once more.

	"Eeeeughhh..."  He slumped against a pillar, blowing at several loose strands of damp mane hair.  "Who'd a thunk I'd be so desperate to chase mares down."  He went cross-eyed, then slapped his own skull.  "Darn it, old stallion!  Get outta my head!"

	Glancing to his three o'clock, he saw a large platform looming in the path of his platform's rotation.  Breathless, he scampered across the granite stretch of floor and prepared to make another death-defying leap.
		//------------------------------//
		// This One's for the Books		//------------------------------//

	"Val Roa?!"  Seclorum exclaimed, gawking.

	Arcshod and several other Xonans glanced at one another with similar confusion.

	"Uhm... some details would be a big help, Color Wheel," Josho muttered across the lamplight.

	"It's a kingdom located far to the east," Rainbow Dash said, facing all of the gathered survivors of the hold.  "Like... super far.  But that's small stuff for a Queen like Chrysalis to sweat.  She's got her broodlings situated—like—everywhere, and they're all picking up information about everything under the sun, giving her the freedom to move east and do what it is that she wants to do."

	"Which is...?"  Prowse leaned forward, pale brow furrowed.

	"Well... uhm... that's hard to say," Rainbow Dash said.  "But considering who and what she's impersonated before..."  She gave Lasairfion a brief glance and continued.  "...odds are it won't be good for the ponies who live in that place."

	"Is she gonna start another super stupid war?!" Props remarked.

	"I don't see what's stopping her," Rainbow Dash said.  "Chrysalis was once an alicorn who lived in the kingdom where I'm from, Equestria," she explained.  "Her and her sister Tchern have been in exile for countless thousands of years, during which they've mutated into shapeshifting monsters who feed on emotion."

	"There's another changeling queen named Tchern?!" Seclorum exclaimed.

	Rainbow swiveled to stare blankly at them.  "What, you didn't get that out of the little fella after days and weeks of torture?"

	Seclorum clenched his jaws and said nothing.

	Razzar's masked face turned left and right.  He stepped forward from the Lounge, his voice crackling to life:  "Assuming Chrysalis has a diabolical plan for the kingdom of Val Roa, then what is her purpose with this place?"

	"Who's to know who or what Stratopolis actually belongs to," Rainbow Dash said with a shrug.  "I have my ideas—but none of that is important right now.  What is important is that Chrysalis has been using this place as a base of operations, and it will totally benefit her to have it located much closer to her new place of operations."

	"You mean Val Roa?" Prowse remarked.

	"Think about it," Aatxe said from where he stood beside Ranbow.  "Chrysalis has been impersonating Lasairfion for months... years.  She needed a place to keep most of the replaced ponies—a prison where the changelings could gather, feed, recharge, and then fly back into action."

	"The Strip of Flurries has been masking this place for Celestia-knows how long!" Rainbow exclaimed.  "But it's too dang far away to be of any use to her in Val Roa."

	"So she needs to move it," Razzar remarked.  "That would suggest that she knows some way of accessing the navigation systems of this place."

	"Rainbow Dash, for it is called," Lasairfion's voice resonated.  Arcshod and other Xonans stepped aside as she shuffled forward, staring inquisitively at her.  "It is curious that it has so many attachments to this place."

	Silence.  Rainbow blinked, then pointed at her.  "What?  Me?"

	Lasairfion nodded.  "Its rulers held past blood with that which mothers the brood.  Its wings match those in corpses and mosaics."

	"Yeah... about that..."  Rainbow Dash rubbed the back of her head with a nervous smile.  "Ehhh... seems like this place flew by Equestria long, long ago.  A bunch of ancient pegasi led by Commander Hurricane took control of Stratopolis, it would seem."

	"It would seem?"  Seclorum remarked, squinting at the pegasus.  "Well, did she or didn't she?"

	"That's what the words on her tomb suggest," Rainbow said with a shrug.  "The ancient warriors of Pegasopolis saw this place as a big huge threat to the Harmony of Equestria and moved it."

	"How?" Razzar asked.

	"Uhhhhhh..."  Rainbow Dash blinked.

	"Rainbow..."  Josho spoke, staring at her pointedly.

	Props leaned in.  "Your magic touch..."

	"Magic... touch...?" Lasairfion repeated.

	Rainbow gulped and said, "Turns out that the crystals that filled the control room around Hurricane's tomb responded to my touch and nopony else's.  Well... uhm... nopony—that is—until..."

	"Until the damnable shape shifters took your form and screwed everything up for your friends and us!" Seclorum said with a growl.  "Sometimes I wonder just how much help you are, Miss Dash."

	"Secchy, lay off," Josho grumbled.

	"Why should I?!"  Seclorum gestured with his hoof.  "Don't you see?!  Chrysalis and her goons had the foresight to expect this!  Hell!  They could have coerced your and your friends to specifically take the flight path you did that brought you here!  Just how many blood tests did you give the strangers you met on your journey from the Xonan battlefield?!"

	Josho sighed and ran a hoof through his hair.  "None..."

	"Exactly!  For the love of the Spark!  Nothing's happened that they haven't somehow orchestrated!"

	"Bloody Hell..."  Prowse stammered.

	"Secchy, if you've paid any damned attention..."  Josho growled. "You'll realize that Rainbow's done enough and lost enough to prove that she's on our side—"

	"But!"  Rainbow silenced the room, her eyes darting across everyone's gaze.  "I won't deny that—yeah—there's been a lot of diabolical fluff thrown into the mix here.  From what the changeling told me, it's pretty clear that Chrysalis has anticipated my arrival."

	"Equestria was going to be Chrysalis' second target," Aatxe added.  "But... uhm..."  He glanced nervously at Rainbow.  "Looks like something made her choose Val Roa at the last second."

	Rainbow sighed, her wings drooping.  She closed her eyes, gulped, and glanced up.  "A lot of bad stuff went down in my kingdom when I began my journey.  Equestria suffered a major blow.  Harmony took a big dip while... erm... a chaos rift s-sorta formed in the center of the nation.  I... I-I lost a lot of good friends..."  She gulped.  "I lost everything."

	The ponies were silent as they waited for her to go on.

	"Long story short, there's nothing to feed on in my hometown cuz the banquet food's already gone stale."

	"So the bug lass is fixin' to get her something meatier to munch on?" Prowse remarked.

	Rainbow nodded.  "Seems like Val Roa is a peaceful enough place for her to set up shop..."  She exhaled through flaring nostrils.  "And do to that kingdom what she's done to Xona and Ledomare."

	The survivors mumbled amongst themselves.

	"But I feel as though you keep deviating from the most important matter at hand," Razzar said, pointing at the pegasus.  "She was waiting for you to show up in this place, because you obviously act as some sort of key."

	"It would seem so, yeah," Rainbow Dash said with a nod.  "But it's gotta be for doing more than just moving a bunch of huge friggin' temples into one another and crashing them into bits."

	"Maybe she knows of some way to control all of Stratopolis?!"  Props remarked, her bright blue eyes glancing at everypony.  "Could there be a hidden chamber of sorts?"

	"We'd be looking for a door, if that was the case," Aatxe said.

	Ponies murmured aloud, pondering.

	Then, with sudden enlightenment, Lasairfion's regal eyes widened.  "Urohringr," she murmured.

	Rainbow Dash gave her a double-take.  "Buh?"

	Arcshod gaped at his queen.  "He'lunniul trenna su'lien Austraeoh niul Urohringr en'vanna sien?"

	Lasairfion nodded.  "Dreit."  She turned to look at Rainbow Dash.  "Has it heard the legend of the Celestial Circle?"

	"Hooboy..."  Rainbow's ears drooped as she glared boredly.  "Here we go."
		//------------------------------//
		// The Circles Inside of Circles		//------------------------------//

	"Nagu'n the serpent Goddess hails from spinning cosmos," Lasairfion said in her thick, rolling accent.  "World of constants\ circles before dawning of mortal life."  Her eyes narrowed.  "It calls it 'Urohringr,' the spheres within spheres.  Says the scriptures of much darkening: evil in angles and curve.  It bleeds unto itself, devouring and leeching.  Circles break and give way to shadows between starlight.  Ever since, task most noble it is of Nagu'n to restore balance between shards of Urohringr."

	Before Rainbow Dash could say something, Props dashed forward.  "And just what's this 'Urohringr' gotta do with this place?  Or with Dashie?"

	Arcshod glanced aside at his Queen.  "Melsun'ielen rekkh'ar threndu Urohringr sara kelem'dreen."

	Lasairfion nodded and turned to face the newcomers again.  "With great repetitioning appears the symbol of spheres inside spheres around us.  Changeling's city of floating prison breathes with the darkness of the cosmic world.  Nagu'n's forsaken glory trails off every corner, and symbols sing of die cast before chaos everswirilng."

	"Symbols..."  Rainbow Dash gulped.  "I... I saw a wall before.  It was a barrier with this crazy mosaic of rings within rings..."

	Arcshod shuddered.  "Murielen sep'andrek Austraeoh threanna malakeen Xon-Nagu'n..."

	"It speaks of great relavencing," Lasairfion stammered, her eyes falling upon Rainbow and her pendant.  "Scriptures speak of Austraeoh, beacon destined to pierce chaos shadow and restore balance for glory of Nagu'n."

	"Wait..."  Josho blinked awkwardly.  "You tattooed dudes' actually foretell color wheel here?"

	Rainbow brushed a hoof across his shoulder.  "Easy, chief.  It's something I've more or less known ever since I landed in the Sacred Hold."  She nevertheless gulped.  "Just a consequence of the Xonans having inherited the language of ponies far older than anyone else who trots this earth."

	"No friggin' way.  You talking about the old pegasi that Khao's yucks farted themselves to death over?"

	"I don't know what I'm talking about anymore," Rainbow Dash muttered aside.  She trotted forward and squinted her eyes at Lasairfion.  "Just what is this 'Austraeoh' prophesied to do when she comes into contact with Urohringr?"

	"It does not understand."  Lasairfion briskly shook her head.  "Nagu'n's blessed cosmos exist only in fragments.  Urohringr is no longer."

	"Er... right..."

	"But upon the Shattering of Spheres, many eggs hatched.  Containers possessed essence of cosmic glory.  Xon only knows glory; Nagu'n chooses not to sing out of reverance.  Eggs hatch and glory sprouts wings.  Celestial sentries that are neither ponies nor serpents, monitor the skies and bring righteous conviction and blood."

	"Eggs... sentries... wh-what?!"  Josho wheezed.

	"Almost sounds like what Handsome would say!" Props chirped.

	"Really?"  Rainbow glared at her with thin eyes.  "Care to interpret?"

	"Uhm... s-sounds to me like the universe of 'spheres within spheres' shattered, and in its place there appeared a bunch of 'sentries' whose job it was to watch over the world as we now know it."

	"More like Urohringr was sundered," Rainbow Dash said.

	Prowse spoke up, "And Stratopolis seems prime material for one of these crazy-flank'd 'sentries.'"

	"And what of the symbols that lie around this place?" Razzar spoke up from where he stood with the Lounge.  "Was this 'sentry' waiting specifically for 'Austraeoh?'"

	Rainbow Dash rubbed her chin in thought.  "Stratopolis floated into Equestrian airspace.  It brought tons of bad weather and chaos and crap.  Commander Hurricane intercepted it... discovered she and she alone could somehow control it.  Hurricane gives up her life to move this thing far away from Equestria.  Eons later, Chyrsalis finds this place, studies the symbols inside.  Meanwhile, she gobbles up Xonan culture, finds out all about 'Urohringr' n'crap, and senses m-me coming from Equestria..."

	"Only Austraeoh has power for piercing Urohringr's seal," Lasairfion.

	"Yeah?"  Aatxe squinted.  "To what end?"

	Lasairfion calmly said, "Glory of Xon."

	Seclorum rolled his eyes and groaned.

	"Maybe... maybe I can do something to that symbol I found earlier," Rainbow Dash said.  "I can open a way to what lies behind the barricade!"

	"And what?"  Seclorum remarked.  "Get us into the core of this damnable place?"

	"Of course!" Aatxe claimed.  "If perhaps another of her kind could do it eons ago, then why can't she?  I mean, she's the first pony with wings to show up here in ages!"

	"We do need to get to the core of this building bloody badly," Prowse remarked.  "Otherwise, we'll never get the energy crystals to breathe life back into the Tarkington."

	"Then what are we waiting for?"  Josho remarked.  "We get our flanks to this place, have Rainbow opened the barricade, get what we need, and blow this waterlogged popsicle stand!"

	Rainbow opened her mouth to speak.

	"I have an even better question," Razzar said.

	"And what's that?" Seclorum asked.

	Razzar's silver mask tilted about.  "Why hasn't Chyrsalis' brood opened this barricade alredy?"

	Everypony was silent.

	"Evidently, they have copied Rainbow Dash's essence into their hive mind," the Lounge leader continued.  "What's to stop them from getting to the core of this place themselves?"

	"They..."  Props fidgeted where she stood.  "They must be waiting for us to make the f-first move!"

	"Or waiting to spring a trap," Seclorum droned.

	Josho gnashed his teeth.

	Ponies glanced at one another and murmured in nervous fear.

	"That..."  Rainbow Dash winced halfway through trying to speak. " ...that c-can't be a good thing."

	"The next course of action seems obvious to me," Razzar stated.  "We must bring Rainbow Dash to the symbol as swiftly as possible and access the core of Stratopolis for ourselves."

	"But what if that's what they're expecting us to do?!" Aatxe remarked.

	"It seems an even greater risk to cower in here and allow our shapeshifting foes complete access to the rest of this floating death trap."  Razzar glanced in Lasairfion's direction.  "If the monarch's words hold resonance, then there is something far older and more powerful than even Chrysalis to be had in this place.  We owe it to ourselves and the rest of the world to make sure that changeling nemeses do not gain access.  Val Roa is already doomed.  What lies next in the destructive path?"

	"I hate to say it..."  Josho rubbed his chin, then glanced Rainbow's way.  "But I'm with creepy-face over here."

	"The first line of defense is a good offense."  Seclorum nodded.  "I concur.  Miss Dash?  What do you think?"

	"Doesn't look like there's much thinking involved," Rainbow muttered.  "Only a crap-ton of doing."

	"We will lead the charge," Razzar said, gesturing towards his lackeys.  The rest of the Lounge cocked their weapons and stood up straight at attention.  "Our weapons and training will decimate the elusive hoard if they try to attack us."

	"Ge'salanna hrenna theem drenn'adren," Arcshod said, jaw tight.  Several able-bodied warriors stood proudly at his side.  "Mer'nassan the'luniel sulien Austraeoh rekkah threen."

	"Looks like you've got yourself a regular hoofball team, Dashie!" Props exclaimed.

	"She sure as heck does!"  Prowse nodded, patting Prop's shoulder.  "I'll lend every hoof I have left, even if I have to build a new one.  Secchy?"

	"We can't do this without you, Missy," Seclorum said, shuffling up to the pegasus.  "You seem like a pony of action.  You game for a trip to the heart of this place?"

	"Absolutely..."  Rainbow's voice trailed off, as did her eyes.  She glanced towards the far corner of the torchlit place.  After a blink, she squinted at the Ledomaritan Enforcer.  "On one condition, though..."
		//------------------------------//
		// The Game is a Hoof		//------------------------------//

    “Absolutely out of the question!”  Seclorum’s growling voice echoed across the tight brick walls of the chamber as he stood several feet away, frowning.  “You let that monster free, and you’ll doom us all!”

    “If you ask me, the doom has already been brought upon us,” Rainbow Dash said as she fiddled with the manacles clasped around the emaciated changeling’s forelimbs.  “Torturing a creature that’s hooked up to hive mind?  Whew!  Talk about shoving your name to slot number one of the Darwhinny Awards!”

    “There’s no telling what will come of this expedition!” Seclorum snarled.  “We could still need it for information!  And if it should summon its fellow broodlings in to attack us--”

    “Secchy, please,” Aatxe grumbled as he trotted past the unicorn with a set of keys dangling around one forelimb.  “We all know that if the changelings wanted us dead, they could easily have raided the hold and slaughtered all of us by now.”

    “And just what do you think you’re doing?!”

    Aatxe sighed.  “What I should have done months ago.”  With a weary smile, he hoofed the keys over to Rainbow Dash.  “There ya go.”

    “I think you should do the honors,” Rainbow said, stretching the changeling’s bound hoof towards the instruments.  “If not for the little dude here, then for your conscience.”

    Aatxe blinked.  With a nervous breath, he nodded and trotted forward.  “Very well then.”

    “I still think this is a horrible plan,” Seclorum said.  “The only reason Arcshod and His Royal Highness voted to comply is because of some backwards religious prophecy mumbo jumbo about this ‘flame bearing Ostrich-oh horse.’  And the Lounge?  Never trust anyone with cold blood!  So help me, Ledo, if you so much as--”

    “Look, either we free this poor guy or I’m not budging an inch to help you ponies get the locked-away crystals for the Tarkington!” Rainbow said, frowning his way.  “You can sit on that until your gray mane hairs fall out, for all I care.”

    Seclorum blinked, his muzzle gaping.  He tilted his gaze aside at Aatxe.

    Aatxe paused in the middle of unlocking the manacles.  He blinked back and smiled awkwardly.  “Uhm… what she s-said.”

    Seclorum’s brow furrowed.  With a frown, he swiveled around and stormed off down the hallway.

    “Pleasant stallion,” Rainbow Dash said.

    “Don’t be too harsh on the pony,” Aatxe said, working on the last cuffs.  “I’m not all that proud of everything we’ve done under his lead, but his tenacity has encouraged us to survive dire straits.”

    “But does he have to be so bitter?”

    “A lifetime at war will do that.”

    “Yeah, but even with all the crap I’ve been through, I…”  Rainbow Dash paused in mid-speech, her eyes crooked.

    Aatxe looked curiously at her.

    “Weird…”  Rainbow gulped dryly.  “Really, really weird…”

    “What is?”

    “Just days ago, surrounded by friends and perfectly safe, I was the most bitter mare on earth,” Rainbow muttered.  “But here?”  She glanced up, sniffling slightly into the torchlight.  “Stuck in the belly of a flying Tartarus, surrounded by changelings, with one of my best friends having just kicked the bucket…”  Her words trailed off.

    “You strike me as a pony of action,” Aatxe said with a slight smile.

    “I guess I’m just best when I’m stupid,” Rainbow muttered.  She nodded her head towards the shuddering changeling they were unfettering.  “Like this, for example.”

    “I wouldn’t call this stupid.”  Aatxe said as he unlocked the last cuff and dropped the metal bits to the floor.  “But you certainly seem to only see forward.”

    “Am I doing a horribly bad thing here, Aatxe?” Rainbow asked.  “Is this somehow gonna kill all the ponies stuck in this place?”

    “We’ve been wasting away here for years, subsisting on prison food and forced to endure tempests and decay,” the stallion muttered.  He gazed at her with a tired pair of eyes.  “We were all killed long, long ago.”  He gestured at the changeling.  “Even if this is the only soul you free, I’d say you were brought here to do a good thing, Miss Dash.”

    Rainbow smiled awkwardly at that.  She turned and scooped the weak changeling up in her forelimbs.  “Come on, pal.  Stretch your wings, why don’tcha?  You’re gonna need them with the nasty winds out there.”

    “Nasty… winds…?”

    “Yeah.  I know it may not be much like sunshine,” Rainbow said as she slung the creature over her back.  “But, hey, it’s freedom.”

    “Freedom…”  The changeling stared at her with quivering fangs.  The black shell gave way for orange fuzz and freckles.  “What’s it y’all want, sugarcube?  Why are you doin’ this?”

    “Why am I not?”  Rainbow smirked and trotted briskly for the far end of the hallway, followed by Aatxe.  “I’ve been in chains myself.  Most uncool.  Now let’s get you out of here.”

    The effigy of Applejack blinked.  With a soft smile, it leaned forward, nuzzling the middle of Rainbow’s shoulders as it was carried safely away from the niche of misery.




    ”These creatures can attack us from any angle,” Razzar said as he paced before his fellow compatriots.  Behind the Lounge, the rest of the Hold’s population was hauling together crossbolts, makeshift bludgeons, and supplies.  “We must be prepared for an assault from the sky, the walls, and even the floors.  They can blend in with anything imaginable, and seeing as we have the superior firepower, this group will be relying on our talents.  Let us worry about restitution and payment after we’ve escaped the winds of this place.”

    ”But Razzar,” one masked member tilted his hooded head about.  ”The pegasus is freeing one of them. Surely this will only set us up for a terrible ambush.”

    “Ambush or not, the pegasus is the key we need to get to the heart of this building.  The survivors here will not be able to escape without the energy sources contained within.  And as to reaching the controls of this place--”

    “We will surely perish!” the figure exclaimed, his gloved fists clenched.  ”She is leading us into a trap with her misguided generosity!”

    ”I trained us to be strong and resourceful.  Whatever happens, we will be prepared for it.  Focus on your strengths and do not obsess with fear and doubt.”

    “This is simply a terrible idea,” the Lounge member hissed from beneath his mask.  ”We will die and our skins will turn to dust in the gales of this place--”

    Ch-Chtkk!  In one dynamic twirl, Razzar had unholstered a crystal rifle and planted the double barrels to the peak of the figure’s mask.  ”On.  Your.  Knees.”

    The other members fidgeted fearfully.  Slowly, the figure under the weapon’s sight slumped down to a nervous crouch.

    Mist wafted out from the edges of Razzar’s mask.  ”Who is strong and wise?  Speak it.”

    There was a wheezing sound.  The kneeling figure trembled before crackling forth:  ”You are, Razzar…”

    ”Razzar who?”

    ”Razzar, our strong and resourceful leader.”

    ”And do you know the cost of being weak and frail?”

    The other members all instinctively turned to stare down the kneeling figure.

    With a shudder, the member said, ”Yes, Razzar, I know the cost.”

    ”And if we were still on our ship, you would experience that cost at full force,” the leader said.  “However, we are about to undergo a most dangerous task.”  He holstered his weapon and stood tall.  “And my need for allies in the forthcoming trial supersedes the example I would have had to make of you.  Now, stand up.”

    The figure did so, hissing in shallow breaths.

    ”Do not question my strength and authority again, and maybe I will forget your tongue by the time we fly to freedom.”

    “Yes, Razzar, leader.”  The figure bowed slightly.  ”I am grateful for your mercy.”

    ”Don’t waste your breath, especially with insincerity.”  Razzar pointed with a gloved finger.  ”Busy yourself with contacting Vaughan.  Inform him about the mission we are about to undergo.  If the winds abide, we may have to rely on air support.”

    ”Understood.”

    ”The rest of you, make sure your weapons are in perfect order.  We will need them at fully functioning capability for the hour to come.”

    As Razzar continued pacing, Props and Prowse looked over from a distance.

    Props blinked.  “Wowsers.  They certainly don’t buck around.”

    “How’d you pick up these sods to begin with?” Prowse asked.

    “Actually, they tried to pick you up.”  Props winced, blushing.  “Well, erm, the other you, I mean.”

    “So they were trying to do your crew a favor?”

    “Yup yup yup!  That is… until they started chasing and shooting at us.”

    Prowse scratched his scruffy chin.  “I’m afraid I don’t know what to make of them.”

    “Me neither.”  Props spun with bright blue eyes.  “But they totally seem super helpful right now, huh?”

    Prowse smirked.  “Look how brave my little Propsicle has become, trusting lizards in masks.”

    “Oh, I haven’t gotten a spine yet!  But give it a few ticks!”  Props leaned in, gave Prowse’s cheek a peck, and leaned back.  “Whelp…”  She slid her goggles over her eyes.  “It’s been groovy, Unky Prowsy, but I gotta get my Dash-Dash on!”

    “Huh?!”  Prowse glanced between the mare and the other clusters of ponies preparing for the expedition.  “Lassie, you can’t be serious!  You barely have anything to defend yourself with!”

    “Like soot-bugs, I don’t!”  She waved a heavy wrench around, smiling with a dangling tongue.  “I can loosen some wicked nuts, if you know what I mean!  Heehee!”

    “If you’re going with this crazy bunch of buggers, then so am I!”  Prowse hobbled towards where his partially constructed prosthetic lingered.  “Just let me fetch my boomstick--”

    “To do what?”  Props shrugged.  “Ain’t much of a boomstick if it can’t go boom yet!”

    “Just give me a few miracle minutes to tweak it!  I’ll be there by your side, lickety-split, to blast bug-ponies senseless!”

    “Unky Prowsy…”  Props yanked him back by his tail then supported him before the three-legged stallion could fall over.  “I’ll be okay.  I’m a big filly now!”

    “I know, but--”

    “No you don’t.”  Props gulped.  “And… And I-I can’t even begin to explain it.  But I’ve grown in a zany bunch of places and it’s high time I owned up to it.  I can’t hide inside Nancy Jane’s womb forever, expecting Dashie to do all of the flank kicking on her lonesome!”

    Prowse gaped at her.  He then snickered.

    “What?” Props peach muzzle scrunched up.

    “Nothing, lass.”  He caressed her cheek and blonde bangs.  “Just never thought there’d come a day where I couldn’t understand what you’re babbling about.”

    “Heeheehee…”  Props leaned in and nuzzled him.  “It’s okay, Unky Prowsy.  Just stay here.  Get your boomstick back in order.  Defend Queeny over there.”

    Props glanced over at the Xonans.  “I think they can bloody well protect themselves…”

    “They don’t know how lucky they are to have you around.  Nopony knows…”  She lingered, muzzle quivering.  “... how lucky I am…”

    He turned to gaze silently at her.

    She sighed, smiling with slightly foggy goggles.  “Even if the same thing happens to all of us that happened to Pilate, I’m glad I got a chance to see your silly beard again.”

    “Heh, yeah, well, I haven’t had the chance to grow the damned thing out.”

    “Something to look forward to!”  Props said as she saluted and bounded across the hold.

    On the other side of the compartment, Arcshod and a few fellow Xonans bowed before Lasairfion, murmuring words of fealty.  Lasairfion smiled gently.  With a telekinetic tug, she urged them back onto their hooves and imparted wisdom and encouragement.  After a final bow, Arcshod briskly turned around.  His eyes twitched, and he followed the movement of a blue pegasus trotting in from the recesses of the place.

    Everypony watched from a distance while Rainbow Dash carried the changeling towards the abandoned edge of the hold.  There, she squatted besides one of the fresh windswept holes torn in the floor of the place.

    “Hey… here we are, buddy.”  Rainbow Dash slid the changeling off her shoulders and reached out to flex its wings with her hooves.  “After talking to me, you should have enough strength to fly.”  She smiled.  “Don’t pretend that you can’t.”

    The shape-shifter looked up at her with dim green eyes.  “Fly…?”

    “Yes.  As in freedom.  Grace.  Life.”  She pointed out the hole.  “Go give it a shot.  I promise, even hurricane force winds are a sight better than the crap you’ve been made to go through.”

    “Rainbow, everypony looks ready to go,” Aatxe said from behind her.  “I’d better go check on Seclorum and the others.”

    “Yeah…”  Rainbow nodded towards him as he trotted off.  “You do that.”  She suddenly felt a tug on her mane hair.  Losing her balance, she slumped over, only to be caught in the changeling’s embrace.

    ”Shhhhhh…”  The changeling stared straight into her eyes, then extended its forelimb.

    Rainbow Dash quietly looked at it.

    Before the pegasus’ eyes, the exoskeleton turned to a blue coat.  Then, like a zipper, a laceration opened. The juices inside changed color from green to red, the flowed openly out of the “cut.”  The changeling turned its forelimb around and around, allowing the blood to seep all around the flesh.  It even gave the hoof a shake, allowing the blood to splatter in a tiny puddle across the floor.  Then, just as quickly as the display happened, the flesh closed up on its own, and turned back to its immaculate black shell.  The juices on the floor remained red.

    Rainbow’s jaw dropped.  She gazed in shock at the changeling.

    The creature merely stared back, silent and deadpan.

    “Why…”  Rainbow murmured beneath her breath.  “Why are you sh-showing me this?”

    The thing leaned forward, nuzzled her cheek, and whispered into her ear, “Because you’re the kind one.”  It leaned back, smiled nervously, then fell backwards.

    Rainbow jerked.

    But the changeling was gone.  It plunged into the winds beneath the building, spread its wings, and disappeared into the rainy gusts.

    Rainbow Dash slumped back on her haunches, her chest pounding and her wings drooped.

    “Alright, everypony!” Seclorum’s voice shouted.  “Let’s get this over with!  It’s now or never!”

    Rainbow Dash jumped in place, gnawing on her bottom lip.  Her eyes darted between all of the shuffling, wandering, murmuring bodies in the room.  There were so many equine shapes, and all of them obscured by dim torchlight and fear.  In a pale slump, she stood back up and trotted away from the holes in the floor.

		//------------------------------//
		// Chief Engineer of Bringing Pain		//------------------------------//

	Red lines.

	Fluctuating.

	Intersecting and crossing against infinite blackness.

	Pilate heard himself panting, hyperventilating.  His body shivered and he curled his legs to his chest.

	And yet the red lines stayed the same.

	The cloud of unconsciousness finally faded.

	An instinct hit him, something the zebra hadn't obeyed in as long as he could remember.

	Pilate opened his eyes.

	The red lines were still there, same as when his eyes were closed.

	"What... wh-what...?"  His voice had a dull echo to it.  It occurred to him that he wasn't paying attention to what was in the background.  His ears twitched to life, detecting rain, footsteps, a muffled voice.  He hadn't noticed before because of the sensory overload.  But what senses?  "Where am I?"  He gulped.  "Am I dead?  Belle... Bellesmith, beloved...?"

	He realized that he was lying on his side.  With a groan, the zebra sat up. 

	The red lines twisted and turned, startling him.

	As Pilate jolted back, he felt a weight on his head, hanging over his brow and just above his nose.  Anxiously, he reached a hoof up to his skull.  As he did so, a dense mosaic of red lines and concentric circles loomed just off his muzzle.  Before he could react to this, his hoof came into contact with solid metal.  He held his breath, feeling a curved helm over the upper half of his skull.  As the shivers increased, he felt back along his cranium, sensing that the object was strapped to his head.  His hoof ran into an array of jagged objects, tiny—like crystals.  At last, a thick series of fibers ran down from the back of the helm, draped along his neck, and ended in a small spherical object attached to the center of his dormant O.A.S.I.S choker.

	"A manasphere?" he muttered.  "But... mine was left on the Noble Jury..."

	He heard another echo—one belonging to a voice that wasn't his own.

	Footsteps came closer.  A cluster of red lines and hashes appeared, forming a singularity.

	Without thinking, Pilate tilted his head towards the source.  That's when he saw a dark crimson shadow set against a chaotic backdrop of vertical red lines.  He gasped, shuffling backwards like a frightened colt.  He felt sweat forming beneath the helm attached to his skull.  As he shut his blind eyes, he was alarmed to still sense the red display in front of him.

	"How in Spark's name...?"  Pilate murmured beneath his breath.  "I... I can see...?"

	There was no way the moving thing in front of him couldn't have heard the zebra, and yet the figure kept pacing, shuffling on quiet limbs against the constant roar of rain and wind.

	Gulping, Pilate stood up on wobbly knees.  He felt bruises from the fight that preceded his capture.  His body was numb in its extremities, no doubt from the effects of a drug.  Nevertheless, he pressed forward, inching his way towards the far end of the corridor.  He followed the sound of the rain, tilting his head down in an attempt to blot out the red lines bending and wobbling before him.  It was all too much to take-in at once.  He cursed not being able to eliminate the crimson mosaic altogether, and continued to inch his way past the pacing figure.

	As he came within earshot, the tell-tale sound of a crackling speaker could be heard, broadcasting the stranger's voice in an eerie fashion.

	"Yes, I understand," he said, shuffling just a few naked feet from where Pilate was currently sneaking.  "I almost have the engine fixed, but I fear it won't be enough to get us past the gale force winds."

	"Do what you can, Vaughan.  From what these survivors have claimed, there may in fact be salvageable mana crystals within the center of this large structure.  Several of the Ledomaritans and Xonans here wish to use some of them to power up their dormant manaship."

	"Well, if that's the case, then maybe you can procure a few in order for me to power up our vessel." 

	"That, of course, is only the best-case scenario.  We have many perils here to overcome.  The changeling menace can be anywhere.  You'd best be on your guard, brother."

	"As I shall.  I won't step foot outside of the ship.  You can count on me to protect our resources."

	"Remember what Razzar has shown us before concerning the cost of weakness."

	"How can I forget?  Vaughan out."  The figure's footsteps stopped cold.  There was the sound of ruffling fabric: the stranger pocketing away a soundstone.  Then all was silent.

	Pilate bit his lip.  Feeling forward, he grasped the edge of a granite pillar.  Red lines stirred, and he felt dizzy from struggling to ignore it all.

	"You truly expect to get far?"  The voice crackled behind the zebra, startling him through to his bones.  "If the changelings don't feast on your flesh, my brothers and I surely will."

	Pilate gritted his teeth, sweating profusely.

	Red lines stirred, becoming larger and more concentrated.  Pilate was confused, but then he heard the footsteps shuffling closer, and he knew that the Lounge member was approaching him icily.

	"And then, there's the storm.  Whatever empowers this blasted city, it will grab you and throw you towards a violent and pulpy death.  If you ask me, I'd say your stripes would surve a much better purpose upholstering Razzar's command chair."

	Pilate tilted his head to the side.  The lines pivoted along with him.  He saw what appeared to be clumps of loose rock and debris.  Stealthily, he slid a hoof towards one of the objects—

	Kapow!  Pilate felt the heat of an energy blast, followed by the tiny piece of granite floor exploding right in front of him.

	He stumbled back with a grunt, waving his aching, burnt hoof.

	Red lines stirred.  Pilate heard the sound of a manarifle cocking.  "No, sir.  I'm sorry, but you do not get to perform that trick on me twice."

	"What..."  Pilate seethed, feeling weighed down by the metal helm on his skull.  "Wh-what have you done to me...?"

	"Consider it a gift," the figure said.  Red lines stretched out from a center cluster of circles—the sign of the stranger holding his arms out.  "You should be quite thankful, actually.  When I found you, I was amazed to discover the state of your eyes.  To think that such soft and docile creatures as ponies would keep an anomaly like you alive.  It's a pity, really.  All your life, living as such a weak and disabled liability.  They should have done you the favor of slitting your throat as a hatchling."

	"For your information, I didn't come from an egg."  Pilate frowned, turning to face him, only slightly intrigued by the ease in which he did so.  "And when I was born, I could see perfectly normal."

	"Oh, well that's just splendid."  There was the sound of a managun being holstered.

	Pilate's brow furrowed from beneath the helm.  "Why's that?"

	"Because that'll make this more of a challenge to me."  The figure shuffled closer towards him.  "You see, naga are natural born hunters..."

	The zebra's muzzle hung open.  "Naga...?"

	"And as an engineer as well as a warrior, I couldn't see myself enjoying my natural born instinct if I hadn't done something to even the playing field."

	"What... wh-what does that even mean?"

	"Quite simply..."  Schiinkt!  Something long and curved slid out of the figure's crimson grasp.  "...you might wish to start defending yourself now."  He grunted and lunged forward.

	The air whistled with cold, serrated metal.

	Pilate didn't need to hear it.  He saw it.  With a gasp, he ducked low and dove to the side.  Sparks showered down across his figure as he scampered back onto his hooves.

	With another growl, the figure lunged again, stabbing at the zebra with full force.
		//------------------------------//
		// Doesn't Take Changelings to Change		//------------------------------//

	Cl-Clank!  The blade lopped off a few of Pilate's tail hairs.

	Hissing beneath his breath, the zebra spun about.  His blind eyes rolled, and yet he sensed a distorted field of red lines intersecting in front of him.  The crimson pattern coalesced, denoting a figure charging straight towards the stallion, leaping, and swinging a blade attached to his left arm.

	Pilate ducked again, jumped to the side, and strafed awkwardly.  Only then did he notice a solid pattern about the lines.  He saw parallel horizontal planes and several vertical pillars.  Beyond such geometry was a chaotic miss-mash of pattering red dots.  A room, he concluded, with the rainy maelstrom of Stratopolis beyond...

	"Hresssssh!"  A reptilian hiss crackled to his left.

	Pilate whimpered and jumped back, tripping on his hooves.  He fell on his haunches with a grunt.  The world distorted in a flash of crimson.  When it reformed, he saw the figure of the Lounge's engineer directly in front of him, his body crouched low in a predatory stance.

	"Please.  I did not augment you to be so damnably anticlimactic, you stupid horse!"  The figure stalked towards him, slinking sideways with cat-like grace.  "That's what you are, you realize.  A ridiculously silly creature that stands out in the gray rain.  I wonder if you even know how garish your stripes are."  The attacker's blade dragged threateningly across the ground.  "Would you like me to describe what your entrails look like?  Hresssssh!"  He pounced.

	"Guhh!"  Pilate rolled to the side and sprang forward as soon as his four hooves had leverage.  The assailant's blade came down swiftly, and it grazed the zebra bloodily across his flank.  "Aaaaaugh!"  Pilate stumbled and collapsed against a pillar, wincing for breath.  "Mmmmmmgnnnh... Sp-Spark!"

	"Yes... call to your pagan deities..."  With cold-blooded footsteps, the reptile inched his way towards Pilate's rear.  "I'll devour the fire of their myths from your still-beating heart."  The masked cretin's speaker crackled, "And I'll make a shrine to them out of your bones."

	Thunder rolled.  Pilate's vision went blood red, then faded—a result of flashing lightning.  When everything came back into focus, he heard the rushing air from the attacker's leap.

	Breathless, Pilate juked to the left.  The lizard landed to his right, then hooked an arm out, grabbing Pilate by the back of his neck.

	With a cry, Pilate swiveled and bucked both rear hooves into the figure's rib cage.

	The attacker barely budged.  "Hrshhhhh!  You call that an attack?"  The flat of its blade slammed across Pilate's skull.

	"Aaaugh!"  Pilate stumbled sideways through a mess of wildly jagged red lines.  Barely two seconds later, he received an elbow to the chest, followed by a violent uppercut to his chin.

	"You are pathetic!"  The engineer shouted, constantly kicking and pummeling Pilate like he was a sack of meat.  "You are weak!  Even with the gift of sight, you are a frail shadow of a stallion!  Why should I even bother to hunt you?!  Your meat couldn't fill one plate... much less the table for Razzar and his brothers!"

	Pilate fell to his knees, spitting up blood and shuddering from head to tail.  He doubled over in pain, clutching himself as the figure paced across the tiny enclosure.

	Lightning flashed, clearing in time for Pilate to spot the lizard's pacing figure.  It was then that Pilate realized something.  The footsteps of the figure were sounding off behind him, and yet—through the crimson field of jagged lines—he could still see his attacker with perfect clarity.  The zebra suddenly felt as though he was sitting in the center of a spherical room with his skull as the center of gravity.  He panted in even breaths, mesmerized and horrified all at once.

	And that's when the creature said, "No, you pathetic little cur!  The hunt does not end with you.  I will find your friends... your mate.  And I will eat of their bones too."

	Pilate's teeth clenched.  He fumed and fumed harder...

	"Let's just hope they at least put up a fight."  The blade raised overhead.  "I'd hate for them to disappoint me as much as you..."

	Suddenly, Pilate knew when and where to fling his hooves.  He twisted to his side and swung both forelimbs high, positioning them where the back of his head was a second ago.  Cl-Clank!  With perfect ease, he clasped onto opposite sides of the blade's hilt and wrenched it from the figure's grasp.

	The reptile stumbled backwards, surprised.

	"Rrrrrrrrrrghhhh—"  Pilate bolted onto his hooves and galloped towards the mesh of crimson circles.  The figure tried dodging to the left, but Pilate could already sense the movement from the coiling of the cretin's lower legs.  "—raaaaaaaugh!"  He jumped where the red lines led him, plowing the cloaked figure's body to the granite.

	Struggling, the Lounge member wrapped his arms around Pilate's neck.

	Without hesitation, the zebra slammed his knees into the creature's chest, knocking the wind from his lungs.  He then swung hard, slamming one hoof viciously across his opponent's silver mask.  The metal surface dented, and the reptile finally reciprocated with a blow to Pilate's chin, allowing him the space to scurry away and escape.

	But Pilate wasn't having any of it.  "Grrgghhh!"  He leapt again, slamming his weight down onto the figure's back.  He repeatedly smacked and pummeled the creature's shoulders.  "Do not... threaten... my beloved!"  He lunged forward, biting for flesh—ripping through cloak and fabric instead.  "Rggghhh!  You want meat?!  Let's find out what naga tastes like—"

	With extraordinary calm, the figure uttered, "I'm afraid neither of us will enjoy the sentiment."  Something whipped hard into Pilate's chest.

	Startled by the blow, Pilate stumbled backwards on uneven hooves.

	The figure flipped up, landed in a slide on all fours, and produced a manarifle—training it directly at Pilate's figure.

	"Come onnnnn!"  Pilate hollered, his nostrils flaring as adrenaline coursed through his whole body.  "You've had enough, you brutish coward?!"

	"Charming vocabulary as always, but the battle is over, Pilate."

	"Like blazes it is!"  Pilate dragged a hoof against the floor and charged the crimson figure.  "Let's see how easily your tail comes off—"

	Kapow!  A manablast blew up a piece of floor in front of Pilate, forcing the zebra to stop.  "I said it's over!" the engineer growled, suddenly panting through his crackling mask.  "And as much as I hate to admit, it's for my own safety as well as yours."

	"Wh-what...?!"  Pilate panted and panted.  He found himself squinting, as if that would somehow make the anomalous shape before him clearer.  "I... I don't understand..."

	"It's quite simple, really.  I had to make sure the O.A. works, so I needed a reason for you to try murdering me as bloodily as possible."

	Pilate gulped.  "O.A.?"

	"Ocular Array.  A Searonese invention.  Leave it to the Lounge to steal anything they can get their scales on.  Of course..."  The figure reached up and stripped its mask off.  Pilate sensed several fibrous strands peeling out from the creature's cloak, rattling together with tiny metallic clinks.  "...if I had known a breeder like you packed such a punch, I would have lowered the neurological frequency so that I could have had more of a chance in close quarters."  Two dense circles hovered in the center of a face made out of cold, rigid lines.

	Of course, Pilate's jaw had long dropped by now.  "Roarke...?"

	
		//------------------------------//
		// To Survive, Make Your Time		//------------------------------//

	"You've proven that you're more than capable of utilizing the Ocular Array in both navigation and defense."  Roarke rubbed her bruised limbs through the fabric of her Lounge cloak.  Her eye-lenses pistoned in and out to shake off the loose droplets of rain.  "Finally, I can be in two places at once."  She marched briskly past Pilate and approached a series of satchels in the far corner.  "We haven't much time.  I have enough fuel in my manapack to transport us both to the inner structure before I make my necessary return to Razzar's ship."

	"But... it... that..."  Dazed, Pilate spun and gawked at her through his bulky black helm.  "Roarke!  Don't brush this all off like it's any other day!  You're here!  I can see you..."  His muzzle quivered.  "I can see!  What in Spark's name—"

	"It's not so much sight as it is a contextual interpretation of superficial matter positioned around you," Roarke droned while rummaging through her pack of things.  "Granted, it's not nearly as intricate or precise as the device your mate invented, but she can be thanked partially for this.  The O.A. is utilizing the runic plate on your skull.  That's how I was able to localize the field so you could accurately perceive things within proximity of—"

	"Blast it, Roarke!  Slow down for a second!"  Pilate waved his forelimbs.  "You're here!  You're alive!"  He fidgeted, then felt the fresh cut on his backside.  "You tried to kill me!"  He snarled.

	"Nonsense," the metal mare droned, picking up a bundled-up cluster of fabric.  "If I would have desired your violent demise, I would have easily gutted you like a pig the very moment I captured you and filled you with a paralyzing agent."

	"Paralyzing agent?!"

	"Are you yet feeling an intense and unbearable migraine?"

	"Intense and unbearable—?!"  Suddenly, Pilate shivered from tail to head.  "Gaaaaugh!"  He fell to his knees, clutching at the helm over his skull.  "Ghhhhnnghh—sweet merciful melons!"

	"Ah.  Right on time."  Roarke trotted towards him on three legs, holding the bundle under her left forelimb.  "That should be the last wave of neuro-sensory feedback.  The first two happened while you were paralyzed, which is why you avoided the common side effect of intense dry heaving."

	"Nnngh... pl-please... tell me th-that this isn't bolted to my cranium!" Pilate hissed and whimpered.

	"And rob your mate the chance of nuzzling your square, masculine muzzle again?  Hmmph.  I've learned a thing or two over the past months, believe it or not."  She reached forward.  "Here, hold still."  And she yanked the cables attached to the back of the helm.

	Pilate gasped, sitting in a panting slump as the lights across his apparatus shorted out.  "Oh... praise the Spark..."  He gulped.  "I never thought I would be so thankful to experience utter blackness again."

	"I didn't build that thing so that you could appreciate fine art," Roarke muttered.

	"I don't understand..."  Pilate tilted his head towards her, shivering.  "What did you build it for?  Why attack me under the guise of a Lounge naga?"

	"You know, the time we spend answering your insufferable questions could instead be used for something advantageous."

	"Like wh-what...?"

	"Like blowing this Searo-forsaken place out of the sky."  Roarke shoved the bundle into his grasp.  "Here, hold this."

	"What... wh-what is this?"

	"Are you feeling the urge to vomit?"

	"Uhm... no."

	"Good."  Roarke nodded.  "Then that means you don't have an adverse reaction to direct contact with yellow skystone."

	"Yellow skystone...?"  Blindly, the zebra unfurled a length of the fabric.  Glowing amber light shone against the rain-slick granite.  He didn't react until his hoof felt the smooth glass surface of the shard held within the bundle.  "Good heavens... do you have any idea how rare this is?"

	"So do the Lounge," Roarke said with a nod, trotting back to her packs.  "And they're willing to do anything to get more of it."

	"Roarke, about the Lounge..."  Pilate winced.  "You do realize they tried to save us, right?"  His ears drooped.  "We thought we had picked up Props' Uncle as we flew across the Wastes.  Turns out it was a changeling in disguise.  Razzar's gang wanted to confiscate them.  They... they almost saved us..."

	"No," Roarke firmly said, shaking her head as she slung several satchels over her shoulder.  "The Lounge are evil and not to be trusted."  She turned and marched firmly towards him.  "I've seen their operation from the inside out.  They traffic sentient creatures and sell them to slave markets.  They bully trade vessels and run zeppelins into watery graves.  I don't care what kind of horrible creatures we might be running into here, but no amount of darkness can make these reptilian scum-munchers any lighter than what they already are."

	"Then..."  Pilate winced, gritting his teeth.  "If they're stuck here with us... then we're in twice as much danger."  He shuddered.  "Rainbow Dash is in danger..."

	"She's been in danger for a long, long time."  Roarke placed her hoof on Pilate's shoulder.  "We're losing valuable time.  We must make our way to the centermost platform."

	"Wh-what for?"  Pilate gulped.  "Aren't you pretending to be one of them?  Don't you have a ship to report to?"

	"I'll explain on the way.  However, this will be a lot easier if you could see where we're going."

	Pilate sighed, biting his lip.  "Is this going to hurt?"

	"Were all breeders born yesterday?"  She shoved the cables back into his Ocular Array.  Bzzzt!

	"Aaaaaaaugh!  Damnation!"
		//------------------------------//
		// Keep On Taking Them Turns		//------------------------------//

	"I dunno, Karl Ebon!  I really think it's something wrong with your end!"

	"My end?!"  Ebon Mane snarled, fussing with several levers in the lavender light of the Noble Jury's engine core.  "How could it possibly be from my end?!"

	Zaid's voice retorted through the intercom, "The ship keeps wanting to veer to the right!"

	"Jee, I dunno..."  Ebon snarled as he fussed with a dial.  "Nnnngh... c-could it be that you're the one constantly turning it to the right?!"

	"But it's wanting to turn even harder, though!"

	"Then compensate for it!"

	"I've tried!  But if I jerk a little too much to the left, we'll be caught up in the outer cloud wall and be torn to shreds!"

	"Then try not to jerk it so much!"  Ebon's eyes crossed and he shook his muzzle.  "What I mean is—Nnnnngh!  Wanna switch places, Zaid?"

	"What would that accomplish?"

	"I dunno."  Ebon leaned against a lever, sighing.  "Maybe both of us just need a rest or something."

	"You fancy yourself a regular NEIGHSCAR driver?"

	"...the buck?!  No!  What does that even mean?!"

	"I think it means you need to stick to salad tossing and I need to be the stallion who sticks to displaying inexplicably competent piloting skills."

	"Unnnnnngh..."  Ebon slumped against the lever, moving it a little.  "I give up."

	"Whoah dayum!  What'd you just do?!"

	"What?!  What?!"  Ebon tilted back, shivering.  "Did I blow us up?!  Pl-please say I didn't just blow us up!"

	"No no!  That's good!  Whatever you just did, do it some more!"

	"You mean panic wildly?!"

	"No, the other thing!"

	Ebon grunted, shoving the one lever all the way.  "You m-mean... th-this...?"



	A groaning noise issued throughout the pipes and conduits of the Noble Jury.  In the pilot's seat, Zaid gripped the controls, grinning to himself as he found the turbulence lessening.  The console around him rattled a bit less, then fell to a relaxing calm.

	"Therrrrrrrrrre she crowns.  Such a pretty rabbit in its hole."

	"Huh?!"

	"Ahem.  Sorry.  Had a Bluish Carrol flashback."

	"Zaid, it isn't nice to lose me while you're in the process of losing me."

	"Whatever you did, it's made this ride nineteen percent cooler."

	"Wow... that's... uhm... an odd number."

	"Yeah, well, I farted out the remaining one percent an hour ago when I had to fly us through a gaping hole in a shattered temple."

	"You did WHAT?!"

	"D'uhmmm... f-forget I said anything!  Just have yourself a little squat down there and take a breather!  Oh, and check on ragdollette when you get a chance.  Make sure she isn't flooding the observation room with drool."  Zaid slapped the intercom, switching it off.  His eyes instantly darted back to the stormy field ahead.  "Phweeeeee... Paging Mr. Floyd with a collect call.  Now would be a good time to wake back up, you big fuzzy wuzzy."  He glanced aside at the large round structure that the Noble Jury was orbiting at a distance.  "I could totally use someone with landing experience... and phallic antlers."



	"It's..."  Pilate's muzzle quivered as he hobbled alongside Roarke.  A long granite plain stretched before them, flanked by marble columns shattered by impacts with other temples.  "It's all so cluttered."  He tilted his head about while rain pelted on his helm, his body, and the structures all around him.  "And yet it's like I can see forever.  Every single rain drop and cracked surface..."

	"Try to focus on specific details in front of you," Roarke said.  "The Ocular Array was originally built by Searonese bounty hunters to detect movement of their prey in the dark.  I'm guessing that the Lounge stumbled upon technology abandoned by my long lost sisters who took their hunting expeditions east.  It's the kind of thing that would serve the naga well in these dense, cloudy wastes."

	"And just what was it that convinced you to try hooking this thing up to my skull?"

	"Stop leaning against me!" Roarke hissed, stepping to the left.

	Pilate stumbled, wincing.  "But!  B-but I need to—"

	"No, you don't," Roarke grunted.  "You need to see on your own.  There is much to do here in this mess.  I can't be in two places at once, but with you on my side, we can make a difference."

	"With what?"  Pilate actually bothered to glance at the bundle in his grip.  The red lines of his "vision" pierced the fabric, outlining the smooth shard of skystone that he was carrying.  "Won't the Lounge have your pelt once they discover that 'Vaughan' had stolen this from their engine?"

	"I hope to be through with them long before that happens," Roarke said.  "Living among the reptiles isn't exactly conducive to relaxation."  Her muzzle tightened while her eye-lenses retracted.  "I watched first-hoof as Razzar stripped one of his colleagues, wounded him in the neck, and then threw him to the claws and teeth of the rest of the crew... who promptly devoured him."  She sighed out her nostrils.  "Believe me, breeder, it's difficult to dig one's muzzle deep into the quivering intestines of a dying lizard and fake cannibalism."

	"Why in Spark's name would Razzar do that to one of h-his own kind?!"

	"Because he was 'weak,'" Roarke grunted.  "It's a sentiment I've understood all too well in my days among the Searonese.  Only, this time..."  Her voice trailed off.

	"'This time' what?"

	She grimaced, then frowned.  "It doesn't matter.  The point is, the Lounge are dangerous and unpredictable.  Admittedly, they possess many strong attributes, but they've been working under the dominating fear and pressure of Razzar for so long that all they can do is lead travellers of the Wastes to ruin.  And now that they're here—in this city—I fear that they could cause as much damage if more so than the changelings."

	"Are you sure you're not just making a subjective argument after having blended with them for so long?"

	"Trust me.  Although it's likely the goal of Rainbow and the others to escape this place, there is no way on Searo's green earth that we can leave it floating here for the Lounge to acquire."

	"Acquire?  You m-mean they want to do something with this abominable city?!"

	"They don't chase changelings just for sport, breeder.  The Lounge torture these creatures, mutilate them, feed them pieces of their own insides—anything to get them to betray information that's only supposed to belong to the brood's hive mind.  As of now, Razzar's gathered enough knowledge to realize that this place can be piloted."

	"Piloted?  You mean like a vessel?"

	"Precisely.  At first, I thought that by infiltrating the Lounge—I would learn all about the potential hazards of the Wastes.  Turns out they're just as dangerous as the changelings themselves.  But... there's something more."

	"More?"

	"A third party.  Something potentially more dangerous."

	"Even more dangerous than the Lounge and the changelings?!"  Pilate almost tripped in mid-speech.  "Roarke, you're going to murder my h-heart at this rate.  What kind of a third party?"

	"Only the changelings know, but Razzar was capable of extracting a vague idea from the shape-shifters he interrogated.  Whatever this danger is, it lies deep in the heart of this city."

	"And what's the Lounge's goal?  To unleash this evil?"

	"No."  Roarke shook her head.  "But whatever they seek is somewhere beyond it.  The Lounge is willing to risk anything to achieve their goal, even if it means the ruination of all the survivors clinging to the platforms of this mess."

	"That's... quite horrible."

	"Yes."  Roarke nodded.  "In my short life, I've endeavored to be vicious and I've even attempted virtue, but nothing sickens me more than innate ambivalence."

	"Then that's what we're here to do, huh?"  Pilate tilted his helm towards her.  "We're going to use this skystone to prevent the Lounge from unleashing some sort of evil just to pilot the city?"

	"No.  We're going to pilot the city ourselves."

	Pilate nearly collapsed.  "What?!  But... but I-I thought you just said—"

	Roarke glanced towards him.  "I didn't suggest we were going to pilot it somewhere safe."

	Pilate gaped at her.  "You wish to destroy Stratopolis."

	"Precisely."

	Silence.

	"How swiftly c-can I be of service to this mission?" Pilate asked.

	"Trot faster."

	"Yes, ma'am."  And the two galloped straight ahead.
		//------------------------------//
		// In All the Wrong Places		//------------------------------//

	"There."  Roarke pointed towards the rain-slick edge of the platform.  "That's the perfect location."

	"For what?" Pilate asked in mid-sprint.

	"For making our jump to the central core of this place."

	Pilate's helm rattled atop his head.  "J-jump?"

	"Relax, breeder," Roarke droned as the two slowed to a stop along the platform's edge.  The temple was slowly revolving, pivoting to face the round structure in the center.  "I'll be doing the legwork for both of us.  This suit I'm wearing has enough fuel in it to provide the thrust for both of us for a short time.  I'll carry you over and then you're on your own."

	"Allow me to guess," Pilate droned.  "More Searonese technology that the Lounge stole?"

	"I'm afraid not.  This technology is beyond me.  Probably something stolen from Alafreo or a place even further east."

	"You've heard of Alafreo?"

	"I've heard of a lot of things."

	"That's just... remarkable, Miss Roarke..."

	"Hmmm?"

	He tilted his helm towards her.  "All this time, you were stealing a place on board Razzar's ship, spying and gathering intelligence."

	"Well, I most certainly wasn't entering a beauty contest," Roarke grumbled.

	"How did you manage it?"

	"Excuse me?"

	"I mean... they're not exactly equines and they know each other like brothers."  Pilate glanced aside as the central structure slowly swung into proximity.  "How did you manage to infiltrate their ranks in the first place?  I mean, with one glance, they would have realized you didn't exactly have scales..."

	"You can thank—or blame Quezaat for that."

	"Uhm... Quezaat?"

	"Yes.  The naga God of Skin and Scales," Roarke explained.  "Every naga ship carries a copy of the ancient Quezaatian Scrolls, and one of the holy text's most important rules is the sanctity of the reptilian body."

	"Meaning...?"

	"It's considered a mortal sin to bear one's flesh to another naga, hence why the Lounge's entire society is constantly wearing thick fabrics and silver masks to obscure their figures.  If they allow one another to even see their faces, then they must masochistically peel the flesh from two of their own fingers and say a ritualistic chant for one whole week."

	"Wow..."  Pilate fidgeted.  "That's certainly... uhm... convenient."

	"Yes."  Roarke nodded, her eye-lenses reflecting the large structure looming ahead.  "As soon as I replaced Vaughan at an eastern Xonan outpost, I was able to masquerade as him on board the Lounge's ship without any of the naga suspecting me or having a reason to.  The only thing I love more than stupid creatures is a religion that makes them even stupider."  She pointed forward.  "Here's our destination.  We must hurry."

	"Quick question.  Exactly what am I supposed to do with this?" Pilate asked, patting the bundled shard in his grasp.  "You've given me ample exposition on every topic but the immediate concern at hoof."

	"That is the key to bringing about the end of Stratopolis."

	"And a key is nothing without a driver who knows what he's doing."  Pilate frowned under his mask.  "Miss Roarke, vision or no vision, I refuse to go any further until I am better informed."

	The metal mare sighed.  "I only know two things, both of which were extracted from tortured shape-shifters courtesy of Razzar.  Number one.  Stratopolis has an operating room located within the very heart of this building before us.  Number two.  Within that room, there are five platforms:  one in the center and four for each cardinal direction.  It's presumed that skystone shards were positioned on the outer four and then relocated to the center in order to make Stratopolis fly to one of the edges of the world."

	"How exactly does that work?"

	"I'm not sure.  What I am sure about is that the north edge of the world—beyond the standard red fare—has unique clusters of yellow skystone, like the type that you're currently carrying."

	"So if I was to reach the control room and place this very piece on the center dais..."

	"You're a smart enough breeder to know where this is going on your own."

	Pilate gulped.  "Yes, I suppose I do."

	"We've wasted too much time," Roarke said, grabbing him while the rear of her outfit hummed to life.  "We must get moving."

	"One m-more thing, though!" Pilate sputtered, trembling in her grasp.  "From what Rainbow reported, the center portion of this place is sealed off!  How am I supposed to get anywhere near the control room?  Especially with changelings everywhere?"

	"I'm certain that a way to the control room will be made accessible soon."

	"How so?"  He clenched his teeth.  "Do you intend to crash the Lounge's ship into the barricade?"

	"No, for I do believe somepony besides us has the means of opening the last barrier to the core."

	"Somepony b-besides us...?"  Pilate's jaw hung open.  "Rainbow Dash."

	"Precisely."  Roarke nodded, then fired the thrusters in her suit.  "Now hang on!"

	Pilate did so, wincing.  The two propelled themselves off the platform's edge and soared towards the outer rim of the central platform.



	Bellesmith lurched to a stop, her coat and mane drenched as she leaned against a piece of zeppeling wreckage positioned along the outer balcony of the large building.

	"Did... did you hear that...?"

	Elma stirred, her limbs curling and uncurling as she shivered across Belle's backside.

	The mare gulped and wiped the rainwater off her brow.  "I could have sworn that... th-that it sounded like something mana-powered..."

	Elma continued to writhe and whimper.

	Belle craned her neck back.  "Elma?"

	No response.

	"Elma!"  Panicking, Belle looked everywhere for cover.  She decided upon the hollow of the crashed zeppelin lying right in front of them.  Ducking low, she slid the two of them inside.  They found a patch of dry rusted floor beneath the mangled hull of the ship.  Lying Elma on her side, Belle squatted low and examined her face, fangs, and neck.  "Elma, speak to me.  What's wrong, darling?  Where does it hurt?"

	"It hurts..."  Elma's green eyes spilled fumes into the air.  "...everywhere."

	Belle grimaced.

	"Just... so..."  Elma squeaked and curled into a fetal position.  "So h-hungry..."  Her dragonfly wings stretched and flitted.  "So hungry th-that it hurts..."

	"I... I..."  Belle shook her head.  "I'm afraid I can't... I-I mean I don't know..."

	"Please... c-can you hold me?"  Elma looked up at her with quivering jaws.  "J-just hold me..."

	Belle sniffled.  She leaned forward and cradled her arms around the changeling.  "Elma, I'm so sorry this happened to you.  I wish I understood more.  I want to ease the pain, but... b-but I have to get us out of here first..."

	"Don't be sorry, Mommy..."

	Belle twitched, her brow furrowing.  She took one look at Elma.

	The changeling's flesh had already taken on a peach coat, covered all over with dark swirling tattoo patterns.  With a sad, pouting face, Kera looked up, then leaned in to nuzzle Bellesmith's chin.  "You're so good to me.  Just stay with me here..."

	"Kera..."  Belle stammered, her ears drooping as sweat formed along her brow.  A labored breath escaped her lips.  "Kera, I've waited so long for you to say something... j-just one thing..."

	"I love you, Mommy," Kera murmured.

	Belle choked on a sob, her whole body shivering.

	Kera curled up against Belle's chest and clung tight to her.  "Don't leave me.  Please.  I'm so scared, Mommy..."

	Belle's eyes flickered green.  A gasp escaped her chest, and she shook her head with an inward growl.

	Kera's limbs squeezed Belle tighter.  "I don't want to be anywhere but with you..."

	"Kera..."  Belle whimpered.  She gritted her teeth and fought the green energy flickering through her skull.  "Elma," she growled.

	"Don't leave me, Mommy—"

	"Elma, stop!"  Belle shoved the filly hard.

	Kera rolled over and collapsed against a rattling wall of metal, instantly turning into the frazzled changeling.

	Belle slumped down onto her chest like a wounded animal.  She wheezed, coughed, and took a few moments to fight a wave of pain.  Tears ran down her face as she quietly sobbed, but even that was fought with strong resolve.  At last, she pushed herself back up to her hooves, glaring down at Elma.

	"That's not the way... that was never the way!"

	"But..."  Elma stared up, shivering.  "But you always—"

	"I know."  Belle sucked her breath in as more tears trickled down her cheek.  "And I was wrong.  Just because it felt good... just because it felt comforting to be by her side at all times..."  She bit her lip and looked away.

	Elma blinked, confused and anxious.

	Slowly, Belle trotted over.  She squatted down before the changeling, then took Elma's hooves in her own.  "Shhhh... look at me."  She tilted Elma's chin up until their gazes connected.  "If you must feed, then do so on that which is wholesome and true, not on that which is sorrowful and pathetic."

	"But..."  Elma gulped.  "You've given me a second chance, Belle.  I want to heal you."

	"I need to heal myself," Belle said.  "And the last thing I'm letting you devour is misery.  So, look at me and listen."  She gulped.  "Feel."

	Elma stared at her, eyes wide.  Slowly, those eyes turned clear while black and white stripes formed across a stallion's body.

	Belle fought the urge to sob.  Another tear ran down her cheek as she squeaked, "I am so... so sorry."  Her breaths came in pained spurts.  "It doesn't matter what mistakes you may or may not have made.  I... I was wrong."  She hyperventilated slightly, but nevertheless kept gripping Pilate's hooves.  "I felt so helpless, so confused, that I took the cowardly way out.  And... and I blamed you, Beloved."

	Pilate's ears folded back as his blind eyes went moist.

	Belle gnashed her teeth and stared at the floor.  "Everything happened so fast and so m-miserably, that I lost my center!  I gave into despair, and I didn't know who else to blame!"  She sniffled and shuddered.  "Only, I blamed myself too.  What happened to Kera was so terrible, that the only ponies who could be punished were the ones who brought her into that mess.  She's been so quiet and so lifeless for so long... I... I-I guess I felt like I had to be just as devoid of life too.  It was my burden to bare... but it was a damnably stupid sentence, because all it ever did was punish you... by putting you at a distance... and I'm sorry..."

	Pilate swallowed a lump down his throat and stammered, "So much pain... and so much anguish..."  He shook his head.  "Even now, it's too dry to consume anything but misery..."

	"No."  Belle shook her head, sniffling.  "No.  Search deeper."  She took the zebra's hoof and placed it over her heart.  A painful smile lifted.  "It is just a barrier."  She winced and spat dryly, "A shell."

	Pilate's face contorted in confusion.

	Belle leaned forward and nuzzled his cheek.  "But inside, beloved, hidden from even myself, it beats for you..."

	All of the sudden, Pilate gasped, and a flash of green light flickered across his eyes.  His face melted as he collapsed in a sob.  "Oh, beloved..."

	Belle instantly cradled him, holding him tight.  "Shhhh... it's alright... it's alright..."

	"I... I-I knew..."  Pilate whimpered.  "Some way... some how... I-I always knew..."

	"And I've been a horrible pony to not reward that faith."  Belle took a deep, deep breath.  "But when I find him, I'll be hiding it no longer.  He will know—as I know—that there is still hope left."  She wiped her own cheek and smiled past the shivers.  "I just need his help in peeling the shell away.  All this time, I've been the blind one, and Spark-willing... he may still have it inside him to forgive me."

	"He... he does..."  Pilate stammered in an off-tone voice.  "I... I've felt it... even if I didn't know it at the time."

	Silence.

	At last, Belle shook the changeling's shoulder.  "Elma..."

	The shape-shifter stirred.

	"Elma Boreal..."

	Losing the stripes, the equine glanced up with a tender expression.

	Belle caressed her face.  "Do you now have the strength to continue?"

	Elma slowly, slowly nodded.  "Yes, Bellesmith."  Its black cheeks curved upwards.  "I... I-I think I can even walk now."

	"Good..."  Belle stood up and helped the changeling to her hooves.  "Though I think we both know who's really been carrying who."  She dashed out of the zeppelin, tugging Elma long with her.  "Come on!"
		//------------------------------//
		// Meanwhile, Rainbow Dash Takes Point		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash poked her head out of the outermost corridor and squinted her eyes at the gray malaise swirling thickly around the center of Stratopolis.  Beyond the marble columns and airship wreckage, she spotted the remaining chunks of temple ruins floating through the rainswept clouds.  However, her immediate concern involved the cityscape directly around her.  She glanced left and right, but spot no sign of a moving shape or shadow.  As well as she could guess, the coast was clear.

	Taking a deep breath, she pivoted about on flapping wings and motioned towards herself.

	With cat-like stealth, Razzar and two other Lounge members slithered out of the corridor, aiming vibrant yellow manarifles in every direction.  They covered various points along the balcony, training their sights on every marble column and rusted bit of metal.  After a minute passed, Razzar held his gloved hand up and motioned along.

	Arcshod, Aatxe, and Seclorum trotted out, along with several Xonan and Ledomaritan equines.  Mares and stallions alike carried or levitated crossbows by their sides.  Far more emaciated and frazzled than their Lounge companions, they shivered from the cold wind and pelting rain, nervously eying the obscure temple ruins around them as they clung to their weapons.

	At last, Props, Josho and the three remaining Lounge members came out, covering the rear.  The group numbered no less than two dozen, and they formed a tight line that shuffled counter-clockwise around the broad temple exterior.

	"If I recall, the wall with the big ol' Urohringr symbol is on the far side," Rainbow Dash's voice cracked against the rumble of thunder.  "Right past—"

	"—a hollowed out manaship with rusted steam thrusters?" Aatxe said.

	Rainbow did a double-take towards the center of the line.  "Why... yeah.  Dude, do you take walks on a consistent basis or something?"

	The stallion sighed out his nostrils.  "You'd do stupid, bored things too if this place became your home for seventeen years."

	"I'm ready to make it a distant memory," Seclorum grumbled.  He cocked a crossbolt in his weapon and dashed forward.  "Let's get this over with—"

	Razzar blocked him with an oustretched hand.  "We will take lead."

	"Excuse me?"

	Razzar didn't bother to look at him, instead strolling forward with courageous speed while accompanied by his two masked brothers.  "We are a great deal experienced in dispensing with shape-shifters.  For the safety of you and your comrades, I suggest you leave this in the hands of professionals."

	"In the hands of—?!"  Seclorum's eyes crossed, and he shook his muzzle with a frown.  "Look, buddy, we're the ones who've been stuck here for eternity!  I think if anyone knows a thing or two about these green-blooded freakjobs, it's us!"

	"And to what extent has that undying self-confidence aided you in the escape from this prison?"  Razzar signaled to his brothers, and they rushed forward, examining every piece of rubble and debris with hot-glowing manarifles.  "It seems to me that no progress was had until Rainbow Dash and my own ship arrived."

	"Why you—" Snarling, Seclorum's magic twitched and his crossbow raised until it was suspiciously aimed at the masked speaker in question.

	"At ease, gray whiskers," Josho grumbled, physically lowering Seclorum's weapon with his heavy fetlock.  "Let the creep do his job.  He may be ugly as sin beneath that mask for all we know—but he seems to know what he's doing."

	"Since when were you so docile, old friend?"  Seclorum frowned at him.  "You and I never stood for this kind of insult back in Ledomare!"

	"When I gave up the bottle, I also gave up a lot of the bullcrap that came packed with it."  Josho cocked his shotgun and marched on ahead.  "And in case you haven't noticed, old friend, we're not in Ledomare anymore."

	Seclorum slumped in place, his glare so sharp it could cut through the wind.

	"Hrmmm..."  Arcshod trotted past him with a wry smirk.  "Bleem'ulien trenna sien thriul.  Dreit?"

	"Meh..."  Seclorum trudged along.  "Easy for you to say."

	"Come on!  Cheer up, Secchy!"  Props sing-songed.  "Soon enough, you'll be off this floating wreckie!"

	Seclorum's glaring eyes swiveled towards her.

	Props bit her lip.  Her ears folded and she swiftly slinked ahead in a bouncing crouch.  "Mmmmmmmmmmmmmm-moving right along!"  She galloped until she was trotting "safely" underneath Rainbow Dash's shadow.

	Rainbow rolled her eyes, suppressing a smirk as she then squinted towards the far end of the temple.  Her ears twitched, and for a moment she turned around, glancing somewhere past the rear where Razzar's comrades were protecting the line with their weapons.

	"You see something, Dashie?"

	"No, Props," Rainbow muttered.  "Not a darn thing, which is what worries me."

	"It's okay!  We've got a bunch of intimidating guys in cloaks protecting us with their super violent laser weapons!  That's a good thing, r-right?"

	Rainbow Dash sighed out her nostrils.  "To be honest... that's worrying me a lot more."  She looked head.  "I can't stop wondering..."

	"About what?" Props asked, blinking through her goggles in mid-trot.

	"Assuming Commander Hurricane could move the temples around from the top room like I could, as well as move Stratopolis itself, then couldn't she also open the door that was sealed when I got here?"

	"Well, sure!  I mean... I guess.  Why?"

	"Then..."  Rainbow Dash chewed on her bottom lip as she flapped along.  "Maybe she kept the door shut for a reason..."

	Props fidgeted slightly.

	"Oh Props..."  Rainbow grumbled aloud.  "I have a very bad feeling about this."

	"Yeah..." Props nodded.  "It was hard for me to keep the faith after the prequels too."

	"...the hay are you even talking about?!"

	"You're assuming I understand half the time myself."  Props let loose a melodic moan and trotted ahead.  "I really, really miss Ebony right about now."

	Rainbow Dash watched her trot along.  Her body slumped as she exhaled, "I miss everypony."  And she glided forward, scouting ahead of Razzar and the group.

	
		//------------------------------//
		// Blind Will Lead the Blind		//------------------------------//

	Pilate swiveled around on his hooves, his head jerking towards the outer wall of the structure beyond the balcony.  His muzzle clenched tightly while his ears twitched on either side of the helm.

	Roarke glanced at him.  "What is it?"

	"I just..."  The stallion fidgeted.  "I-I'm not sure..."

	"Did you sense something from inside the structure?"

	"Possibly?  It's hard to say."

	"The Oracular Array's primary function is to detect movement along the visual spectrum, but it's been known to highten other senses," Roarke explained.  "You've been without sight for a long time.  It stands to reason that your smell and hearing is greatly attuned to your surroundings.  Now, buffered by the Oracular Array, however—"

	"Yes, but can I actually sense through walls?"

	"I wouldn't know."

	Pilate turned towards her.  "I thought you said this was Searonese technology."

	"Yes.  But it doesn't necessarily mean that I've utilized it myself."

	His metal brow furrowed.  "And yet you'd attach it to me?!"

	"Affirmative."

	"Roarke, just... j-just where did you get a spare manasphere to hook up to this device anyways?"

	The metal mare squirmed slightly, her facial features wincing.  "It's... best not to ask."

	Pilate was silent.

	"We've wasted enough time.  I need to return to the Lounge's ship."  She reached beneath her cloak and pulled out her mana rifle.  "Here. I've slightly augmented this to respond to equine touch."  She tossed it at the zebra.  "Feel for impressions along the central length.  A little squeeze is enough to fire a blast of electrical energy."

	Pilate snatched it in mid-air.

	Roarke continued.  "The damage output has a wide spread.  Accuracy isn't as important as versatility.  And here..."  She stripped of a satchel and tossed it to the zebra as well.  "That should help you carry the amber skystone to its destination."

	"Stratopolis' control room..."

	"Right."  Roarke nodded.  She stretched her spine, protruding the twin manathrusters of her outfit and preparing to take off.  "If I'm to believe Razzar's latest communications, then his group and the local survivors are heading towards the barricade that seals off the inner chamber.  No doubt Rainbow Dash is acting as the key to this place as we speak."

	"It all seems too easy to be true," Pilate muttered.

	"I'm inclined to agree."  Roarke nodded, then turned towards the edge of the balcony to take off.  "If there's anything in the world I've refused to trust, it's whatever's easy."

	"Which begs the question, Roarke."  Pilate took a firm breath.  "Even after you've given me sight... even after you've given me a weapon to defend myself..."  He raised his front hooves and trained the glowing stick's end towards her back.  "How do I know you're not just a changeling trying to send me on a suicide mission?"

	Roarke slowly turned around, the rainwater cascading off her lenses.

	Pilate gritted his teeth, keeping the weapon trained on her figure.

	At last, Roarke uttered, "I could ask the same of you."

	Pilate gulped.

	"We and the Lounge have a common foe... a very dangerous and unpredictable foe.  As of right now, I have no more assurance that you're you than you do that I'm me.  But let me ask you this..."  Her lenses retracted.  "Do either of us really... truly want this city to keep flying?"

	Pilate stood still.  Eventually, he lowered the staff while a sigh escaped through his nostrils.

	Roarke turned around, fired her thrusters, and zoomed out into the stormy mess.  "Also, you're holding the staff backwards!"

	Pilate blinked beneath his helm.  He held the weapon up, winced, then spun it around.  Frowning, he barked up at Roarke, "And this whole mission!  It could be a ruse as well!"

	"Then go bring the skystone to Rainbow Dash!" Roarke's voice hollered back through the winds.  "Assuming you believe that she's herself!"

	Pilate groaned.  He fidgeted where he stood for a minute.  At last, he stuffed the skystone bundle into the satchel, slung it around his figure, and galloped off with the aid of his helm and the staff.

	"I don't know what I prefer more... being blind or being stupid."



	"Rekkha threen siul..."  Arcshod stopped the crowd with an outstretched hoof.  His tattooed face paled as he stared up at the barricade before them.  "Urohringr..."

	The group of survivors formed a curved line facing the large stone wall.  Carved circles and spheres stretched before them, slick with moisture and rainwater.  Amber light from the Lounge's weapons illuminated the runic inscriptions that stretched between each ancient etching.

	"Wow..."  Props cooed, her ears drooping as her goggled eyes took in the sight.  "It's even bigger than I imagined it, Dashie."

	"It always is," the pegasus muttered, trotting forward until she stood within a sneeze's distance from the wall.

	"So, what now?" Seclorum muttered.

	"Time to make your magic, paint bucket," Josho said.

	"Uhm... yeah... about that..."  Rainbow Dash chuckled nervously, then hovered up on flapping wings.  "When it comes to this sort of stuff—machine worlds, runic tomes, smexy blondes—I don't exactly have an art to practicing magic.  The crud just sort of... sets itself off, y'know?"

	"No, we don't know," Aatxe said, shaking his head.  "But obviously the changelings do, because they've used your essence to move the temples around from the structure's top room!"

	"Yeah, and I get that!  But the temples are different!"  Rainbow pointed at the wall.  "I've been by here already, and I couldn't get anything to flicker or move or change then!"

	"Did you make physical contact the last time?" Razzar asked, his pale mask tilted towards her.  "It could very well be the game changer."

	"Oh, please!"  Rainbow rolled her eyes and leaned against the wall with a hoof.  "As if it could be as simple as—"

	FLASH!  The centermost ring lit up.

	Several Xonans and Ledomaritans leaned back, gasping.  Several of the Lounge tilted their masked faces in curiosity.

	"Xon!"  Arcshod stammered, his eyes widening.  "Her'lanna semiulen na'saadar Austraeoh threanna!"

	"Hey, you set off the tattooed guy!"  Props chirped.  "That's a good sign, right, Dashie?"

	"Uhm... but nothing's happening though," Rainbow Dash said, then squinted.  "Wait a second."  She traced the inner most ring.  "Only the circle on the inside is lit up."

	"Then perhaps the other two...?"  Josho began.

	"Working on it."  Rainbow licked her lips, hovering across the miniature spheres that lined the twelve segments of the inner ring.  One by one they lit up by her touch.  At last, when they were all illuminated, they spread their glow to the spheres on the outer rings, until those segments also turned bright.

	Soon, the entire barricade was afire with bright lavender energy.  Just as it was starting to blind the ponies and lizards lined up, the granite floor around them shook violently.  With a cascading cloud of dust, the wall slid straight down, retreating into the foundation of the structure.  The survivors gawked in stunned silence while the Lounge trained their weapons forward.

	"At last..."  Razzar hissed, his masked face peering into the dim, dusty corridor beyond.  "The path is set..."



	"Unnngh!" Elma collapsed, falling limply on her chest.

	Bellesmith slid across a puddle of moisture and spun around.  "Elma!"  She scampered back across the balcony and crouched at the changeling's side.  "What is it?!  What's the matter?"  She scooted over and cradled the hyperventilating creature's body.  "Please... t-talk to me!  Do you feel weak?  Do you need to feed again?"

	"No..."  Elma's green eyes fumed as she stared painfully into blank space.  "Mother... pl-please... spare them..."

	Belle blinked.  "Spare them?  Spare who?"

	Elma gulped, panted, and stared nervously into Belle's face.  "Your friends... th-they're in trouble..."

	"From who?!"  Belle's eyes narrowed.  "Changelings?"

	"No..."  Elma gulped and shook her head.  "Something worse..."
		//------------------------------//
		// A Dash From the Past		//------------------------------//

	Josho made to step forward.

	Rainbow Dash held her hoof out.

	Josho glanced up.

	The pegasus shook her head, flapped her wings, and hovered forward.

	The two dozen survivors watched from where they stood.  Props bit her lipe while Razzar and the Lounge craned their necks, gazing in silence.

	Rainbow Dash flew into the broad corridor, her nose scrunching to the musky, stale air.  After hovering in place for a bit, she brought a hoof to her pendant and rubbed the ruby lightning bolt a few times.  A crimson glow splashed over dusty heaps of rubble before her.

	The mare's eyes narrowed.  She glanced to her right.

	There were patches of charred granite and cracks in the wall.

	She looked to her left.

	The stone surfaces were marred in several places, as if by acid burns.

	At last, she looked straight down.

	She counted three... four... five chunks of rock missing from the floor—like miniature craters.

	There were no skeletal remains.

	Rainbow Dash's jaw clenched.  Nevertheless, she looked over her shoulder, made eye-contact with Josho, and briskly nodded.

	Josho nodded back.  Levitating his shotgun alongside him, he trotted firmly forward.  Razzar and two of his associates were not far behind.  Soon enough, Props, Seclorum, Arcshod, Aatxe and the rest followed suit.

	The surviving mares and stallions glanced nervously from wall to wall.  Crossbows nearly rattled to the floor from a unicorn or two losing their concentration due to the intense silence.  While Razzar and his team marched along, undaunted, Props paused every now and then to scrutinize various details with her goggled eyes.  She rubbed her chin in thought, glanced up at the crew, then dashed back into formation with a nervous jump.

	As Rainbow Dash floated along, she pivoted to her right.  Her eyes narrowed.

	In between the random cracks and fissures, a complex mosaic loomed.  Swirling designs coalesced into the granite depiction of swirling clouds and cosmic nebulae.  Emerging from the galactic miasma, solid circles glided in distant formation.  Orbiting the outer rings of these circles, tiny globes floated.  Only—upon closer inspection—they weren't exactly spheres.  Rainbow Dash drifted close enough to a wall to see that the etchings were actually debris clouds consisting of multiple structures with a large platform located in the center.

	Rainbow Dash tongued the inside of her mouth.  She glanced towards the other wall, but it was beyond the penumbra of her glowing pendant's light.  She kicked off the right wall and flew close enough to illuminate the other.  What she saw caused her to stop in midair.

	Equine figures had been illustrated, stampeding in a herd that proceeded out from the depths of the corridor.  It took a while for Rainbow Dash to realize that the ponies weren't stampeding as much as they were flocking.  Each equine had wings, and she would have liked to have seen the etchings of their muzzles—only all of the effigies had been marred in some fashion.  Burn marks and impacts from blunt instruments had defaced them entirely.

	Rainbow raised an eyebrow, pivoted about, and darted further down the corridor before the rest of the group could pass her.

	"Tren'nalliuen dreneek'raat siul threanna," Arcshod murmured, breaking the silence.

	Aatxe nodded.  "It beats me.  I think we would have run into them by now too."

	"Into what?" Props chirped.

	"Changelings," Aatxe muttered.  "We may be big in number, but this is the perfect kind of trap."

	"Maybe the Lounge are scaring them off!" Props said through a crooked grin.  "Spark only knows they're scaring the soot out of me!"

	Arcshod's nostrils flared.  "Brendessa t'lenna thrillem hranna thiulen..."

	"Huh?" Props blinked.

	Seclorum spoke up, "We just did those shapeshifting creeps a favor by opening this place."  He turned to frown at the others.  "I doubt it's the Lounge scaring them."

	"It will do no one any good if we scare ourselves," Razzar said without looking back.  "Cling to your weapon if you can't cling to your courage."

	"Hey, I'm a soldier, buddy!"  Seclorum frowned.  "Thirty years and running!"

	"Running away, is more like it."

	"Why you—" Seclorum darted for Razzar's backside, only for Aatxe and Arcshod to hold him back.

	"Let it go, Secchy," Josho said.  His grizzled lips curved.  "Besides... that was a pretty good one."

	Seclorum stumbled back, muttering under his breath.

	"Maybe... uhm..."  Props galloped forward until she was within earshot of Rainbow.  "Maybe we should have had you close the door behind us, Dashie?"

	Rainbow shook her head.  "No... I don't think that's a good idea."

	"Why not?"

	Rainbow glanced at the cracks and craters and burn marks on the floor.  "Uhhhh... call it a hunch."

	Suddenly, her pendant's glow was swallowed up by pitch blackness.

	She braked in midair and held her front limbs out.  "Everypony, stop!"  A beat.  She looked over her flapping wings.  "You too, Razzarlings!"

	Razzar held a gloved fist up.  His comrades stopped, as did Seclorum and the rest of the survivors.

	Aatxe and Seclorum craned their necks to see.

	"What is it, Rainbow?" Josho asked from where he stood in the middle of the group.

	Rainbow Dash dropped down to her hooves.  The ground had given way in front of her, and an abysmal pit loomed.  She swung her body—and pendant—left to right.  She spotted the beginning of two staircases.

	"It's a stairwell, I think," she said.  "Goes down pretty far."

	"How far?" Aatxe asked, nervously.

	"I'm guessing the entire depth of the structure."  She tilted her pendant up, revealing a flat ceiling.  "And that must be right below the room that controls the temples."

	"Yes, it's all very intriguing architecture," Razzar droned as he shuffled up beneath Rainbow Dash.  "But where are the mana crystals located?"

	Arcshod cleared his throat and said, "M'lanna siulen drasta kran'adar.  Menus la'tranna kelethiuen vreen."

	"Judging from the distance Lasairfion sensed, it must be further down," Aatxe said.

	"Of course," Seclorum grunted.

	"Well, then..."  Rainbow Dash flew forward.  "Down into the heart of Stratopolis we go."

	Suddenly, Props gasped.  She flung a hoof and yelped, "Dashie, wait!"

	"H-huh?"  The pegasus glanced back, not realizing that her dangling forelimbs had traveled through a dim energy field.  Just then, bright lights illuminated from an unforeseen rig of crystals that lined the edge of the platform right before the pit.  "Aaaugh!"  She flew backwards, rubbing her eyes.

	Mares and stallions gasped in surprise.

	"By Ledo's nose hairs!"  Seclorum raised his crossbow at the blinding array.

	"Ready, brothers!"  Razzar gestured towards his companions.  "Fire as soon as you see—"

	"Will you vomittards just chill?!" Josho shouted, pointing.  "Look!  It's just a fancy light show!"

	"Nnnngh..."  Rainbow Dash rubbed her face, blinked, and squinted up.  "Huh?"

	Right then, the lights coalesced into a large translucent face.  The flickering magical projection of a mare stared down at them.  A scar ran down her muzzle while her multi-colored bangs peaked out from beneath a golden helmet.  Her coat's graying age could be seen in the luminescent patterns, along with the cold hard lines of her jaw and cheekbones as she spoke.  Despite the crackling quality of the sound sample, the booming authority of her voice rang true.

	"Stop at once.  Do not go any further."  A pair of cold blue eyes narrowed.  "Whoever you are, if you have pierced the walls of this chamber, then that can only mean one thing.  You and I share the same spirit, both in purpose as well as in practice.  But do not obey the impulsive courage that urges you to press forward, lest you wish to learn the same lesson that I did... through loss of blood and limb."

	Razzar stepped up while the message was speaking and unabashedly pressed his gloved hand through the projection.  "Hmmm... magic luminescent construction.  And judging from the quality... a very ancient design."

	Rainbow Dash shuddered.  "Yeah... about ten thousand years ancient..."

	Props flashed her a goggled glance.  "How do you know that?"

	"I think she's about to tell us."  Rainbow gulped and bowed her head ever so slightly.  "Commander Hurricane, I presume..."

	The projection did not reply, instead thundering forth, "This door was sealed for a reason, and under my authority.  My name is Commander Hurricane of Pegasopolis.  I gave up my station as defender of the newly-formed Equestrian Alliance to see that this place remains forever untouched.  If you value your lives and that of the Harmonic Realm, do not proceed any further.  In the core of this sepulcher lies the blackest, vilest of hearts, and all you will find here is death."
		//------------------------------//
		// The Pegasus Behind the Curtain		//------------------------------//

	"Shortly before the formation of the Equestrian Union, the skies of Pegasopolis had been hounded by vicious, rampaging windigos.  My fellow brothers and sisters nearly froze to death from the cold spell that had been spreading throughout the realm.  It took many months, many lives, and many opportunities wasted by foolish pride before we realized that the solution was to embrace our fellow earth ponies and unicorns in harmony, setting aside our differences for the sake of a peaceful future of coeexistence."

	The projection of Commander Hurricane kept speaking, her glaring eyes focused on everypony and nopony in particular.  Rainbow Dash paced slowly in the air, squinting at the image as the enchanted array continued broadcasting.

	"The windigos were driven away, and our new nation began to prosper.  But then, less than two years later, there was a new wave of inclement weather, moving slowly across the Equestrian north and spreading tempests and cyclones and lightning storms.  As sworn defender of the land, I arrived with my fellow soldiers to confront this new evil.  I expected more windigos, but was surprised instead to find this city—a place far vaster and more grandiose than Pegasopolis.

	"At first, I assumed it was a relic from Pegasopolitan history, a piece of the noble city that had broken off and drifted way long before our wise record-keepers were ever foaled.  As it turned out, this city's ancient origins went far back before anypony could have even predicted.  It was certainly a place of pegasus design—but not any pegasi that I or my fellow comrades had ever met before.

	"The ponies... the creatures who built this place were exceedingly wicked.  I do not say this lightly.  As weeks went by and we continued examining this place, the more we realized that the city was nothing more than a looming death trap constructed for nefarious reasons.  Hidden weapons and malevolent devices ensnared my brothers and sisters, ending their lives within a blink.  Despite our best efforts to control the weather, this city continued its path of destruction, pulverizing the countryside below with countless waves of tempest and turmoil.

	"It was then that I made an alarming discovery.  The finer machine parts of this city can be controlled, but they respond to only one key—and that is myself.  For some inexplicable reason, I was born with the power to manipulate and guide this accursed place in manners that none of my fellow soldiers could.  The reason for this is a mystery, and yet it pains me to realize that the explanation may very well be painted in the malevolent patterns of this city's architecture.  From stained glass windows to mosaics to the ancient remnants of antique artwork, I've come to realize that a pegasus of my design was prophesied to have discovered this place.  I do not rejoice in this revelation, and yet it is with a heavy heart that I've decided to exploit it.

	"Ten years before this message was recorded, I, Commander Hurricane of Pegasopolis, and a legion of my most trusted warriors made the sacrifice of dwelling permanently within this city.  We bid Pegasopolis and the newly formed Equestrian Union a somber farewell.  Equipped with the enchanted Sword of Solstice from the Celestial Siblings, we took it upon ourselves to steer this city out of harm's way, keeping to the frozen north, and avoiding as many continental civilizations as possible.  At last, through much trial and error, we found an oceanic body that could serve as a safe haven above which we might keep this city hidden, obscured by clouds and arctic winds forever.

	"However, during this voyage, we discovered an even greater terror locked away in the core of this infernal place.  It turned out that the innermost structure of this city had a large central chamber, and the entrance to it only responded to me.  Equipped with the Sword of Solstice, I traveled deep into the city's heart, hoping to find answers to what inspired the construction of this place of evil.  It was then that I discovered that the age of this city is not only timeless, but it had long been polluted by greed, malice, and ambitious forms of magical experimentation.  The pegasi who commandeered this dwelling before I—whoever they may have been or wherever they may have hailed from—they desired power at the cost of their own well-being.  They had discovered something in their travels, something vile and deadly and ravenous, something older than any other agent of death that plagues the Harmonic Realm.

	"I encountered this evil first hoof, and it nearly devoured me.  Many of my brothers and sisters were consumed by it, twisted by it, and reduced to ravenous shadows of their past selves.  I have no doubt now that the pegasi who discovered and manipulated this cruel weapon were nothing short of agents of chaos, and it's obvious to me that their hubris was the cause of their own demise.  How fitting—and yet how tragic that their curse would now befall us.

	"Opening this chamber was a mistake, but I still have hope of rectifying the situation.  My brothers and sisters intend to fight the chaotic essence back into the black heart of this city.  No doubt many will fall in the execution of this offensive, but it will be a necessary cost, however grim.  I only hope I live long enough to shut this chamber and seal the evil away within.  Nopony must be allowed to have access to the city's core, lest they be exposed to a fate far worse than death.  If I should perish while continuing to monitor this city, then my brothers and sisters have already committed to guarding my remains as staunchly as they would guard the entrance to this chamber, for the Harmonic Realm will be in great danger if somepony were to use my remains or the Sword of Solstice in accessing that which we have so diligently locked away."

	The image of Commander Hurricane flickered in and out of the visual spectrum as it reached the tail end of the broadcast.  With a somber expression, the scarred pegasus spoke her last words.

	"Whoever you are, if you've made it this far, then either you've successfully pilfered my remains to use as a key to this chamber, or you were also born with the unique ability to access it on your own.  If it's the former scenario, then proceed at your own risk.  What you find will be ample reward for the blind avarice in your heart.

	"But if the latter is true, then we share a common bond.  Something inexplicable has drawn us both along this course, something far more powerful and older than even the legacy of Pegasopolis itself.  I've no doubt that the same blood runs through our veins, the same fluid that stabs us awake in the middle of the night, making us realize that no matter how large this world is, we are destined for things far greater and more epic than any of our peers can understand.  If you feel this same spirit as I do, then I implore you... I beg of you... do not go any further.  Ignore your impulse and your warrior's resolve, much like I failed to do when I first opened this place.  You are far too precious and too important to let your life end here.  My fate has already been sealed by my own foolish courage.  I sense my death looming on the horizon, when instead there should be a bright beacon, a golden sunrise.  My only regret is that this destined luminance shall not be mine to grasp, but it could still be yours.  Leave this chamber, seal it back up, and depart from this city forevermore.  Let it continue to be a grave of evil... and a monument to bravery.  Please.  Go back.  Go back.  This is y-y-your f-f-final war-n-n-n-n-skkkkkkt!"

	The array sparked, popped, and emitted a column of smoke.  In the absence of Hurricane's booming voice, deathly silence fell, returning the chamber to quiet desolation.

	Nopony said anything for a long while.

	Props, naturally, was the first to speak up.  "Well... that sucks."

	"Ger'essul'ina thulien rekka threnn," Arcshod muttered.

	Seclorum sighed.  "Yeah, well, those manacrystals are looking a lot less promising now."

	Rainbow Dash turned towards the survivors.  "You've been here for how many years?"  Her eyes narrowed.  "You never encountered something else besides the changelings?"

	Aatxe shook his head.  "I'm sorry, no.  We've never had an opportunity to open this chamber until you came along."

	"For obvious reasons," Josho muttered.

	"Dashie?"  Props squinted up at Rainbow.  "Are you... related to this smexy Hurricane?"

	"What?  No!  I-I mean... I dunno.  I don't think so..."  She rubbed her scalp, sighing.  "Sure, we kind of look alike—assuming that was her real face we just saw right now."

	"Any reason it wouldn't be?" Aatxe remarked.

	"For all we know, the changelings could have set it up!"

	"Yes, but even if they could turn into you and open this chamber up, wouldn't we have noticed a clue or something?" Aatxe continued.  "This place is virtually untouched!  I don't think anypony's been in here for eons!"

	"Probably because what the big floaty head thing was right," Seclorum said, pointing at the craters in the floor and the cracks in the wall.  "Whatever happened here last, it looks like it was one hell of a smackdown."

	"Hurricane fighting back the 'chaotic evil?'" Aatxe remarked.

	Seclorum nodded.  "Seems like it."

	"You think she coulda been more friggin' specific?"  Josho frowned.  "Not sure I'm a big fan of your ancient, poetic ancestors, paint bucket."

	"Look, her message was clear: 'do not go down here any further!'"  Rainbow folded her arms and frowned.  "I never once thought I'd be given a direct command from Hurricane herself, but darn if I feel like disobeying it."

	"So what's the call, Dashie?" Props asked, fidgeting where she stood.  "If we keep going on, we might end up entangled in nasty-wasties."

	"But if we don't get those manacrytals, who's to tell if we'll ever get out of here on the Tarkington!" Aatxe remarked.

	Rainbow Dash sighed, rubbing her chin in thought.  "I... I think..."

	Everypony stared at her in silence.

	She gritted her teeth and finally grumbled, "I think it's not worth the risk."

	Several survivors hung their heads.  Arcshod's ears folded as he stared off towards the wall.

	Seclorum took a deep breath.  "I'm not a fan of advancing backwards, but I've seen enough crap from this city to possibly give it a second thought."

	"Rainbow..."  Josho trotted up, eyes thin.  "Are you sure we can't... send a few of us down to investigate?  I mean, we can still proceed—but no need to risk everypony—"

	"No need to risk anypony."  She frowned.  "Period.  I suggest we regroup.  Bring this by Lasairfion.  She seems pretty smarty-smart.  Maybe she can come up with an idea or two."

	"Sounds okay to m-me!" Props said with a nervous smile.

	"First thing's first.  Let's get the heck out of here."  Rainbow spun around.  "Seclorum?  Arcshod?  Gather your dudes.  Aatxe, keep an eye on everypony.  Razzar—"  She did a double-take.  "Razzar?"

	Everypony jolted in place, looking all around.

	None of the cloaked figures were to be found.

	"Uhhhhh..." Props sweated nervously.

	"Where in Ledo's girdle strings did they g-go?!" Josho exclaimed.

	Rainbow blinked, then gasped.  Lighting her pendant, she flew towards the edge of the platform and stared straight down the pit.  Six dim amber lights were winding their way down the twin spiral staircases.

	"Luna poop!" Rainbow hissed.

	"They didn't..."  Aatxe murmured.

	"What in the hell do they think they're doing?!" Seclorum rumbled.

	"Dammit!"  Josho gnashed his teeth.  "Those slimy salamanders!"  He cocked his shotgun.  "We need to go down and grab 'em before they screw stuff up!"

	"No.  No!"  Rainbow shoved Josho back.  "I will go down and get them!"

	"But Dashie—" Props began.

	"I mean it!"  Rainbow shouted.  "You guys stay here!  Keep together!  Nopony move a muscle beyond this point or else!"  Taking a deep breath, she coiled her wings at her side and dove swiftly down the pit and after the Lounge.

	"Wait!"  Seclorum shouted, galloping towards the edge while Josho shoved him back.  "Nnnngh!  You idiot!  What are you doing?!" His snarling voice echoed down the cylindrical blackness.  "Don't go alone!  Have you learned nothing about this place?!"
		//------------------------------//
		// Something Bad is Coming Down...		//------------------------------//

	The spiraling staircases swished and crossed around Rainbow Dash as she plunged into the depths of the building.  Reaching the bottom of the pit, there was no longer any sign of the Lounge to be found.  Rainbow's glowing pendant illuminated a dust-laden floor with a tall doorframe that opened up to a large chamber.

	Pulling up into a low hover, Rainbow swiftly threaded through the passage and entered the chamber beyond.  A couple of flare had been deposited in even spaces across the stone floor.  From how brightly they burned and the amber hue with which they did so, she could easily guess who left them there.  The flickering light revealed a steep set of stairs leading down into a broad room with widely spaced walls in a hexagonal pattern.

	No sooner had Rainbow Dash flew a few feet when she nearly smashed into something.  At first, she thought it was a dangling set of rusted chains, or maybe a moldy rope.  Pausing, she tilted her crimson pendant up and illuminated what turned out to be a series of dangling obstructions.  Upon closer examination, she blinked and halted her forward movement entirely.

	The upper length of the room was clustered with various branches of leathery green vines.  Fibrous strands dangled off the flat ends of the thorny structures, betraying their age and state of decay.  Visions of Everfree Forest flashed through Rainbow's mind, and the more of these ropey structures she saw, the more claustrophobic and confined she felt.  Her eyes traced the looping ends of these things, and she found that they had long found surfaces across the floor, walls, and ceiling to cling to eons ago.

	Rainbow Dash hovered close to the ground, having to constantly duck and weave beneath the branching structures.  As she proceeded along, she noticed several clumps of debris littering the floor.  Glancing down, she saw smashed remnants of a granite table, along with a copious amount of shattered glass containers and rusted instruments.  Decayed wooden chairs and moldy shelves lingered in the corner, overshadowed by the array of dangling vines.

	Rainbow's lips pursed as she spun and looked around some more.  In the flicker of a yellow Lounge flare, she saw decrepit stone tablets lying against the wall.  There were inscriptions upon the granite slabs that for the life of her she couldn't recognize.  They were written in a language completely alien to Equestrian Basic.  However, she did recognize several illustrations accompanying the texts and geometric figures.  She saw equine shapes with wings, along with etchings of vines, plant leaves, and something that resembled a liquid solution contained within a vial.

	"Experiments...?"  Rainbow's brow furrowed.  "Commander Hurricane?"  Her jaw went tight.  "No.  Couldn't be.  But perhaps..."  Her eyes trailed up, and she gasped.

	All of the vines and thorny branches connected to a central source.  In the converging amber and crimson light, Rainbow saw a large tree trunk in the center of the room.  Only, it wasn't quite a tree, but rather a bulbous thing, shaped like an enormous pear.  The shell of the thing was organic, consisting of a vomitous green carapace and studded all over with rust-red barnacles.  The vines and branches converged at the top, where a crimson stem with decayed petals loomed just beneath the chamber's ceiling.  Rainbow had no doubt that the thing was once alive, but it lay dormant now, its outer fringes moldy and gray from millennia of neglect.

	The pegasus bit her lip.  She slowly pivoted about, spotting fibrous green roots that branched outward from the base of the plant and spread towards the furthest walls of the room.  At one spot, the bulk of the roots combined, forming one thick tether that ran through a thin doorway and cascaded down a series of winding steps.  From the far end, Rainbow detected the faintest hint of yellow amberlight.

	Frowning, Rainbow Dash flapped her wings and sailed down the curved, descending corridor.  After three and a half spiraling turns, she emerged in a large round room positioned beneath the chamber with the hideous plant.  Here, at last, she caught up with the Lounge.  Razzar and his five companions were busily snatching glowing purple manashards from the platforms where they lay.  The room was shaped like a giant octagon, with similarly shaped panels spotting the flat walls of the place.  The roots that had snaked their way down had spread to all eight walls of the chamber, winding their way into the panels that reflected the Lounge's amber managlow.

	"Razzar!"  Rainbow hissed, fluttering her way into the center of the chamber.  "What in Celestia's name has gotten into you?!  Are you crazy?!"

	"If desiring a way out of this floating monstrosity deems me psychotic, then I gladly subscribe to your diagnosis," he calmly said through his mask while gesturing to his companions.  "Every crystal shard, brothers.  Don't leave a single one behind."

	"Didn't you hear a single dang thing that the ancient hologram said upstairs?!" Rainbow's voice cracked.

	"Allow me to guess."  Razzar pivoted towards Rainbow Dash, his silver expression reflecting her glinting ruby light.  "A copious amount of doom and gloom but with vague descriptions as regarding the true nature of it?"  He slinked across the room beneath her.  "Ponies may find comfort in wasting their time on fear, but the Lounge have long learned to look beyond it.  We had a goal in coming here.  Do you or do you not wish to help your companions escape on the Tarkington?"

	"Well... y-yeah!  But..."  Rainbow Dash fidgeted in mid-air, eying the octagonal panels with the roots attached.  "Commander Hurricane made it perfectly clear that something really dang evil is down here, waiting for us!  And I'm not all that keen on disturbing it!"

	"And does it seem disturbed to you?"

	"Dang it, Razzar, this isn't the time to taunt fate!  We're a lot safer up on the surface of Stratopolis and—Guh..."  She frowned.  "Did you not see that flank-fuggly plant on the way down here?"  Silence.  "Razzar...?"  She glanced down, and her eyes widened.

	Razzar was walking up a center platform that was raised above the rest of the room.  His gloved hands flexed and unflexed as he approached what looked like a lever and crank-shaft positioned on the top of a slender cylinder.

	"Razzar..."  Rainbow grunted, then grunted again.  "Razzar, what are you doing?"

	"We're in the very heart of Stratopolis," the figure crackled through his mask.  "Seems like the most logical place for the builders of this structure to house the city's engine... or—perhaps—it's cockpit."

	"Cockpit?!"  Rainbow's muzzle scrunched.  "Razzar, look, we've got the manacrystals!  It's what we need to power the survivors' ship and yours.  Let's just hoist them over our shoulders and get out of here!"

	"You're obviously a seasoned adventurer, Rainbow Dash, but you have a few things to learn about opportunity."  He tilted his mask up towards her.  "Why run from something when instead you can control it?"

	"What do you mean, control it?" Rainbow asked.  Her ears twitched to the sound of manarifles cocking behind her.  She didn't even need to look back.  Instead, she glared down at the Lounge leader, frowning.  "This was your goal all along, wasn't it?"

	"If you think I desired my comrades and I to be stranded here like a bunch of helpless equines, then you are sorely mistaken."

	"But you wanted to gain access to this city nonetheless!"  Rainbow gnashed her teeth.  "Tell me, Razzar.  Aatxe and Lasairfion and Prowse and the rest—did the changelings bring them all here?  Or were you running ship after ship into the storm to test how long anyone could survive in this place?!"

	"How easily you think ill of me..."

	"'Cuz you friggin make it that easy!" Rainbow Dash growled, hovering in the glow of the converging figures' manarifles.  "What were you actually doing when you were hunting down Prowse and Elma, huh?!  Did somepony really contract you into finding the shapeshifters this whole time?!"

	Razzar stood in silence.

	"Hmmph..."  Rainbow clenched her jaw.  "That's what I thought.  What do you do when you actually capture the changelings, Razzar?  Do they tell you enough about this place under knife and taser?"

	Clak-Clak!  Razzar pointed a manapistol at her skull.  "Enough to know that nothing can be trusted in this city, including a pegasus who is inexplicably gifted with the powers of an ancient to open the inner chambers of this domain.  The monsters who run this place can control magic, enchantment, and even the viscosity of their own blood.  They've usurped royal monarchs, mind-controlled a dragon, and brought two powerful empires upon the brink of oblivion.  Now they shift their focus to the east, and with the essence of a magically-imbued pegasus added to the hive, who knows what they're capable of doing?!"

	"Then what does this make you?"  Rainbow Dash asked, monitoring the glowing gun sights in the corners of her vision.  "Are you somehow the savior of the Wastes, Razzar?"

	"No more than you are, Rainbow Dash.  Though that is about to change."  He side-stepped closer to the cylinder and its lever.  "He who wields power wields control in this world.  With access to the mobility of this city, one can navigate the furthest reaches of this plane.  Don't pretend to deny it.  You've seen the illustrations etched into the walls of Stratopolis.  You know in your heart the function of this place."

	Her nostrils flared.  "It's a Sentinel... a Sentinel of the Rings..."

	"It is clear to me now why the queen of the changeling hive desires this place so much.  It has already served as her secret base of operations.  But now, with full access to its operations, she can make that base mobile and attack any kingdom from anywhere, and just who will be able to resist her?"

	"She's not succeeded so far, Razzar!"

	"That's because she's not had the key to the heart of this place.  You, Rainbow Dash.  You are both the best and the worst thing to come to Stratopolis.  Because of this, now is the time that I must take control of the situation.  If the changelings are too hungry for power, and you too frivolous about it, then the Lounge must make their move."

	"And just what do you intend to do with it?"

	"If I am right about my suspicions of this place, then this city can navigate any spot on the plane... including the far north."

	Rainbow blinked.  "The... far north?"  She pursed her lips.  "You mean the skystone fields?"

	"No ship, naga, pony, or any other living thing has been able to cross the north or south edges of the plane," Razzar said.  "But, with a city—a Sentinel such as Stratopolis—we can finally have access to all of the precious minerals.  We'll have enough energy to stage an attack on the changeling hives all across the world.  They'll be incapable of defending themselves from our unprecedented speed and firepower.  With unlimited skystone at our disposal, we'll hunt the shape-shifters to the ends of the earth, and restore balance to the continents abroad—even beyond the Grand Choke!"

	"And does it stop there, Razzar?"  Rainbow Dash snarled.  "What happens to the world once the 'mighty and powerful Lounge' have rid it of the shape shifting hoard?"

	"It's just as I said, Rainbow Dash.  He who wields power in this world wields control."

	"Grrrr..." Rainbow flew forward, only to stop at the threatening sound of cocking manarifles.  She spat from a distance.  "I did not go through Hell and back across this world just to see the reins of power thrown into another pair of gnarled hands!  If you really wanna do what's best for the world, Razzar, you gotta learn how to repair it!  Not fill it with holes!"

	"There will be no peace, no tranquility—until the conspiring shape-shifters are completely eliminated."

	"You don't know that!" her voice cracked.  "What if they can be fixed?!  What if they can be healed?!  What if... what if..."  She gulped.  "What if they can be shown what it means to be loved again?!  They've been feeding on pain and chaos for so long that they don't know any better!"

	"A most interesting sermon," Razzar droned.  "Coming from a pegasus who's chief talent is waging destruction wherever she goes."

	Rainbow Dash frowned.  "Don't pretend to know me."

	"Only as long as you pretend to know yourself."  Razzar gestured towards his comrades.

	P-Pift!  Gusts of steam burst along the fringes of the room.

	"H-huh?!"  Rainbow glanced aside, then gasped as lengths of cord wrapped around her body.  Two grappling hooks ensnared her from opposite sides, and she fell—wriggling—to the floor while a pair of figures bundled her up.  "Nnnngh!  Let me go!  Quit it!"

	"I knew there would come a time when I would have to contend with you."  Razzar slowly stepped towards her, looming above the struggling mare with his pistol in hand.  "Somehow, I thought that you would put up more of a fight.  Perhaps I guessed correctly, and the brood queen already got to you, Rainbow Dash, if that's who you really are..."

	"Whatever I am..."  Rainbow spat.  "At least I'm not a good-for-nothing snake in the grass son of a—"

	"Please, Rainbow..."  Razzar waved his gun disapprovingly.  "What would your pony goddesses say?"

	"'Go buck yourself!'"

	"Indeed.  Maybe they will have the opportunity, someday, once I have liberated their kingdom from the shape-shifting army."  Razzar turned and stepped back up to the cylinder.  "Odds are I will have run into you a dozen times by then... at least... versions of you.  I do hope they prove more exciting than this encounter."

	"Dang it, Razzar!  Don't do this!"  Rainbow Dash hissed from where she writhed.  "Don't try to take this place over!  Don't you realize why Chrysalis never attempted it herself?!"

	"I believe it's quite clear.  She never before had you to—"

	"It's because she knows it's been tried before!"  Rainbow Dash spat.  "Commander Hurricane had access eons ago, and in so doing she accidentally unleashed an evil far greater than the changelings could ever possibly be!  Whoever first controlled this place—the pegasi who first had access to this Sentinel—they went off the deep end!  They found something or made something that killed themselves off!  And it killed Hurricane off too!  That's why it was left here in the wastes!  Hurricane didn't want anypony else to find it or else they'd make the same mistake you're about to!"

	Razzar sighed through his crackling mask, then spun about with his pistol aimed squarely at Rainbow's skull. "Rainbow Dash, the only mistake I've made was not silencing your prattling mouth minutes ago—"

	Ka-Pow!

	Rainbow winced, only to realize that her skull was still intact.

	Meanwhile, Razzar's weapon flew from his singed glove.  He winced, stumbling back against the cylinder.

	The other five Lounge members spun and faced the doorframe entering the octagonal room, weapons drawn.

	"Not another move, scaleys," Josho hissed from where he squinted down his smoking shotgun.  "Don't even fart."

	"Nnnnngh..." Razzar moaned, still clutching his wrist.  "It's always the fat ones..."

	"You okay there, paint bucket?" Josho barked.

	"Josho!"  Rainbow Dash sputtered from where she lay in binds.  "I thought I told you and the rest to stay up above!"

	"Yes, well..."  Seclorum trotted out of the room, his crossbow drawn.  "Luckily, we don't speak 'stupid.'"

	"Dashie!"  Props sing-songed, popping out of the hallway along with Arcshod and four other ponies.  A phalanx of equines trained their makeshift weapons on the six Lounge members.  "What in the hay happened to you?!"

	Rainbow grumbled, "I picked a bad time to catch up on my filly scout knot-making."

	"Get her out of that mess, blondie," Josho nodded towards the mechanic.  "We'll take care of lizard breath."

	"You speak as if we're not of one accord, Ledomaritan," Razzar said while Props ran over to Rainbow's side.

	"Oh, I'm sorry!  Did I interrupt your tea ceremony?!"  Josho scowled.  "Or is it just pure coincidence that you give rambling evil monologues to bound mares in the dark?!"

	"What the crap, Razzar?!" Seclorum grunted over his friend's shoulder.  "You said you were going to cover the survivors!  How does abandoning us in the middle of a strange environment fit into all of that?!"

	"You desired the manacrystals, did you not?"  Razzar gestured towards the shards clinging to the cloaked figure's backsides.  "We were simply retrieving them as planned."

	"Uh huh..." Rainbow fidgeted and frowned while Props sliced her binds free with a metal shiv from her saddlebag.  "And what about the part where you planned to take control of this city, harvest skystone from the north, and then wield world-wide totalitarian domination?!"  She stretched her wings and crawled up onto her hooves, freed.  "Didja forget that part?!"

	Arcshod frowned.  "He'kaata rekulien trenn'adren!"

	Seclorum squinted.  "Is this true, Razzar?"

	"You all have no idea the extent to which the shape-shifters have dominated you," Razzar said icily.  "They control you with fear.  They control you with paranoia.  And now... thanks to Rainbow Dash... they control you with a false sense of self-righteousness."

	"I dunno, pal."  Josho squinted down his shotgun.  "From where I'm looking, I'm not the one with the disgusting hard-on over changelings."

	"I've done some nasty things to get me and my companions out of this rathole of a city," Seclorum said.  "The last thing I wanna do is take control over it."

	"We are in a race against a dynamically morphing conspiracy!" Razzar growled.  "Perpetrated by the shape-shifting brood and accelerated by that mare!" He pointed at Rainbow Dash.  "If we leave now, this inner chamber and all of its secrets will fall into the hive queen's clutches!  The world as we know it will tremble under her control!"

	"Let's take things one flankhole at a time, shall we?"  Seclorum motioned with his shotgun.  "Step away from the colorful mare, buddy, thank you..."

	Razzar stepped backwards as commanded.  "It is unfortunate that you cannot smell what's truly run afoul here, ponies."  His body inched towards the cylinder.  "Perhaps now is the time to keep both eyes open..."

	Rainbow saw where he was moving.  She gasped.  "No!"  Her hoof stretched out.  "Don't let him touch—!"

	It was too late.  Razzar stealthily grasped the handle of the central pedestal with his gloved hand and gave the crankshaft a turn.  A metallic sound reverberated deeply through the place.  The raised steps around the cylinder glowed one layer after another with a lavender aura.

	Props clung to Rainbow, trembling.  Rainbow looked up with quivering eyes.

	The room shook, raining dust and sediment down onto everyone's heads.  Arcshod and his fellow Xonans glanced about anxiously.  Seclorum's fellow warriors clung to their crossbows, shivering.

	Then, as quickly as it began, the rumbling ended.

	Razzar stood up straight.  His panting breath could be heard through his mask.  "I... I do not understand.  Where is the cockpit?  Another chamber should have been revealed..."

	"Perhaps the changelings we interrogated lied, brother," another Lounge member said.

	"Silence, weakling!" Razzar hissed.  "That is impossible!  I simply didn't turn it far enough—" He reached for the lever yet again.

	"Not another inch!" Josho shouted.

	"Do not threaten our master!" a Lounge member growled, priming his weapon in Josho's direction.

	"That's it!"  Seclorum cocked his crossbow.  "You creeps have just signed your death warrant—"

	"Everyone stop!" Props shouted in a high-pitched squeal, even making Razzar's gang wince.  "Do... do you guys hear that?!"  She stammered.

	Everyone stood in silence... that is until they became aware of a ringing sound echoing across the dark chamber.  It rose and fell in tonality, ultimately undulating with a deep bass hum.

	"Sok'ranna rendulien threatta..." Arcshod murmured, nervously eying the ceiling.

	"What in blazes is making that sound?" Seclorum murmured.

	Another Ledomaritan remarked, "Sounds... almost like d-drums."

	"More like a heartbeat," said another pony.

	"Alright..."  Josho gulped.  "Drum sessions are sexy n'all... but I think now is high time we gallop outta here—"

	Just then, the noise stopped.  It was quiet enough to hear the saliva swishing in everyone's mouths.  Then, all of the sudden—

	"Look!" Props yelped, pointing up.

	Everyone's necks tilted.  One by one, the octagonal panels in the wall slid open with errant hisses.  When at last all of them were opened, the bass thumping resumed, coming out of one hole on the far side of the chamber.

	Rainbow Dash flapped her wings, hovering upwards and squinting.  She saw a lavender glow from the deepest recesses of the compartment.  The roots of the plant that rivered into the hole shifted and wobbled slightly.  Then, at last, something came out of it... or more like dripped out.

	A collective gasp filled the room as a viscous globule of muck fell to the granite floor.  Lizards and ponies alike backstepped from the slimy mess.  No one was training guns on each other anymore.  All eyes were locked on the unsightly puddle.

	Props fidgeted, glancing nervously aside at Rainbow Dash.  Squinting her ruby eyes, Rainbow hovered forward in silence.  She gave her pendant a good rub, illuminating the pool of slime on the floor.  Upon closer inspection, the bubbling solution took on a sickly purple hue.  It quivered all over like living plasmodium, and it was covered in random spots by thick rounded postules.  After a few seconds of stillness, those postules suddenly flickered open, revealing an array of bone-white blinking eyes.  They swiveled around until they all faced Rainbow Dash.

	The pegasus jerked back.

	Sploosh!  A necrotic hoof emerged from the puddle.

	Props shrieked.  Rainbow Dash hovered back while everyone collectively flinched.

	The hoof was followed by a second limb, then a cranium, then a spinal structure.  Inch by inch, an equine body pulled itself out of the impossibly tiny puddle of slime, accompanied by a deeply resonating deathbeat.  Soon, a slime-covered pony stood before the group, shivering.  Its joints cracked as it took one wet step forward, then a second.  Suddenly, it stopped, then spread a pair of bony wings out in a splash of purple liquid.  Crkkkk!  It tilted its head up, then opened a gaping maw, vomiting out four times the amount of viscous lavender slime, every other square inch awash with blinking white eyeballs that spread the disgusting solution further and further across the floor.

	Rainbow Dash flew backwards, grimacing hideously at the display.  At that precise moment, the bass noise doubled, and she heard shrieks to her left.  She glanced to her side.

	Out from two other holes, more fountains of slime were splashing.  In quick order, equine figures emerged from the purple mess, lurching across the floor and crushing eyeballs into bloody pulp as they approached the Lounge like a sentient wall of phlegm.

	"Back!  Get back!"

	Snarling, a cloaked member of the Lounge shuffled his way into a wall.  The floor around him was already covered with the purple goo, giving him no way to run.  At the sound of his distressed voice, two slimey ponies turned and marched his way.  As some of the ooze dripped off the figures, Rainbow could spot spread, feather-less wings, rotting from the inside out.

	"Brothers!  Help me!"

	Desperate, the figure fired his rifle into the guts of the approaching creatures.  One pegasus fell flat to its chest, bursting with four times as much slime as the puddle it emerged from.  The second rushed towards him, its open mouth gargling with the acidic solution.  The lizard took one good shot at its scalp, and the pegasus' cranium exploded, splashing purple liquid all over the Lounge member's weapon.  The slime wormed its way into the structure of the rifle, making it useless.  Panicking, the lizard flung the weapon away and reached under his cloak for a pistol.  Meanwhile, four more equine shapes emerged from the slime, joining their headless companion.  They converged on the lizard, thrashing and biting as his body from all sides.  Their attacks were barely wounding him, but the slime that dripped off of their muzzles and fetlocks spread all over his figure as soon as it made contact.

	Hyperventilating upon the smell of his own body going up in smoke, the lizard shrieked through his mask and activated his rocket thrusters.  He soared through the room, dragging the clinging equines—and their deathly slime—along with him.  "Hraaaauckckkkkltkg-grkkkk-aaakk!"  Ponies and naga ran for cover as he slammed into the far wall, then fell like a slimy sack of meat.  When he struck the floor, it was with a wet splash, spilling purple ooze marinating in reptilian entrails.

	Cl-Clink!  The manacrystals that the ill-fated lizard was carrying rattled cleanly across the floor.  Rainbow Dash looked at it, then spun to gape at other side of the room.

	Seclorum and two other ponies were cornered against a wall, firing at a current of purple slime rivering their way.  One by one—equine-shaped lumps emerged from the mess and lumbered towards the trio.  Despite their fervent efforts, no amount of crossbolts could stop the death march of the undead pegasi.

	"Hold on, old friend!" Josho shouted between firing pot-shots with his shotgun.  "Hey!  Connect-the-dots face!  A little hoof here!"  Arcshod followed the obese stallion as he stood upon the edge of the eye-bobbing mess.  With combined telekinesis, they levitated Seclorum and his two companions away from the tiny patch of granite before it could be overwhelmed by slimey pegasi.

	From four other holes, more copious streams of gunk poured out.  Without wasting any time, moaning pegasi emerged from the solution, spread their wings, and glided towards the embattled survivors.

	"Josho!  Look out—" Rainbow started to shout.

	Ka-Pow!  A yellow stream of mana flew in and exploded the winged ponies in mid-air

	Josho, Arcshod, and Rainbow spun to look.

	Razzar and his remaining cohorts had formed a line, retreating firmly form the center of the swiftly flooded chamber.  "Get a move on!  We'll hold them off!"

	"Like we can trust you!" Seclorum spat.

	"I'd be vastly amazed if you can strike up an even better conversation with them!"  Razzar fired blast after bright flast into the multiplying wave of slimy monstrosities.  "Now go!  Whatever you do, don't let the slime touch you!"

	"Props!" Rainbow shouted.  "Quick!  Grab the manacrystals!"

	"Okay!"  Props scooped up the glowing shards and strapped them to her saddlebag.  "Okies!  What now—?!"  She looked up to see a fountain of purple liquid sloshing towards her.  "Aaaaaiie!"

	Rainbow scooped her up in the nick of time, then soared over the bubbling death currents.  The air was filled with a deafening bass hum by this point, undulating as if with a demon heartbeat.  Whille the interior turned darker and darker, all Rainbow could see was the whites of alien eyes bobbing in the current, then lunging towards her as hissing pegasi shapes splashed violently out of the mess.  She spun with the weight of Props' body, avoiding the splattering lavender liquid with only a hair's breadth to spare.

	Loud shrieks filled the chamber by the time Rainbow reached the patch of stone floor before the exit.  She turned her head to look.

	Two ponies stood their ground, surrounded on all sides by the viscous liquid.

	Rainbow seethed through her teeth.  "Josho!"

	"Wh-what?!" the stallion shouted back amidst shotgun blasts.

	"Catch!" And Rainbow tossed Props.

	"Aaaaackies!"  Props flailed, only to be caught by Josho's strong telekinetic field.

	"Are you crazy?!" Josho sputtered as he shoved Props up the hallway to safety.

	"Something like that!" Rainbow hollered back as she soared towards the stranded pair.  She had to dodge crossbolts, energy beams, and exploding splashes of purple ooze along the way.  Once in the clear, she dove down, spun sideways, and grabbed the two ponies in her forelimbs.  They gasped in her embrace as she glided fearlessly over the deadly pool, then swiveled back towards the last remaining patch of unwashed stone.  Through the corner of her eyes, Rainbow could spot the cylinder with the lever, remaining strangely untouched by the viscous slime.  Before she could dwell on that, a pair of dripping pegasi sailed at her body, hissing and spitting up muck.

	Pow!  Razzar's well-aimed blast exploded the winged equines before they could make contact.  Nevertheless, Rainbow had to dart upwards to avoid the splattering liquid.

	"Rrrrghhh... Razzar!"

	"It would do you well to fly faster," he calmly said while firing at the advancing pegasi.  "Hurry.  My brothers and I can't hold them off much longer."

	"We're not through, you and I!"  Rainbow grunted as she touched down and deposited the breathless pair of ponies.  "Not by a longshot!"

	"You heard the snake in the grass!"  Josho yelled while backtrotting from the flooded compartment.  "Let's get out of here!  Gallop!  Back up to the door with the others!"

	"Move it!  Move it!  Move it!"  Seclorum shouted while reloading his crossbow.

	"Re'lanna brekken la'sanna'kiel?!" Arschod sweatily exclaimed.

	"Yes!  Prowse's niece is carrying some manacrystals!"  Seclorum nodded.  "At least somepony got what we came here for!"

	"Xon... drenna diulen thr'akka vreen!"

	"Don't need to tell me twice!"  Seclorum kicked an errant Ledomaritan in the flank.  "Dammit, go!  Make like the wind!"

	Ponies and Lounge members alike turned completely and ran straight up the stairs.  At the last second, a throng of pegasi burst out of the mess and lunged at the group.

	In mid-flight, Rainbow Dash turned and gasped.  "Look out!"

	"On your six!" Josho howled.

	Arcshod spun, snarled, and fired a crossbolt.  The projectile pierced a pegasus' skull, slamming its body into another equine.  However, the resulting purple splash made contact with a fleeing Xonan.  The stallion gasped, collapsing across the stairs on his chest while the liquid melted his fetlocks out from under him.  "Grrraaaaaugh—Drek threem jaat!  Xonnn!"

	Arcshod gasped, his glossy eyes reflecting a pair of slimed figures as they pounced on the warrior, ripping his tattooed flesh to pieces.  In a matter of seconds, their oozing bodies merged with his, and they became one with the fleshy puddle of purple slime.  From inside the quivering mound of liquid, the stallion's screams could be heard, curdling lower and lower until they joined with the bass thumping.

	"Rem'uttien drenna'draak!"  Arcshod howled, charging forward.  "Drems'thulien lattar threnn siul Nagu'n!"

	"Dammit, it's too late!"  Seclorum and another Xonan restrained Arcshod, tugging him back with flickering telekinesis.  "Keep moving, ya big lug!"  He fired over Arcshod's quivering shoulder at the mess.  "Everypony!  Just keep moving!"

	Rainbow nearly wretched, but nevertheless turned and flew up the winding corridor, shoving several ponies along with use of her wingstrength.  "You heard the stallion!  Run!"

	"Go on, brothers," Razzar hissed as he took up the rear, firing madly into the rising, rising ooze.  "We can still salvage this yet—"

	Just as he spoke this, a pony splashed out of the bubbling mass and charged up the steps.  This one had no wings, but instead freshly mawed flesh brimming with bloody tattoos.

	"Master!  Look out!"  A cloaked figure grabbed Razzar's shoulder and hoisted him out of reach of the undead Xonan's jaws.

	As Razzar stumbled up the steps, two other Lounge members fired at the stallion's body.

	The creature's skull burst, splashing purple goo all over the cloak of the naga that had saved Razzar.  The lizard shrieked instantly, collapsing to the steps as the ooze melted through his cloak and ate away at his scales.  He writhed on the floor while the lavender pool swiftly washed up over his body.  His mask crumbled away, and a hint of razor sharp teeth clattered through smoke and fumes.

	"Grnnngh... br-brothers... brothers, pl-please... help..."

	Razzar stood up straight.  Taking a deep breath, he reached down... and grabbed the manacrystals off the naga's back before they could be encased in slime.  Swiveling, he reached into his own cloak, produced a belt of mana explosives, and shoved them into the quivering mass that remained of his melting companion.

	"Do not stop for anything!" Razzar snarled, firing down the steps in mid-march.  Kapow!

	The energy blast had the desired effect, blowing back a wave of the purple slime and giving the surviving Lounge room to escape.  Not long after, the viscous material recoalesced, floating eyes blinking wide as the quivering mass advanced up the curved steps with rapidly multiplying speed, accompanied by galloping and gliding equines.
		//------------------------------//
		// Can You Survive the Evil?		//------------------------------//

	Rainbow Dash was the first to emerge in the broad chamber full of vines and thorny branches.  Her ruby pendant glowed off the sickly carapace of the large deceased plant in the center of the compartment.  Threading her way over and around the dangling obstructions, she paused halfway and turned to face the hallway from which she emerged.

	"Quick!  This way, guys!  Just up the steps and—"

	"Look out!" a pony's voice shrieked.  Josho, Props, and a few other survivors had already emerged, but they all dove for the floor as something streaked past them, dripping with purple slime.

	Rainbow gasped.

	The lone, speeding pegasus pinballed off two vines and rose towards the looming ceiling.  Its bony feathers dribbled acidic slime as it spiraled about, hissed, and dove suicidally towards the helpless group below.  Josho could barely aim at the thing to get a shot off.

	"Hnnnngh!"  Rainbow Dash courageously threw her shoulder into the body of the undead beast.  The two went ricocheting off the floor, crashing wetly through a wooden shelf full of moldy scrolls and ancient texts.

	"Rainbow!" Josho shouted.  "Watch it!"

	"Don't let the damn thing splatter all over you!" Seclorum added, emerging and cocking his crossbow.

	Waking up to the danger, Rainbow gaped at the puddle forming between her and the creature.  She snapped out of it at the last second, ducking as the thing's mouth snapped violently at her scalp.

	Right then, Razzar and two other Lounge members emerged.  "Move aside."  Razzar squatted and fired without hesitation.  Ka-p-pow!

	Yellow manafire flew in Rainbow's direction.  Thinking fast, she rolled to the side, spiraling out of reach of the zombie pegasus' exploding innards.  Purple slime coated the far walls of the granite compartment, sending smoke and steam billowing ceilingwards.

	"Dammit, lizard!"  Josho grunted as he telekinetically shoved more ponies ahead, boosting them towards their destination.  "I never thought I'd hear myself say this, but shooting madly isn't helping!"

	"Speak for yourself," Razzar droned.  Right then, the thumping beat intensified, echoing throughout the whole chamber.  "They are overcoming us!  Brothers—"

	The other three Lounge members had already formed a phalanx, aiming their manarifles at the tunnel exit.  The last stumbling equines gasped, their eyes lit up by the weapons' light.  Arcshod and Seclorum hoisted them out of the way just milliseconds before a wall of pulsating purple slime poured out, splashing outward in every direction.

	"Fire!"  Razzar howled, and then the room filled with thunder.  Solid waves of yellow energy surged into the corridor, roasting every square inch of the door-frame.  The bubbling ooze rolled back, undulated, and splashed forward with greater speed and viscosity.

	The Lounge members adjusted their weapons, intensifying the mana output as they collectively struggled to beat the deadly solution back.  In the meanwhile, Razzar turned, snarled, and shoved several ponies towards the far end of the room.

	"You wish to go?!  Then go!" his voice crackled loudly through the mask.  "We'll hold them back as best as we can!"

	"Throw yourselves at 'em while you're at it," Seclorum grumbled, then galloped up the stairs, ushering several fellow survivors along in the process.  "Keep moving!  Head for the door at the top of the stairwell!"

	"Move it!" Josho added.  He glanced upwards in mid gallop.  "Rainbow Dash—"

	"I could use some cover!" Rainbow hollered, watching in horror as two pegasi violently slipped past the Lounge's blockade.  Set ablaze by manafire, the undead creatures stumbled their way through the vines and dove at a train of galloping ponies, their mouths drooling with lavender acid.

	Josho's eyes darted upwards.  He aimed his shotgun and blasted at a length of plant branches.  P-Pow!  A length of vines fell.  "Paint bucket—"

	"Got it!"  Rainbow twirled sideways, spun, and grabbed the loose end of the falling vine in her mouth.  Swinging her body around, she flew in a wide arc and clotheslined the two pegasi with the thorny branch.  Both creatures twirled from the blow and slammed into a far wall, exploding into wet puddles awash with fluttering eyeballs.

	"Quezaat spare us!" a naga's voice could be heard shouting.  Rainbow spun a glance over her shoulder.  She saw Razzar's phalanx buckling, stumbling backwards as the dense flood of slime finally emerged from the corridor.  With deadly splashes, one equine after another galloped out of the mess, charging the valiant defenders.  Manafire converged on the undead hoard, sending them collapsing to the floor in wet splashes, spreading the slime thicker and thicker across the ancient granite.

	"Retreat, my brothers!"  Razzar shouted, nudging the other cloaked figures along.  "I shall give you cover—"  Just as he said this, a bipedal shape leapt out of the slime, lunging towards him.  Holding his breath, Razzar ducked while the creature soared over his scalp.

	Props gasped as she and Arcshod jumped in opposite directions.  The thrashing creature collapsed against the large plant in the center of the room, a large thick tail whipping as it gnashed blindly at the air with a scaled mouth.

	"Nagu'n!" Arcshod sputtered.

	"Is that one of the Lounge?" a pony breathlessly stammered from the stairs.  "But... it d-died just minutes ago—"

	"Hressssshhhh!"  The slime covered monster lunged at the ponies.

	"Mmmmffnnngh!" Rainbow Dash dove down and slammed into the thing's chest.  "It's looking pretty darn alive now!"

	"Rainbow, watch out!" Props' voice cracked.

	The beast propped itself up on its necrotic tail, swinging a fist full of claws at the pegasus' face.

	Rainbow ducked, then flapped her wings so she could backstep from its second lunge.

	Sliiiink!  The monster's claws grazed the carapace of the plant, spilling bright orange fluid all across the floor.  Rainbow Dash inadvertently slipped on the juice, falling awkwardy to her spine.  The reptile spun, vomited purple ooze, and pounced towards the mare.

	Rainbow flinched—

	Pffft-Thunk!  A single crossbolt sailed into the thing's neck, pinning it—dangling—to the trunk of the plant.  The dead naga hung there above Rainbow Dash, twitching and convulsing.  Then, with a sickening pop, its tail snapped clean from its body and fell to the ground with a splash of surging purple slime.

	Spluttt!  A dollop of the ooze splattered across the room... and caught Props tail.  The mare gasped, collapsing breathlessly to the floor as the slime coagulated, spreading through her blonde hairs.

	"D-Dashie!" Props whimpered, goggled eyes wide.

	"Props!" Rainbow shouted.

	Schiiing! Arcshod unsheathed his scimitar.  In one massive stride, he swung the blade at full force, cutting off the last third of Props' tail hairs.

	The mare gasped, scrambling away from the puddle.

	Rainbow grabbed her forelimbs and yanked her safely away while three more undead pegasi galloped up.

	"Raaaaaaaugh!" Arcshod howled in fury, lopping two heads off in one swing and skewering the chest of another.  The last living corpse stuck itself on his blade, dribbling blood and slime that crept like animated mold up the sword.  Realizing that it was a lost cause to salvage the weapon, Arcshod kicked away at the blade's hilt and levitated his crossbolt, skewering the skull of the impaled beast and the advancing pegasi behind it.  The muscular Xonan joined the Lounge as they marched backwards up the stairs, firing potshots at the flood of equine death and slime spreading rapidly across the stairs and crawling up the steps after the survivors.

	Meanwhile, up above, Rainbow Dash deposited Props' frazzled body besides Josho at the top of the stairs as they all went charging through the doorway and into the immense stairwell beyond.
		//------------------------------//
		// It's Simply Called Advancing Backwards		//------------------------------//

	"Eeugh!" Elma convulsed in Belle's embrace.  Her black shell flickered from one coat to another as her eyes fumed with green smoke.  "No!  N-no, mother, please!"

	"Elma!" Bellesmith hissed, dragging her deeper into the confines of a collapsed zeppelin. She tried desperately to silence her.  "Elma, you must be quiet!  They'll hear us!"

	"D-don't do it, mother!" Elma squeaked and writhed.  "Don't do it to them!"  She curled her forelimbs and sobbed into Belle's chest.  "So... so tired... so s-sick and tired of devouring pain..."

	"What's happening, Elma?"  Belle gulped and stammered, "What's 'mother' doing to who?  What is she planning?"

	No sooner was she done asking this then a loud series of buzzing sounds flitted past the zeppelin.  Belle glanced out a rusted, gaping window just in time to catch streaking black bodies on dragonfly wings.



	Pilate winced.  It wasn't enough that his visual senses were being overloaded by the Oracular Array of red lines against virtual blackness.  The rolling thunder of the Stratopolitan tempest pounded his eardrums, making it hard to walk straight, much less carry the weight of the amber skystone on his back.

	Neverthless, he pressed forward, keeping the Lounge's energy rod that Roarke had given him close to his side.  He was about to trot past the umpteenth marble pillar when—suddenly—his helm practically vibrated from the sheer amount of information he was receiving.  He didn't know exactly how or why, but he sensed a dense cloud of objects surging up from behind.

	"What in Spark's name...?"

	Pilate's heartrate increased tenfold.  Glancing left, he saw a collapsed pillar lying on its side beneath a crashed manaship.  There was a niche within that was small enough for his body.  He rushed over, slid on the moist balcony's surface, and threaded his body through the narrow crack.

	Not long after, several objects zipped by, propelled by blurred wings.  Pilate stared out—but realized he didn't have to.  Even through the immediate structures surrounding him, he could sense the flying bodies as they streamed through the rain and wind.

	"...twelve... seventeen... twenty-two..."  He didn't realize he was doing it at first, but he was counting each of the bodies, clearly separating them from the rest of the chaos and noise.  "...thirty-five..."  His brow furrowed under the helm.  "Where are they off to in such a hurry?"

	It was then that he started to feel massive vibrations through the floor of the balcony beneath him.  Whatever was happening, it wasn't in sync with the thunder.

	Determined, Pilate slid back out from underneath the niche and trotted swiftly—cautiously—after the flying figures.



	"Th-they're coming!" Props stammered beneath the sound of the rattling mana crystals on her back.

	"We can all see that!" Seclorum grunted, pausing along the stairs to reload his crossbow.  "Now keep moving!"

	The procession of Xonans, Ledomaritans, and Lounge scampered its way up the spiral stairs.  Some took the opposite path, so that when they paused to fire down at the advancing muck, their projectiles criss-crossed and converged on their target.

	But the danger was growing larger, faster, and more widespread.  With each undead pegasi shot, the virulent puddle multiplied in size and speed.  Soon, a deluge of the stuff was fountaining out from the chamber below and rapidly rushing up the walls of the place.

	"It's no use!" Josho shouted, his voice drowned out by the echoing shrieks of the winged monstrosities.  He blasted the brains out of a lunging pegasus and watched as it plunged back down into the curdling depths.  "Every time we kill one of these motherbuckers, it only makes them stronger!"

	"Then we just have to be faster!" Rainbow Dash shouted, coaching the galloping, breathless survivors on.  "Come on!  Run like your lives depend on it!"

	"Razzar, master, they will overtake us!" one of the Lounge Members exclaimed.

	"Then we must gain the upper hand.  Come, my brothers!"  Razzar ripped his gloves off, exposing gnarled claws and rust-brown scales. He turned away from the fight completely and clamped his fingers into the curved wall of the granite pit.  His comrades followed suit, and—with tails thrashing out from under their cloaks—they shimmied swiftly up the walls of the place, easily outpacing the labored equines.

	"Gen'salla keemsleen thulien massa..."  Arcshod paused in firing to gape at the lizards.

	"Mrrrmmf..."  Seclorum galloped along, glaring at the steps ahead.  "That's just wrong."

	"Aaaugh!" a Xonan warrior grunted from far down below.

	Rainbow Dash glanced down.

	The tattooed mare had collapsed on her chest.  Another Xonan rushed over to help her, but it was too late.  A bubbling pool lapped up to their limbs.  Floating eyes blinked and all turned towards the two victims while the haunting heartbeat intensified.

	Gritting her teeth, Rainbow Dash blurred down towards the scene.  She hoisted one forelimb under the mare's chest and another under the other pony's.  Fiercely beating her wings, she took off slowly, floating away from the stairs as they washed over with purple slime.

	"Nnnngh!  Just... h-how many dang... grasshoppers h-have you been stuffing yourselves with here?!  J-jeez!"

	"Nagu'n!" the mare in her grasp shouted, for directly beneath them a pair of pegasi emerged—groaning—from the lavender mass and flew at full speed.

	"Razzar!" A naga shouted.  "Down below!"

	In one deep breath, Razzar hung from one arm, pivoted, unholstered his pistol, and fired down the pit.

	The yellow energy blasts struck one pegasus in the chest and the other one right between the eyes.

	Invigorated, Rainbow Dash gritted her teeth and flew faster, streaming up past Razzar and his fellow lizards.  The Lounge fired down at the mess while the equines continued scaling the stairs.  Rainbow soared away from the echoing chaos, making it to the top level where she safely deposited the two breathless Xonans.

	Without wasting a second, Rainbow kicked off the platform, backflipped, and dove back down into the raging battle.  "Josho!" she shouted.  "We won't make it at this rate!  Time to cheat!"

	"Yeah, I hear ya!"  Josho grabbed Props' waist with one forelimb and Seclorum's with another  "This should bring back memories, Secchy, old chum."

	"H-huh?!"  Flash!  Seclorum went cross-eyed as he appeared dozens of meters above in a blink.  He grunted as Josho landed with him and Props on the upper platform, dropping them like ragdolls to the granite floor.  "Bleaachkk!  Ledo's vulva, Josho!  Warn a stallion, why don'tcha?!"

	"Jee, I'm sorry for giving you yet another lease on life."  Josho bravely plunged himself back into the abyss while his horn sparkled.  "Gotta jet!" Flash!

	Josho materialized halfway down the steps.  He reached out and grabbed the closest survivors he could.

	"Rainbow?!  I'm holding up my end!  How about you?!"

	"Grnnngh!"  Rainbow hissed as she somehow managed to carry two survivors in her arms and one frazzled Ledomaritan on her back.  "Working... on... it...!"

	Two pegasi suddenly lunged at her.  Before she could react, the Ledomaritan on her back fired a crossbolt, sending one creature tumbling into another until they both exploded in the coverging manafire of the Lounge.

	"Just fly!" Razzar hollered.  "It's our only way out of this!"

	"If... nnngh... you th-think for one second that we're even..." Rainbow snarled.

	"We can kill each other once we're done killing them!"

	"Raaaaaaaaaugh!" Arcshod slammed the skulls of two pegasi with the butt of his crossbow.  While Josho ported back down to rescue the warrior's remaining companions, the large Xonan stood his ground halfway up the spiraling stairs, firing multiple bolts at the advancing undead.

	The shrieking pegasi wormed their way into a living stream, curling and spiraling their way upwards like a serpent of purple slime.  They adapted to the firing patterns of the Lounge, snaking swiftly up the pit and approaching with great speed.  At last, avoiding a series of yellow energy beams, they slammed into the bottom of the stairwell just beneath Arcshod.

	"Grunngh!"  The large unicorn teetered, nearly falling off the stairs entirely.  Her heard a cracking sound, and he looked straight down.  A deep fracture had formed in the stairs beneath him.  Clenching his jaw hard, he aimed his horn at the segment of stairs and pulled with all his telekinetic might.  At last, he ripped loose a huge chunk of stone granite.  By now, the pegasi had rose to his level, charging like a living serpent's head.

	With a loud shout, Archod mercilessly threw the enormous slab of granite straight into the swarm.  The air filled with the sickening crunch of many-many bones.  The stream of pegasi shattered completely, their limbs and bodies spreading outward as they fell back into the ooze-filled pit.  Not long after, a collective mound of undead figures surged through the sea of slime below, slamming intelligently into the side of the pit.

	The entire chamber shook.  The Lounge struggled to keep their grips, relinquishing the aim of their weapons.  The stairs cracked in many places, and Arcshod—

	"Gaaaugh—Mmmmfngh—Xon!"  He teetered, slipped, and fell towards the lavender mass below.

	"Hrnnngh!"  Rainbow grunted, catching his left rear fetlock and flapping her wings as hard as she could.  With desperate resolve, she kept the large stallion dangling in place just a dozen feet above the rising muck.

	Arcshod painted in horror, his eyes reflecting the pool while more and more bodies emerged below.

	"Can't... h-hold on much longer..." Rainbow's voice cracked while her pendant flickered.  "You're... sl-slipping..."

	Flash!  Josho materialized on the stairwell parallel to her.  He gasped, nearly slipping into the slime himself.  He glanced aside, blinking at Rainbow's struggle.  "Seriously?!"

	Rainbow sweatily nodded.  "S-s-seriously," she hoarsely replied.

	Arcshod slipped an inch, his lungs emptying with a tiny yelp.

	Josho groaned.  "Oh sweet... merciful kittens..."  With a deep yell, he plunged straight out into the air, grabbed onto Arcshod's body, and fired his teleportation spell.

	Fl-Flash!  Josho, Arcshod, and Rainbow Dash materialized against the ceiling... and upside down.  With a combined shriek, the three plunged a few feet and landed on the platform's edge above the pit of death.

	"Ooof!"  Rainbow winced as she rolled over, her blue hooves curled against her chest.  "Is... is th-that all of them?"

	Josho stood up, sweating all over his fat body.  "That's... th-that is all of th-them..."

	"Dreit..."

	Right then, four reptilian bodies scurried up over the platform's edge on all fours, then stood up in their glowing cloaks and masks.

	Josho glared.  "...present scum excluded, of course."

	"They are advancing rapidly," Razzar said.  "No time for rest."

	"You don't say?!"  Rainbow Dash stood up straight, gnashing her teeth as she prepared to yell at him some more—

	"Rainbow!"  Aatxe's voice rang forth.  He galloped past Seclorum and Props and approached the pegasus.  The majority of the survivors could be seen from a distance, standing near the brightly-lit entrance to the chamber.  "Rainbow, what's going on?!  We heard screams and gunfire and..."  His eyes narrowed.  "Good heavens!  Are there less of you?"

	"Never mind!  We gotta go!"  Rainbow Dash shoved him along, pulled Josho and Arcshod to their hooves, and flapped her wings.  "We all gotta move!  Now!"

	"But... b-but what's—" Aatxe stammered in mid-gallop.

	"No time to explain!"  Rainbow Dash shouted as she soared down the tunnel ahead of the group.  The mosaics of rings and defaced pegasi blurred on either side of her.  "We gotta get out!  And we gotta seal this place up right behind us!  Pronto!"

	"But... b-but the manacrystals!"

	"I've got them!"  Props breathlessly chirped.  "And so do some of the lizard guys!  But trust us!  You don't wanna stay down here long—"

	"Holy garbage farts!" Seclorum suddenly rasped, skidding to a stop, wide-eyed.

	"Huh?!"  Rainbow frowned at him.  "Why in Luna's name are you stopping?!"  She looked ahead.  "We've gotta get out—"  She froze in mid-air, her ruby eyes twitching.

	A changeling stood right outside the door.  Then two more touched down.  Then five more.  Then ten.  Then twelve.  At last, nearly three dozen shape-shifters stood at the entrance, silhouetted against the swirling gray malaise of Stratopolis.  Then, in a burst of green flame, they all took on blue coats with rainbow-streaked manes.

	Rainbow Dash's ears folded.  "Oh no..."

	There was a lavender glow to the doorframe.  And then... SLAM!  The chamber was sealed with thirty-five times the speed with which Rainbow had first opened it.
		//------------------------------//
		// Hold On To Your Hooves		//------------------------------//

	"Oh jeebies!"  Props squeaked in the darkness.  "Oh jeebity jeebity jeebity jeebity jeebity jeebities!"

	Seclorum's horn lit up, as did his grimacing face.  "They knew it!"  He spun to face Rainbow Dash and the others as they all bunched up against the inside of the door.  "They knew we'd be in here!  They waited for us!"

	"Je'klanna semulien rekk'ar threen!"

	"Everypony, just calm the buck down!"  Josho grunted, then flung Rainbow a glance.  "How could they have shut the door?!"

	"How else?"  Rainbow's voice cracked.  "They all turned into me!"

	"It's the temple control room all over again!" Aatxe stammered.

	"Is all the evil gunk-gunk still after us?!" Props remarked.

	Razzar coolly took his position at the rear of the group, aiming down the long hallway where the pit resided.  "I do believe you'll have an answer within the next minute or two."

	As prophesied, a loud, undulating heartbeat echoed down the chamber, coming to a rumbling peak against the walls that surrounded the nervous cluster of ponies and naga.

	"Well..."  Seclorum sighed and tossed his forelimbs.  "It's been fun..."

	"It's not over yet, old friend!"  Josho spun towards Rainbow Dash.  "The door!  Can you reopen the dayum thing?"

	"On it!"  Rainbow Dash flew over, pendant-glowing, and pressed her hooves against the barricade.  A soft lavender glow filled the door, flickered, then faded.  "Ah jeez—Come onnn!"  She pressed her chest against it, struggling with her whole petite weight.  "Nnnnngh!"

	"Why isn't it budging?!" Seclorum exclaimed.

	"It's... st-staying shut from the other s-side!" Rainbow Dash hissed, concentrating.

	"It must be all the 'Dashies' on their end!"  Props remarked, sweating.  "They're trying to keep us locked in here!"

	"Then what do we do?!" Seclorum grunted.  "We're running out of time!"

	"I don't understand!" Aatxe remarked, staring wide-eyed at everypony.  "What's wrong?! What did you find down there?!"

	"Hra'mulien threanna!" Arcshod shouted.

	"Brace yourselves, brothers!" Razzar shouted as he cocked his manarifle and took aim.

	With banshee shrieks, two winged figures flew down the length of the corridor and sailed towards the group.  The Lounge's weapons converged on it, melting the beserker pegasus in mid-air and sending its corrosive remains splattering against the walls and floor.

	"Mother of mildew!" Aatxe shrieked like a filly.  "What are those things?!"

	"Our eternal fate, shortly," Razzar droned while taking more pot-shots at the figures flying down the hall.  "Now would be a good time to get that door open."

	"Dashie?"

	"I... c-can't get it to b-budge!"  Rainbow Dash squeaked, sweating all over.  "They're sealing us in!"

	"Then there's gotta be another way!"  Aatxe said.

	Props gritted her teeth and flashed a look at the obese stallion.  "Josho!  You got any juice left in your horniness?"

	"Nnnngh..."  Josho clenched his jaw while his horn flickered a bit.  "I think so, yeah..."

	"Josho, you'll burn out!" Seclorum said while reloading his crossbow.

	"Doesn't look like I have much of a friggin' choice."  Josho glanced across the group with shifty-eyes.  "Now, who's coming with me?"

	The air rang with another shriek.  A zombie pegasus took a shot to the head, collided with the floor, and skidded wetly to a stop less than ten feet away.  A pile of muck splashed towards the group—causing the ponies to shriek.  The Lounge's combined shots beat it back, but then they had to switch their firepower back on the lunging figures from the distant pit.

	"No time for delicacy!" Rainbow Dash shouted.  "Get on the other side and distract them!  I just might be able to get this door open!"

	"Right."  Josho took a deep, deep breath... and grabbed Seclorum's and Arcshod's shoulders.  "You two've been drafted, soldiers."

	Arcshod blinked, lopsided.  "Buh?"  FLASH!  The Xonan gasped into hurricane winds, surrounded by blue fuzz and rainbows.

	"Hocrap!" Seclorum flinched, his face reflected in two dozen pairs of ruby eyes.

	"Hckkkt—Gaugh!"  Josho wheezed, stumbled forward, and lay prone with his shotgun cocked at the ready. "Well... this should be interesting."  Bl-Blam!  Blammmm!

	Two Rainbow Dashes dropped to the floor when—suddenly—they no longer had their skulls.  Five times as many shape-shifters leapt over the corpses of their two siblings and charged Josho, snarling.

	"Hraaaaaaugh!"  Arcshod galloped forward, slamming through the first wave with his mighty forelimbs.  He swung his crossbow from left to right like a club, knocking even more to the ground before taking aim at the center of the floundering group.  He punctured the chest of one changeling, spilling green blood into the heavy winds before spinning to tackle another creature charging from the sides.

	Three more creatures pounced on Arcshod's flank.  A single crossbolt sailed through the neck of two of them and sent them flying off into the gale force winds.  Seclorum reloaded his crossbolt and stood flank-to-flank with Josho while his old friend reloaded the shotgun.

	"Brings back old memories, eh, fatso?!" Seclorum managed to snarl.

	"Secchy..." Josho cocked his rifle and fired again.  Blam!  Blammm! "You must have found some really funky mushrooms in this Ledo-forsaken place to think this resembles any of our previous scrapes!"

	"Hra'dranna sulien threem'assa!"  Arcshod sweatily stammered, struggling to beat back thicker and thicker waves of rainbow doppelgangers.  "Ra'varnnum rekkhar thien!"

	"We won't last at this rate!"  Seclorum sputtered.  "We need more muscle!"

	"R-right..."  Josho wheezed, struggling up to his hooves.  "Be right back..."  His horn started to sparkle.

	"Josho, no!  You're weak enough as it is!"

	"Better a sissy than dead!" Josho grumbled.  "Trust me.  I've got first-hoof knowledge.  Ggrrrrrrrrrrghhh!"  His horn pulsed. Flash!  He landed upside down within the dark corridor on the other side of the barricade.  The sound of manablasts and shrieking pegasi hit his beleaguered ears.

	"You're b-back!" Aatxe exclaimed.

	"Yeah..." Josho wheezed.  "And it's... kaff... k-kaff... a b-bad show out there..."

	"Well, whatever you're doing, it's working!"  Rainbow Dash wheezed.  Howling wind pierced its way into the compartment as she lowered the door slowly—inch by inch—with a lavender glow.  "It's starting to b-budge!"

	"Maybe it'll work better on the other side, Dashie!"  Props exclaimed.

	"Sounds good to me..."  Josho struggled, ultimately crawling over and grasping her tail.  "Ya ready for vomit-town?"

	"Josho, h-hold up!" her voice cracked.  "Can you even jump again?"

	"Seems to be our only t-ticket!"

	"At least make it worth it!" Razzar shouted, signaling to one of his comrades.  A Lounge member reloaded his manarifle and rushed over while the other two stuck by Razzar's side.  "We can hold them off in here, but not for long!"

	"Nnnngh..."  Rainbow Dash bit her lips, then blurted, "Fine!  Anypony else?"

	"Can Josho take three with him?!" Props stammered.

	"You!"  Josho pointed to a random Xonan mare and beckoned her over.  "Get your scimitar ready.  It's close combat over there!"

	Rainbow squinted.  "Why her?"

	Josho shrugged.  "Figured the last ponies I ever hug might as well have someone sexy."  Taking a deep breath, he lunged forward and embraced a cluster of scales, tattoos, and blue fuzz.  "Zoop!"

	Flash!
		//------------------------------//
		// Black, White, Red All Over		//------------------------------//

	Pilate galloped and galloped.  To his right, the world was a whirling tapestry of red streaks against a black canvas.  Before long, crimson bodies surged in and out of the finely woven mess.

	Holding his breath, he dashed behind a pillar and pressed his body against it, hugging the mana-powered rod to his chest with trembling forelimbs.  He found that the longer he sat in one place, the clearer an "image" he got of the architecture dead ahead of him.  Dozens of winged equines were converging upon one spot, and his ears detected the sound of an ongoing structure.

	Just then, his Oracular Array fluctuated all over.  He winced, sensing a surge of mana feedback through his helm.  As soon as the pulse of energy dissipated, he detected six bodies pressed against a wall.  From their movements and jerking patterns, he guessed that they were fighting off the waves of equines ganging up on them.  One was a unicorn, significantly bigger and more muscular than the rest.  Another was a creature of slender, lithe built with a thick tail—a naga, Pilate guessed.  Last but not least, he sensed an obese equine lying prone to the ground and a winged figure hovering directly above it.

	"Rainbow..."  Pilate's lips slurred.

	The fight carried on and on.  The sound of mana blasts and whizzing crossbolts filled the air.

	Pilate hugged the energy rod to his chest.  He closed his eyes, but the red lines and crimson figures did not vanish.  That's what finally made him frown, summoning a guttural snarl from deep within his striped being.  Hooves clopping across the wet granite, he pulled himself into a heavy gallop.



	"Josho!"  Rainbow Dash exclaimed, shaking and jostling the collapsed stallion's shoulder.  "Come on, ya big lug!  Say something!"

	"Mmmfnnngh... bordello..."  Josho's eyes rolled back in his head while his horn pulsated at random.  "One night in the red room, pl-please," he gurgled.  "Not much R&R left, darling..."

	"He's pooped!" Seclorum shouted, smacking away a changeling.  "Do your door-thingy, dammit!"

	"Rrrgh!"  Rainbow Dash spun about and slapped her hooves across the center of the Urohringr symbol.  "Just keep them off from us a little bit longer!"

	"Jaat'sanna kraddit threem!" Arcshod shouted as the fellow Xonan warrior joined his side, fighting off the shape-shifting waves with her scimitar.

	"Right!  Easier said than done!" Seclorum howled.

	"It's... st-starting to budge!"  Rainbow Dash said between panting breaths.  Sure enough, the barricade began its slow descent downwards.  Rainbow's pendant glowed as her essence gradually overcame the spell that her doppelgangers had put on the barrier.  "Hey!  Can you guys on the other side hear me?!"

	"Loud and cl-clear, Dashie!" Props' voice faintly squeaked.


	The engineer stood up on her hind legs, balancing the manacrystals on her flanks as she shouted through cupped hooves.  "It's about enough space now to slip and slide through!"

	"Just h-hang on!" Rainbow grunted against the howl of hurricane winds and thunder.  "I'll get this thing open all the way soon!"

	Props would have answered, but just then a decapitated pegasus head splattered against the wall beside her, forcing her to shriek.  She spun and looked down the corridor.

	A solid line of galloping undead equines had formed.  Razzar, his comrades, and a line of survivors with crossbows were firing wave after wave of projectiles at the rampaging hoard.  Their charge refused to buckle.  Sloshing waves of purple muck swept from wall to wall, rolling towards the group like pulsating lava flow.

	"Uhhhhh..."  Aatxe sweated profusely, glancing back and forth from the line of death to the thin space at the top of the doorframe.  "That's good enough!" He motioned to several ponies, then propped his body against the base of the door, straightening his back.  "Hop on and hop over!  Move!  Move!  Move!"

	"Ya hear that, Dashie?!" Props shouted.  "We're sending p-ponies through!"

	"Sounds good to me!" Rainbow said.



	Sweating, she flung a glance over her shoulder.  "Tell 'em to get ready for a fight!"

	"Hraaaaaugh!"  Arcshod charged a throng of rainbow-maned doppelgangers, headbutting them with his massive horn.  The winged shape-shifters surged back, swung around, and grabbed at his neck and flank.

	"Hnnngh!"  The Xonan mare charged to her superior's side, swinging the scimitar and lopping off a length of green carapace.  The wounded changeling fell—hissing in agony—while Arcshod threw the rest of the bodies off him.  Shape-shifters flailed in the air, momentarily losing cohesion of their blue coat and feathers.

	P-Pow!  The naga's manarifle shot through two of the airborne changelings in one blast.  He cocked his weapon and glanced over his shoulder.  "More from the upper clouds!  Incoming—"  A pair of changelings rammed into his side.  "Ooof!"  The naga fell hard to the floor, his manarifle rattling loosely to the side.

	Panting, Rainbow Dash glanced over from the door while ponies slipped through the frame, one at a time.

	Several prismatic doppelgangers galloped over the conked-out naga and attacked Seclorum's side.  They shoved the aged stallion up against a pillar and wrestled the crossbow from his telekinetic grip.  He yelled and struggled with them, but was swiftly overwhelmed.  A cluster of changelings pulled at his forelimbs and lifted him skyward—flailing.

	Rainbow Dash bit her lip, glanced at the door hanging halfway open, then clenched her jaws.  Planting her hooves against the Urohringr symbol, she coiled her muscles, kicked off, and propelled herself like a missile towards Seclorum's plight.  "Rrrrrrrgh-Haa!"

	Wh-Whud!  Rainbow bowled mercilessly through the shape-shifters.  Their bodies turned black as they spun into the whipping-winds.  Breathless, Seclorum plunged towards the depths of Stratopolis.

	Grip!  Rainbow clasped onto Seclorum's forelimbs, spun completely around, and tossed him back towards the balcony.

	Arcshod twirled, gasped, and activated his telekinesis just in time to catch the thrown Ledomaritan.  The two slid back to the wall while more and more ponies poured out, joining the battle with crossbows and makeshift bludgeons.

	"Wh-what?!"  Seclorum glanced up, blinking.  "Oh, great!"  He blanched at the sight of a virtual dogfight of blue coats and rainbow manes.  "Now who do we know which one is the real deal?!"

	"I'm the only one who's awesome!"  Rainbow Dash's voice cracked.  She was too busy flinging her hooves, elbows, and leg-joints into any body part that presented itself.  Spinning like a blue top inside the floating melee of gnashing changelings, she shouted at the group.  "Don't worry about me!  Just make sure the rest of the survivors get out and—"

	A savage uppercute silenced the pegasus, and she flew back into a granite pillar, hard.

	"Aaaugh!"  Rainbow slumped down.  She trembled, spitting up blood.  Looking up, her ruby eyes narrowed on a solid line of diving doppelgangers.  Stealthily, she rubbed a hoof around the front of her pendant.  Then, just as they descended on her, she stood up straight, tilting her neck back and dousing the group with an unmitigated blast of enchanted light.  "Say cheese!"

	Several of the doppelgangers instantly flinched, hovering backwards in midair as they covered their eyes and groaned.  One by one, their bodies morphed from blue coats to black shells.

	The naga glanced up through his mask.  "That works..."  Clakka-Clak!  He took aim and fired a mana pulse at the thick group of exposed changelings.

	Pow!  The resulting blast showered black limbs and green blood over Rainbow's figure.  She flew back, collapsing by Josho's side with a grunt.

	"Nnnngh!"  Sputtering, she wiped her muzzle clean of the insectoid slime and snarled.  "Dang it!  Did Razzar at least teach you a thing or two about—"

	Th-Thap!  Three glaring Rainbow Dashes landed directly in front of the real-deal, glaring down at her with identical, devilish smirks.

	Rainbow's ears folded.  "...bad end."

	The doppelgangers crouched, preparing to leap all at once.  It was precisely then at a red energy blast sailed in, smacking one changeling across the skull and sending it reeling against the others.

	Breathless, Rainbow Dash looked up—then did a double-take.

	"Hnnngh!"  A striped stallion in a black helm landed.  He snarled into a glowing staff gripped in his muzzle.  Twisting his whole body, the zebra knocked the legs out from beneath all three shape-shifters and fired an energy blast into their collapsing sides for good measure.

	"Pilate!"  Rainbow Dash gasped, her smiling jaw hanging wide open.  She hopped up, ears perked.  "Omigosh omigosh omigosh!  You're..."  She blinked, her eyes contorting.  "...a friggin' cyborg."

	Pilate's whole body twitched.  He spun sideways and shouted—muffled—into his staff.  "Behind you!"  Z-Zap!  His energy rod fired a crimson blast at a pair of blue changelings descending on Rainbow Dash.  Without a second breath, Pilate galloped, leapt over her and Josho, and mercilessly pummeled the stumbling creatures into submission.

	"Uhhhhhh..."  Rainbow Dash stared numbly.  She gulped.  "...Derp?"

	"It's..."  Josho wheezed, slowly becoming cognizant again.  "It's... one of the br-broodlings?"

	"I highly doubt it."

	Josho coughed.  "How do you kn-know?"

	Rainbow slowly shook her dumbfounded expression.  "I don't think there's enough imagination in 'em..."

	"Hraaaugh!"  Pilate shouted before slamming his staff into another hopeless skull.

	
		//------------------------------//
		// The Second Fall of Stratopolis		//------------------------------//

	"Don't stop climbing through!" Aatxe shouted, heaving another pony over his shoulders while Props and two more equines helped.  "We gotta get outside!"

	"They're almost here!" a mare shrieked.

	Her voice was swallowed up by the sound of several muck-covered bodies bounding their way.  The Lounge's energy blasts knocked the undead pegasi to the floor, inadvertently collecting a puddle of deathly slime just a few spare inches in front of the group.

	While his two companions reloaded, Razzar stepped back and shouted into a communicator on his wrist.  "Vaughan, brother!  We need you!  Bring the ship around to our mana signatures and prepare to take us off the platform!"

	There was no reply.  The air grew louder and louder with a deathly drumbeat as the ravaging pegasi drew closer and closer.

	"Vaughan!" Razzar hissed.  "We have the mana crystals!  But there's a grave problem here!  We need an evacuation!"

	Further silence.

	His voice dripped loosely out of his mask.  "Why doesn't he answer...?"

	"Brother, look out!"

	Razzar looked up.  His body quivered under the shadow of a leaping pegasus.  He jumped back, swinging his rifle at the ready.  The naga was too slow, and the zombified creature bucked the weapon out of his hands and prepared to pounce at his torso.  Th-Thunk!  The sharp end of a wrench flew into the creature's neck.  Gurgling up purple goo, the pegasus fell over in a meaty slump.

	Razzar glanced breathlessly to his side.

	Props' body was frozen in a heavy toss.  She leaned back, breathing deeply.  "We've got most everypony through!  Time to go!"

	"It's now or never!" Aatxe sputtered as he helped the mare over.



	Outside, Pilate sensed Props' body being slid out the tiny frame in the door.  He sensed Aatxe, the three naga, and the wall of frenzied equines charging them from the other side.  As a matter of fact, Pilate sensed almost everything with a thirty-foot radius.  It just so happened that he was currently preoccupied with slamming his staff against several changeling skulls.

	"Hnnnngh!"  The zebra hissed into his toothy grip of the bludgeon.  "Mmmmfhh-ghhh!"  Every violent impact was rewarded with a wild splash of bright red streaks across a black slate.  He even sensed the inner juices of the changeling anatomy swirling and becoming inflamed with each major hit to their bodies.  His helm fluctuated a series of cross-hatches over their exoskeletons, betraying the fact that they were struggling to maintain their fake exteriors.

	"Dashie!  Is that...?  Oh blessed soot stains!  Is that really—?"

	"Don't hug the zebra right now, girl!" Rainbow Dash retorted.  "He's kicking flank!"

	"I thought you trotted in here with that fellow being blind!" Seclorum's voice breathlessly growled.

	"I did!"

	"Then what's the deal?!"

	"Uhhhh—"

	"Rainbow?!"  Pilate spun, sweat pouring down from beneath his helm.  "Rainbow!"  He focused on a winged figure that was currently fending off and uppercutting a trio of similar shapes.  "I'm glad I found you!  This is a case of dire circumstances!  You must help me with—"

	"You're telling me!  This is about as dire as—wait a second..."  With a grunt, the wing-flapping figure kicked off a doppleganger and pivoted towards him.  A solid red pony planted her hooves against her dangling hips.  "How do you know that I'm the real me?"

	Pilate staggered in place, pausing to pant.  "I... I-I'm not sure.  You're... uhm... d-denser?"

	"Excuse me?"

	"This helm!  It shows you in a different light than the rest of the—"

	"And just where in the heck did you get that?!"

	"Roarke gave it to me!  She also provided me this piece of skystone which I must somehow—"

	Whooosh!  The one crimson shape suddenly flew up to Pilate, gripping his shoulders.  "Roarke gave this stuff to you?!" Rainbow's voice cracked in his face.  A beat.  She shook his shoulders.  "Roarke is here?!"

	"Yes!  Rainbow, there's no time!  We gotta bring this skystone to—"

	"We're out!" Aatxe's voice stammered as his body slipped out of the door.  "Everypony's accounted for!"

	Razzar's joined in.  "That includes us.  You may wish to know that the menace is right behind."

	"Dashie!  You gotta close it!" Props squeaked.

	"On it!"  Rainbow zoomed back towards the door.

	Right at that moment, Pilate sensed a pair of changelings diving down at his flank.  Within a second, he judged that they'd be smashing his legs out from under him.

	Snarling, he spun and aimed the sparkling end of his staff.  However, to his surprise, there was nothing there.  The changelings were gone.

	He gulped.  "Is... is it m-malfunctioning?"

	He heard a few lingering blasts of manafire, followed by Seclorum's shouting voice.  "They're leaving!  The shape-shifters are bugging out!"

	"I'll give you one guess as to why," Josho grumbled.

	"Everypony, away from the door!" Aatxe shouted.

	"Keep your distance, brothers!"

	Props' voice rang, "Do you need help—"

	"No!" Rainbow grunted.  Pilate sensed her petite frame propped up against the door and its circular granite impressions.  The barricade was slowly... icily grinding its way up the stone frame while every pony and naga trained their weapons on the thin space above.  "Just stay back!  I got this!  Only I can close this!"

	"It would benefit us all greatly if you made haste..."

	"I'm... nnngh... tr-trying!"

	"Quicker, Dashie!  Quicker!  It's almost shut!"

	"Nagu'n..."

	"It's too late!  They're pouring through!"
		//------------------------------//
		// Run For Your Bucking Life		//------------------------------//

	The first river of slime jettisoned through the crack in the doorframe to Rainbow's right.  She flinched, nevertheless keeping her hooves pressed to the Urohringr symbol as the barricade slowly, slowly rose towards the ceiling.

	Then a second stream of muck poured through.  The shrieks of the survivors echoed in horror.  Rainbow caught the sight of bobbing eyeballs in her peripheral.  Her ears filled with the rhythmic bass beat of the evil within.  Then, all in one accord, the floating eyes on either side swiveled to face her.

	"Dashie!  Look out!"

	Rainbow flinched.  She glanced up.  A curtain of purple goo was raining down on her.  She flapped her wings and rotated to the left, rolling out of the path of the falling gunk.  Fumbling and breathless, she struggled to plant her hooves flat against the door to the heart of Stratopolis once again.  The ooze was pouring down in three places all around her, slowing the door's ascent by tenfold.  Before she knew it, undead bodies started rising from the impossibly thin spaces that the growing lavender puddles occupied.

	"Rainbow, you're surrounded!  They're bursting out all around you!" Josho's voice shouted.  Already, hooves were storming off into the distance as half of the survivors simply turned and ran.

	"I... can... cl-close it...!" Rainbow sputtered, even as necrotic wings twitched on the edge of her vision.

	"Rainbow, stay alive!" Pilate's voice shouted through the mess.  "More than anything, we need you alive!"

	"Don't leave us, Dashie!"

	Rainbow snarled.  At this point, all she could hear was heartbeat.  Her nostrils filled with rust and decay.  She took one glance up, and her ears drooped.  There was five times as much space left between the door and the ceiling than she had anticipated, and now the purple muck was gushing through like a waterfall.

	"Gnnngh!" she bucked against the wall, threading her way through two pouncing pegasi and barely skirting above the quivering pools of death ooze.  Twirling about, she shouted at what was left of the group.  "Go!  Gallop back to the hold!"

	"B-but—!" Aatxe began.

	"Don't stop for nothing!  Get someplace where you can seal yourselves up!"  Rainbow had to shout over the sounds of shrieking undead.  "And whatever you do—don't let them touch you!"

	Four winged ponies took a running start and leapt wetly into the air.  Three of them soared after Rainbow Dash while a fourth streaked towards the survivors on the other side of the balcony.  Props flinched and Josho reached weakly for his shotgun.

	"Raaaaugh!"  Arcshod stepped in, swinging a piece of rusted airship parts at full force.  He batted the creature away, sending it flailing into the hurricane winds beyond the balcony's edge.  Spitting into the gale, Arcshod turned and shouted to his fellow Xonans.  The group galloped along, although Arcshod trailed slightly behind, keeping eye contact with the last hub.

	"Well, old friend..." Seclorum tugged Josho telekinetically to his hooves while Aatxe supported the stallion's other end.  "That's our cue!"

	"We'll never outrun them at this speed!" Aatxe stammered.

	"I don't think it's our job to!" Props said.

	Everypony looked up to see Rainbow Dash flying rapid figure-eights in the air.  By this point, a cluster of six undead pegasi were clinging to her six.  At the sight of the limping group of survivors, two winged ponies broke off, swooping down on them with muzzles dripping with the purple slime.

	Rainbow Dash saw the breakaway group.  Pivoting her wings, she spun a sharp turn to her right, bravely flew through the cluster of pegasi soaring after her, and bucked off the spine of one of the monsters, plowing it wetly to the floor.  The other pegasus noticed her in an instant.  It broke off from pursuing the survivors and chased after Rainbow Dash instead.

	"Careful!"  Seclorum shouted, looking back.  "Touch them in the wrong place and—"

	"Will you just friggin' go?!"  Rainbow panted in the middle of backflipping and twirling towards the far end of the balcony, away from the retreating ponies.  "I'll keep them off your back!  Tell Lasairfion and the rest—I'm gonna distract them!"

	"But... b-but..."  Props fidgeted.

	"You heard the mare!"  Seclorum and Aatxe dragged Josho along.  "Let's go!  Let's go!"

	Props reluctantly joined them, turning away from Rainbow Dash completely.

	Rainbow, in the meantime, was skirting her way clockwise around the structure's balcony.  Squinting, she caught something that made her frown.  The Lounge were already dozens of meters away, running as fast as they could from the scene.

	"Guess those slimy salamanders didn't wait for nothing."  Rainbow looked to her right in mid-glide and gasped.

	Pilate was standing his ground, twirling and flailing with the staff gripped in his muzzle.  All the while, winged ponies closed in on all sides, surrounding him with a solid ring of bubbling purple ooze.

	"Luna Poop!"  Rainbow Dash gnashed her teeth and hung a sharp right.  From the shrieking breaths behind her, she realized the creatures were a lot closer to her tail than she had anticipated.  In quick order, she darted in and around various granite pillars along the balcony, forcing the undead train of mindless cretins to crash and slam into random structures.  "Pilate!  Get a move on!  What in the hay are you doing?!"

	"I c-can't run away, Rainbow Dash!" the zebra exclaimed between panting breaths.  "I have to get this skystone to the city's core!"

	"Dude!  This death ooze?!  I dunno if you can see it, but the inside of Stratopolis is simply pouring with it!"

	"I don't care!"  Pilate frowned, backing up to a wall as a trio of limping undead stalked him.  "I-I have to find a way!  Roarke tasked me with the only means of destroying this city!  For my beloved's sake... for everypony's sake!  I gotta see it through!"

	Rainbow Dash gritted her teeth.  Her ears ached from the horrific, undending shrieks and bass rhythm.  Beyond that, winds howled and thunder roared.  Somewhere, in a place of safety and power, Chrysalis and her brood watched all of this hell unfold, succulently devouring the misery that poured out from the heart of Stratopolis.

	"Nnnngh!"  Pilate smacked a pegasus in the face and uppercutted another with his staff.  He leaned back, his muzzle grimacing under the helm as he sensed the ooze creeping up towards his fetlocks.  "Oh blessed Spark..."  He shuddered.

	Swooosh!  Rainbow Dash plucked Pilate from beneath the balcony.  The two of them spiraled out of the reach of lunging pegasi, then soared into the hurricane winds.  By now, enough slime had poured through the door to spawn a veritable squadron of undead.

	Pilate stammered above the rising salvo of shrieks, "Rainbow!  Please!  We can't retreat!  Not like the others!  We have to—"

	"We're not!"

	Pilate's jaw dropped.  "Huh?!"

	Rainbow struggled to fly them steadily through the whipping winds and outpace the zombified ponies on their tail.  "Tell me more about this crazy plan of Roarke's!"

	"Oh, Rainbow, bless you!"

	"Don't bless me yet," Rainbow grunted into the rainwater.  "You picked one heck of a bad day to see again..."



	"Vaughan!  Vaughan!"  Razzar's mask rattled as he shouted once more into his communicator in mid-sprint.  "In Quezaat's name, brother, wh-what's happened to you?!"

	The other three naga came to a stop at the jagged end of the balcony facing a scattered swarm of half-demolished temples.  "Razzar, master, what are your orders?"

	"We have enough energy in our packs to bring these manacrystals to the ship!"

	"Vaughan has failed to respond.  The changelings may very well have gotten to him—"  Razzar froze in mid speech.  His gloved knuckles morphed into fists.  "Unless..."

	A series of loud shrieks echoed from above.

	"Master!"  One naga pointed straight up.  "Look!"

	Razzar tilted his mask up into the pouring rain.  In a flash of lightning, he saw Rainbow Dash and Pilate soaring through the maelstrom in a yellow streak.  The source of that yellow color was a particularly large skystone shard.  Razzar inhaled sharply, then exhaled through a hissing voice:  "Make your way to the temple where we last left the ship."

	"What of you, brother?"

	"There is one pegasus yet living in Stratopolis," Razzar said, even as he jumped onto a pillar and scurried up onto the domed roof of the structure.  "I may indeed have to fix that..."

	The other three naga exchanged masked glances.  In tight formation, they faced the ship's edge, leapt, and ignited their manapacks.  The three soared off on yellow beams of energy, threading their way through the storm as they made for the first platform with solid footing.
		//------------------------------//
		// Explosions, Expositions, It's all Gravy		//------------------------------//

	Bellesmith's ears twitched.  She tilted her head up, panting.

	"Do... d-do you hear that?"

	Elma shivered, clinging to her.  The exhausted changeling stammered, "Hear what?"

	"It... it almost sounds like... like..."  Belle's chestnut eyes narrowed.  "...screaming."

	"Mother... I mean..."  Elma winced.  "She sent them away.  The brood..."

	"No, it's not changelings," Belle said.  She stood up and trotted towards the battered hole in the rusted side of the collapsed dirigible.  "It's... almost animalistic.  Primal.  I... I don't understand..."

	"Belle?"  Elma squinted towards where the mare stood, her green eyes squinting.  "What are you doing?"

	"Something's not right here," Belle murmured.  "This place is older than you, me, and just about anything we've stumbled upon."  She turned and looked over at Elma.  "What if it was hidden here for a reason?"  Out from the hole, a decayed pegasus head entered, shrieking loudly.

	"Belle!" Elma shouted, her shell flickering stripes for a blink.

	"Gaaaie!"  Belle fell, scooting backwards from her flank.

	The undead pony rammed and rammed and rammed its battered shoulders into the frame of the hole, struggling and scuffling to get in.  As it spat and snorted, copious streams of purple goo fell to the floor of the airship's hollow chassis.

	Belle grimaced at the pooling ooze, trying not to vomit.  The metal frame of the vessel shook, and the hull cracked in four different places, allowing the zombified creature to squeeze through.

	With a birdlike yelp, the thing pounced on Belle.  Its bone wings spread wide, scraping the edges of the ship's interior and producing sparks.

	Belle rolled aside, panting for breath.  She fumbled her way across the interior on her belly while the pegasus loomed above.  Wincing, she flung a hoof forward and swooped up Eagle Eye's shield.  The mare spun around and swung the thing blindly, successfully smacking the skull of the monster.

	Crack!

	The thing's jaw snapped clean off.  Nevertheless, it icily pivoted its cranium back down at the horn-less unicorn.  A stream of lavender slime trickled out of the gaping hull in its maw.  With a gurgling sound, it lunged at Belle again.

	"Hnnnngh!"  Belle planted the shield flatly against the ends of her lower hooves and reverse somersaulted.

	Clannnng!  She uppercutted the beast, knocking it towards the dilapidated cockpit of the vessel.  There, it crashed and rattled about, drowning in loose junk and danging manaconduits.

	Before the shield could completely rattle to a stop, Belle grabbed it and used its weight to stand.  She watched—breathless—as the wings of beast protruded in and out of its buried struggle.  She heard more shrieks, and she looked straight out the cracked hole in the airship.  Her twitching vision caught sight of various winged figures streaking across the gray clouds.  Then, Bellesmith heard an eerie hiss.  Like steam.  She looked down.

	A puddle of the pegasus' purple drool was spreading right before Belle's eyes.  Bubbles formed, only to produce lids that fluttered open.  Bright eyes rotated around, eventually locking on Belle's figure with one collective stare.  Almost immediately, a low thumping picked up, like a drumbeat summoned out of the void.  Then, with slow and frightening grace, the slime-slick skull of a pony emerged from the paper-thin pocket of ooze.

	Belle hobbled backwards, her eyes glossy with terror.  She nevertheless bit her lip, dashed over to Elma's side, and threw both the changeling and Eagle's shield over her flank.  "We have to go."

	"Go?!" Elma gazed sickly at the floor giving birth to a lurching abomination with featherless wings.  "Go wh-where?!  These... these creatures..."

	"We can't give up!"  Belle panted and stammered, galloping briskly out of the manaship and into the gray rain.  "We must keep moving!"

	"But..."  Elma shivered as she gazed through the thick precipitation at multiple waves of shrieking beasts.  "But th-there are so m-many—"

	"We must!"



	"Pilate, you're good with words!" Rainbow huffed and puffed as she rocketed the two of them through the rain.  "Not to mention super alive.  Both of which are totally awesome!  So... in two sentences or less... do ya think you can explain to me what in the hay Roarke is doing here and why she set you up to be friggin' robo-zebra?!"

	"Beneath us!" Pilate shouted, his helm rattling as he dangled in the pegasus' grasp.  "About five of them!  Try and fly to your right!"

	"Pilate, dudeguy, I think I know what I'm doing—"  Five separate shrieks sounded off from below.  "Crapazoid!" Rainbow's voice cracked as she suddenly jerked left, flinging both of them away from the intercepting pegasi.  "Luna on a unicycle!  You weren't kidding!"

	"Two more!  Up top!  High!"

	Rainbow flung her eyes up, squinting through the rain.  In a flash of lightning, she saw two pairs of skeletonous wings.  Just as drops of purple slime fell towards them, she spiraled about, backflipped, and dove straight down, hurling their combined weight towards the top of the domed structure.

	"All seven of them are still on our tail!" Pilate stammered.  "And there's a group at your nine o'clock!  Coming in fast!"

	"Friggin' flank buckets!"  Rainbow Dash griped and performed the necessary twirl and dodge motions before ultimately flying a wild loop around the broad circumference of the building.  "How do you even see all of this?!"

	"It's the Oracular Array!"

	"The Oracle Aria?!"

	"No!  Oracular Array!  Combination of Searonese and Naga technology!"

	"Naga?!"

	"Lounge!  It was built by the Lounge, okay?!"  Pilate winced, almost slipping from Rainbow's grip on the last turn.  Rainbow tossed him and picked him up again in one motion so she could hold onto him better.  "Nnnnngh... Roarke... sh-she snuck aboard Razzar's ship weeks ago!  She's been passing herself off as one of the Lounge ever since!"

	"No friggin' way..."  Rainbow Dash weaved in and out of the pillars, trying to throw the monsters off her tail.  "What in Celestia's name for?"

	"Presumably to f-find out who the Lounge were..."  Pilate shivered as he held tight to the Lounge staff in his hooves.  "And pr-provide us safe passage through the Wastes!"

	"After all I said and did to her..."  Rainbow Dash's rainsoaked ears drooped.  She heard the shrieks of the pursuers, snapping out of her momentary daze.  Frowning once more, she barreled hard to the side, flew daredevilishly through a throng of zombie pegasi, then dove deep into the clouds lingering beneath the structure.  For a brief moment, she and the zebra were alone with the mists and thunder.  She nevertheless continued her high-velocity flight.  "So why'd she hook you up with all of that gizmospunk?!"

	"This crystal on my back?!" Pilate shouted above the howling winds.  "It's sk-skystone!  But a very specific kind!  Material you can only find along the north edge of the world—not too far from here!"

	"Yeah?!  Your point?!"

	"More like Roarke's point!" Pilate shouted.  "She tasked me with getting this to the center control room of Stratopolis!"

	"What in the buck for?!"

	"She says that Razzar tortured enough changelings to gather information about this place!  Someway or another, the shapeshifting hoard know about a control room in the very heart of the central structure.  You place a piece of skystone like this on the center dais, and Stratopolis immediately flies toward the corresponding cardinal direction!"

	"And just what will flying this towards the skystone fields accomplish?!"

	"Rainbow Dash..."  Pilate gnashed his teeth against the rain.  "It's not about flying this place.  It's about crashing it!"

	Rainbow Dash blinked, then gulped as she coasted the two of them through the clouds.  "Yeah.  Yeah, okay.  I can get behind that."

	"But our friends—"

	"—will have to find their way off the platforms," Rainbow said with a nod.  "Hopefully Props, Josho, and the others will get their flanks to the Tarkington.  They've got what they need.  As for the Noble Jury—"

	"She's safe!" Pilate exclaimed while errant shrieks picked up in the distance.  "She's still flying through the windy reaches of Stratopolis!"

	"What?!"  Rainbow glanced down at him.  "When?!  How?!"

	"Rainbow, trust me!  I saw it... I-I mean I felt it!"  He winced.  "Sensed it!  Nnngh... it's... an awful lot to take in and then try to explain..."

	"Heh, you and me both, brother."

	The shrieks intensified.  Rainbow Dash glanced back and saw several dark figures bursting out of the upper clouds and soaring after them.

	"Did Roarke friggin' anticipate them?!" Rainbow barked.

	"Yes and no!  I don't think she had any idea they would have come from the heart of Stratopolis or else she wouldn't have tasked me with delivering the skystone!"

	"I dunno.  I mean, this is Roarke who we're talking about."

	"Rainbow Dash, what do we do?!"

	"You're the clever zebra.  You tell me."

	"Rainbow," he growled.

	"Alright.  Fine.  You take your time and think.  I'm gonna... uhm... screw with gravity some more."  Holding her breath, she flapped her wings hard and shot straight up.  Pilate stifled a yelp as he felt his body flinging with her movement.  The two rocketed upward, piercing the dark mists while winds blew at them from randomly switching angles.  All the while, the pegasi pursued, undaunted, fueled by the panic in their prey's flight.
		//------------------------------//
		// A Belle In Smith's Clothing		//------------------------------//

	Bellesmith galloped, breathless, over the rainslick edge of the building's curved balcony.  Looking down, she could see decayed bodies swishing through the sky in the reflective rain puddles.  She slipped once, yelping, scampering to avoid a violent plunge off the edge of the structure.

	Gathering speed once more, she sprinted along, the weight of Elma flouncing on her back.  The changeling whimpered, looking up with fuming eyes.

	"So... s-so hungry..."  Elma stammered.  "I... I-I can taste their misery."  Her green eyes twitched in the wet wind.  "No life... and yet so much suffering..."

	"Don't savor it, Elma!" Belle sputtered in mid-run.

	"No wonder... M-Mother brought her brood here..."

	"You're not going to feast on pain ever again!" Belle exclaimed.  "That's not the way for you to live!  Do you hear me?!  You have to—"

	Gunshots.

	Belle skidded to a stop, splashing water across the nearest row of columns.  She stood still, panting.  She sensed movement up ahead, along the curved balcony.  Shouting voices, stomping hooves, and shotgun blasts acted as violent percussion to a symphony of animalistic banshee cries.

	"That's... that's Josho's gun," Belle murmured.  "I'd recognize it anywhere."  She blinked, her jaw dropping.

	Within view, several ponies appeared—all of them galloping Belle's way.  The panicked group constantly turned and glanced behind them, many of the equines holding position as they fired crossbolts into an incoming swarm of winged beasts.  Aside from a fleeting glimpse of an obese stallion and a blonde mare, the group consisted entirely of strangers.  Among the lot, Bellesmith saw tattooed coats, and she gasped.

	"Xonans... and Ledomaritans?"  Belle stepped backwards, shivering.  "How... h-how long have they been here?"  She froze in place.  Glancing aside, she looked worriedly at a scrap of zeppelin wreckage, then back at the group.  She gasped, then clenched her teeth.  "Elma..."

	The changeling stirred on her back.

	"Elma!"

	"Mmmf... Belle...?"

	"You must change!  Take on a form!  Don't let them see you as a changeling!"

	"But... but th-they'll just—"

	"No arguing!" Belle hissed.  "Do it now!"  There was a flash of green light.  Belle looked over her shoulder and did a double-take at the stripes.  "No!  Not my beloved!  They've seen Pilate take a plunge!"

	"But... I-I don't know what else—"

	"Eagle Eye!"  Belle exclaimed.  "Change to Eagle Eye!"

	"H-how?"

	"You know how!  Think about him!  Dwell on your memories of him!  And if you can't, then dwell on my memories of him!"

	Elma blinked.  She shuddered, and soon a rain-slick mat of purple hair drooped around her velverty lavender coat.  "Nnnngh..." she exhaled in Eagle Eye's breath, draped limply around Belle's shoulders.

	Biting her lip, Belle marched bravely forward.

	The group came within range so that their errant shouts took on coherent meaning:

	"We're almost there!  This is where we exited!  It'll take us back to the hold, everypony!"

	"Keep switching!  Reload your crossbows and fire!"

	"Th-there's too many!  And I'm almost out of—"

	"That's fine!  Josho's got us covered with his ammo!  Isn't that right?!"

	"Dammit, Secchy!  Don't distract me when I'm killing!"

	"Hraa'junna faleel sulien thren'nar meen!"

	"I swear!  They've quadrupled since we began running!"

	"Don't stop now!  We're almost—"  Seclorum turned, spotted Belle, and nearly pratfalled onto his face.  "Ledo's stones!"  He fumbled to unjam his crossbow.

	"Please!"  Belle waved two hooves out, panting into the rainy wind.  "Don't shoot!  It's me!  Bellesmith—"

	Clakk-Clak!  Arcshod loomed above her, aiming a crossbow at her skull.  "Grrrrrghh—Fekk'lovlien hraasta ven'mulien threatta, dreit?!"

	Belle flinched away from him, gritting her teeth.  "I'm friends with Rainbow Dash!  You've all met her, haven't you?!"

	"What's holding the friggin' line up?!"  Josho howled from the middle of the group. While the rest of the ponies surged on towards the structure's interior, he glanced over their shoulders and blanched.  "Bellesmith?!"

	"Belle?!"  Props gasped, hopped, and scampered over.  "Belle!  It's you!  Soot saddles on fire!  That's so fancy pants—!"  Seclorum's hoof blocked her, holding her in place.

	"You picked a bad time to try and get the drop on us!"  Seclorum's eyes narrowed.  "But we have no time for this.  Big fella?"

	Arcshod nodded and aimed his crossbow at the mare's skull.

	Props gasped and flung a wrench at the Xonan's horn.  "What the penguins are you doing?!"

	Bonk!  "Aaaaugh!"  Arcshod clutched his skull and hissed.  "Ledomulien trentte!"

	"She's on our side, ya big meanie!"

	"She's one of the shape-shifters!"  Seclorum grumbled.  "Can't you see that?!"

	"Kiiiiiinda dealing with something a little bigger here, Einstallion!" Josho barked in between loud blasts of his shotgun into the attacking swarm.

	"Please!  It's us!  It really is!"  Bellesmith sputtered.  She gestured towards Eagle Eye on her back.  "Right before the temples started flying into one another, we rushed here to find what happened to Rainbow, Pilate, and the others!  That's when the changelings attacked!  Now Eagle's hurt!  After rescuing me from death, I gotta make sure he gets somewhere safe!"

	"Hey!"  Aatxe shouted from the inner corridor, waving his hoof dramatically.  "Almost everypony's through!  What are you standing around for?!  Move!"

	"We absolutely cannot afford to make any exceptions!" Seclorum shouted.  "Come on, let's go!"

	"Please!  Take us with you!" Belle shrieked.  Breathless, she looked at Props.

	Props blinked.

	"Please..."  Belle gulped.  She then mouthed two words: "For Elma."

	Props brow furrowed.  Her goggled eyes glanced up.  She saw a long scar running across the back of Eagle Eye.  Her jaw fell slightly.

	"Guys..."  Josho started to pant, backing up and reloading his steaming shotgun while more and more pegasi dove towards them.  "It's now or never."

	Suddenly, Props spun, stomping a hoof into the rain-slick puddles.  "If she doesn't come along, then neither do I!"

	Arcshod did a double-take.

	"You're shitting me," Seclorum droned.

	"And if Unky Prowsy doesn't get his niece back, then how can you bet on him lending his sexy blunderbust skills in getting everypony to the Tarkington?!"

	Seclorum grumbled, "If you think for one second that I'm going to lower my defenses for such a stupid, juvenile threat, then you've got—"

	Josho rushed in, telekinetically shoving Props, Bellesmith, and Eagle Eye down the corridor in one magical swoop.  "Welcome to the club!  Now carry Princess Rain-Soaked into safety!"

	"Okie dokietron!"  Props chirped, helping Belle carry the limp stallion.

	"Josho!" Seclorum howled.  "Are you out of your mind?!"

	"Yes!"  Josho blasted his weapon into the hurricane winds as he, Seclorum, and Arcshod backtrotted into the corridor, covering the rear of the group.  "Have been since the battle of Blue Nova!  And I've been loving every minute of it!"

	"You're going to be the end of us!"

	"It's called having friends, Sechhy!  You should try it sometime!"  Josho fired one last shot, turned, and galloped full-force into the tunnel.  "Shoot me later if you don't agree!  For now, run!"

	"Oh, for all that's good and sparkly..." Seclorum rolled his eyes and barked, "Hey!  Bighooves!  You know what to do!"

	Arcshod nodded.  He holstered his crossbow, stepped back, and charged a solid stream of mana into the walls on either side of him.  "Hnnnnghhrghhh... mmnnngh... Nagu'n rath'allam sesukra'kkan melodriel!  Nnnngh!"

	The entrance to the corridor cracked, buckled, and collapsed.  A solid mountain of granite fell down, miraculously blocking the shrieking wave of pegasi at the last second.  They slammed into it, thrashing and clamoring, leaking all over the rubble with blood, pulp, and purple.
		//------------------------------//
		// Something's Easier Zaid Than Done		//------------------------------//

	Eagle Eye's ears twitched.  At the sound of a loud, deep hum, he spun to face the clouds opposite the cyclonic winds.  A large metal body was hurling towards him.  Its red skystone crystal shone brightly through the haze of Stratopolis.

	"Hey!" he sputtered, soaking wet with rainwater.  "Hey!  Guys!" He scampered towards the edge of the platform he was on and hopped up and down, waving.  When that didn't seem to work, he aimed his horn at his sword and fired a basic illumination spell.  The sword lit up, and he waved it left and right through the air like a bright baton.

	And yet, despite Eagle's best efforts, the Noble Jury soared over head and cruised right past him, continuing on its perpetually circular flight.

	"Come onnnnn!"  Eagle Eye whimpered, frowning.  "I'm right here!  Can't you see me?!"  He stood, panting in the wet rain.  "Seriously, since when was Floydien ever that blind... or bored?"

	He heard another sound, this one a great deal higher in pitch... not to mention louder.  A veritable chorus of shrieks pierced the air, growing nearer and nearer by the second.

	Eagle's heart rose to the bottom of his throat.  Gulping, he spun to face the center of the storm.  "What... the fluff...?"

	That's when he saw a squadron of dark shapes flying overhead, all of them carried aloft on bony wings.  They flew with supernatural precision, their haggard and decaying bodies slicing through the wind like knives.  With a twitch, a third of the hellish valkyries broke off formation and dove down at him, drooling purple goo and liquid gore.

	"Bad fluff... bad fluff!"  Eagle Eye shrieked as he turned and ran.

	His hooves splashed wetly across the floating temple as he made a mad dash for the stairwell that led down towards a lower level.  The pegasi closed the distance all too quickly, streaking down at him and attempting to rip his flesh off with gnashing jaws.  He dodged to the left and right, barely avoiding their aerial assaults.  Then—at last—two of them got a better idea and simply plunged into his backside.

	"Ooof!"  He rolled through the splashing puddles, ended upright, and slashed upwards with his sword.  "Haaaaaugh!"

	A pegasus' chest and neck split up the middle.  As its body collapsed to the ground, a long puddle of purple goo landed between Eagle's legs.  Almost immediately, eyeballs emerged from the slime, rotating around to blink at him.

	"Ay-jee-jee-jee-jee!"  He scooted backwards from the abominable phenonemon.  He was almost too busy wretching to see another pegasus diving towards his forehead.  He swung his sword and decapitated it in one swipe.

	The mosnter's body flew into the hurricane winds while its cranium ricocheted off a granite pillar and landed on the floor.  Almost immediately, the skull sunk into the ground, becoming a large lavender puddle.  Within seconds, two equine shapes were emerging from the puddle, covered in slime.

	Grimacing, Eagle Eye stood up.  At the sound of more shrieks, he galloped as quickly as he could towards the lower level of the temple.  From the sound of flapping wings immediately behind, he knew he wasn't alone.



	"Almost got it stabilized," Ebon Mane sputtered, sweating as he adjusted a series of knobs in the Noble Jury's engine room and brought the fluctuations of the lavender tome down to a minimum.  "Heck, at this rate, I might even be able to redirect power anywhere!  Heh... and I always thought it looked so hard, Propsy—"

	There was a resounding thud, and the entire ship shook.  Several of the knobs Ebon had worked hard on adjusting rotated loosely.

	The stallion's jaw fell.  He shook and gritted his teeth.  "Nnnnnngh... Zaaaaaid?!"  He reached over to an intercom and slapped a hoof over it.  "I thought you said you were gonna keep the ship steady—"

	Thud!  The ship shook again.

	This time, Ebon Mane wobbled, his ears folding atop his head as he grimaced.

	"Uhm... Zaid?"

	No response.

	Ebon started to panic.  In quick order, he flung the engine room door open and scampered towards the bow of the ship.

	Climbing up two decks to the top floor, he emerged in the cockpit.  "Zaid, you're alive!"

	"Uhhhhhh..."  Zaid sat in the seat, his eyes locked on the windshield.

	"You scared me half to death!"  Ebon frowned.  "Why didn't you answer the intercom?"

	"Sorry, food dude.  I was... uhm... a little distracted?"

	"Yeah?  By what?"

	WHUD!  A decaying zombie pegasus slammed against the windshield.

	"Cheese and crackers!" Ebon hid behind the pilot's seat, shivering.

	"Not a good time to make me hungry!" Zaid sputtered.

	"Whatisthatwhatisthatwhatisthatwhatisthat?!"

	"I dunno... but it seems to have a lot of brothers and sisters."

	"Huh?"

	"What, you can't see?"  Zaid flung his hoof over several instruments.  "Let's see... nope... nope... uh uh... nope... ah!  Here we go."  He activated the windshield wipers.  The twitching pegasus was peeled off the window.  Once it was gone, the two stallions could easily see a flock of black necrotic shapes populating the grey thunderclouds.  "There they all are!  Aren't they cute?"

	"Cute?!"  Ebon stammered, gripping hard to the back of the pilot's seat.  "They're hideous!  Where in Spark's name did they come from?!"

	"Well, Ebony, when a zombie mare and a vampire pigeon love each other very much—"

	"Zaid!"

	"Look, I have no friggin' clue.  One moment, it was clear gray nightmare.  The next... it was a fluffy gray nightmare with undead winged ponies four croutons!"

	"Why's everything gotta be a food analogy with you?"

	"'Cuz I'm friggin' starving, okay?!  You picked one hell of an afternoon to become an engineer!"

	"Blessed Spark..."  Ebon grimaced at the denser and denser squadrons of the undead.  "You think... you th-think they could have gotten to our friends?"

	"I dunno.  Seems to me they're content to just fly around and enjoy the breeze."  Zaid pointed.  "I mean, look at 'em!  Just like a graceful flock of birds!"

	"Uhhh..."  Ebon shivered as his pupils shrank.  "They're... uh... th-they're flocking this way."

	"Oooh!"  Zaid smirked over his shoulder.  "You too are a fan of Michael Critrot?"

	"Zaid, do something!" Ebon shouted as the creatures drew close enough for the ponies to hear their shrieks.

	"Yeah... uhm..."  Zaid gripped the controllers.  "Say, I have an idea.  Did you like playing Starfilly 64?"

	"Starfilly what—Gaiiiiie!"  Ebon clung to the pilot's seat for dear life.



	The Noble Jury spun around on an invisible axis, thereby drilling its way through the rampaging sea of pegasi.  Necrotic bodies went flying, their purple gooey innards dissolving into the wet, drenching rain.

	The rest of the undead soared after the Noble Jury's hull.  In a desperate move, the vessel dove down low, skirting past the underbellies of several buildings as it made its way to the far end of the floating nightmare city.
		//------------------------------//
		// The Dash of the Dead		//------------------------------//

	"You h-hear that?!" a Ledomaritan stammered as the group of survivors galloped through the dark, twisting corridors that led towards the Hold.  "They're breaking on through!  I just know it!"

	"There's no way they can sense us through the walls!" another survivor exclaimed.  A gulp, and she timidly glanced at the others.  "Is th-there?"

	"Just keep friggin' moving," Seclorum said in a growling tone.  "We have enough bullcrap to deal with."  His glaring expression swam over Bellesmith's face.

	Belle bit her lip, carrying "Eagle Eye" on her shoulders.

	"Don't let 'em get to you," Josho said, regaining enough energy to march in full stride.  "Old Secchy just needs an excuse to be abrasive with somepony."

	"So I can imagine."  Belle gulped and muttered, "Do you believe that I am me, Mr. Josho?"

	"Let's put it this way..."  The stallion shrugged in mid-step.  "Even if you are in fact a snake-in-the-grass shapeshifting metamorph that leeches off of emotion... I'm happier to have you along than Secchy."

	Belle bit her lip.  "Well, uhm... th-that is certainly a good thing to know—"

	"Nnnngh..."  Aatxe collapsed against a wall and slumped to his knees.

	Props gasped.  "Mr. Aatxe!"  She turned around and scampered towards the trembling stallion.  "What's the matter, guy-guy?!  Get up!"

	"I... I-I can't help it..."  He panted, his face awash with sweat.  "So much galloping around... so much pandemonium..."  He gulped, staring ahead with a feverish stare.  "I've gotten so out of shape since my piloting days."

	"Just take deep breaths and walk it off, dude-bro!"  Props shook his shoulders.  "We need to get to the Tarkington, and that makes you the pony of the hour!  Stick with us, buddy!"

	"Easier s-said than done..."  He smiled weakly at Props.  "Even if I made it out of this place, I'm afraid I don't have much energy to go back to living a normal life."  He gulped and patted Props' golden head.  "I'm just glad to meet somepony whom Prowse cares so much for.  He raised his niece very well..."

	"D-don't talk like that!  We're gonna get you out of here!"  Props looked up, wincing.  "Please!  Somepony!  Anypony!  Help me out here—"

	The hallways shook with a resounding crash of noise.  Rust-tainted air billowed down the corridor, making every pony's muzzle shudder from the purely rancid scent.

	"Th-they're breaking on through!" a mare stammered.

	"Rehmm vreen threadd siul Nagu'n!"

	"Darn it!"  Seclorum snarled, breaking into a full gallop.  "I knew this was too good to be true!"

	"Everypony!  Pick up the pace!" Josho shouted, levitating his shotgun at the ready.

	"Please!"  Props stammered, tugging and pulling at Aatxe's exhausted form.  "Help us!  They're gonna clobbermunch 'em!"

	"Somepony!" Bellesmith stammered, shivering where she stood.  "We can't just leave—"  A large body galloped past her, nearly knocking her and "Eagle Eye" into the wall.

	Arcshod skidded to a stop, telekinetically encased Aatxe in a levitation spell, and threw him over his shoulders.  "Hmmph... rekkha'three siurna blen'silaat threem..."

	"Easy f-for you to say," Aatxe said through an exhausted grin.

	Arcshod galloped forward on thundering hooves.  Not far behind him, dark shadows coalesced and surged along the walls.  In the penumbra of flouncing manalight, several white eyeballs glittered like stars, multiplying in density along the crest of a rising heartbeat.

	"Run, girl!"  Props squeaked as she shoved Bellesmith along.  The two ponies sprinted away from the sloshing madness while Elma's disguised body clung to Belle's flanks.  "Run run run run runnity run!"

	"H-how can th-they be this fast?!" Belle panted in mid-sprint.  "It's like an animated sea of d-death!"

	"Yeah, well death is gonna get a whole lot deader!"  Josho stood his ground, firing loud shots into the rampaging mess behind the group.  As the walls echoed from his thunderous salvos, he backtrotted briskly, reloading and discharging the shotgun—just as pegasi shapes emerged from the rippling wall of muck.  "You're almost to the Hold!  Keep going!"

	"Blessed Spark, preserve us," Belle stammered, her eyes growing teary.  "Preserve Pilate, my beloved..."

	"Let us through!" Seclorum shouted.  Up ahead, the group had reached the barricade, and the front line of unicorns—both Ledomaritans and Xonans alike—were unravelling the obstruction brick-by-brick with levitation spells.  "We've got manacrystals for the Tarkington—but things went from worse to uber worse!  Now let us in!"

	They were greeted on the other side by a line of ponies with crossbows.  The nervous, shivering sentries stammered, "W-we're not letting you in until we g-get a blood test!"

	"A blood test?" Belle exclaimed.

	"Oh for the love of—"  Seclorum rolled his eyes.  "Look, I'm not a fan of it either, but if you don't let us through now, something a million friggin' times worse than shape-shifters is gonna rip us all a new one—changelings or ponies alike!"

	"S-sorry, sir.  But it's your rules!  Nopony passes through unless—"

	"Rrrrghhh!"  Arcshod thundered through, spitting at the tattooed half of the group.  "Fre'mukkyr hava'klanna vreem siul rasta, resen vekkomulien trenna'dren!  Xon!"

	The Xonan warriors shuffled backwards, ears drooped like shamed canines.  Arcshod marched on through with Aatxe on his back.

	Blinking, Seclorum shuffled along.

	"What exactly did the big lug say?" Josho remarked

	"You don't wanna know, old friend."  Seclorum motioned forward.  "Okay, everypony!  Into the Hold!  Quick, before—"

	"It's too late!" a stallion bellowed.

	The hallway filled with shrieks.

	Seclorum spun around to see the first of many slime-covered pegasi rushing the barricade.  With a leap, he threw himself into the torch-lit chamber beyond, then tugged Bellesmith and Props forward with telekinesis.

	"Form a line!" Seclorum shouted.  "All ponies with a weapon!  By me!"

	On either side of the chamber entrance, unicorns were feverishly attempting to stack up the debris wall to keep the charging undead out.  But at the weak speed at which they were doing so—

	"Th-they're here!"  Props whimpered, covering her goggled face.  "We're gonna be slime pony kibble!"

	Josho gritted his teeth, aiming down the corridor as he could now see the whites of the zombie pegasi's glazed eyes.  "Well, here goes nothing—"

	The ragged monsters climbed the walls, kicked off the floor, and leapt off the ceiling with a combined banshee cry—

	Krakowwwwwwwww!"  A solid stream of sun-bright mana billowed down the corridor, burning the first wave of pegasi to a crisp and sending the next two layers of undead flying backwards like a puddle of burnt oatmeal.  The hallway went dark at the end of the discharge.

	Seclorum and Josho glanced aside, muzzles agape.

	Prowse leaned on his good three legs, panting.  Meanwhile, he held his prosthetic forward, its crystalline tips still flickering with electrical energy.  The manaconduits hummed and flickered from the inside out, illuminating his sweaty, stubbled face.

	"And that, lads and lassies, is how you fix a bloody boomstick."

	"Unky Prowsie!"  Props leapt and clung to his upper body with a clingy-clingy hug.  She nuzzled his neck and beamed.  "Heeeeee!  You're the bestiest of the bestiest!"

	"Heh... just capitalizing on your genius, lass."  He nuzzled her in return.  "Glad to have you back."

	"Hey, uh..."  Seclorum wheezed, his eyes briefly sparkling.  "Can I get a nuzzle too?"

	"Fart yourself sideways, ya bloomin' bastard."

	"Heheh... right..."  Seclorum cleared his throat and gestured towards the nearest line of unicorns, snapping them out of their awestruck stupor.  "What are you idiots waiting around for?  Seal it up!  They'll be back any moment!"

	Josho leaned in with a smirk.  "There's still hope for you yet, Secchy."

	"Can it.  We're still gonna die, y'know."

	"Yeah, well, some faster than others."

	"Meh."
		//------------------------------//
		// Pegasus Rock Anthem Featuring Death		//------------------------------//

	"Zaidddddddddd—" Ebon whimpered and hid his face behind a pair of curled forelimbs.

	"There's no gettin' off this Nancy Jane we're on!" Zaid cackled while barreling the vessel through another wave of pegasi.  Yet more splatters of guts and purple goo flew across the ship's windshield.  "H-hey!  Ten points!  Twenty!"

	"Really, Zaid?!  Really?!"

	"What?"  The stallion looked over his shoulder.  "I lost my ability to scream in acute terror over two hours ago."

	"At least watch what you're barreling into while you barrel into it!" Ebon shrieked, pointing straight ahead.

	"Whoah, dayum!"  Zaid jerked up and down at the controls—inadvertently bunny-hopping the skystone craft in mid-air as it bobbed and weaved its way around floating temple shards.  He twirled past a leaning column of rain-slick granite and soared his way under a particularly large, looming temple.  "You gotta admit, they're pretty darn persistent for a bunch of nasty-wasty distant cousins to Rainbow Dash!"

	"We h-have no clue who these creeps are related t-to!"

	"Why not?  They share her same social graces!"  Thud!  "Aaaaaand thirty points, fillies and gentlecolts!"

	"Zaid, you have to get us someplace where they can't see us!" Ebon stammered.  "I dunno what that yucky muck is that's dribbling out of them, but I think it's some kind of acid!"

	"That's what a diet on rotting pigeons will do to ya."

	"Zaid!"

	"Hold up!"  Zaid craned his neck, looking upwards through the windshield.  "What do we have here?!  Who's a pretty pony?"

	"Huh...?"  Ebon did a double-take, then gasped as beams of mana shot down in bright bolts, impacting the pegasi and clipping their wings before they could get within clawing distance of the Noble Jury's hull.  "Where's that coming from?"

	"Up there!"  Zaid pointing towards a temple twirling in the wind alongside the Noble Jury's trajectory.  A lithe figure was galloping along the crest of the temple's edge, aiming his horn into the maelstrom and taking pot shots at the creatures swarming around the vessel.  "Well well well..."  Zaid grinned from ear to ear.  "It's fitting that he'd protect such a beautiful ship."

	Ebon's muzzle quivered.  "EE...?"

	"You're gonna have to whimper your true love's name in a slightly higher volume, there, chief."

	"Eagle Eye!"  Ebon practically climbed over Zaid, waving and flailing his forelimbs like mad.  He gestured desperately against the cockpit windows in hopes that the stallion could see.  "Over here!  We're right here!"

	"Dude, chillax!"  Zaid wheezed and shoved Ebon back so he could re-grip the controls with ease.  "It's obvious he sees us!  He's fending the monsters off for a reason!"

	"Oh jeez!  Th-they'll swarm him too!  And he's out there all alone!  St-stranded!"

	"In another minute, we'll have sped past the floating temple's velocity."

	"Then we g-gotta slow down... or s-something!"  Ebon hyperventilated, jumping and squirming in place.  "Anything to let him hop back on board!  It's obviously a whole lot safer in here!"

	"I don't think I can slow the ship fast enough!  All I can do is steer!"

	"But Zaid—"

	"However..."  Zaid glanced over his shoulder.  "If some loverboy was to get his sailboat flank to engineering—"

	"I'm on it!"  Ebon was already gliding down the stairwell and landing on the bottom deck.  His voice shouted upwards as he scampered towards the heart of the ship.  "Get us in close to the temple!  I'll slow us down so that Eagle Eye can make the jump!"

	"Hey—uh—if I get a good whiff of his sopping wet mane, I swear, it'll totally be by accident!"



	"Alright!"  Josho spun from the collapsed mound of mortar and debris.  "We're sealed off!"

	"But not for long," Seclorum muttered, staring warily at the clogged corridor as loud thumping noises issued from the far side.  "They'll get through eventually.  They made it past Arcshod's barricade at the outer entrance, did they not?"

	"They seem to operate under a one-track mind.  Long story short, we ain't going back out the way we came."  Josho swiveled to face the others.  "Is there another way out of this place?"

	"There is," Prowse said with a nod.  He continued priming his weaponized prosthetic while he squinted at the frazzled, rain-soaked team.  "Why?  Are we going anywhere soon?"

	"These aren't the same as changelings," Josho said.  "Whatever these creatures are, they aren't just happy with you guys staying here."  He turned to glare at everyone.  "Nopony will be safe here for long.  They have powers the likes of which I've never seen."

	"And when they touch you, you become one of them," Seclorum said.

	Several ponies gasped and murmured.

	"Ya can't be bloody serious," Prowse stammered.

	"I've seen it happen to a Xonan and one of the Lounge," Seclorum said.  He turned towards Arcshod and his fellow warriors.  "I'm sorry for what happened back there, big guy.   But if we stayed too far behind, half of us would be on the other side trying to barge in right now."

	Thud!  Another reverberation echoed through the chamber.

	Props squeaked and clung—shivering—to Prowse's side.  The manacrystals on her back rattled.

	Josho glanced at them, then at the others.  "Then there's only one course of action.  We're not safe here forever.  We have to find a way to go mobile."

	"The Tarkington..." Aatxe remarked.

	"Right."

	"But even if my old ship could keep us safe once it's powered up, how in the hay are we going to get there?!"  Aatxe exclaimed.  "It's at least two floating temples away and none of us can fly!"

	"What happened to Rainbow Dash and Pilate?!" Bellesmith remarked.  "Where'd she take my beloved?"

	"Darling, your beloved watch a few notches above resident badass last time I saw him," Josho said.  "Apparently Roarke slipped in among the Lounge and used their tech to give him an elbow up on the situation."

	Belle's jaw dropped.  "What... wh-what kind of an elbow up?!  What's Roarke and Rainbow up to?!"

	"I-I thought they went to distract the creep-jeepies!" Props exclaimed.

	"Well they're not doing a very good job of it," Seclorum grumbled.

	"Bite your tongue, Secchy!"  Josho snapped.  "Rainbow and Pilate are the main reasons we got out of that hell hole in the end!"

	"Sevu'vlien lassa threen rekk'har siul ranna'kess," Arcshod stated.

	"Right."  Seclorum gulped.  "The longer we stay here and discuss it, the sooner we all become dead meat."

	"But how will we even get to the Tarkington?!"  Aatxe growled.  "How is that even a viable option?!"

	Josho glanced at Seclorum.  "Queen's Convoy?"

	Seclorum nodded.  "Yes... yes... it might work.  But in this weather?"

	"We've done it in worse."

	"Done what?" Bellesmith asked.

	"It's a seldomly practiced Ledomaritan military maneuver where—to span a gap—multiple unicorns line up and act as mana-buffers, spreading a levitation spell across a wide area."

	"You mean..."  Prowse gawked.  "...you horn blokes form a levitating bridge through sheer willpower?"

	"Depends on how much junk we can find to utilize for it," Seclorum said.  "And if there's enough of it facing the direction of the temple where Aatxe's old ship is."

	"Well, I say it's bloody brilliant!" Prowse nodded.  "Let's do it!"

	"But if we gallop out in the open now—we'll be risking absolutely everything—"

	"Risk is part of the game, laddie!"  Prowse gestured at a stockpile towards the back of the room.  "We have weapons!  We have bludgeons!  Hell, we even have my trusty old mortar shells from my expedition!"

	"There's no telling if the fuses for those work still—"

	"No sense in not tryin'!  Besides, the more explosions on your side, the better!"

	"I'm with Unky Prowsy!" Props said.

	Josho glared.  "You're always with Unky Prowsy."

	"This time I'm with him with fries on the side!"

	"Hey... uhm..."  Bellesmith shuffled nervously with the weight of "Eagle Eye" on her back.  "This is supposed to be a closed-in hiding place, right?"

	Everypony looked at her.

	"Right..."  Seclorum slowly nodded.

	"Then... uhhh..."  Belle squinted.  "Why does it feel so breezy?"

	Props blinked.

	Josho glanced around.  "Did anypony seal up those holes that the temple shards smashed?"

	One Ledomaritan shook her head.  "No... th-they were too big."

	Prowse added, "I kept my boomstick trained on it for if any wayward... changelings... flew in..."

	Everyone was dead silent.

	Josho craned his head... then followed the motion with a limp side-shuffle.  He rounded the corner, once again seeing the large gaping rifts in the bottom of the building where gray wind and wet rain billowed through.

	He stood there for a few seconds, biting his lip.

	Not long after—

	Three shrieking pegasi burst in at once, skittering like crickets across the ceiling and vomiting ooze out their ravenous muzzles.

	"Nagu'n!"

	"Great Spark!"

	"Unky—!"

	"Everypony stand back!"

	Krakowwwww!  Pow!



	"Nnnngh-Guh!"  Ebon sweated hard as he pulled back on a lever.  Steam vented from the bulkheads encasing the Noble Jury's engine room.  "Okay, Zaid!" he wheezed as he felt the ship buckling around him.  "That should decelerate us to something within r-running speed!"

	"Neato keano!  I'm pulling up along the temple now!"

	"Is h-he there?!" Ebon responded to the crackling intercom.  "Does he see us?!"

	"Just chillax and let me assist him with the hurricane-defying leap of death!  Okay?!  Now keep it at this speed!"

	"Hurry up!"  Ebon panted.  "If I h-hold us back for t-too long, we m-might stall!"

	"Almost got him... almost got him..."

	"Come on, EE..."  Ebon heaved and hissed.  "Come on..."



	"Hnnnngh-Gaaagh!"

	Eagle Eye dove forward, rolled out of the way of a diving pegasus, and stabbed his sword straight up into the gut of another one flying through the narrow chamber after him.  The creature split in two, splashing into wet purple puddles against the far side's columns.  The first attacker came around for another swipe, but Eagle Eye was ready, blinding the thing's glazed eyes with a magical attack.  When it flew past him, he gave its wing a deep cut, ripping it from the stalk.

	As the creature spun into the lightning and thunder, Eagle Eye saw an odd sight in the distance.

	The breathless stallion stood up, leaning tiredly on his glistening sword.  His expert eyes squinted, and he gasped.

	The Noble Jury was pulling up along a temple, and a petite lavender shape was bravely leaping off the platform and landing on the ship's top deck just beneath its flickering red skystone.  From afar, the tell-tale flash of an opening cockpit struck Eagle's vision, and then the Noble Jury picked up speed, outflying a rampaging flock of pegasi.

	"No..."  Eagle Eye stammered.  "N-no... that's not me..."  He gnashed his teeth and ran up to the edge, shouting against the thunder.  "That's not me!"  He shivered and yelped, "Don't let him on board, guys!  Don't let—"

	More shrieks echoed behind him.

	"Gnnnghh!"  Eagle hissed into his clenched teeth, swiping blindly overhead.  The pegasi nipped and snapped at his ears, barely missing him by a hair.  Puddles of quivering muck collected thicker and thicker as he hopped over the mess, scampered around a series of columns, and struggled in vain to catch up with the runaway manaship.  "Noooo!  Come back!  Please!  Come b—"

	The undead swarm flew at him from all directions.
		//------------------------------//
		// We Can't Have Nice Things		//------------------------------//

	"Move to the far side!  Don't let them touch you!"

	Josho's frantic cries dissolved against the maelstrom of noise that filled up the hold.  From wall to wall, rabid pegasi stampeded on ragged limbs.  Several of them leapt up and skittered across the ceiling for a better angle on their fleeing targets.  With wretched gurgling sounds, they leapt at random, pouncing on the backs of helpless ponies.  Four equines fell to their charge in an instant.  All the survivors could register was howling and the scraping of hooves against brick—and then the wave had advanced before the rest of their horrific fate could be witnessed.

	Prowse finished priming his gun.  Against Props' protests, the stallion spun about in mid-hobble and discharged his energy weapon at the swarm nipping at their tails.  He blasted the attackers in two, taking a good chunk of the invaded hold along with it.  Gaps in the floor appeared in random patches, filling the claustrophobic air with wind and rain water.  The rest was a goop of purple mess, sloshing ever so dastardly forward.

	Several ponies looked back, hung between shrieks and sobs.  Arcshod, Josho, and several other warriors urged them along while a few Xonans and Ledomaritans dismantled the barricade to their last and only exit.

	"Props!"  Bellesmith shouted from where she hobbled beside Josho.  "Props, you and your Uncle need to m-move!"

	"Unky Prowsy!"  Props tugged and tugged on the stallion as he held his ground.  "Please!  Let's g-get out of here!"

	"Them bloody wankers ain't stoppin' for nothing!"  He spat, priming his prosthetic with a dull bass hum.  "We're all that stands between them and the others!"

	"Unky, until that boomstick of yours reloads, it's useless to us too!"

	"What are you two waiting for?!"  Aatxe and two other ponies scuffled to a stop, panting.  "We have to make it to my ship—"

	A pegasus dove through the hazy air and pounced onto the stallion to Aatxe's side.  Aatxe and his companion stumbled aside, gaping in horror.

	"Gaaaa-aaaauchkkk!"  The stallion flailed beneath the ravenous creature.  Its every bleeding orifice soiled his quivering flesh with gallons of the deathly muck.  As the thing bit and tore at his shoulder, he looked up with what was left of his tear-stained face and reached a melting hoof out.  "Nnngrauhhhhkkk—pleeeease...!"

	Aatxe sat, slumped in frozen horror.

	Seclorum charged up, wide-eyed.  He heard a rattling sound and glanced to the side.  He stood next to Prowse's little hovel in the hold, and the nearest crate of junk held several explosive ordinances.  Seclorum reached in, twisted a knob with his teeth, and tossed the object into the nightmarish scene.  The explosive erupted in flames and shrapnel as soon as it landed.  The monster and its victim were instantly incinerated while the wave of undead beyond staggered from the blast.

	"Props!  Prowse!"  Belle hopped and craned her neck from a distance.  "Come on!  Run!"

	"You heard her!"  Seclorum shouted as he took two more explosives and shoved the crate towards the stallion at Aatxe's side.  "We don't move?  We don't live!  Now get your flank into gear!"  He looked fixedly at the stallion.  "Will you lend a hoof?"

	The stallion nodded and reached in for an explosive.

	Seclorum was already tossing another.  "Prowse!  Get your niece and her manacrystals to the surface or I'm breaking both of your legs and dragging you myself!"

	Prowse gnashed his teeth, shaking his half-charged prosthetic in frustration.  He begrudgingly hobbled off, leaning on Props' shoulder for support while more explosives went off behind them.

	"Burn in the Spark's abyss, you smelly bags of piss!"  Seclorum sputtered.  Once he had lobbed his last explosive, he shoved Prowse's crate towards the thinning crowd behind him and shoved the stallion along.  The pony carried the crates along while Seclorum backtrotted from the flame and smoke.  He bumped into Aatxe in the process, then gaped at the numb equine.  "Hey!  Hey!"  He shook the pony's shoulders.  "I wanna get out of here too!  That's gonna be hella hard if I have to carry you!  So wake the buck up!"

	Aatxe nodded in a cold sweat.  "Yes... y-yes..."  He spun about and hobbled on, wincing.  "Must... st-stay alive..."

	As the shrieks picked up once more in volume, Seclorum spun and dashed down the hazy corridor just as the rest of the survivors poured through the empty barricade beyond.



	Schwissssh!  The rear door to the Noble Jury's cockpit opened to the rain and wind.  Eagle Eye's soaked figure trotted through.  He sheltered himself with a cushion of telekinetic force while Zaid yanked the door shut behind with a lever beside the cockpit.  Slowly, with cold purple eyes, Eagle Eye looked up.

	"There's the stallion of the hour!"  Zaid beamed, glancing over his shoulder briefly as he drove the skystone ship through the soupy maelstrom.  "Didja catch any fish?"

	"... ... ..."  Eagle Eye smiled.  "You're a funny one."

	"Nawwww, in a seriousness, though..."  Zaid smirked.  "It's great to have you back on board. We thought you were a goner, dude!  Well, granted, we thought we were all goners, but—"

	"The ship is in one piece?" Eagle Eye asked.

	"Pfft.  As good as it's ever going to be."  Zaid motioned down below deck.  "Poor ol' Floydien knocked his head up worse than a jackrabbit on her honeymoon.  We think he's doing alright... for a giant space elk suffering a coma, that is.  But, in the meantime, yours truly is having to pilot the ship so that we don't blow up.  Then, maybe, we'll run into Rainbow Dash and the others... and then blow up.  Ya feel me?"

	"I do, Zaid," Eagle Eye said.  "Is everypony else okay?"

	"Uhhh... all I can tell you is that Kera's snug-as-a-bug in the observation room..."  Zaid smirked with thin eyes.  "...and Ebon's playing engineer in Props' place.  Maybe you should go down there and say 'hey.'  Help him grapple with levers... so to speak."

	Eagle Eye smiled.  He then smiled some more.  "So he is in the engine room?"

	"Yup!  He'll be super jazzed to see you, among other 'j' words.  Hell, I'm so happy to see you I just about j—"

	"I should go check on the engine room," Eagle Eye said—then paused briefly.  He turned to say, "And Ebon."

	"Righto!  Heheh!  So nice to have you around, guy!"  Zaid pivoted the chair just enough to stretch out his hoof.  "Gimme some fetlock!  Up top!"

	Eagle Eye silently shimmied down the crawlspace.

	Zaid was left hanging.  He blinked, then frowned.  "Hmmph... Just because I'm straight doesn't mean I'm gonna slice you up or nothin', bro."  He pivoted towards the controls with a sigh.  "Wonder if the poor sap even notices how much his mane sucks right now."
		//------------------------------//
		// Going Down With The Ship		//------------------------------//

	The engine room door creaked open.  Sweating, Ebon glanced over.  After a blink, his gaping jaw curved into a bright smile.

	"EE..."

	The unicorn stood at the far end.  His lavender coat shone in the matching light of the Noble Jury's flickering engine core.  His gaze lingered on Ebon Mane, and eventually he smiled back.  "Ebon..."

	Ebon Mane's breaths came in shallow little squeaks.  Fighting the urge to shiver, he released his heavy grip of the lever.  The ship shook as the engines regained their thrust.  "Zaid!  She's all yours!" Ebon sputtered into the intercom, leaning up against it with a pair of twitching hooves.  "Take us out of here!"

	"Aye, cook, my cook!"

	The room rocked slightly from side to side as the ship once again picked up speed.  Ebon twirled with a suppressed squeal.  "Omigoodness!  I'm sooooo glad to see..."  He blinked at nothingness.  "...you?"

	"Everything is operating efficiently?"  Eagle Eye had crossed the length of the room.

	Ebon swiveled to face him, blinking.  "Uhm... y-yes!  I mean... it wasn't easy to keep this thing running."  He trotted over with a nervous smile.  "Ever since Mr. Floydien went k-kerplunk, Zaid and I have been chomping at the bit to keep from crashing the ship into a temple or some other floating structure.  Neither of us exactly know how to slow the ship down or even land it... but so far... uh... so g-good?"

	"You've done magnificently," Eagle Eye said, staring at the floating tome inside its cage.  "Bless the Spark for having stallions like you around."

	Ebon smiled.  He leaned in and nuzzled Eagle's damp mane.  "That's not all I'm thankful to the Spark for."

	Eagle Eye turned towards Ebon.

	Ebon smiled, biting his lip.

	Eagle Eye brought a hoof up, caressed Ebon's forelimb... and gently brushed the stallion aside.  "How about the engine core?" he asked while trotting across the room.

	Ebon stumbled, blinking loosely into the bulkheads.  "Uhhhh..."  He snapped out of it and glanced over his shoulder.  "Huh?"

	"Is it damaged in any way?" Eagle Eye asked, studying the wires connecting the core to the wall consoles.

	"Uhmmmm..."  Ebon teetered back and forth on his hooves.  After a few more blinks, he cleared his throat and said "No... I-I mean... I don't th-think so.  Everything's operating smoothely."

	"That must mean that Rainbow Dash is still alive."

	"H-huh?"

	"Rainbow Dash and the book have a connection..."  Eagle Eye murmured.  Silence.  He turned and brandished a dashing smile.  "Don't they?"

	Ebon slowly, slowly nodded. "Yes... I figured as much..."

	"So, if the book is in one piece, then that must mean Rainbow Dash is still alive somewhere in this city."  Eagle Eye trotted up to the core again.  "This is a good thing, don't you think?"

	"Well... uhm... of c-course, Eagle Eye.  But you're alive as well!  I mean... we're so lucky..." Ebon's voice trailed off.

	"Where do you suppose she may be at this moment?" Eagle Eye asked, squinting into the lavender light.  "You think this thing is capable of indicating that?"

	Ebon bit his lip, starting to tremble.



	Eagle Eye slid, scampered, and rolled across the rain-slick temple platform.

	No less than three pegasi scraped against the floor beside him, barely missing him in their deadly swoop.

	At his lung's breaking point, Eagle Eye jumped up, slid backwards, and levitated his sword in a twirling slash.  He lopped off the front limbs of one undead and lacerated the face of another.  A third pounced on him, but the ex-mercenary rolled backwards and used the creature's momentum to fling him out into the twirling winds.

	Kipping back up to his hooves, Eagle Eye stumbled forward and leaned—panting—against a column.  His dazed eyes squinted through the maelstrom.

	A familiar red streak was surging back towards him on its clockwise rotation.  Within a minute, the Noble Jury would be once more in leaping distance.  However, at its maddening speed and even crazier distance—

	Shrieks lit up behind Eagle Eye.

	He looked over his shoulder, then raised his sword at the last second.

	A snarling pegasus slammed into him, its mouth snapping at his muzzle.  Eagle Eye blocked its teeth with his sword—but took the brunt of the impact.  His body plunged over the side, plummeted, and fell onto a craggy cliff of broken granite below.

	"Ooomf!"  Eagle Eye winced, pain wracking through his body.

	Three sets of legs landed on either side of him.  His ears heard the thumping of a demonic heartbeat through the rain, and he saw dribbling curtains of purple leaking over the granite in his peripheral.

	Gritting his teeth, Eagle spun three hundred and sixty degrees on the wet surface, slashing the sword out in every direction.  A dozen legs were reduced to ribbons in a blink.  The howling undead collapsed all around him, forming a ring of bubbling purple.

	Eagle Eye hopped over the acidic ooze, standing precariously now on the edge of the platform. Hurricane winds pelted his face with needle-sharp drops of rain.  He teetered, wheezing, his eyes thinly gazing at the Noble Jury.

	The craft was streaking below at this point.  Within seconds, his last window would be missed.

	Eagle gritted his teeth.  He heard more banshee cries and looked up.

	A solid line of undead soared his way.  Eagle could see the whites of the eyes marinating in their gashed flesh.

	Taking several deep breaths, Eagle frowned.  As the air lit up with thunder, her twirled the sword until it was directly in front of him...

	And he leapt suicidally into the deathly flock, his body one with the storm.



	"See?  It pulses brighter and dimmer."  A lavender hoof pointed at the glowing tome across the engine room.  "Could it be resonance from proximity to Rainbow Dash?"

	"I... never thought that hard about it, EE," Ebon Mane said.

	"If it's true, then we could use it to find Rainbow Dash."

	"Uh huh..."  Ebon Mane clenched his teeth.  He looked left.  He looked right.  A large wrench hung off the edge of Props' workbench.

	"Wouldn't that be a good thing?" Eagle Eye asked, his nose nearly brushing with the dark cage housing the tome.  "Having Rainbow Dash here would solve so many problems."

	"Yes... perhaps..."  Ebon silently, stealthily picked up the wrench.  Holding it in the crook of one hoof, he shuffled ever so gradually towards Eagle's flank on his other three.  "Like what kind of problems?"

	"Well, certainly we need to save the others," Eagle Eye said.  "But we'd have to save ourselves first."

	"Save ourselves..."  Ebon held his breath and loomed directly behind the stallion, holding the wrench up high.  "...from what, EE?"

	"This is a very dangerous place, Ebon.  Only Rainbow Dash is the key."

	Ebon said nothing.  Already wincing, he nevertheless flung the wrench towards the back of Eagle's skull—

	Th-Thwwpp!  Eagle's violet-streaked tail morphed into a black tentacle that spun three time around Ebon's neck.

	"Snkkkkkktttt!"  Ebon wheezed.

	Eagle's head spun one hundred and eighty degrees, glaring at the stallion.  Half a second later, his eyes flickered green... and he smiled.

	Thwoooosh!  WHAM!  The tentacle slammed Ebon into one wall—Crasssh!—then straight through Props workbench, scattering tools and metal nick-nacks everywhere.  Ebon collapsed hard on the floor sputtering and wheezing.

	Eagle Eye twirled his tail back to normal, spun, and morphed his right forelimb into a crab's pincher.  The black claw reached up and yanked a manacable loose from the circular frame of the caged engine core.  Sparks spat out its ends as the changeling took one massive stride to the wall, grunted, and shoved the electrocuting mess deep into the intercom system.  The lights of the Noble Jury flickered instantly.



	Up in the cockpit, Zaid blinked.  His instruments were going haywire.

	"Whoah whoah whoah whoah!"  He released his grip of the controls, flinching away from the splashing sparks.  "What the fart?!"

	A bright light strobed to his left.

	Stupidly, the stallion glanced towards it.

	The intercom system flickered, sparkled, then outright exploded.  Bands of burning mana shot out from the overloaded soundstones and leapt into the pilot's nervous system.

	"Gaaaaaaahhckkkt!"  Zaid shook, quivered, and slumped to a limp, smoking heap beneath the pilot's seat.  His eyes rolled back as he lay still against the bulkheads.



	Its skystone engine flickering, the Noble Jury teetered to its port.  It veered awkwardly through the mess and into the looming path of wayward floating platforms.  The ship was soon lost in the wind and rain as it barreled along its suicide path.
		//------------------------------//
		// The Mare Tricks, Rebel Lotion		//------------------------------//

	With a glicker of greenflame, "Eagle Eye" smirked at himself.  He swiveled around from the Noble Jury's damaged intercom and approached the far end of the engine room—

	Clanggg!  A dislocated steam pipe slammed across his skull.

	With a hiss, the changeling jolted backwards, breaking face with a wincing expression.  It turned back into Eagle Eye long enough to glare across the cabin.

	Gripping the pipe in his teeth, Ebon Mane paced himself from the shape-shifter, flicked his tail, and came in for another strike.  "Gnnnnghhh!"

	Eagle Eye easily side-stepped him, ducked a second strike, swiveled about, and bucked Ebon Mane in the fetlocks.

	"Ooomf!"  Ebon pratfalled, collapsing against the teetering floor of the runaway vessel's interior.  He struggled back to his hooves—only to have the weight of the changeling slamming down against his spine.  "Guhh!"  He quivered as his grinning nemesis clutched his chin and scalp in separate hooves, pressing inward from both angles and threatening to crush his skull.  Wincing, Ebon squinted forward.  His hoof danced around until it grasped the dangling electrical manacable that had been detached from the ship's engine core.  With a grunt, he jabbed the cable up and into the changeling's fake horn.

	"Gaaa-aaa-aaa!"  The shapeshifter rolled off of Ebon.

	The stallion scampered up to his hooves and ran forward.  He crossed the distance of the engine room and yanked a metal tool off the nearby bench.  When he spun around to face his foe—a tentacle had wrapped around his waist.

	Snarling, the half-mutated changeling pulled back, flinging Ebon along the full length of his morphing appendage.  The stallion slammed into the wall, another wall, and was finally sent—crashing—through Props' workbench.  Ebon rolled limply to the floor, whimpering in pain.

	With thudding footsteps, the changeling trotted icily towards Ebon's twitching figure.  He retracted his tentacle, morphing it slowly back into a hoof.  "You've given me quite the workout.  I would gladly feed..."  His hoof spread into five sets of digits as it became a reptilian hand in the changeling's possession.  "...if only you weren't such a blank slate."  Then, with a snarl, he formed all five fingers into a fist and slammed it straight into Ebon's muzzle.



	High above the Noble Jury's plummeting plight, a flock of undead pegasi flew in circles.  There was no rhyme or reason to their aerial patterns.  This may have had something to do with the fact that one of their numbers was being ridden like a bucking bronco.

	"Grrrr-rrrr!"  Eagle Eye hissed into the pelting rain.  He straddled one of the larger pegasi, stabbing his sword straight down through the creature's skull.  Telekinetically twisting the hilt of his blade left and right, he awkwardly steered the creature, struggling for dominance of its flight pattern.

	Beneath him, the monster hissed and spat purple vomit at every turn.  Its labored wings deteriorated under Eagle's weight.  Its already mangled body was dissolving, shred by shred, losing its pulpy muscles in the merciless rain.

	"Come on... c-come onnnn..." Eagle gnashed at his teeth, feeling the pull of gravity nip and bite at his senses with every thrashing move that the monster made.  He heard shrieks rising around him in intensity, and he ducked his skull with folded ears to avoid the passing pegasi from biting chunks of skin off his head.

	Down below, the Noble Jury loomed within view.  Through the rain and lightning, Eagle Eye nervously spotted a gigantic temple hovering in front of it at a distance—a distance that was swiftly closing.

	Eagle Eye bit his lip.  Around that time, he felt a dip in the monster's flight.  His sword's hilt grew looser and looser.  "H-huh?!"  He glanced down.

	Purple goop was crawling up the blade, just inches from Eagle Eye's body.  The zombie pegasus was literally melting from the inside out, and twirling white eyeballs peaked out of every lacerated orifice in the beast.

	Eagle Eye took a deep breath.  He ducked the swooping attack of another pegasus, then stood up on the creature's back with wobbly legs.  With an inward shout, he ripped his sword out from the monster's head and tossed the infected weapon skyward.  It skewered the bodies of two more pegasi, breaking off their attack.

	While they were distracted, the ex-mercenary swan-dove off the spine of his liquified mount.  He straightened his body into a lavender arrowhead, plunging towards the ship far below.  As its rain-slick bulkheads grew close enough for Eagle Eye to spot every rivet of detail, he concentrated hard and encased his entire body in a magical field.  The wind wipped against his face, forcing him to blink.  When he next opened his eyes, he could only see moisture.  So, in a desperate shout, he flung himself forward with the force of a telekinetic booth, and stretched both forelimbs out...



	The door to the Noble Jury's engine room hung open.

	One shuffling hoofstep after another, the changeling crept through the navigation room and approached the observation room at the ship's bow.  Despite the rattle of the bulkheads and the shrill whistle of the hurricane winds outside, he kept his pace slow, methodical, and calm.  He glanced down at Floydien's meaty body, smirking at the bruises lining the elk's skull.  As he stepped gingerly over the creature's limbs, he approached a little bundle of a figure lying on the hammoc in front of him.

	Kera lay in a fetal position, her glazed eyes reflecting the figure as he drew close... and closer.

	"Hmmmmm..."  The changeling squinted at her.  Slowly, his smile returned.  "Yes..."  He grinned harder.  "Oh yes..."  As he came closer to the filly, his hair grew in length, turning gray around a pale coat.  "You have so much misery to give..."  One of his eyes scarred over while a cold voice murmured through the Prime Enforcer's throat.  "...so very delicious."

	Kera's breaths grew shallower and shallower through her nostrils.  A slight tremble ran through her figure, and a tear rolled down her tattooed cheek.

	The changeling's one good eye flickered green.  Fangs glistened from under his lips as he reared his muzzle over the filly's throat—

	WHAM!  A pair of legs slammed across his skull.

	"Ooomf!"  The changeling slammed into the wall, morphing into an equine insectoid.  Snarling, it glared angrily across the observation room.

	Zaid finished sliding down the ladder of the vertical crawlspace.  "Httt!"  He landed across from the changeling, his mane sticking out at every angle with electrical sparks fizzling at their ends.  "Did I ask for this 'fro, bra?!  Did I?!"

	"Hsssssssss..."  The changeling cracked the joints in its neck and hissed, "When I'm done feeding off of her, I'll shove her useless flesh down your throat—"  A horseshoe ricocheted off its skull.  "Aaugh!"

	"Buck you, pal!"  Zaid snarled, yanking another horseshoe off and tossing it.  "Buck you and the horse you rode in on!  So, in other words, buck you squared!"

	The changeling dodged the second shoe and charged viciously across the chamber.  "You were doomed before you even came into this city—OOF!"

	The shape-shifter's words came to a stop, for Zaid had unabashedly speared him with his diving body.  The stallion plunged the two of them across the cabin so that they rolled over the floor and ended up with Zaid on top.  The stallion brought both forelimbs together to smash the changeling's face in.  The shape-shifter swiftly turned into Josho and head-butted Zaid savagely.  Zaid stumbled back, sputtering, and the creature pounced on him in the form of Rainbow Dash.

	Kera's body swung in the hammock from the ship's perilous flight.  Her unblinking eyes reflected the two equines locked in combat.  One shape repeatedly punched the other while its opponently finally returned with an uppercut and a slam to its gut.

	"Gnnkkt!"  The changeling spun, slamming chest-first into the wall of the observation room.  Before it could peel itself away, Zaid pressed into its backside.  The stallion gripped the insectoid's skull and slammed it repeatedly into the bulkheads.  "Do not!"  WHAM!  "Threaten!"  WHUD!  "The filly!"  SMACK!  "It's totally!"  THWACK!  "Not!"  THUD!  "Sexy!"

	In a flash of green flame, the changeling rematerialized with its head on backwards.  With a hiss, it lunged forward and bit its fangs into one of Zaid's forelimbs.

	"Aaaaaugh!"  Zaid wailed in pain, repeatedly bopping the thing's skull in desperation to dislodge it.  "D-dude!  Not on a first date—"

	In the meantime, the changeling's tail morphed into the bottom half of a snake.  The reptilian limb coiled around Zaid's rear legs and lifted him off the floor.  After tossing the stallion towards the ceiling, the creature leapt up, morphed into Arcshod, and bucked Zaid's body in midair.

	"Ow ow ow ow ow—"  Smack!  Zaid winced as his muzzle mushed up against the doorframe to the crawlspace.  "...owwwwwwwwww."  His front hooves dangled against a fire extinguisher.

	Grumbling, Arcshod morphed into Seclorum and marched forward—Clangggggg!—and right into a swinging fire extinguisher.

	Panting, Zaid trotted forward, swinging the bludgeon about in the crook of his hoof.  "Jee, is it cold and lifeless around here?"  Smack!  Thud!  Whack!  "Or is it just you?!"

	After the last impact, the changeling spun around and turned the end of its tail into a razor-edged blade.  It sliced the fire extinguisher down the center, spilling flame retardant goop all over the floor.

	Zaid stood in place, blinking dazedly at the two halves of the extinguisher in his grip.  "Dude... not cool."  WHAM!  A hoof at the end of a tentacle savagely uppercutted him.

	Wasting no time, the changeling wrapped the appendage around Zaid's throat and slammed him multiple times into opposite walls.  At last, he dropped him to the observation room floor and loomed above the groaning stallion.  The creature morphed its two forelimbs into barbed insectoid stingers and aimed them at the nape of his neck.

	Zaid gulped.  "What I wouldn't have g-given to get laid once m-more..."  He sputtered.  "...with cheese."

	"Mother spare me," the changeling snarled, spitting green blood and saliva.  "The Austraeoh wasted all of her time on a ship of fools.  And to think that this task almost offered me a challenge—"

	Flasssssh!

	A fountain of electrical energy soared into the creature's gut.  Zaid gasped as the changeling flew off him and slammed into the bubble windows at the very front of the room.  Wincing all over in manafire, the changeling looked across the cabin.

	Floydien was sitting up, awake, and very pissed off.  His antlers crackled as they summoned an even brighter charge this time.  "Get off my Nancy," the elk slurred.  Zaaaaaap!

	The changeling let loose one scream before its melting body was shoved like grinded meat through the shattered glass.  Dissolving in a green spray, its limbs flew off into separate directions, carried off by the shredding gales of Stratopolis.  The cabin instantly flooded with wind and rainwater.

	The first thing Zaid did was grab Kera's body and shelter her with his figure.  He hobbled over and crouched beside Floydien with his back to the pelting maelstrom.

	"H-hey there, big guy!  Bodacious wake-up ultra!  My aching flesh would have liked it if you did it a minute or two earlier, but—"

	"For the love of hush hush..." Floydien groaned, rubbing his bruised scalp with a cloven hoof.  "Does the boomer ever shut up?"

	"You have no idea how glad I am to hear your deliciously wonky voice, duuuude!"  Zaid shouted above the howling winds.  "Still, did you have to get medieval on your own windows?  It's not exactly Mareami Beach outside the Jury, y'know—"

	"Nancy Jane..."  Floydien's red eyes twitched as he gawked at the smashed front window behind Zaid.  "...where is Floydien's beloved headed to...?"

	"Huh?"  Zaid held Kera tight as he glanced over his shoulder.  His pupils shrank.  "Oh pineapple tits!"

	An enormous temple loomed just within view.  The entire ship was ten seconds away from smashing into a rusted pulp.

	"Get Floydien's flank to the cockpit!"  The elk stammered, struggling to get up on wobbly legs.

	"I'm... tr-trying...!"  Zaid grunted, shoving his shoulder hard into Floydien's enormous side. "But Floydien's flank is so darn flankity!"

	"Floydien... can... h-hardly trot balance-side-up..."  The elk slumped helplessly against the doorframe to the crawlspace.  "Nancy, forgive Floydien... so much dizzy dizz...."

	"Come on, ya big lug!"  Zaid resorted to kicking the elk repeatedly in the rear.  "Just jump or something!  You can make it up there..."  His voice cracked as he felt the whole ship tilting upwards.  "...make it?"

	Floydien gasped, gazing awkwardly towards the bow.

	Through the shattered windows, the temple could be seen swaying out of view.  The clouds shifted, and the heart of Stratopolis evened out.  The vessel had lifted to a higher elevation on its own.

	"Floydien didn't..."  The elk murmured.  "...then what boomer did?"

	Zaid blinked, then blinked again.  With a gasp, he lay Kera down in the doorframe to the navigation room and scurried swiftly up the ladder.



	Up in the cockpit, the door to the Noble Jury's top deck had been forced open halfway.  Rainwater seeped over Zaid's body as he ascended from below.  He gazed in shock at a sopping-wet figure seated at the controls.

	"Don't ask," Eagle Eye sputtered, evening the vessel out so that it spun clockwise once more around the heart of the floating city.  "You wouldn't b-believe me even if I told you."

	"Lavender Unicorn!"  Zaid lunged forward, hugging Eagle Eye from behind and nuzzling the back of his soaked mane.  "Heeeee!  You totally pulled a Han Soloats!"

	Eagle Eye shivered and said, "The name's Eagle Eye, y'know."

	"Don't ruin the moment."  Zaid smirked.  "Egads, look at you!  It's like you just got an invite to a wet saddle contest and your mane was caught unprepared."  Suddenly, Zaid blinked, then leaned back with a suspicious squint.  "Wait.  How do I know it's you?"

	Eagle Eye sniffled.  He glanced back with sparkling eyes, biting his lip.  "My... mane isn't t-too ruined, is it?"

	Zaid stood perfectly still.  At last:  "Yeah, okay.  'You' enough."

	"Please tell me the others are alright!" Eagle Eye exclaimed.

	"Thanks to you, a bunch of us are."

	"Define 'a bunch of us.'"

	"Kera's in one piece.  Floydien recovered just in time to paint the skies with shape-shifter intestines.  I'm still all around best background pony—"

	"Ebon..."  Eagle Eye gasped, his eyes growing wider.  "Where's Ebon?  Is he...?"

	Zaid blinked, then smiled.  He tugged at Eagle's forelimbs and switched places with him.  "Let me be the autopilot pony once again until Floydien's ready.  You go down into the engine room and check on yours turly, Romeoats."

	"Okay..."  Eagle Eye panted, shimmying swiftly down the crawlspace.  "Okay okay okay..."  He galloped straight past Floydien and Kera, practically throwing himself into the engine room beyond.  All was silent for the space of a minute, and then the door to the room closed slowly, shutting the two inside.
		//------------------------------//
		// Royal to the Bloody End		//------------------------------//

	"We're not even remotely safe yet!" Seclorum shouted as he urged the stampeding group of survivors along.  The frenzied ponies galloped their way down the twisting granite corridors of the building, making their way outward from the heart of the place.  They ascended steep stone stairs and approached the distant light of day ahead.  "They're four times as fast as all of us combined!  Don't even think about stopping!"

	"Secchy!" Josho shouted from where he stood up ahead, covering a junction of hallways with his levitating weapon while he urged equines along.  "Prowse and his niece are taking point with that boomstick of his!  How's the rear?!"

	"I'm the rear!" Seclorum growled, galloping closer within earshot.  "Where's Arcshod?"

	"Covering the middle along with Aatxe!" Josho said.  "How many did we lose back there?"

	"About five since the monsters burst through," Seclorum panted as he reached Josho's side.  "Josho, old friend, I've never run into anything that's moved so fast—"  As he said this, there was a disturbingly loud noise from far down the corridor.  Seclorum flashed a terrified look behind.  "They broke through the last barrier!"

	"Damn!"  Josho grumbled.  "Where're Prowse's explosives?"

	Bellesmith skidded to a stop and looked back, panting.  "Th-the large Xonan has them!"  She shifted the weight of "Eagle Eye" on her back.  "Up ahead!"

	"Dammit—Arcshod!"  Seclorum hollered down the tunnel.  "Get your tattooed flank here and bring the grenades!  We gotta close up another corridor or something because—"

	"They're already here!" Josho hollered, discharging his shotgun as punctuation to his shout.

	"Ledo's sponge!"  Seclorum twirled and fired two crossbolts at the rampaging wall of pegasi and purple.  The undead mass of limbs, hooves, and teeth gnashed their way towards the helpless group.  "We gotta hold 'em off so that the rest of the group can get out to safety!"

	"Wait!"  Belle exclaimed.  "Then that means—"

	"My life's been full of last stands, lady!" Josho snarled, firing constantly at the unstoppable wave.  "I'm good and prepared."

	"But—"

	"Tell that lump of princess fluff on your back that he's alright." Josho gnashed his teeth, sweating.  "I never had myself a kid... that I know of.  But if one exists somewhere, I hope he's half as good as Eagle..."

	"Josho..."  Elma wheezed, his coat flashing stripes briefly.  "Beloved.  I-I feel..."

	"Shhhh..."  Belle backtrotted, misty-eyed.  "It can't... it can't end like this—"

	"Just take off, already!" Seclorum shouted, forcing the mare back with a blast of telekinesis.  "Changeling or not, you don't wanna be at the biting end of these things!"

	"Spark dammit!" Josho hollered, his eyes reflecting a sea of undead faces.  "So dayum fast—"

	Seclorum spun around.  He flinched, for the shadows of the leaping pegasi were already upon him.

	And just when they were within inches of snapping into the stallions' throats, they were viciously thrown back.  The entire corridor lit up with manasparks.  Even the ragged flesh covering the creatures' limbs caught fire as they rolled backwards with pained shrieks.  The entire flock of undead was held back, at least for the moment.

	Breathless, Seclorum and Josho turned—along with Belle—to see who or what was responsible.  That's when they saw Lasairfion standing dead-center in the junction of corridors, channeling all of her masterful energy into the buckling wave of death.  The regal unicorn gritted her teeth while her elaborate tattoos shimmered in a majestic pattern.  Despite the strain of her exercise, she managed to speak succinctly out the corner of her muzzle:  "S'lanna mela'thulien s'renna norrem hala'thrasta rekkhar hem'iliel threen."  Her glowing eyes darted aside.  "Arcshod, Xon-Nagu'n?"

	Instantly, the stallion thundered over and bowed low.  "Dreit, Lasairfion, Xon-Nagu'n?"

	"Me'lasimnelien siul hasta k'raan."

	"Dreit."  Arcshod trotted forward and urged Belle towards the front of the group.

	"I... uh..."  Belle called back in mid-gallop.  "I think she's providing us the window of opportunity to make our exit, gentlecolts!"

	"But it's too risky!"  Seclorum stammered, staring at the quivering manafield.  "Prowse's ordinance should do the trick!  Just hoof us over a grenade or two, big buddy, and we'll—"

	Two enormous forelimbs gripped Seclorum and Josho.  Arcshod's scowling face leaned in.

	The massive stallion hissed:  "The asses.  It moves them.  Yes?"

	Josho and Seclorum only had to exchange glances once.  "Dr-dreit."  Kicking up dust, they galloped briskly after Bellesmith.

	Lasairfion watched carefully amidst her mana-discharge.  Once the ponies had galloped by—including Arcshod—she let loose a glorious shout.  Her tattoos pulsed from flank to spine, and she fired her last reserve of energy into the corridor ceiling.  A chunk of granite fell just in time to block the secondary charge of the purple oozing pegasi.  The undead dealt with the latest blockade while the Xonan Princess turned tail and ran to join her royal subjects.
		//------------------------------//
		// A Piece of the Sun		//------------------------------//

	"Rainbow Dash, at the risk of sounding like a stick in the mud, have you—perhaps—outflown your welcome?"

	Rainbow Dash grunted, twirling through the clouds above the large structure.  "A little busy here, Pilate..."

	"We've 'distracting' this flock for an eternity!" the zebra sputtered from where he dangled in her grasp.  "Surely they can't still be chasing us!"

	"Uhhhhhh..."  Rainbow Dash glanced over her shoulder.  No less than four dozen winged freaks emerged from the foggy depths behind her.  "Hate to break it to ya, zebra dude, but they're angrier than ever."  She gulped as she glided forward.  "And don't call me 'Shirley.'"

	"Rainbow, we can't do this endlessly!" Pilate spoke over the rattle of the skystone shard in his satchel.  "At some point, we have to make for the core of the structure!  Only there can we hope to eliminate the evil of Stratopolis once and for all!"

	"Pilate, you were never in the heart of this building!" Rainbow grunted as she swung hard to the left and blurred around the structure in a sharp turn.  "It's filled to the brim with that goey purple death stuff!  There's no friggin' way we can make our way inside!"

	"Well, we've got to find a way!  Or else everypony we know and love is dead in this place!"

	"What in the h-hay?!" Rainbow Dash sputtered, glancing straight down.

	"I mean it, Rainbow!  It's not like we have the resources to escape on our own!  Not even Roarke!"

	"No, I mean—what in the buck's going on down there?!" Ranbow Dash exclaimed, staring at the first of several survivors popping out onto the balcony of the structure.  "Why'd they come out from hiding?"

	"Rainbow, even with this helm, I can't possibly see that far.  Who are you talking about?"

	"The survivors!  Josho, Props, and the others!  Even Lasairfion!"

	"Perhaps the evil has spread further than we anticipated?"

	"Or maybe..."  Rainbow Dash gulped in mid twirl.  She pulled up and flew skyward from the shrieking pursuers.  "M-maybe they're going after the Tarkington."

	"The Tarkington?"

	"It's Aatxe's stranded ship.  We accessed the core of the building to get manacrystals that would power the thing up.  I'm guessing that the ponies are desperate to jump-start the thing and escape the infestation, but with the temples spread apart and crud, I dunno how—"

	Pilate suddenly gasped.  "Rainbow!  Look out!  Three o'clock sharp!"

	Rainbow Dash looked slightly to her right.  Three pegasi soared in from nowhere, barreling straight towards her.

	With a grunt, Rainbow backflipped to avoid their attack.  The first two streaked past her.  The third, however—

	WHUD!  The undead pony tackled Pilate, yanking him from Rainbow's grip and carrying him—gasping—down into the thunderous maelstrom of Stratopolis.

	"Pilate!"  Rainbow Dash shrieked, hovering in place.

	A pegasus tackled her from behind.  She snarled, bucked it away, and propelled herself off the thing's chest.  Soaring straight down, Rainbow Dash fearlessly threaded her way through the mess of pegasi just as they caught up with her.  She spun and spiraled, yelling for good measure.  Wingbones snapped and strips of flesh melted all around her.  The mare barely managed to squeeze her way safely past the splashes of acidic goo.  Once she emerged on the other side, she caught sight of Pilate once again—dangling in one monster's grasp.  The creature was leaning its muzzle in to bite onto his neck; the zebra defended himself by blocking the attack with his glowing staff, but he was starting to slip from the freak's grasp.

	"Hang on, Pilate!  I'm a'comin'!"  Rainbow Dash angled her wings, dove like a missile, and practically bowled herself in between the zebra and the zombie.  There was a splash of purple goop in the air.  Rainbow swiped Pilate up and hooked a single wing out, throwing the two of them into a sharp corkscrew and narrowly missing the splash of slime.

	However, this slowed them down, making them prime targets for the creatures soaring down from above.  Two separate monsters caught up with Rainbow, spearing her and accelerating her suicidal descent.  Rainbow struggled and fought them back, but the four of them still became a tangled mess.  Out the corner of her eye, Rainbow spotted the domed ceiling of the structure emerging through the storm.

	"Rainbow!" the zebra gasped, his helm flickering from the inside out.

	"Brace y-yourself!"

	Crasssh!

	Rainbow and Pilate sailed through the middle-most panel of the stained glass ceiling.  They plummeted among a sea of rainbow colored shards.  Somehow, in the last few dozen feet afforded her, Rainbow succeeded in flipping herself and her foes around.  They impacted the floor of the room with the zombies striking the granite first.  Rainbow and Pilate went tumbling in separate directions, rolling over broken staves and black crystals.

	Above, thunder and rainwater poured through the fresh hole in the glass ceiling.  Then came the pegasi, slipping through one at a time, shrieking at the top of their decaying lungs.

	Pilate was the first to get up.  "Rainbow!  Look out—"  With gnashing teeth, he gripped onto his staff and spun about in time to impact a diving zombie.  He bucked a second attack, sending the thing's decrepit body sailing off and smashing through an ancient barricade along one of the adjacent corridors.

	Rainbow Dash climbed over a broken monolith, jumped over a splash of purple muck, and landed with a jump kick against a recovering pegasus' chest.  "We gotta get out of this place!  Pilate, gallop towards one of the tunnels and I'll—"

	Two creatures tackled Rainbow from behind, shoving her to the floor and preparing to spill their slimy innards over her wings.

	"Rainbow!"  Pilate smashed the skull in of a beast, galloped forward, sensed a creature diving from behind, and kicked up a staff from the ground with his hoof.  He spun—knocking the debris back with his weapon—sending it slamming off the skull of the diving creature.  Once again regaining his stride, he sped in and smashed one monster off of Rainbow's backside, then aimed and fired an energy blast at the chest of the other.

	Rainbow rolled to safety in the middle of the room—only to hear Pilate grunting.  She looked over and saw two creatures tackling him from behind.  "Oh no you don't!"  She jumped up, kicked her legs against the center cylinder of the room, and propelled herself at the fight.  She speared both zombies at once, knocking them off Pilate's shoulders and shoving them clear across the room.

	The three of them slammed into something hard.  Rainbow's ears rang with the smashing of granite slabs.  She rolled across the ground, coming to a stop with a pained groan.  When she looked up, the first thing she saw was the cracked face of an equine effigy.

	"Commander Hurricane...?"  She glanced behind to see the tomb smashed to bits.  The barest hint of a petrified skeleton lingered in the rainfall.  "Awwwww shoot."

	Just then, the chamber filled with hellish shrieks.  Rainbow jerked a glanced upwards.  The pegasi had stopped slithering through the hole in the domed ceiling.  They flinched in place, thrashing about.

	"Uhhhh..."

	"Rainbow!" Pilate exclaimed.

	Rainbow spun around—but had to squint.

	The zebra nervously stood a few feet from her, but even then it was next to impossible to see him.  An exceedingly bright aura of gold light was obscuring his figure, including the bodies of the zombified monsters squirming nearby.

	"Something's happening," the stallion wheezed.  "They... th-they appear to be overcome by something!"

	Rainbow squinted, hovering a hoof over her brow as she approached the source of the light.  "No friggin' way..." she slurred.  "You're not going to believe this..."

	"Uhhh..."  Pilate gulped as he aimed his helm at the paralyzed creatures.  "At this rate, you're welcome to try me."

	Rainbow reached into the blinding light.  Her hoof felt something and gripped around it.  Upon physical touch, the light dimmed slightly, eventually becoming visible in the mare's grasp.  It was a long, double-edged sword, guilded down the center with six studded, multi-colored gemstones.  The metal of the blade was an immaculate golden color, and the hilt bore the image of a regal alicorn.

	"The Sword of Solstice..."  Rainbow Dash murmured, her jaw hanging agape.

	"Huh?"

	Rainbow glanced at the smashed tomb of Commander Hurricane, then back at the blade.  "Of course... of course!"

	"Rainbow, help me out here!  What's going on?"

	"I think a little bit of sunshine has returned to Stratopolis."

	The zebra cocked his helm slightly to the side.  "Is that a weapon in your grasp?"

	"And how..."  Rainbow looked aside at the beasts quivering in pain.  The goo on their bodies evaporated with little puffs of steam the more she held the sword in their direction.  "Still, only one way to find out."  She gripped the hilt of the sword in her teeth, dove in, and gave the beasts a wide slash.

	The creatures literally split in two, and whatever was left of their purple-stained flesh melted into dark ash.  Two creatures suicidally plunged from above, but Rainbow was more than ready.  She grunted into her grip of the weapon and swung the Sword of Solstice in a high arc.  The monsters caught flame for a brief second, then split apart on either side of her, littering the ground with flakes of ash.

	"Great Spark!" Pilate wheezed, flinching from the bits and specks of undead flesh littering around him.

	Rainbow backed up into him, holding the sword in her hooves.  "Pilate, I now know how Hurricane beat back the infestation far enough to seal the heart of this place."

	"Then that means..."

	Rainbow nodded.  "We just might be able to retrace her path and get to the core again."

	"Then what are we waiting for?"

	"Pfft!  Who said anything about waiting?"  Rainbow grinned, then launched herself at a writhing mass of undead.  "Haaaaugh!"  The room flashed with gold as the zombified pegasi met their burning fate.
		//------------------------------//
		// Dash That Extra Sexy Machina		//------------------------------//

	No less than half a dozen zombie pegasi met their burning end in one fell swoop.  Each swing Rainbow Dashmade of the sword sent the undead reeling instantly.  The air filled with black ash as the purple muck evaporated from the proximity of the Sword of Solstice.

	Rainbow Dash sweated from the sheer heat of the weapon's righteous fury.  As she cleared out one end of the circular room, Pilate busied himself with the other half.

	"Haaaugh!"  The zebra came down, slamming the skull in of a beast with his staff before spinning about to block the attack of another diving monster.  He sensed two flying at him from behind, so he twirled to meet their attack.  However, in the midst of his spin, he realized he had moved too slow.  He winced, expecting the teeth of either monster to sink into his neck at any moment.

	Thunder cracked—a great deal louder than previous strikes of lightning.  Suddenly, the two pegasi slumped to a soggy end at Pilate's hooves.

	The zebra stood, panting, his brow furrowed beneath his helm.  He sensed movement, and he tilted his head straight up.  The hole to the top of the domed ceiling was clear, though he could have sworn that the faint traces of red-on-black lines denoted a streak leading away from the scene.  He teetered for a while in dull confusion, then turned towards Rainbow Dash.

	The mare was busy clearing away her half of the room with relative east.  She was too preoccupied to notice a creature slipping through the melee and leaping at her flank.

	"Rainbow!" Pilate shouted, immediately galloping her way.  Without a second thought, the stallion leapt and threw his weight forward through his shoulder.

	Wh-wham!  The zebra plowed the monster to the ground with a clatter of metal armor.

	Rainbow Dash felt the impact through her hooves.  Twirling about, she saw the zombie pegasus reeling from Pilate's blow.  She immediately spat the sword out, held it in the crooks of both forelimbs, and lunged forward with a massive down-thrust.  "Haaaugh!"

	The creature's skull split in two and the rest of it turned to ash.  Rainbow Dash leaned forward against the sword, panting.  She threw her mane back and murmured aside.

	"Way to go, Stripesy."  Her muzzle curved as she glanced at him.  "Guess I got carried away there—"  Her ears folded.  "...Celestia."

	Pilate lay on his side, convulsing.  Half of his flank was covered with purple ooze, and it was spreading.

	"Hnnkkkt..." The zebra clenched his teeth, his helm rattling as a hissing breath escaped his muzzle.  "Blessed Spark, it burns."

	Breathless, Rainbow Dash slumped down by the stallion's side.  She watched with twitching eyes as the acidic muck thickened, as if a dozen unholy things were spawning from somewhere deep within.

	"Rainbow..."  Pilate hyperventilated, his voice squeaking in pain.  "Please... tell Belle... t-tell her that I love her..."  He gulped.  "And I'm sorry."

	Clank!  Rainbow stabbed the sword into the ground half-an-inch from Pilate's prone body.

	The stallion wheezed.  "Rainbow...?"

	She said nothing, gripping the hilt as she narrowed her gaze into a righteous glare.  Between them, the Sword of Solstice glimmered with golden energy.  The air grew warmer by the second, resonating with pulsating heat.

	Suddenly, steam rose from Pilate's flank.  The stallion winced slightly, then lay still as—inch by inch—the purple stain dissipated cleanly from his body.  Within the space of a minute, the substance had completely evaporated.  Pilate's flesh lay unblemished.

	The zebra breathed easier and easier.  He moved his lower limbs and was surprised to find that all the pain was gone.

	Rainbow reached a hoof out.  He grabbed it and was helped back to his hooves.

	"What..."  Pilate reeled, still stunned from the ordeal.  "I-I mean... how?  How did you do that just now?"

	"I dunno..."  Rainbow Dash said, pivoting the sword against the stone floor, gazing at it.  "It just came to me naturally."  She blinked, and a faint smile came to her lips.  "Just as naturally as it once came to Hurricane, I bet."

	Pilate stared at her, smiling awkwardly.  He flinched, then spun towards the far ends of the room.  "It's... so still in here..."

	"I know..."

	"What happened to all of the pegasi?"

	"I think we cleared them all away, dude."

	"Really?"

	"Yeah."

	"Spark alive... were they once Hurricane's soldiers?"  Pilate glanced back at Rainbow.  "Or a far more ancient race?"

	"Who knows.  Maybe both?"  Rainbow Dash shrugged, glancing at the etched grooves in the floor.  "Hmmmm..."

	"What is it?"

	Rainbow smirked.  "Call it another natural hunch."  She picked the sword up and trotted forward on three legs.  "But I think I can make life easier for the other survivors in this place."



	"Where are we headed?!" Bellesmith sputtered in the rain as she ran with the group along the outer rim of the circular structure.  "This ship—the Tarkington—is it far away?"

	"Over there!" Seclorum exclaimed, pointing with his hoof.  "That large temple floating beneath the dark thunderloud!"

	"Blessed Spark..."  Belle stammered.  "That has to be at least one hundred meters away!"

	"There's another temple between us and them!" Prowse exclaimed.  He spun around from where he stood along the windblown edge of the structure.  "Alright, you bloody spark starters!  Let's get a bridge made!"

	"Spark... st-starters?" Josho remarked.

	"I believe Unky Prowsy means 'unicorns,'" Props said.

	"Hmmmf..."  Prowse cocked his weaponized prosthetic.  "Nopony asked you to be a bloomin' translator, lass."

	"Hey, I gotta be useful at something!"  Props blinked her goggled eyes.  "Besides—of course—carrying the manacrystals and looking booty-full."

	"We need to hurry!"  Aatxe said, breathless as he leaned against Seclorum's side.  "The beasts are right behind us!  There's no telling how many more are out there in the storm clouds!"

	"Then let's get this show on the road!"  Seclorum pointed at a mess of zeppelin parts and overturned pillars.  "Arcshod?!  Why don't you get the bridge started?!  You're the strongest of the bunch and—"

	"What in Ledo's lingerie box?!"  Josho barked.

	Belle turned with "Eagle Eye's" body stirring on her back.  "Josho, what is it?"

	"Look for yourself!"  The stallion pointed.

	Murmurs ran across the thick crowd from Lasairfion to Prowse to Aatxe himself.  Everypony watched in a shocked stupor as the two temples—the fractured one close to them and the distant structure with the Tarkington—floated ever so gradually towards them in a slow hover.  Within the span of a minute, they both became three hundred percent easier to scale.

	"It's... it's a miracle," Belle murmured.

	"No way..."  Josho rubbed his scruffy chin, then turned to squint towards the domed roof of the structure behind them.  "Somehow, I smell a rainbow..."



	"Is... is it working?" Pilate stammered.

	"I'm willing to bet!" Rainbow Dash said through a smirking muzzle.  She had stabbed the tip of the Sword of Solstice into the groove of the room's floor.  Golden energy surged down into the niche, filling the grooves where the broken staves had once before.  "If Hurricane wielded this thing, then I don't see why I can't work magic with it either!"

	"What's the source of its power?"

	"I'm not really sure.  But I think the rainbow colored gemstones is something of a clue."

	"They're rainbow colored?"

	"Can't you tell?"  Rainbow glanced up, blinking at his helm.  "Oh.  Right.  Guess you can't."

	"I wish all miracle devices worked the same, Rainbow."

	"Heh.  You and me both, brother."  She reached a dead-end and had to pull the sword out.  "Okay.  I think that's as far as I can drag the temples outside."

	"You're sure about that?"

	"No.  But we can't waste too much time second-guessing ourselves."  She rushed over and grasped him by the hoof.  "We got somewhere to go.  You along for the ride?"

	Pilate gulped and nodded with a rattle of his skystone shard. "As ready as I'll ever be."

	"Think happy thoughts."  Then, with a deep breath, she took off for the hole in the domed ceiling, carrying the determined stallion along with her.
		//------------------------------//
		// Where Is That Confounded Bridge?		//------------------------------//

	"You need help on the up and up?" Zaid asked, glancing occasionally over his shoulder at the crawlspace beneath the Noble Jury's cockpit.  "Want me to paint your nose red so you can fly up here or something?"

	"Floydien's returned from a near-death experience," grunted the elk as he climbed up the last few remaining feet.  He emerged upon the cockpit, wincing.  "And even still, the boomer does not amuse him."

	"Seriously, though.  You've just had your melon seriously fudged up."  Zaid smirked as he returned his attention to the debris and stormclouds ahead.  "The least I could do is let you chillax a bit longer while I improve on my flight skills—Whoah dayum!"  Zaid had just been thrown to rear of the cockpit by a massive cloven hoof.

	"Boomer must have skills in the first place that stand improving!"  Floydien frowned, wincing as he climbed back into his own seat.  "Nnngh..."  He gritted his teeth, firing sporadic beams of mana into the consoles as he controlled the ship in his own unique way.  "Glimmer shimmer on ice!" he exclaimed.  "What has the boomer put Nancy through?!"

	"So I've b-been testing her endurance!" Zaid sputtered, lying upside down against the sealed door to the outer deck.  He righted himself up and said, "Granted, I could have attempted deceleration or even a landing, but then we'd be kind of sort of dead, considering I know as much about piloting as I do about making love to a porcupine."

	"Considering boomer's history in stupidity, that would not surprise Floydien."

	"Buh?"

	"Let Floydien bond with Nancy," the elk grunted.  "Floydien knows how to land his beloved somewhere safe so that the boomers can reunite."

	"That's just the thing."  Zaid gulped and gestured.  "We don't exactly know where Rainbow Dash and the rest are all having their hurricane party, or else we'd be on them like vomit on crazy bread."

	"Floydien says he will find the boomers and he will!"  The elk flashed a frown over his shoulder.   "The least you can do is check up on the cuddle cuddle."

	"Huh?" Zaid blinked,then twitched.  "Ohhhhhh.  Right."  He trotted forward.  "I knew I was missing out on something warm and fuzzy—Gaaah!"  He tripped and tumbled down the stairwell.  A few seconds later.  "We're good!"

	Floydien grumbled, decelerating the craft slightly as he repositioned her and flew perpendicular to the wind.  "Nancy will never be dirtied by an idiot's hooves again.  Floydien promises her..."



	Meanwhile, Zaid was stumbling through the navigation room and approaching the door to the engine room.  "Hey!  Hey!"  He knocked several times with a shaking hoof.  "Eagle Eye!  Ebon!  Is everything cool in there?"

	Silence.

	Zaid bit his lip.  "Guys?  For real.  Are you both okay?  Can I have a look—or are you two being a pair of sticky stallions?"

	At last, a muffled voice returned, "We're doing j-just fine, Zaid."

	With a furrowed brow, the ex-cultist leaned forward and opened the door.  He peered into the engine room.

	Under flickering lavender light, Eagle Eye could be seen cradling Ebon Mane's limp body.  A pair of glossy violet eyes glanced over.

	"Everything's okay," Eagle Eye squeaked.

	Zaid blinked.  "You... uh... you s-sure of that?"

	Ebon stirred slightly, murmuring unintelligible words.  Eagle Eye immediately nuzzled him, planted a kiss on his forehead, and glanced over with a sniffling smile.  He slowly nodded.

	Zaid bit his lip, smiled awkwardly, and backstepped out of the engine room.

	As soon as he was gone, Eagle Eye exhaled through a grimacing expression.  He held Ebon tight, gently rocking the stallion's figure as he stared—worriedly—into the nearest bulkhead.  Around them, the compartment buckled as the Noble Jury flew into the thunderous depths of Stratopolis.



	"It's still a bit far away," Bellesmith said, holding Elma's weight on her shoulders.  "How will we cross the gap?"

	"How else?"  Seclorum threw a look over his shoulder.  "Arcshod?"

	"Dreit."  The large stallion was already levitating a chunk of rusted metal over.  He positioned it until it was hovering at a tiny distance from the outer balcony of the large round structure.

	Seclorum motioned a fellow Ledomaritan over.  The two of them timed themselves, then leapt over onto the levitating platform while Arcshod steadied it.  Then, with simultaneously glowing horns, they floated over another chunk of a battered zeppelin, floating it just another space over.  Seclorum hopped onto it while the other unicorn remained on the first platform.  One by one, a precariously floating bridge was formed between the balcony's edge and the temple that was looming just two dozen feet away.

	"That's the trick, Secchy!" Josho exclaimed.  "We'll be crossing in no time!"

	Shrieks lit the air, emanating from the corridor in the structure behind them.

	Props gasped while Prowse spun about, teeth gritting.  "We aren't the only ones!"  The pale stallion cocked his prosthetic weapon and aimed at the exit behind them.  "Get a move on!  I'll hold the buggers back as much as I can!"

	"You mean we will!"  Josho galloped up to his side and trained his shotgun at the same space.  A Xonan and a Ledomaritan formed up along the phalanx with their crossbolts.  "We'll take out the first freaks in the wave!" Josho exclaimed.  "You wait to blast the bulk of 'em with your boomstick.  Sound like a plan?"

	"I can certainly dance to that tune!" Prowse spat.  "Propsicle!  Get yer arse a'movin', lassie!"

	"Okay..."  Props nodded nervously, then turned around.  "Come on, Belle!" she exclaimed, scampering towards the bridge as the unicorns finished making the bridge.  Under the insistence of Arcshod, Lasairfion and her subjects were the first to cross.

	"They'll be coming any moment now," Aatxe murmured, then gazed up into the swirling maelstrom of lightning and thunder.  "Just where is Rainbow Dash...?"
		//------------------------------//
		// Beware of Dashies Bearing Gifts		//------------------------------//

	"It's simple!"  Rainbow Dash said, carrying Pilate around the broad, curved balcony of the structure.  "We make it back to the door with the Urohringr symbol—"

	"Urohringr symbol?!" the stallion sputtered.

	Rainbow Dash went on.  "I clear the slime from the area, then open the door.  You watch my back, and I'll carve us a path back into the heart of the city!"

	"Uhhh..."

	"Together, we can get that friggin' skystone to the place where Roarke wants it to go!"

	"Assuming it all goes well, then how do we get to the others?"

	"Uhhhhm..."

	"I mean, if we're flying Stratopolis to its doom, then it stands to reason that there won't be any platforms left for us to make into a safe haven!"

	"Well, Seclorum's and Lasairfion's group are making their way to the Tarkington."

	"Yes."  The zebra nodded.  "And the Jury?"

	"I'm pretty sure we'll still have time to find them and grab them!"

	"We will?"

	"I will!"  Rainbow frowned, then glanced back at him through the glow of the sword.  "Look, Pilate.  I've got a cybernetic zebra and a glowing godsword."

	"Uhhhh..."

	"What I'm saying is that it's best not to look a gift-horse in the mouth and just make do with what we've got!  Any delay, and we'll actually be putting our friends in danger—"

	"There's something ahead of us," Pilate stammered.

	"Huh?"  Rainbow Dash looked ahead.  Sure enough, the pegasus could spot an equine figure standing at the half-open barricade to the interior of the structure.  It was a mare, and her hooves fearlessly stood within inches of the bubbling purple muck.  "Belle?"

	Pilate was already gnashing his teeth as his helmet flickred.  "Rainbow, that's not my beloved—"

	"Like I'm really that stupid," Rainbow grumbled.  She hovered to a stop, frowning.  "Look, I've got no time for you shape-shifting creeps anymore!  Now get out of the way!"  She shook her back, rattling the sword sticking out of her saddlebag with a glow for good measure.

	The doppleganger stood in place, staring placidly up at the pegasus.

	"Rainbow... I-I don't like this," Pilate wheezed.

	"Yeah, well, she's about to like this even less."  Plop!  Rainbow Dash touched down a safe distance from the ooze.  While Pilate teetered on dizzied limbs, Rainbow reached her muzzle back and grasped the sword's hilt. She marched forward with a righteous glow.  The muck spread away from her hoofsteps as she trained the sword at her target.  "Mrrrmmf..."  She spoked in a muffled yet assertive tone.  "Unless you wanna become fake pony parmesan, you'd better turn carapace and run.  Ya hear me?"

	The fake Bellesmith stood her ground.

	Pilate tilted his head back and forth.  His ears twitched, and he suddenly craned his head towards the cloudy sky.

	"Last warning, bucko!"  Rainbow Dash took a swipe at the ground.  The Sword of Solstice showered sparks, making the slime retreat with ashen fright towards the barricade.  "You have no more business here!"

	"Belle" blinked... then smiled.  "That's impossible, for Mother wishes to speak to you."

	Rainbow Dash's eyes twitched.

	Pilate gasped.  "Rainbow—"  He tried reaching for his staff, but it was too late.  No less than a dozen shapes broke camouflage, leaping off the contours of the balcony where they had been clinging all this time.  Like moths, the materializing monsters swarmed the two, knocking Pilate back onto his spine.  "Ooof!"

	"Mrmmmf?!"  Rainbow Dash spun. Her eyes bugged, and she thrusted forward with the blade.

	The line of shape shifters effortlessly split formation, evaded the sword slice, and lunged their limbs forward in a mixed cornacopia of tentacles and pinchers.

	"Graaaugh!"  Rainbow Dash thrashed back and forth, struggling in the odd array of animal appendages.  She slashed her sword at everything that moved, but the creatures anticipated her every tactic.  Collectively, they swung her back and suplexed her hard into the balcony's edge.

	Cl-Clakkk!  The Sword of Solstice flew free, landed, and slid across the granite steps.  It came to a rattling stop several feet away, leaning precariously into the wind gusks of Stratopolis along the structure's edge.

	Pilate sensed it.  He scuffled over, reaching a shivering hoof forward.  A hoof stepped on his fetlock, forcing the zebra to yelp in pain.  A half-dozen changelings wrangled him off the floor and slammed him against a pillar across from the sword, holding him in place.

	In the meantime, the rest of the creatures swarmed Rainbow Dash.  Dozens and dozens more came out of the niches and shadowy crooks of the place, until the pegasus was certain that she was being smothered with Stratopolis' entire changeling population.

	They covered her like termites, affording her only one sliver of space to see through.  Rainbow's twitching eyes glanced past the black shells and quivering wings, and there she saw the smile on Belle's face.  It morphed into a fanged maw as a line of green flame cascaded down the undisguised shape-shifter's face.

	"Mother would like to thank you, Austraeoh, for unwrapping the greatest gift she could possibly ask for," the creature said as the rest of the monsters lifted Rainbow Dash off her hooves.  "The black heart of Stratopolis."
		//------------------------------//
		// Destiny, Misery, and Your Mother		//------------------------------//

	By the time Bellesmith hopped off the levitating bridge and onto the fractured temple, she had no chance to breathe with relief, on account of Elma's body twitching involuntarily.

	The mare gasped, glancing over her shoulder at the changeling.  "Elma?  Elma, what's the matter?"

	"It's her..." Elma squeaked in Eagle Eye's voice.  The lavender coat started to fade, giving way to a black shell and smoldering green eyes.  "I... I-I can feel her... oh good heavens, she's here!"

	"Elma!"  Belle winced.  She glanced over at the procession of survivors hopping off the makeshift bridge and onto the platform.  One by one, the ponies formed a dense cluster in the center of the temple.  Trotting stealthily to the side, Belle knelt beside an overturned column and laid Elma onto the ground.  "Pssst... Elma!  Look at me!"

	"I'm so sorry..."  Elma bit her lip, her teeth forming and losing fangs in every other blink.  "Please... d-don't devour me... I was so blind... I-I had no idea..."

	"Elma.  Please.  You must maintain your shape."  Belle winced.  "I mean EE's shape!  Focus on me!  Focus on my voice!"  She smiled reassuringly, caressing the shapeshifter's cheek.

	The creature looked up, its face fluctuating to and from a lavender sheen.  At last, Elma took on the form of a petite stallion.  A solitary tear trickled down a fuzzy cheek.

	"Now..."  Belle leaned forward, her eyes set on Elma's.  "Who is here?"

	Elma gulped, ultimately stammering in Eagle Eye's voice.  "Mother."



	"Grrrkkk!"  Rainbow Dash felt herself being lifted up, up, up into the hurricane winds.  A solid cluster of changelings were gripping her every limb, floating her two dozen feet off the balcony's edge.

	Down below, Pilate shook and struggled in the grip of several burly shape-shifters.  With clenched teeth, he tilted his helm to the side.  He sensed the Sword of Solstice's shape several feet away, wobbling along the balcony's edge.  Try as he might, he couldn't get his limbs to budge a single inch under the pressure of the creatures tackling him, much less reach towards the glowing weapon.  All he could do was tilt his head up at the sound of buzzing dragonfly wings.

	Rainbow squinted through tearing eyes.  She was being pivoted to face the upper rim of the balcony just above the overhang that led to the Urohringr barrier.  Clinging to the roof's edge, several changelings scurried and clustered together.  More and more arrived from the distant stretches of Stratopolis, all skittering on porous black hooves.  At last, when there were over seventy of the obsidian wretches, they pressed against one another, forming a tight black ball of rattling carapaces and folded dragonfly wings.

	Then, gradually, that ball took shape, its edges morphing out and turning into jagged edges and rough joints.  Two points formed to the top left and the top right, followed by a spike of clumped bodies in the center.  Last but not least, the lower half of the cluster of changelings dangled loosely from the top half, hanging off by a "hinge" of sorts.  Then—with a cadence of cricketsong—the changelings all fluttered their wings in sequence.  A line of flame wafted once, twice, three times over the entire cluster.  At last, the collective black sheen of the multiple segmented bodies glossed over into the facade of one polished surface.  A face had fully formed, complete with fangs, a drooping webbed mane, and a pair of piercing green eyes that burst open with dual pulses of blazing emerald.

	And then that face spoke:

	"Ohhhh, how I do love to make an entrance," the voice rang with a nauseating vibration that tickled the hurricane gales.

	Rainbow Dash gritted her teeth.  She helplessly stared into the massive muzzle.  "Chrysalis," she sneered.

	"Austraeoh," the face of Chrysalis smiled.  Tiny puffs of green flame flickered randomly across her visage, revealing the ghostly shadows of limbs, wings, and more limbs.  Then all was clear once again.  "You have proven most fortuitous.  Misery has followed you east across the continents.  And now, misery has followed you through ten thousand years of forsaken time.  If I didn't know better, I would have guessed you were hatched instead of foaled."

	"Too much of a coward to actually see me face to face?!" Rainbow snarled.

	"But we have seen each other face to face," Chrysalis said, her massive face morphing through green flame to bear a hurt expression.  "On the Lightning Bearer.  You see, I had to know that you were something worth manipulating."  A flicker of flame; a smug grin.  "You did not disappoint."

	"Don't drag me into your stupid puppet games!" Rainbow Dash spat.  "You're responsible for the deaths of thousands of lives!"

	"Tens of thousands, actually.  Isn't that a lovely number?  Sometimes I count it to myself while I fall into hibernation so I can wake up the next hatching season with a smile."  A pair of fangs glimmered to life.  "Every death... every wound... every horrible consequence of war that you deem abominable is simply a seed that'll grow for my hive's glorious harvest."

	"Is that your friggin' plan?!" Rainbow Dash sputtered, struggling against the changelings holding her.  All was futile.  "Nnnngh... You're sowing misery all across the world so you can feed your children?!"

	"It's about destiny, Rainbow Dash.  As the Austraeoh, surely you've become well-acquainted with that.  I have a destiny too."  Chrysalis' eyes narrowed into glimmering slits.  "But unlike yours, my future is comprehendable, for it is a goal I've set for myself and myself alone since long before your insipid nation was born.  No stars foretold my journey.  I'm not blindly led by deteriorating books and a scattering remnant of foolish zealots defending some indefinable cause."

	"It's about Tchern, isn't it?!" Rainbow Dash frowned.  "All of this is some pathetic attempt to impress your lame sister on the dark side of the world!"

	"I will not have a pathetic mortal pawn like you insulting the legacy of my elder sister and Queen!  She has sacrificed far too much and far too long to deserve that sort of abuse!"  The flickering head leaned back, hissing with the assistance of dozens of dragonfly wings.  "Tchern is righteous, but she is also stubborn.  She doesn't realize that our combined strength alone is not enough to achieve victory in the Trinary War.  That is why I've taken it upon myself to pursue this most glorious undertaking.  By siphoning the dreadful emotions of the sunlit realm, I shall amass a well-fed army powerful enough to return full-force to the dark side.  Once reunited with Tchern's hive, the Twin Queens shall be unstoppable.  At last, after thousands of years of chaos, we will unite the fragments of Endrax and lay claim to the Sarcophagus of Ages.  Both the Sarosian and Night Shard armies will be driven into ruin, and we will have our rightful claim to the powers of harmony and chaos that keep this plane adrift."

	Rainbow Dash's pupils shrank.  "The 'Sarcophagus of Ages...'"  She blinked.  "Wait, you mean the Midnight Armory?!"  She frowned.  "And just what in the buck happened to Endrax?!"

	"She was nothing but a relic of the Age before the Sundering," Chrysalis said with a flickering smile.  "Her vigil was over long before it began.  The Three Armies overran her bastion eons ago.  After all, we now live on the fragments of a broken world, and everything is dying.  Including you, Austraeoh, the supposed spark that the empty runes of old claim will reunite the pieces of Urohringr."  A thunderous cascade rolled through the air in the form of ghostly laughter.  "A perfect epoch is perfect only once.  There is nothing to restore, and yet there is everything to reinvent.  I know this now, for one of the Sentinels from before the Sundering is now in my possession, and I have you to thank for that."

	"What in the hay could you possibly accomplish with a floating death city full of zombies?!"

	"I shall master its nagivation, and carry it on a path of destruction to the far reaches of the world, through the Grand Choke and beyond.  The cursed infestation of the past shall pour forth from the heart of this Sentinel, waging misery across the continents.  All the while, my beloved children will feed and grow strong, starting with the kingdom where I have now settled.  It is a bountiful place, full of many souls ready to scream and sob.  They shall serve as my springboard here, and when the rest of the sunlit world becomes covered in blight, my hive will have rejoined with Queen Tchern on the far side, initiating an Age of Glorious Night."

	Rainbow Dash's muzzle hung open.  "Val Roa," she murmured.  "You're already in Val Roa as we speak..."

	The Queen's eyes billowed with green flame.  "And what a succulent sepulcher it will become..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Where Misery Goes to Graze		//------------------------------//

	"Here they come!" Josho shouted.

	Seclorum gritted his teeth, concentrating on the plank of metal he was levitating in place as the middle of the "bridge."  He glanced out the corner of his eyes as a solid line of pegasi swooped down at them.  "The last ponies are hopping over now!  We need cover!"

	"On it!"  Prowse shouted, running to the edge of the temple on the other side.  "Propsicle, I hate to ask ya for it, lass, but—"

	"All in the family, Unky Prowsy!"  Props rushed over and braced his flank with her spine.  "Fire away!"

	Now with a firm hoofing, the stallion aimed his prosthetic at the thick of the undead flock, charged up the crystal batteries, and fired.  A burning stream of mana flared through the hurricane winds, evaporating the rainwater as it traveled towards its targets.

	Six pegasi melted instantly.  The rest of them split on either side of the energy discharge and came swooping at opposite angles.

	"Brace yourselves, everypony!"  Josho exclaimed, firing pot-shots at the creatures on the left.

	Two of them fell.  The rest swooped low, biting and clawing at the heads of several equines.

	The survivors ducked low while the winy air filled with criss-crossing projectiles from the ponies' makeshift weapons.  In the meantime, a thick line of pegasi swooped down from the right.  Josho pivoted to fire at them, but it was too late.

	With a deep breath, Lasairfion rushed in and blasted a stream of energy from her horn.  She erected a forcefield that succeeded in blocking the first line of winged undead.  Several more seeped around the edges of the barrier and came soaring down at the platform.

	"The last pony is through!" Seclorum shouted as Arcshod and the other unicorns began hopping along the remains of the bridge, carrying levitating platforms along with them.  "Quick!  We've gotta make it to the other side—"

	"A little busy here, old friend!" Josho grunted, slamming his shotgun across the snout of a zombie and firing its barrels deep into its quivering gut.

	"Watch it!" Seclorum shouted as he and Arcshod made it onto the platform.  Puddles of purple muck was starting to form along the temple's surface.  "We gotta off 'em in the air!  Keep them away!"

	"Tell them that!" Prowse growled as he spun and swung his prosthetic into the mangy face of one creature after another.  "Come and get some, ya bloody sods!"

	"We don't want to win the battle!" Aatxe stammered.  "We want to avoid it!"  He pointed to the far end of the platform.  "Come on, everypony!  Just one more bridge to the Tarkington!"

	"Secchy!" Josho shouted.  "You, Arcshod, and the others go!  We'll hold them off!"

	"This many of them?!"  Seclorum wheezed as he galloped across the landscape with his heavy metal plank floating after him.  He sweated from the constant telekinetic effort.  "We won't last a minute!"

	"Lasairfion's got her magic and Prowse's boomstick is recharging!  We can do this—"

	A pair of pegasi dove out of the clouds and coasted straight towards Josho.

	Belle saw it.  With a gasp, she let go of Elma and picked up a chunk of granite.  "Josho!  Watch it!"  Grunting, she threw the rock with all her might.

	It flew in a curved arc through the wind and ricocheted off one pegasi's skull.  At the sound of the pained shriek, Josho turned and ducked before the creature could rake its teeth across his neck.  Shouting, he swung the butt of his shotgun agains the skull of the second monster.

	The battered pegasus veered left and right, bounced off a column, and partially dissolved in midair.

	"Look out!" a Ledomaritan shouted as everypony ducked its careening body.

	"My ship!" Aatxe shouted.  "I can see it!  Arcshod, over here—"  The stallion grunted as the pegasus' corpse slammed into him.

	"Aatxe!" Seclorum yelped.

	Arcshod spun with wide eyes.  Snarling, the large stallion marched over and swung his metal plank like a bludgeon, knocking the quivering mess of a creature off of Aatxe's shoulders.

	Seclorum scampered over, standing by Arcshod's silent figure.  He grimaced.

	"Gnnngh... mmmfffnngh..." Aatxe curled up in a quivering ball, his eyes tearing.  Purple muck oozed down the sides of his body, causing tiny columns of steam to rise.  "It... it b-burns..."  He looked up, muzzle quivering.  "How... h-how bad is it?"

	"Xon..." Arcshod exhaled.

	Belle covered her gasping muzzle from afar.

	For once, Seclorum was at a loss for words.



	"I don't care how many minions she has at her command!" Pilate sputtered from where he lay in the grip of several changelings along the structure's balcony.  "She's obsessed with agony!  And that makes her as corrupt and short-sighted as every other thug we've run across, Rainbow Dash!  Don't give into her despair—"  One of the shape-shifters holding him down gave his chest a hard punch.  "Aaaugh!"

	"Stop it!" Rainbow hissed into the face of the changeling queen.  "Don't hurt him!  Or, I swear, I'll—"

	"You'll what?"  The face smiled with a flicker of green.  "The only reason you've had friends these last few months is because I've allowed it."

	"Okay, now I know you're just spewing bullcrap," Rainbow grumbled.

	"Do you seriously think that all I've ever known of you has been gathered from leeching your emotions alone?"  Chrysalis' eyes flashed, and her face took on a white sheen with a mane of rippling pastel hues.  "Your kingdom is home to more than the average mortals," she said in Celestia's voice.  In a flash of green, Luna's face loomed.  "The night doth belong to creatures far more cunning than all that thou hath allied with." The face went pale again, accompanied by eyes brimming with eternal wisdom.  "My children are everywhere," the vision of Whitemane said.  "And they all have eyes.  My eyes.  When I sensed opportunity in the Ancient Homeland fading, I sent the bulk of the brood to investigate.  I found a world nearly sundered by a chaotic rift, and then there was one survivor—one miserable, miserable survivor heading east.  I didn't realize it at first, but she was bringing the delectable chaos to me."  The air filled with nauseating laughter as Whitemane vanished and Chrysalis' visage returned full-force.  "And that is why I ultimately decided to keep my station in Xona and turn my focus on Val Roa.  You see, an inexplicable agent of chaos would soon be in my grasp.  So long as I led her to the Sentinel, there was no backtracking required."

	"I... am not an agent of chaos," Rainbow Dash snarled.  "I am the last Element of Harmony!  I am—"

	"The divine 'Spark' or some other such nonsense, yes?"  Chrysalis' face morphed into a contemptuous scowl.  "I believe in the style of the runic prophecies my brood have discovered in the Sentinel and beyond.  I don't take quite as much stock in the substance.  You are destined to make your trip east, yes.  Hmmmmm—But there's simply been no declaration set in stone over who you were making this trip for."

	"I am not going to be your device to make horrible things happen in Val Roa or anywhere!" Rainbow's voice cracked.

	"And yet you're so good at it," Chrysalis said with a resonating chuckle.  "From kingdom to kingdom, you leave death and destruction in your wake.  I sometimes think to myself that I don't need the Sentinel and its black heart at all."

	"It's... it's n-not true..."  Rainbow Dash seethed, avoiding the image's gigantic gaze.  "I'm not a monster.  I'm the Element of Loyalty.  I'm... I'm awesome..."

	"Oh, admittedly, you did need... a boost from time to time.  Misery is like sheep; it has to be herded and managed to properly graze on the living.  That's why I had my children intercede in little ways to make sure you arrived in this city..."

	Rainbow Dash sneered.  "Prowse..."

	"And, of course, why not feed on those unfortunate enough to be herded along with you?  Honestly, I couldn't help myself.  The thirst for anguish made it too much to pass up.  All it took was putting some of my children in the right places at the right times."

	"What..."  Rainbow squinted.  "What are you even trying to say?"

	"Are you really so blind, Rainbow Dash?"  Chrysalis fanged teeth showed.  "Are you so pathetically loyal to the idea of your own lonely plight that you can't see through pure coincidence and see it for the masterfully constructed mechanization it really was?"

	Rainbow's muzzle hung agape in confusion.

	"He was blind too.  His tenacity and determination made him a great deal like you.  But madness had dissolved his resolve, and—unlike you—he was so... so very easy to manipulate.  This should be no surprise to you, since one of your best friends had manipulated him before."

	Rainbow's eyes quivered.  "Shell..."

	Pilate glanced up, breathless.

	"You... y-your broodlings guided Shell... to Lerris...?" Rainbow murmured.

	"To a feast, Rainbow," Chrysalis thundered.  "And you, the Austraeoh, shall bring the Sentinel to the greatest banquet of all in Val Roa..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Lay Your Head to Rest		//------------------------------//

	Josho blasted the face off of a diving pegasus.  He and several other ponies ducked as the creature dove past the edge of the temple, gargling purple ooze.  In the meantime, the obese stallion turned and shouted at a train of Ledomaritans and Xonans levitating metal zeppelin parts towards the large structure with the Tarkington.  "Get the bridge built!  Or else this is our last stop!"  He took another blast at the swarm, ducked their swipes, and slid over to where Arcshod and Seclorum stood crouched over the twitching figure of Aatxe.  "H-how bad is he?!" Josho breathlessly asked.

	"He... he..."  Seclorum grimaced.

	"Grkkk—Hauckkkt!"  Aatxe—wide eyed—vomited a dollop of violet-tainted bile onto the granite beneath him.  He curled his limbs to his chest as the slime slowly spread across his coat.  "Like... I'm m-melting... my insides..."  He hissed in pain, then squinted up at the group.  "Gentlecolts... I-I never once thought I'd see my ship again."  He gulped.  "Much less flying."

	"Knock it off, dammit," Seclorum sneered.  "You just got sprayed with the crud!  It's not like they bit you or—"

	Josho's hoof rested on Seclorum's shoulder.

	The old soldier clenched his eyes shut, taking several deep breaths.  "Arcshod..."

	The Xonan jerked a glance at him.

	"The other ponies need you to finish the bridge."

	Arcshod scowled.

	"Well?!"  Seclorum turned to glare at him.  "What are you waiting for, ya big oaf?!  We're all dead if we stay here!"

	"Grnnghhh..."  Arcshod's nostrils fumed as his tattoos glimmered in sequence with his horn.  "V'renna sela'thenmar rekk threen..."  He stormed off, wrenching his gaze off of Aatxe's tortured figure.

	More shrieks filled the air, carried along the hurricane winds.

	"Elma, we have to move..."  Bellesmith stammered, heathing the breathless fascimile of Eagle Eye over her shoulder.  "Hold on tight to me.  Listen to my voice, not hers!"  She scampered over to where Arcshod was forming the rest of the bridge.  "Props!" she shouted.

	Props stood in the dead-center of the temple, gazing with misty eyes at Aatxe's figure.

	"Props!" Belle exclaimed louder.  "We need you to cross over first!  You're carrying the mana crystals!"

	"Do as she says, blondie," Josho said as softly as he could, glancing over his shoulder.  "And make sure Lasairfion follows you close behind.  We need the Queen's magic to defend the Tarkington as it takes off."

	"Right..."  Props sniffled and galloped along.  "Right righ right..."

	Prowse watched her, panting, then flung his gaze towards the sky.  "The... th-the buggers are coming in from all directions!  I don't know where to aim my boomstick!"

	"Prowse..."  Aatxe wheezed, flinching in the rain.  Unable to form words, he instead motioned with what was left of his left hoof.

	The pale stallion immediately rushed over, standing over the steaming figure.  "Yes, laddie?"

	Aatxe gulped.  "Those th-things want blood.  And I-I have some in me still..."

	"What are you even getting at?"

	"Do... d-do you have those explosives still?"

	Prowse clenched his jaws.  He glanced at the others.

	Josho was silent.  Seclorum hung his head... before slowly nodding.

	"Awww Hell..."  Prowse unhitched the crate of rattling charges from his backside.  "Even if you took an entire squad of them freaks out, this place still has ten times as many to toss at us—"

	"It doesn't matter... none of that m-matters..."  Aatxe spat up more ooze... but smiled.  "My ship is a fast ship... a b-beautiful ship..."  He hissed and spat.  "And th-there's no better grease monkey to bring her b-back to life than you, Prowse..."

	"Aatxe..."

	"Face it.  I lived my life here... in th-this wretched place..."  Aatxe curled up again, wincing.  "Hckkkt... pr-promise me, friend, th-that you'll get the others out of here so they can live their lives elsewhere..."

	Prowse nodded firmly.  "I will.  I swear on what's left of my banged-up body and soul, I'll get these ponies—and your ship—off this slime drenched crud heap."

	"Then th-that's what matters..."  Aatxe nodded.

	"They're swooping in!" Josho exclaimed.  "Boys...?"

	Aatxe motioned for the crate.

	Prowse clenched his teeth and slid it over.

	Aatxe gripped the edge, tilting it over so that the explosives rattled to a stop against his body.  He limply scooped several of them up at once.  His eyes darted over to Seclorum.  "Hey... soldier..."

	Seclorum stared at him through foggy eyes.

	Aatxe smirked.  "Never stop fighting..."  He coughed, snorted, and breathed, "But find some time to love as well..."

	Seclorum slowly, slowly nodded.  He reached his forelimb forward.

	Aatxe lifted his.  With an inch to spare, however, both stallions avoided making contact, settling for an imagined hoof-bump.  Slime spread over Aatxe's body, forcing him to whimper slightly in pain.  He rolled over, causing the explosives to rattle like loose pebbles.

	"Okay!  Everypony else is across!"  Josho shouted, backtrotting towards the bridge as he aimed his shotgun at the sky.  "Incoming—"

	"No!" Aatxe managed to yell.  He stood up on wobbling legs, his body dribbling purple muck to the floor as he shuffled towards the middle of the platform.  "Don't fire!  Let them come... let them c-come to me."

	Josho gnashed at his teeth.  With a grunt, he turned and galloped full-speed across the floating bridge while Arcshod maintained it.  Prowse followed short behind, glancing over his shoulder.  "Seclorum!  Time to go, laddie!"

	Seclorum held his breath, turned, and sprinted across the bridge.  The unicorns holding up the rear dropped their zeppelin pieces and ran after him—one levitating plank at a time.  At last, Arcshod drew up what was left of the rusted chunks and threw them to the winds of Stratopolis.  As for the pegasi—

	"Hey!" Aatxe's gargling voice sliced through the winds.  He tossed one grenade high into the air.  It burst overhead, illuminating the gray malaise of the storm with a brief plume of fiery orange.  "Over here, you mangy death pigeons!  Dinner's served!"

	The diving figures spiraled about, ribboned their way through the air, and converged on the platform where the sputtering stallion stood.  He fell back as they pounced on him, but fought and struggled with a stifled howl.

	"Raagghhhgh—Is th-that all you've got?!  Grrhghhh—I've been waiting eightteen years for th-this dance!"

	A sheet of heavy rain shot between the platforms, obscuring the struggle.

	Bellesmith watched from the cover of a granite pillar.  Props stood, shivering in the rain, while her uncle paused at her side to steady her with a natural hoof.  Lasairfion and Arcshod stood in reverant silence while the survivors rushed for cover behind them.  Among the galloping ponies were Josho and Seclorum, the latter of which stopped within stone's throw of the stranded Tarkington to turn and glance at the platform beyond.

	It would not last for long.  Kapowwwww!  In a brilliant spray of combined explosions, the battered temple evaporated with a spray of purple mist and limbs.  The hurricane winds carried off the gore and debris before it could remotely make its way towards where the survivors were currently perched.  For a heavenly spell, the air was devoid of undead shrieks... or the bellowing shouts of one brave stallion.
		//------------------------------//
		// You Are What You Eat		//------------------------------//

	"You have done a marvelous job serving my brood from the outside," Chrysalis' image said with each flickering shift of her grinning jaws.  The massive cluster of shapeshifters leaned forward so that her leering face was practically "breathing" on the restrained pegasus.  "But it is now that you join the fold, Austraeoh."

	"Grnnnghh!"  Rainbow Dash hissed and spat as she struggled in the changelings' grip that was hovering her in place.

	Fangs glistened in the wet gray air as the Queen spoke, "I will feast on your pain and assimilate your essence into the hive.  At last, my children shall wield complete control over the Sentinel and the beacons of Urohringr beyond.  You'll no longer have a reason to fear dying before the end of your flight, Rainbow Dash, for you shall live on in us.  Your journey is now our journey, and victory awaits us with our sister Tchern at the Sarcophagus of Ages."

	"Rainbow Dash!" Pilate gasped.

	"Darn it, don't do this!" Rainbow growled.  "I don't care how bloody the Trinary War is!  Nothing is worth trashing the entire light side of the world just to get what you want!"  She seethed.  "You have so much friggin' power and influence!  Why can't you do use it for something good or harmonic for once?"

	"Oh please, Rainbow..."  Chrysalis face briefly flashed to Luna's.  "We both know that pain and destruction is all we're good for."  The brood queen's dark and glossy visage returned.  "I am not converting you so much as I am completing you.  At least now the Austraeoh's destiny will be a slow burn instead of a tragic conflagration."  She tilted her massive head aside and nodded towards a source above Rainbow Dash.  "Proceed, my child."

	Rainbow Dash struggled to look up.  One changeling flitted out from the massive swarm and flew down to her level.  It converted its dangling left forelimb into a massive stinger, dripping with frightening green venom.

	"Induct her into the hive," Chrysalis said with a hissing smirk.

	The changeling loomed closer, aiming the stinger for Rainbow's chest.

	"Snkkkt... please..."  Rainbow Dash stammered through clenched teeth, twitching.  "Don't do this.  I've got friends..."  Her eyes went glossy.  "I've got ponies to save.  We all have ponies to save.  Don't listen to her.  You don't have to..."

	The changeling reached into the mass of shape-shifters holding Rainbow Dash and gripped the back of the pegasus neck.  It then pressed the stinger to Rainbow's sternum.

	Rainbow shivered, a tear forming along the edge of her right eye.  "It d-doesn't have to be like this..."

	Pilate watched from below, frozen in fear.

	The changeling reared its stinger, coiled its muscles to puncture Rainbow's chest... then suddenly thrusted its head forward, kissing Rainbow squarely on the lips.

	"Mmmmmmffff!" Rainbow gasped into the creature's fangs, cross-eyed.  When the long kiss ended, she jerked back, breathless.

	The changeling caressed the back of Rainbow's head, gazing at her closely.  One by one, freckles appeared across its cheek, followed by a fuzzy orange complexion.  "No more tears, sugarcube..."

	Rainbow's lips quivered.  "It's... it's you..."

	"What is going on here?!"  Chrysalis' voice boomed as the face flickered from left to right with furious green flame.  "Pierce her heart!  Make her one of us!"

	"Shhhh..."  Applejack stroked Rainbow's cheek, fluttering backwards with a rosy-cheeked smile.  "It's gonna be alright."  Green eyes sparkled.  There was a glint of something fiery, like sunshine on apple orchards, and the shape-shifter spun around, spiraled, and plunged full-force into the gaping mouth of the massive Chrysalis facade.

	"Graaaauchkkkt!"  Chrysalis' skull reared back against the temple.  Lightning flashed overhead, illuminating the orange bands suddenly rivuleting across her face, one changeling at a time.  "Hnnnghhh... what... wh-what is happening?!  What d-did you do?!"

	Rainbow Dash buckled.  She gasped, glancing aside.  The changelings gripping her were wincing, their faces wrought with confusion and dizziness.

	Down below, the creatures holding Pilate fell to their sides, clutching their skulls as tufts of green fumes billowed from their eye sockets.

	As thunder rolled, the windy air filled with the cries and wails of the changelings.  One by one, the face of Chrysalis dissolved as the shape-shifters constituting her face loss cohesion.

	"My children... nnngh—no!  Listen to me!  Listen to your Queen!  Graaughkkt!"  The face thrashed from left and right as more and more orange bodies overtook the solid black gloss.  "Stop!  Your mother commands you!  Do not... gnnngh... do not feed on it!"

	At last, the creatures could no longer hold onto Rainbow Dash.  They all drifted to the granite surface of the balcony, joining the twitching figures who fell from the dissolving face of their brood queen.  Rainbow flapped her wings, hovering a few feet above the scene.  Everywhere she turned to look, changelings were curling up into fetal positions, lost in sobs and murmurs of confusion.

	Pilate jerked about, his rattling helm struggling to take the situation in.  At last, he scampered freely to the edge and scooped up the Sword of Solstice in the crook of his hoof.  "Quick!  Rainbow Dash!"  He galloped straight for a tight cluster of dazed changelings.  "While they're down for the count—"

	"No!"  Rainbow Dash held a hoof out, stopping him in his tracks.  "Just... just wait..."

	"Wait?!"  Pilate panted and panted.  "Wait for what?"

	"Something's happening..."  Rainbow Dash slowly, slowly smiled, tilting her head up towards the mass of changelings.  "Something awesome..."

	Pilate stood by her side and gazed up as well.

	"Stop!  It will make you weak!  We need to keep strong!" Chrysalis sputtered and hissed, but there were less and less changelings making up her face and mouth to maintain the speech.  "Don't feed on it!  Mother needs you!  I need you to be strong!  My s-sister... grnnnghh—obey me, children!  Obey... m-m-meeee... aaannnghh!"

	Chrysalis' skull yanked upwards, and when it came back down it was in over forty separate pieces.  The changelings collapsed across the balcony, and they did so in a splash of rainbow color.  Coats of orange, lavender, pink, yellow, white, and sky-blue.

	Rainbow couldn't help it.  She flinched, leaping into Pilate's side and bracing herself against his shoulders.  She hyperventilated slightly, her ruby eyes reflecting a sea of Twilights, Rarities, Pinkies, Fluttershies, and Applejacks.  Pilate, confused at the doppelgangers pooling around him, nevertheless gave Rainbow's hoof a firm reassuring squeeze, and the mare's breaths calmed slightly.



	Whurrrrr—Clank!  The side door to the massive green hull of the Tarkington finally slid open.

	"We're in!" Prowse sputtered through the rainwater coating his face. "Props!  C'mere with the mana crystals, lass!  We gotta jump-start this beast like there's no tomorrow!"

	"Make it quick!" Seclorum growled.  "Aatxe gave us one hell of a window and it'd be a shame to put it to waste!"

	"Just point and click and I'm there!" Props said, sliding into the ship's interior.  "Oooh!  It's even got that metal musk smell!"

	"Savor it later, Propsicle."  Prowse threw a look over his shoulder.  "Josho!  How're the eyes on the sky?!"

	"We're in the clear!" Josho exclaimed, cocking his shotgun with a beam of telekinesis.  He gazed thinly into the rainy wind.  "Nothing's coming this way anytime soon!  Say, did Aatxe say whether or not he had gun turrets on his baby?  Cuz that would be a friggin' goddess-send—"

	Just then, several groaning voices sounded off.  Everypony stopped what they were doing to turn and look.  Out of the group, two Ledomaritans and three Xonans suddenly buckled, collapsing to their hooves as they clutched their skulls in pain.

	"H'raanan siul mess'okuun?" Arcshod stammered as he stood protectively beside Lasairfion.

	"What's their problem?" Seclorum exclaimed.  "Have they been infected?!"

	"No..."  Josho icily trotted towards two of the collapsed ponies, raising his shotgun.  "It's something else..."  His brow furrowed.  "I've seen this before, Secchy..."

	Bellesmith watched breathlessly.  She felt Elma quivering on her back.  "Elma...?"  She turned to look at the shape-shifter.  She had lost Eagle Eye's image entirely.  "Elma!  For Spark's sake!  You have to—"  Belle paused in mid-speech.

	Elma was sobbing.  What's more, she had a smile on her face.  She gazed up with green, evaporating tears.  "She's... she's gone..."

	Belle blinked.  "Who is...?"

	"Mother..."  Elma smiled painfully.  "She lost us... she lost her children..."  A sniffle, and a happy sob.  "We found something better than what she feeds us..."

	Belle's jaw hung open.  She flashed a look at the collapsed ponies.  In the place of Ledomaritans and Xonans, she saw hauntingly familiar coats and manes.  "Rarity... Fluttershy... Applejack..."

	As soon as she said this, the coats disappeared, and the changelings gained their black carapaces back.  By now, their spasms had stopped, and they huddled in a tight circle on the floor, gazing about in lucid confusion.

	Arcshod scowled.  With a suppressed growl, he whipped out his crossbow and aimed it at the huddled creatures.

	Josho stepped forward, shotgun aimed.

	Belle gasped.  In a blink, she dropped Elma, galloped forward, and slid to a stop directly between Josho and the changelings.  "No!  Stop!  Don't!" she shouted with hooves outstretched.

	"Belle, step away," Josho grumbled.

	"No..."  Belle gulped, and smiled hopefully.  "They're no longer of any threat to us!"

	Josho and Arcshod silently exchanged glances, then glared down at Belle.

	The mare smiled warmly in the rain.  "Trust me..."



	One by one, the changelings on the balcony of the large structure stood up, exchanging weak glances and blinking off their separate spells.

	Pilate trotted around in a circle, gawking at each and every one of them.  At last, he swiveled about and looked towards Rainbow Dash.

	The mare trotted forward, approaching one of several changelings still collapsed on its knees.

	The shape-shifter shook and quivered, hanging its head as it was overcome with sobs.  A blue hoof tilted its chin up.  It stared painfully into Rainbow Dash's face.  Slowly, its black shell turned into an orange coat, topped off with a violet mane.  "I'm... I'm so sorry," Scootaloo's voice stammered.  "I didn't know... we didn't know..."  Tears trickled down the foal's face.  "How c-can there possibly be something better?  It's... it's all sh-she ever gave us... and we b-believed her..."

	Rainbow Dash ruffled the filly's mane.  Slowly, she smiled.  "Guess all you guys needed was a change in diet."

	The doppelganger sniffled, smiled, then flew forward, hugging Rainbow Dash as it buried its sobbing face in her fuzzy blue chest.  Rainbow reached down and stroked its back, even as the black shell returned, accompanied by fumes of green tears.

	Taking a deep breath, Rainbow Dash looked up from the crowd of blank-faced changelings.  Her eyes fell on the Urohringr door, still coated in purple slime.  At last, she glanced back at her friend.  "Pilate..."

	"Yes... Rainbow?"

	"Give me the sword."

	The zebra nervously complied.

	Rainbow parted the hug with the changeling and gripped the glowing blade in the crook of her hoof.  She took a deep breath, facing the barrier and the deathly slime beyond.

	"Let's finish this."
		//------------------------------//
		// A Call to Jury Duty		//------------------------------//

	"Lookie!" Props shouted, pointing a hoof at the peak of the maelstrom.

	Several of the survivors swiveled away from the Tarkington, squinting up at the rainy sky.  In thin threads of winged flight, several black bodies lifted from the large central structure and vanished amidst the gray malaise of Stratopolis.

	"Is it another wave of undead?!" Prowse exclaimed.

	"No," Josho said, shaking his head.  "It's the changelings."

	"Where in the heck are they going?!" Seclorum exclaimed.

	"Their work is done here."

	Everypony looked at Belle.

	She stared back at them, speaking, "They're no longer bound to the same hive mind."

	Several ponies exchanged nervous glances.  Arcshod silently fumed while Seclorum held his breath.

	Josho looked past Belle's shoulder.  Eagle Eye was gone, and in his place was a changeling with a familiar scar across its back.  He turned to squint at Belle in particular.  "You've known all this time...?"

	Belle didn't respond.  She kept her position in front of the shivering cluster of changelings atop the platform.

	Josho took a deep breath. His brow furrowed.  "Belle..."

	"They've released us, Josho," she quietly said above the pitter-patter of rain.  "It's time we released them."

	Silently, Josho turned to look at Seclorum and the others.  Arcshod was frowning, but at the shuffle of hooves, the large Xonan stepped aside.  Lasairfion stood in the midst of the group.  She looked at Belle, then at Josho, and slowly nodded.

	Seclorum closed his eyes.  After a deep breath, he turned towards the changelings and spoke icily, "The longer you stay here, the greater the odds of all of you being skewered alive by crossbolts."  He sidestepped several feet.  "Now scram."

	The changelings' fangs rattled.  In frightful flits of dragonfly wings, they all took off, soaring into the swirling clouds beyond.

	Prowse and Props watched, standing side by side in the continuous drizzle, until at last Props tapped on her uncle's side.  "We gotta get the crystals in place!"

	"Right.  After you, lass."

	Belle slumped back, exhaling with relief.  She looked over at Elma—only for an obese figure to block her vision.  She looked up into Josho's serious face.

	"And the real Eagle Eye?  Is he..."  The stallion lingered, clearing his throat.  "Do you know if he is safe?"

	Belle bit her lip.  "I hope so..."



	Hoof after lavender hoof, Eagle Eye climbed up into the cockpit of the Noble Jury.  Once he reached the top, he leaned against the wall—stagnant—his face very pale and distant.

	Floydien sat at the controls with Zaid leaning on the back of the elk's chair.  Outside, Stratopolis reeled and pivoted beyond the ship's windshield.

	"Cheese and crackers, ya space moose!  How can you control this thing so well?"

	"Nancy knows when she's in the grip of her lover."

	"So you're saying that the reason I could only fly us in useless circles is 'cuz I suck at foreplay?"

	"Annoying boomer sucks at many things.  Floydien is too busy to make a list."

	"Now that's just a lazy excuse—even for me."

	Lightning flashed, piercing the murky heavens with strobes of bright blue illumination.  The clouds were getting darker, and it was obvious that the Sun—wherever it was beyond the depths of Stratopolis—was starting to fade away.

	"Eugh... it's getting worse out here!" Zaid exclaimed.

	"Boomer has a point of stating the obvious."

	"Goddess, I'm so glad only one of us speaks in third pony or else all of our collective heads would explode."

	"Enough with the gas gas and help Floydien find the others."

	"Where else is there to go?!"  Zaid pointed over Floydien's sparkling antlers.  "There's that bigass building in the center where we dropped off Rainbow Dash and the others!"

	"Floydien can hardly see through this mess mess.  Is annoying boomer sure they would still be there?"

	Eagle Eye lethargically spoke up, "I'd go searching over there."

	Zaid spun around.  "Huh?"  He blinked.  "Over where?"

	Eagle pointed with a limp hoof, barely tilting his head up.  "Where the changelings are fleeing from."

	Floydien leaned forward in his seat.  "For the love all that glimmer spits..."

	Looming ahead, floating a reasonable space from the central structure, was a platform engulfed in rain clouds.  A patch of shape-shifters flew from the sight, flitting away into the dense murk above.

	"Reckon it's worth checking out," Zaid said.  He turned back to Eagle Eye with a smile.  "How'd you spot that, anyway?"

	"You do remember my name, right?" the unicorn muttered.

	"How could I forget?  It's so marketable."  Zaid squinted.  "You okay, buddy?  How's Ebon?"

	"Fine."  Eagle Eye looked up.  He gave a tender smile.  "We're b-both fine..."
		//------------------------------//
		// As Above, Then So Below		//------------------------------//

	"Rainbow Dash!  Watch it!" Pilate stammered, stumbling after her.

	"Warn them!" Rainbow Dash exclaimed.  "Not me!"  That said, she gnashed her teeth against the hilt of the Sword of Solstice and charged further down the tunnel.  As she did so, she swung the blade to the left and right in heated, golden sweeps.  Each lunge forced the purple slime further and further back from her presence.  Steam billowed from the layers of muck as if the dreaded slime positively melted from the presence of the blade.  "Grnnghhh--It's like mowing the lawn in Tartarus!"

	Panting, Pilate turned around and aimed his helm towards the exit behind them.  All of the changelings were gone, and his ears echoed with the pounding salvos of Rainbow's sword-swinging charge.  "The shapeshifters..."  He gulped.  "They've all vanished."

	"Grnngh... that's a g-good thing..."  Rainbow swung and swung.

	"Is it possible that you reached all of them?" Pilate remarked.  "Every single one?"

	"Mrmmff... well... every one around here," Rainbow panted.  "I'll bet you a daisy sandwich that Queen Criminal is still chilling all the way in Val Roa, untouched."

	"Then... then perhaps the change is temporary?"

	"I dunno.  I hope not."

	"So many shape-shifters... and you affected a good bulk of them at once.  I wonder if that includes many of them east of here--"

	"Y'know, Pilate, th-this spelunking would be a lot easier if I had your help in the here-and-now."

	"What's to h-help?!" He spun to face her, his muzzle scrunched beneath the helm.  "You seem to have a firm grip on things--"

	Right as he said that, a body emerged from the slime puddles to his right.

	Rainbow spun with a gasp.  "Behind you!"

	"Gah!"  Pilate snapped to it, swinging his Lounge staff in time to uppercut the approaching pegasus.

	Rainbow Dash promptly slid in with a downswing of the Sword of Solstice.  In a blink, the creature dissolved, its muck evaporating along with its entrails.

	PIlate shuddered, stumbling back a step and a half.  "Great Sp-Spark!  It came out of nowhere!"

	"Yes, well, nowhere happens to be the place we're headed," Rainbow said between strained breaths.  "I'm gonna need your one hundred and ten percent, buddy."

	"Sorry, it's just that--"

	"Out of your element?"  Rainbow swung to take out another lunging zombie.  Thwack!

	"Yes.  I must agree, an abysmal charge into the heart of a slimy undead coven isn't exactly my usual afternoon activity."

	"Well, live and learn, Pilate.  Here's something you can weave stories about to your smexical striped grandfoals."

	"How in Spark's name did Hurricane even fight her way to the control room?"

	"That's a darn good question.  Something tells me you and I are about to find out."  Rainbow Dash hoofed the sword over to Pilate.  "Here.  Hold this."

	"M-me?!"  Pilate tucked his staff away and nervously gripped the golden sword.  "But... b-but what about you?!"

	"I'm going to be doing the awesome part."  She gripped Pilate's shoulders from behind.  "There's no time to be delicate about this.  Time isn't exactly batting for our team at the moment."

	Pilate gulped.  "Rainbow, are you sure we're cut out for doing this on our lonesome?"

	"Dude... a mare carrying a blind zebra with blood-vision and carrying a burning golden sword?"  Rainbow's flapping wings took them both off the ground.  "There's no other way to do this.  Now--whatever you do--don't drop the darn thing!"

	"I swear, Rainbow, you have too much faith in--"  Pilate gasped as the two blurred ahead on Rainbow's gliding feathers.  "--meeeeeeeeee!"

	"Less doubting and more zombie slashing!"  As Rainbow shouted, the two mercilessly carved their way down the tunnel and towards the pit below.  The sheer heat and aura of the Sword of Solstice in Pilate's grasp caused a continuous swath of granite to be cleared through the sea of purple muck, and despite the floundering undead pony or two, there was no sign that the bubbling substance was about to coagulate back together anytime soon.  "Thatta zebra!  We're going for the gold!"

	"If you insist!"  And the two ducked down beyond the light from the outside world.

	Half a minute passed...

	A figure slinked down into the doorframe of the Urohringr passage.  Carefully navigating the trench through the muck that the two equines had carved, the shadow scurried on four limbs, swiftly making its way to the pit's edge.  Once there, it paused to survey the drop, swishing a reptilian tail left and right before ultimately plunging with wild abandon.
		//------------------------------//
		// Take Off or Shove Off		//------------------------------//

	With bright spurts of crimson manaflare, three cloaked figures descended on a temple floating along the far side of the maelstrom.  Two landed nimbly while a third collapsed, panting through his silver mask.

	"Do not embrace weakness, brother," one of the standing figures said to the one on the ground.  "Razzar needs our unwavering courage.  Especially now." 

	The third figure stood up on wobbly knees.  "Praise Quezaat... I did not think our packs would have the fuel for that last trip."

	"It matters little.  This place presents new danger.  We need air superiority again."

	One figure spoke into his wrist communicator.  "Vaughan, we have arrived, brother.  Razzar remains on the central structure.  We need to rendezvous with him as soon as possible."

	Silence... save for the constant hush of rain.

	"Vaughan.  Come in, brother.  Are you there?

	"We landed on the right platform, did we not?  Shouldn't the ship be here?"

	"And it is," another said, gesturing past a throng of granite columns.  "Look."  The three masked reptiles gazed upon the glossy, bulbously shape vessel parked amidst the debris.  "It lies dormant."

	"As Razzar commands it."

	"I mean all of its lights are off.  I detect no power from within the vessel whatsoever."

	"Perhaps it is for the best."  One Lounge member trotted forward, approaching the starboard side of the vessel.  "Those vicious creatures are out there, and unnatural lights might attract them."

	"All the better for us to take off and assist in our brother in need."

	"I whole-heartedly agree.  Vaughan!" One figure snarled into his communicator.  "Show yourself!  This is urgent!

	POW!  A stream of crimson energy flew in from behind, ricocheting off the Lounge's wrist and disentigrating his communicator.

	"Aaugh!"

	The other two spun, unholstering their weapons—

	P-POW!  A figure squatting in the shadows fired a manarifle again.

	One reptile was knocked back to the ground while the other had his weapon melted within a blink.  He hissed in pain, being forced to drop the pistol.

	"How good of you breeders to finally join me," the figure from the shadow droned.

	The naga on the ground sat up with a rattling mask.  "Vaughan?!  Is that you, brother?!"

	"No, brother.  And yet... yes..."  The figure stepped forward and peeled its mask off.  Roarke's scowling face glared at them.  Moisture clung to her eye-lenses as she said, "Our romp through the clouds is over.  However, I need you for one last task."

	"One last task...?

	Another reptile shook his fist and snarled. "We will not follow the rules of a scale-less pony—"  An energy blast burned the hood off his cloak.  He shrieked with a shrill breath and struggled to cover his exposed scales.

	"Quite frankly, I don't need all three of you alive.  So don't tempt me anymore than you already have..."  Roarke cocked her rifle.  "Razzar's stayed behind where the monsters are spawning, yes?"

	The other two naga slowly, slowly nodded.

	"Somehow, I'm not surprised."  She tapped a button at the waist of her cloak.

	With swirling bands of amber light, the Lounge's skystone ship came alive.  Its forward dome rolled back, exposing the interior platform and the entrance beyond.

	"Get on board," Roarke grunted, waving with her rifle.  "Our business in Stratopolis isn't over."

	While two naga nervously scampered on board, the third who struggled with his hood glanced down to scowl at the bounty hunter.  "Quezaat frowns on you for this deception, Vaughan."

	"The name is Roarke Most Rare," she grunted, training the rifle's sight on his chest.  "If you like, I'll carve that into your corpse's chest, and we'll see how happy that makes your bashful lizard god."



	"Again!" Prowse shouted.

	"Nnngh!"  Props yanked a lever along the far end of the Tarkington's engine room.

	The mana crystals on the center dais pulsed with purple light, fluctuated, and faded.  All was dark once more in the center of the rain-pelted ship.

	"Bollocks!" Prowse spat, hobbling over on his prosthetic.  "I don't bloody understand!  The crystals are fully charged!  They should provide plenty of power!"

	"Uhhhh..."  Props glanced over nervously.  "Unky Prowsy?"

	"Thrust the lever again!  Better yet!  Let me do it—"  He moved to shove her out of the way.

	But Props shoved back.  "Hey!  Cool your sexy head!"

	"We c-can't fail now!" Prowse spat.  "I promised Aatxe that I'd fly the survivors to safety on this hunk-o-junk!  I won't let the lad down!"

	"And you're not gonna!" Props slid her goggles up and gazed at his eyes.  "We just gotta go about it more gently, is all!"

	"Say what, lass?!"

	She smiled.  "I know it sounds crazy, especially for you, Unky Prowsy, but there's a lot to be said about delicate engine work."

	Prowse squinted at her.  "Who are you and what have you done with my niece?"

	"Shhhh..."  She tapped his stubbly chin and backtrotted to the lever array.  "Just watch!"  Taking a deep breath, she gripped the lever, counted down to herself, and gave it a yank.

	Sparks flew.  The crystals fluctuated once more, their purple light intensifying and fading within seconds.

	Before Prowse could say anything, Props was diving across the room, sliding to a stop beneath the center dais.  Using her teeth, she yanked a panel open, reached in, and pulled out a cluster of wires.  She detached a few of them, sweating from the supremely intricate work.

	Gradually, the manacrystals stopped dimming.  The mana conduits weren't overloading this time.  Finally, as the light became a constant glow, Props reattached the wires with a splash of tiny sparks.  Holding her breath, she scurried back over to the wall, retracted the lever, then pulled it back halfway.

	Whirrrrrrrrr-Crk-Crk-Crk-VRMMMMMM!!!

	The lights of every console flashed on throughout the ship.  The Tarkington came to life, its engine maintaining a constant hum.

	"Bloody hell..."  Prowse grinned wide.  "Where'd you learn to operate like that!"

	Props hopped up with a bright smile.  "Nancy Jane's smile!"

	"I beg your pardon?"

	"Uhm..."  Props rubbed one leg with another, blushing.  "It's a long story."  She gulped.  "And most times a sweaty one."

	"Hey Blondie!"  From outside, Josho's voice could be heard shouting, "Are we a go, yet?!"

	"Rest your bulging flank, ya tyke!" Prowse hollered in Props' place.  "We still gotta test the main control system—"

	"Buck that!  It's now or never!"

	"Look, ya trigger happy buffoon!  You can't rush this—"

	"A new wave of those freaks is coming!  Our window has come and gone!"

	To that, Props gasped with wide, glistening eyes.
		//------------------------------//
		// At the Speed of Spit		//------------------------------//

	While Seclorum and Arcshod continued filing distressed ponies on board the Tarkington, Josho rushed towards the platform's edge, armed with his shotgun.  He stared through the rainwater with twitching eyes, spotting a dense field of undead creatures swooping down from a higher elevation.

	Bellesmith lingered near the airship's entrance along with Elma.  "Is it a large group of them?!"

	"'Large' doesn't even begin to describe it," Josho said with an inward snarl.  He squatted behind an overturned chunk of debris and aimed his shotgun high.  "I think I can take a good number of them out, but the wave's too thick.  They'll overrun me in seconds."

	"Then we'll drag Prowse out!" Seclorum exclaimed.  "His weapon can level out a whole column of them!  Easily!"

	"Just tell Props to stick to the engine!  More than anything, we gotta get off this rock in order to—"

	"Blessed Spark!"  Belle shrieked.  "Josho, look!"

	"Huh?!  I'm looking already!"

	"No no no!"  Belle seethed, pointing towards the other edge of the temple.  "Three o'clock!  Down low!"

	Josho swiveled to look.  He did a double-take.  Another wave of undead pegasi were zooming in from a completely different altitude.  "Ledo covered in chocolate..."

	"It's even bigger than the other group!" Belle exclaimed.

	"Don't look now," Seclorum grumbled, glancing towards the rear of the temple.  Two small pockets of pegasi flew in from rain-soaked clouds.  "But they've got the drop on us from behind too."

	"Xon..." Arcshod exhaled.

	"We... we can still do this," Josho stammered, fidgeting in place.  "Arcshod..."  He spun with a frown.  "Arcshod, ya tattooed elephant!  Get your Queen out!  Between her and Prowse—"

	"It's too late!" Belle winced, clinging hard to Elma as she cowered against the Tarkington's hull.  "They're here!"

	Seclorum whipped out his crossbow—only to blink stupidly at the complete lack of crossbolts.  "...well, it was a good run."

	"Dammit..."  Josho popped out from hiding, spinning about in a literal circle as he trained his shotgun from one group to another.  "Dammit, it can't end like this!  We were almost free!"

	The shrieking cries of the winged ponies broke through the thunder as they descended on the temple from all sides.

	Belle closed her eyes, gnashing her teeth.  "I'll love you always, Pilate—"

	With a banshee wail, the first wave of pegasi soared in... only to dissolve to a pulp from a bright flash of mana.

	Josho's eyes twitched.  Suddenly, from the left, a massive vessel emerged through the rain clouds on rumbling engines.  Lightning flashed, illuminating the majestic hull of the Noble Jury as it wedged itself between the temple and the incoming waves of undead.  The ship twirled to a stop like a sled grinding against gray snow.  Standing on the open rainswept deck was Floydien, and he was in the process of unleashing wave after wave of furious mana from his antlers.

	"Spit out your own organs, you flying boomer burps!" the elk howled, eliminating half-a-dozen creatures in a single discharge.  "Unbirth your cruddy selves to ash ash!"

	Josho ducked as an errant beam of energy branched off the latest volley and missed his horn by a hair.  "Dammit, Floydien, you beautiful beautiful manure machine!"

	"Floydien?!" Seclorum sputtered as he and Arcshod squatted to the side.  "What in the Hell is that thing?!"

	"Beastly sex with a red nose!  That's what!" Josho said with a wicked sneer.  He heard shrieks from behind, spun about, and aimed his shotgun at a rushing wave of undead.

	A metal steam pipe flew down from the sky and impacted the skulls of two pegasi.

	Josho gasped, looking up as a lavender shape leapt from the Noble Jury's deck.  Eagle Eye plunged through the rain, his silhouette showing in a streak of lightning.  "Yaaaaaaaugh!"  He came down, crushing his way through another pegasus with a square metal crate lid for a shield.  Immediately hopping up, he spun and uppercutted another creature with a levitating pipe-swing, shattering the attack in seconds.

	"Eagle Eye!" Josho growled out the side of his muzzle.  He spun and fired into a wave of pegasi with his shotgun while Floydien single-hoofedly covered the other side.  "You're alive!  I could kiss you!"

	"You're even fatter when you lie," Eagle hissed before deflecting the charge of another monster.  "Hrnnnngh—Raugh!"  He knocked the creature back.

	Josho exploded its head all over the temple's edge and stood—heaving—by Eagle's side as they faced the next wave.  "Seriously, seeing you alive just gave me a second wind."

	"Good..."  Eagle shook the rain out of his soaked mane and eyed the vulture-circles of enemies.  "Then don't break it."

	"If you're down here and Floydien's doing the fireworks show on the top deck..."  Josho glanced up at the rain-slick windshield of the hovering ship.  "...then who in the heck is piloting the thing?"

	"Zaid."

	"Zaid?!"  Josho gnashed his teeth.  "Great Ledo, it is the apocalypse."

	"Somepony you know, old friend?" Seclorum shouted.

	"Secchy, I'd like you to meet my daughter."

	"H-huh?!"  Eagle Eye blinked awkwardly.

	"EE!" Belle pointed with a shout.  "For Spark's sake—"

	"Darn it!" Eagle Eye spun and deflected a zombie's dive at the last second.  "Grrnnngh!"

	"Hah hah hah hah!" Josho cackled, wide eyed.  "I think we have what it takes now!"

	"Don't spit all over it!" Floydien howled from the top deck.  He blasted another wave of winged bogeys and spun to frown at Bellesmith.  "You!  Beloved of stripe-stripes!  Get your flank Nancywise!  On the tick!"

	"R-right..."  Belle nodded with a nervous shudder.  "Come on, Elma..."
		//------------------------------//
		// Regarding the Failure to Launch		//------------------------------//

	"I got it..."  Props stammered, her goggles reflecting the bright glow of the manacrystal in its new power housing.  "I th-think I got it!"

	"Brill, Propsicle!" Prowse shouted above the noise of the Tarkington's rumbling engine.  "Just in the nick of time too!"

	"We gotta get this thing into the air!"  Props flinced at the dull reverberation of pegasus bodies colliding with the outer hull.  "These survivors have spent enough time freaking out!"

	"Right!  Let me just adjust the auxiliary output—"

	"Nnnngh!"  Props shoved the stallion across the room with a remarkable show of strength.  The blonde mare snarled into his face.  "You get your handsome keister to the cockpit! I have things taken care of here!"

	"But... but..."

	"Do it now or else I'll bolt your remaining legs to the bulkheads!"  She blinked, suddenly blushing.  "Uhm... please?"

	Prowse blinked, then smiled awkwardly.  "Yes, ma'am."  He spun and hobbled out the engine room.  Threading through seated and trembling ponies, Prowse galloped the full length of the Tarkington.  "Look out!  Coming through!  Move your bloomin' arses!"  He breezed past Lasairfion and her subjects, a cluster of Ledomaritans, and finally landed in the ship's one-seat cockpit at the far end.  "Time to take to the skies, lasses and laddies!"  He flipped several instruments and pulled twin levers, powering up the rear thrusters of the craft.  Tilting his head back, he shouted over his shoulder.  "Anypony with the bollocks to be fighting those freaks outside..."



	"...now is an awfully good time to give it a rest and throw yourself on board!"  Prowse's voice echoed through the open doorframe.  "We're kissing this temple good bye!"

	"That's our ride, Arcshod!"  Seclorum shouted above the criss-crossing projectiles and energy blasts.  "All aboard who's coming aboard!"

	"Dreit dreit..."  Arcshod smashed one last pegasus' skull in with a tossed chunk of granite.  Sweating, he spun and galloped on heavy hooves towards the Tarkington's door.  Seclorum followed after him, trotting backwards.  "Josho?!  Old stallion?!  You coming?"

	"Sorry, Secchy," Josho grunted as he reloaded his shotgun and shuffled towards the Noble Jury.  "But there's a new mistress in my life!  And her name's Nancy!"

	"You could at least be subtle about it," Eagle Eye stammered while fending off a pegasus with his metal shield replacement.

	"And you could learn to shriek less."

	"Huh?  Aaaaaaiiieeeee!" Eagle Eye squealed like a little filly as he was picked up in Josho's telekinetic field and tossed onto the Noble Jury.

	"Go time, ya space elk!"  Josho hollered as he threw his heavy self after Eagle Eye and abandoned the temple.  "Vacation's over!"

	"You hear that, hollow boomer?!" Floydien shouted to the cockpit as he fended off a retaliating wave of undead.  "Just like Floydien showed you!  Drift drift and glimmer zoom!"



	"Aye, your red-nosedness!"  Zaid grinned from ear to ear as he yanked at the Noble Jury's controls.  Behind him, Floydien, Eagle Eye, and Josho gripped to the top deck as he veered the ship away from the temple in a turbulent hover.  "Props and the other ponies on board the sausagemobile had better catch up, though!"

	"She'll get them into the air!" Eagle Eye's voice sputtered into the hurricane winds.  "They're in the best possible hooves!"

	"The sexiest too, depending on whose team you're rooting for!"  Zaid turned around and shouted down the crawlspace.  "Belle, how're you doing down there, girl?!"

	"Just fine, Zaid...!"



	Bellesmith crawled down the last rung of the ladder while Elma clung to her back.  She gulped and continued, "Just keep doing what you're doing!"

	Her eyes remained locked on the observation room.  Gently, she laid Elma down on the floor within the doorframe and rushed forward.  She reached her hooves into a hammock and scooped Kera out.  Her eyes instantly teared up as she leaned in and nuzzled the dormant child.  With a hissing inhale, she broke into a fragile smile, caressing the filly's mane.

	"You're so brave, Kera.  I'm sorry.  All this time... all the things I did..." She rubbed her cheek against the child's.  "I'm sorry.  Things will be different.  I promise.  You'll..."  She sniffled, smiling painfully.  "You'll get to see your daddy again.  I can guarantee it.  I can..."

	Her chestnut eyes drifted up.  She stared out the shattered observation room window with a moist blink.

	Outside and below, the Tarkington hadn't lifted off.  It continued lying on its side atop the temple, swarmed by zombie pegasi.  Its engines flickered and sputtered, but the vessel didn't move an inch.

	"Why hasn't it taken off yet...?" Bellesmith murmured.



	"Rainbow, c-could you slow down a little—?!"

	"No can do, buddy!"  Rainbow hissed as she squeezed the two of them through the tunnel at the bottom of the pit.  The two zoomed past the petrified plant in the chamber full of vines and dripping muck.  "This city's got a one-way ticket to oblivion and you and me are the sole conductors!"

	"Look out, Rainbow!" Pilate exclaimed, his helm buzzing.  "Above us—"

	"I see it!" Rainbow said, then spun upside down so that the zebra was aimed at the dropping goo.  "Sword out!"

	"Ah—Spark!"  Pilate winced, nervously slash-slashing the golden weapon left and right.  Thanks to the way Rainbow positioned him, he successfully evaporated the muck before it could cascade over them.

	"Good job!  But the icky part is coming up next!"

	"H-huh?!" He tilted his head upside down and gazed at the narrow corridor ahead.  "Oh, heavens, no..."

	Rainbow spotted gurgling pegasi emerging from the gunk in her peripheral.  "We gotta make this quick.  Hold onto your stripes!"  Hooking her wings in opposite angles, she threw the two of them into a maddening spin.

	"Guhhhh!" Pilate focused entirely on gripping the Sword of Solstice.  Together, the two mimicked a fiery golden pinwheel as they soared into the curved, descending tunnel.  Like a drill, they burned and melted all of the purple slime that coated the dark, twisting stairwell.  Several agonizing seconds later, they emerged into the chamber where the hellish nightmare started.  Here, a virtual sea of purple goop awaited them, with several winged bodies leaping out and hissing.

	"Time for the main event!"  Rainbow Dash held her breath and spun a low orbit through the claustrophobic room, barely avoiding the ring of holes where more and more rivers of ooze fountained loose.  "Just slash anything that moves!  Unless, of course, it's rainbow colored and attached to me!"

	"Not... m-making... this any... easier!" Pilate sputtered between sword slashes.  One pegasus after another dissolved into ashen bits from the weapon's golden fury.  "Rainbow, we c-can't be doing this forever!"

	"Well, I sure can!"

	"I'm serious!  Our goal is the control room!" the zebra exclaimed, pointing at the center of the purple sea with his sword.  "Access to that was on the central dais—the one Razzar touched when he summoned this nightmare in the first place!"

	"Right.  And now we got the key to getting to that place unscathed!  Got it!"  Rainbow flipped, dodged two lunging pegasi, and came back around to the center of the room.  "Okie dokie lokie!  Let's make ourselves an island!"

	"And h-how do we do that?!"

	"I dunno.  Be awesome!  It works for me!"

	"Uhhhh..."

	Rainbow panted, glancing out her peripheral vision as shadows closed in on all sides.  "Now or never, robo-zebra!"

	"Grrrr-Raaaaaaaugh!"  Pilate lunged forward in her grasp, striking the sword down so that it stabbed half of its length into the quivering muck.  Rivulets of energy fountained outward from the stabbing point.  The purple ooze dissovled to ashen flakes, like dead skin.  Emerging through the pool was a raised platform with a cylindrical podium and a lever.  Within seconds, the Sword of Solstice had burned away enough slime to allow standing room.

	"Perfect!  You're the stallion of the hour!"  With that said, Rainbow dropped Pilate.

	"Gaaah!"  The stallion awkwardly stumbled to a stop, his sweat-slick back braced against the cylinder.  Rainbow flew past him in a prismatic streak, illuminated by her pendant.

	"The sword!  Alley-oop!"  She stretched her hooves out.

	Without a second thought, Pilate tossed the blade towards the convergence of red-and-black crosshatches that signified her figure.

	She caught the blade's hilt in her teeth and immediately spiraled around in her circular orbit. "Nnnngh-ghhhh!"  A wider space in the floor was melted away, giving Pilate more breathing room.  Rainbow spat the sword out and gripped it in the crooks of both hooves.  "Okay!  You do your awesome skystone voodoo while I hold off all this crud!"

	"I... I'm not entirely sure how!"

	"Gnnngh!  Y-you mean Roarke never told you?!"

	"She told me what to do once we got to the control room!  But opening the last door to it—"

	"Just think at something!  You're good at the thinking!  Me?"  Rainbow continued hacking and slashing at the muck.  "Grnnngh!  I'm a bit busy with pulverising!"

	"Right!  Just hang on!"  Pilate squirmed, ultimately gripping the lever on the center cylinder and struggling with it.  "Nnnngh... I... I-I got this!"

	"Dang straight, you do!"  Rainbow spun and slashed a pegasus down the center before the slime-coated thing had a chance to pounce on the both of them.  "Hey, pretties!  How about a taste of summer?!  Yaaaugh!"



	"I don't get it..."  Zaid sputtered out the side of his muzzle as he flew a slow orbit around the temple.  His eyes remained glued on the Tarkington beyond the Noble Jury's windshield.  "Why aren't they going zoom-zoom?"

	"Don't spit like Floydien in the company of Nancy," the elk in question said as he marched up and practically threw Zaid out the seat with one cloven hoof.  "Everything gold and gliding, yes yes yes?"

	"No no no!"  Zaid picked himself off the floor and pointed out the windshield.  "They're stuck like ducks in muck!"

	"Poetic," Josho grunted as he and Eagle Eye marched inside the cockpit from the wet deck outside.  "For real, though, what gives?"

	"Isn't Props on board, helping them?" Eagle Eye squeaked, breathless.

	"They must be having trouble," Josho mumbled.  "Poor Aatxe's ship hasn't flown in years.  Who's to know how much dust is crammed up that vessel's plot."

	"We g-gotta help them!" Eagle stammered.

	"How?"  Josho frowned.  "They've got all the juice and juju they could possibly need!"

	"Well, Floydien thinks the glimmer is not enough..."

	"Come on... come on, blondie," Zaid shook his hooves, biting his lip in tension.



	"Propsicle?!"  Prowse yanked and yanked at the controls of the Tarkington.  The engines of the ship sputtered and roared and sputtered again, sending dull reverberations down the body of the dormant craft.  Behind the pilot's seat, several survivors murmured and trembled in panic.  "Propsicle, now would be a good time, lass!"

	Props' voice shouted down the long corridor from the engine room.  "I'm giving her all she's got!  But she won't take off!"

	Arcshod sweatily stammered, "V'lanna'siul messul nessa'keen thiul spaana'keem!"

	Seclorum galloped past him.  "The sound's coming from the rear!"  He leaned against the back of Prowse's pilot's chair.  "It's gotta be the take-off thrusters.  After all these years, they must be burnt out."

	"If that's the case, then we can't take off, no matter how much raw power my niece channels into the manacircuits."

	"So what do we do?" Seclorum sputtered.

	Prowse looked over his shoulder at him and the other ponies.  "Hypothetically, unicorn magic can set off the thrusters with a spark, but..."

	"Lemme guess..."  Seclorum's eyes narrowed.  "That's gotta be done on the outside."

	Prowse bit his lip.

	Seclorum took a deep, deep breath.  "Well, it's not like I was going to live forever."

	"Huh?" Prowse blinked.

	Seclorum turned and gestured towards the door.  "Somepony open it up again!  I feel like going for a stroll—"

	"Grnnngh!"  Arcshod slapped Seclorum's hoof away and glared the stallion down.  "Haak'tin!  N'mberaat siul rekka siulen drenn'adrentte!"

	"Love you to, ya big lug," Seclorum droned, then brushed past him.  "But this has gotta be done.  It's not like we have any more miracles to rely on—"

	Just then, the entire ship shook.  Everypony gasped—including Seclorum—as the vessel jolted forward, then jolted forward again.  Even Lasairfion blinked with wide-eyed surprise.

	"What in the bloody hell...?!" Prowse stammered.

	Props' voice rang through the ship.  "We're moving!  We're taking off!"

	"Yeah... but..."  Seclorum spun towards one of the many portholes, squinting at the gray world outside.  "How...?"



	"They're moving!"  Eagle Eye hopped up and down with a bright smile.  "They're moving they're moving they're moving!"

	"What in the spit spit...?" Floydien's red eyes twitched.

	"Did blondie pull through?" Josho asked.

	Zaid smirked wide and pointed out the Noble Jury's windshield.  "I'll give ya six little hints."

	Everypony craned their necks to see.  At the rear of the Tarkington, a half-dozen black bodies were pressed against the stern.  With buzzing dragonfly wings, changelings heaved and heaved, shoving the vessel forward until it slipped clear of the temple.  Once airborne, the thrusters sputtered to life—glowing a hot orange.  The ship raised up, and several more changelings flew in from the misty clouds, giving the vessel extra lift as its engines adjusted to the slow, cruising flight.



	Inside the Tarkington, Seclorum stepped slowly back from one porthole.

	Through the glass panel, a pair of changelings flew parallel to the ship.  One of them glanced over, making eye contact with the former enforcer.  In a flash of green light, Aatxe's face stared, smiled, then reverted back to an insectoid slate.  The two changelings veered off, joining a dense formation that dodged and outran the rampant flocks of undead also populating the clouds of Stratopolis.

	For the time being, the Tarkington was in flight... and safe.  Several ponies exhaled and cooed with relief, hugging each other and chuckling with tears of joy.  A few of them clapped their hooves against the bulkheads in subtle applause.

	Arcshod exhaled heavily, turning to smile at his equally relieved Queen.  Props' cheering voice could be heard from the engine room in the back.

	Prowse smirked, gripping the controls with a hoof and a prosthetic limb, guiding it alongside the Noble Jury in a smoothe hover.  He glanced once over his shoulder, directing his voice at Seclorum.  "What do you think about shape shifters now, eh, laddie?"

	Seclorum shuddered, falling back on his haunches.  "Eh... they're still flank-fuggly..."  A small smile.
		//------------------------------//
		// Oh Please, Not This Again		//------------------------------//

	Bellesmith shuddered with relief as she stared out the open windows of the Observation Room.  She saw the Tarkington take off from the temple where it had previously been stranded.  The vessel reeled about, gliding sideways through the clouds until it ascended to a position along the Noble Jury's side.

	The mare leaned in, nuzzling Kera's green, rain-slicked mane.  She heard a clatter of hooves and glanced behind her.

	Zaid climbed down the crawlspace and landed in the doorframe beside Elma. He saw Belle and stood in place.

	The mare smiled tearfully.  She squeezed Kera in her grasp and murmured, "Thank you... thank you for keeping her safe..."

	"Hey..."  Zaid shrugged with a smirk.  He spoke above the noisy wind, "I have respect for little bundles of cuddle drool, seeing as I tend to be one myself from time to time, especially when I dream of grilled cheese—" He bumped into a dazed changeling and glanced down at it.  "Hello!" He flinched, blinking.  "And who might you be when you're at home?"

	"Zaid, that's... uh..."  Belle gulped.  "That's Elma Boreal."

	"Yeah, no shit?" Zaid smiled.  He turned.  He looked past Belle, and his face paled.  "Oh shit..."

	"...?"  Belle turned and looked directly into the ooze-spitting maw of a zombie pegasus.  She fell back with a shriek, clutching Kera to her fuzzy chest.

	The creature had wedged itself midway through the bars of the shattered observation window.  What's more, it wasn't alone.  Two more had flown up from the lower clouds and were struggling to squeeze through the circular metal frame.  Their bones crunched and their flesh peeled as they wriggled their way further and further into the Noble Jury's interior.  Soon, feathers and puddles of lavender muck rolled onto the lower bulkheads.  All the while, more and more undead buzzed around the windy air immediately outside the ship's bow.

	"Th-they must have swarmed us while the Tarkington took off!" Belle exclaimed.  She scampered to her hooves with Kera in her grasp and backtrotted to the doorframe.  "Blessed Spark, I had n-no idea they could be so quiet!"

	"Who's judging them?!" Zaid exclaimed.  "Just run and get yourself to the rear of the ship!"  He called up the crawlspace.  "Eagle!  Josho!  We have a problem!"

	Belle's eyes were locked on the ooze pooling across the floor of the observation room.  "Oh no... oh no no no no no no no!"

	"What is it?!"

	"It's too late!" She grimaced.  "Their essence has invaded the Jury!  They'll be spawning from the inside now!"

	"The heck do you mean?"  As Zaid saw that, he heard a sickening crunch noise—like cockroach shells breaking in the night—and he turned to see a slimy equine shape emerging from an impossibly thin pool of muck.  "Ohhhhhhhhh-ho-ho-ho-ho that is the ickest!"

	Josho descended the crawlspace, followed by Eagle Eye.  "Ledo fluff it, Zaid, what's with all the commotion—whoah dayum!"

	"How?!" Eagle's voice cracked as he shivered against the doorframe, pupils twitching.  "How did they even?!"

	"Never mind how!"  Belle shouted, gazing wide-eyed at the others.  "We gotta get them out before they infect the whole ship!"

	"I thought you said it was too late!" Zaid said.

	"We have to do something!"

	"EE...?"  Josho rushed forward.

	"Oh jeez..."  Eagle scampered by Josho's side.  "Oh jeez oh jeez oh jeez..."

	"Let's try combining our magic fields," Josho snarled, already illuminating his horn and aiming it at the purple-stained window.  "Maybe we can sweep all the gunk out."

	Eagle gulped, glowing his horn as well.  "You really think so?"

	"No.  But let's try it anyways."

	"What in the spit is going on down there?!" Floydien's voice hollered.

	"Uhhhh... just a sec, sexy!"  Zaid spun and kicked-kicked-kicked at a hammock's support beam on the starboard side.  "Gnnngh!"  Crack!  He snapped the long bar loose and gripped it in the crook of one hoof.  "You keep doing your voodoo, dudes!"  He rushed forward and started stabbing at the necks and muzzles of the hissing pegasi.  "I'll hold the mouth breathers back in the meantime!"

	"Zaid, d-don't!" Belle winced.  "For Spark's sake!  They'll reel you in!  Don't let them touch you!  Nnnngh!"  Nostrils flaring, she gently laid Kera down besides Elma, yanked another bar loose from where Zaid had kicked the bulkhead, and rushed to his side.  "Here!  I'll give you cover!"

	"Could r-really use your David Clopperfield trick right about now, g-guys!" Zaid sputtered.

	"Working on it..." Josho hissed with a sweating face.

	"Your leyline is breaking, old stallion," Eagle Eye stammered.  "You have to concentrate better!"

	"You're the one with the weak field!  I'm giving it my all!"

	"Dudes, this isn't a contest!"

	"Zaid!  Your left side!"

	"I see it!  Guhh!  If only Khao could see me now, fighting licorice monsters with a pole!"

	"There're more of them flying up!"

	"For Spark's sake, concentrate!"

	"I'm trying!"

	"Floydien!  Keep her steady, for the love of all that's holy!"

	Meanwhile, Elma stared sideways, her face lying against the floor.  She blinked, her green eyes twitching as she watched the panicked scene unfold.  Despite the best efforts of the Jurists, the purple muck crept further and further into the Observation Room, consuming the hull of the ship from the inside out at a dramatic rate.

	Just then, green columns of steam billowed from the corners of Elma's optics.  She gasped, her face gaining tattoos and losing them in a blink.  Biting her lip, she rolled over, staring at Kera's dormant figure.

	The filly lay curled in a fetal position, her eyes forever gazing into some unseen abyss.  The cries and struggles of her closest companions fell on deaf ears.

	Elma's breaths came in short bursts.  She slowly reached a hoof out, caressing the foal's tattooed chin.  Belle's voice hollered once more, and the changeling flinched, glancing over at the dramatic struggle while Josho and Eagle Eye combined their magical telekineses.





	"Grrgggh!"  Rainbow Dash spun, effectively lopping off the skulls of three pegasi with a swing of the Sword of Solstice.  With a spare moment to breathe, she hovered in place, spitting the hilt of the sword out of her mouth so she could grip the thing in two hooves.  "Pilate, now would be a good time to start deus ex machining."

	"I've... b-been trying... to pull this lever every w-way I can!" The zebra sputtered, yanking hard on the device located at the top of the dank room's central cylinder.  "I refuse to believe that all it can d-do is summon the flying dead!"

	"You sure you're trying everything?"

	"Yes, Rainbow, confound it!"  Pilate snarled as shadows swam over him and the skystone fastened to his back.  "I swear, this is a dead end!"

	"Haaaugh!"  Rainbow skewered a shrieking pegasus and flung it back to the ooze-stained walls.  She turned back to him, panting.  "Okay, so maybe you're putting too much thought into it!"

	"Point being?!"

	"Duh.  You're a stallion."  She said, dodging a dollop of purple slime from the ceiling.  "Be bone-headed for once!"

	Pilate blinked, then blinked again.  "...Haaaaaaaaaaaugh!"  He thrusted his skull forward.  The helm head-butted the lever, snapping it down along the hinge of its fulcrum.  Clank!  Vrmmmmmmmm!  The cylinder rotated and sunk down into the center dais.  Suddenly, the circular floor where Pilate was situated sunk down one granite plank at a time until—at last—a twenty-foot wide platform lowered like an elevator into uncertain darkness.  "Uhmmm..."

	"Now that's the way to unthink!"  Rainbow grinned, then dove down towards the sinking platform.  "Step aside!  Quick!"

	"Gah!"  Pilate complied, stumbling.

	"Hnnnt!"  Rainbow stabbed the Sword of Solstice blade-first into the center of the lowering platform.

	An aura of blinding gold light emanated from the impact, melting away any residual slime clinging to the platform.  Even Pilate winced as his helm's sensors briefly fluctuated from the luminescent overload.

	When the pulse of light dimmed, the two found themselves descending a deep cylindrical shaft far below the dark heart of Stratopolis where the undead-fueling ooze originated.

	"So, where's that dang c-control room?" Rainbow stammered.

	"Rainbow, you feel that?"  Pilate panted as he stretched a hoof out.  He tilted his helm towards her.  "Air's rushing down with us—as if to fill a hollow space."  His muzzle curved slightly.  "I do believe the chamber Roarke spoke of awaits us!"

	"Well, neato keano.  Maybe we can take a photograph for her, since she sent us on a total death trip in the first place."

	"Rainbow, if it wasn't for her—"

	"I know, Pilate.  I get it.  This had to be done."  Rainbow glanced aside at the circular walls of granite sliding up past them.  "A part of me kinda wishes that I could have learned more before sending this place crashing."

	"If you ask me, Rainbow, the pegasi who ran this facility eons before Hurricane took over were supreme victims of curiosity and hubris.  No need for you to follow their exact—"  The zebra suddenly jerked, tilting his helm upwards.

	"What is it, boy?"

	"A body," Pilate muttered.  "Diving down swiftly."

	"More pegasi?"  Rainbow smirked and raised her sword, gazing upwards.  "Zombie sushi, coming right up—!"

	KAPOW!  A blast of yellow mana shot down and struck Rainbow.

	"Gaaugh!" the mare fell back with a splash of blood.  The Sword of Solstice clattered to the floor in the center of the lowering platform.

	"Rainbow!" Pilate reached for her—

	Fwooosh!  On a streak of amber rocket exhaust, a reptilian figure landed hard on the platform between Rainbow and Pilate.  Clank!  Razzar stood straight up, his joints tightening as he glared down at Pilate with a glinting mask.

	"The ride stops here, my little ponies..."
		//------------------------------//
		// It Boils Down To This		//------------------------------//

	"Bloody hell," Prowse murmured, his eyes widening.

	"Huh?"  Seclorum climbed forward along the turbulent interior of the Tarkington.  He leaned back against the pilot's chair.  "What is it?"

	"Take a gander for yourself."  Prowse pointed with his good hoof at the Noble Jury.  A cluster of writhing, purple figures clung to the ship's bow, a deck and a half below the cockpit.  "They must have latched on while nopony was looking."

	"Ah jeez..."  Seclorum winced.  "Josho, please tell me you can ward them off..."

	Props' voice rang down the corridor full of frazzled survivors.  "What is it?  Why aren't we accelerating yet?"

	"Lassie, don't look."  Prowse gulped.  "It's not a pretty sight."

	Props rushed up out of nowhere.  "What isn't?"  Upon first glance of the Noble Jury, her goggled eyes went wide and she held two hooves over a gasping muzzle.

	"Could we—perhaps—fly perpendicular to the craft and knock those creatures off?" Seclorum suggested.

	Prowse's jaw went tight.  "And risk infecting Aatxe's gift to us?"  He shook his head.  "I'm not fan of it either, boyo, but we can't damn the lives of all these ponies..."

	"Oh please..."  Props mewled out a quivering mouth as her goggles fogged up.  "Oh please oh please oh please..."



	"Got it!" Eagle Eye shouted.

	"Good!"  Josho gnashed his teeth, tilting his horn forward as he contributed to the petite stallion's magic field.  "Keep it together and let's flush these things out!"

	"After your lead!"

	"And... march!"  Josho stomped forward, joined by Eagle Eye.  Both stallions made their way to the shattered window of the Observation room, slowly shoving a solid wall of fluctuating telekinesis directly in front of them.

	By now, three undead pegasi had materialized between where the Jurists stood and the shattered window frame ahead.  While Josho's and Eagle's field was successfully mopping the purple gunk up, the zombified equines made things a hundred times more difficult, slashing and biting and thrashing at the magical field.  The energy rippled with each impact, threatening to snap at any second.

	"Come on, chestnut!" Zaid barked, shoving his metal rod through the field and knocking the monsters back as best as he could.  "Put on the pressure!  Defense!  Defense!"

	"I'm trying!" Belle yelped.  "I don't want to upset their magic field!"

	"Then d-don't even mention it!" Josho growled.  "Eagle, you're buckling!"

	"Stop marching so f-fast!"

	"I can't let up for one second!  These creatures—"

	"Another is h-hatching!" Zaid spat, eying a patch of purple where an equine figure emerged.

	"For Spark's sake..."

	"Get them to the window!  Get them to the window!"

	While this mayhem went on, Elma continue squatting by Kera's side.  She stared at the struggle ahead with weary eyes, but soon tilted her gaze until it fell on the dormant little foal below.  She knelt down, breathing lightly, her dark cheek just inches from nuzzling the filly.

	"It's just... so much..."  Her fanged mouth quivered.  The changeling's green slits morphed into chestnut eyes that teared.  "So much misery... so much pain..."  She brought a hoof down and caressed Kera's straight green mane.  After a few seconds, Elma looked at her own fetlock, spotting black and white stripes that traveled up her body.  In a blink, her black shell returned, and she shuddered.  "But the love is there too.  It's just buried..."

	Belle shrieked and fell back.  A creature lunged at the field, nearly breaking through.  Zaid rushed forward and smacked the zombie's head through the field, then turned to help Belle back up to her hooves.

	Elma stared at the mare.  She bit her lip and leaned down to nuzzle Kera.  "No child should remain separated from her mother."  She sniffled.  "Not so long as that mother is a good pony."  A stifled sob, and she brought both hooves to the sides of Kera's face, tilting her chin up until they stared each other—face to dazed face.  "Love may never belong to me... but it belongs to you."

	That said, Elma's eyes narrowed once more into green slits.  Energy fluctuated from within the changeling's body, erupting at the surface in random spurts of emerald flame.  At last, a translucent stream of energy could be seen bouncing between the two ponies.  Kera's ears twitched, and her mouth hung open.  Just as her purpils started to shrink, Elma jerked back with a wimpering sound.  She stared up at the ceiling as her forelimbs began trembling.

	"This isn't working!" Belle exclaimed, holding Zaid's body to support his swings of the metal pole.  "We gotta get Floydien down here or something!"  Panting, she glanced behind her flank.  "Maybe his mana discharge can—"  She instantly gasped.  "Elma!"

	"Ggnnngh-Auugh!"  Elma's head flew back.  In bursts of green flame, her body transformed into Golden Happenstance, then to Beau, then to Pilate, then to an oversized filly with fluctuating tattoos.  She slipped from her grip of Elma and fell back to the metal floor, reverting to a fetal-curled shapeshifter staring blankly into the ceiling with streams of green smoke wafting out of her wide eyes.

	"Elma, no!" Belle hollered, galloping straight towards her.  She slid on her knees and scooped the limp changeling up, shaking her.  "Why, Elma?  Why?"  The mare was already sobbing, her eyes tearing as she tilted the shape-shifter's head to meet her misty gaze.  "Oh, blessed Spark!  What did I tell you?"  She hugged Elma close, rocking back and forth.  "Just because that's all your Mother fed you—"

	"What's happening?!" Eagle Eye sputtered.

	"Dammit, kid!" Josho hissed, his horn struggling to maintain luminescence.  "Concentrate!"

	"It's too late!" Zaid grunted as two undead yanked his pole towards them and coated it all over with purple muck.  "They're gonna break through!"

	Belle glanced up, muzzle quivering, as she held Elma close.  Before them, the energy field flashed, flashed again, and dissipated entirely.



	Razzar marched icily towards Pilate.  The naga stepped over the Sword of Solstice, his robed limbs outlined by patches of amber glow.  All around him, the purple muck from above dribbled, having followed the descending platform down the cylindrical shaft.  Soon, a veritable waterfall of ooze surrounded the three bodies.

	"I'm going to need you to give back what belongs to me," the Lounge leader said, extending a gloved hand towards the skystone on Pilate's back.  "I require it to pilot this city, for it belongs to me too."

	"Seriously, Razzar?"  Pilate gritted his teeth, all four hooves planted firmly in place as he glared up at the towering lizard.  "After all the purgatorial menaces that have broken loose... after all of the damnable calamities that you yourself have unleashed... you still think you can somehow salvage Stratopolis and make it work to your own ends?"

	"The only flaw here is ponies... ponies like you..." Yellow mist wafted out of the mask's mouth slits as he stood above Pilate.  "Ponies who dared pollute my plans with their weak frailties.  Still, it was my mistake for thinking I could ever have accomplished anything by cooperating with the likes of the equines stranded here.  When the Lounge's strength is finally bolstered with our domination of the Skystone fields, I'll be sure we never make that mistake again."

	"Look around you!" Pilate barked.  "This place is corrupt!  There's nothing to exploit!  The Sentinel destroyed the ancient pegasi who thought they could control it!  And it cost the lives of the brave Equestrians who later commandeered it!  This place is nothing but a death trap!  But you'd know that, wouldn't you?  For years, you've been sending ponies here to die under the changelings' watch!  Well, now it's your turn to be consumed by the curse!"

	Cl-Clakk!  Razzar thrusted a manarifle loose from under his left sleeve, aiming it at the zebra.  "Amusing that you would ask me to 'look around,' seeing as the only reason you have vision is because it was appropriated through a traitor who boldly infiltrated my ranks."  The barrel of the weapon glowed a threatening yellow.  "Betrayal is a weak tactic, and it is the Lounge's prime task to put down the weak and the frail.  Starting with you—"

	"Hnnngh!"  Rainbow Dash flew up from behind and slammed two bloodied forelimbs across the back of his skull.

	"Aaaaugh!"  Razzar stumbled forward, firing randomly.

	The mana blast ricocheted off the platform between Pilate's legs, making him gasp.

	Rainbow followed her initial blow with a two-legged buck against the naga's spine.  As he collapsed, she hovered above him and spat, "Wow!  An idiot—and—the memory of a goldfish!  That's two for two, ya melon f—"

	"Hrrrrrrrr—"  Razzar contorted his back, spun about, and leapt at her—legs spread—like a velociraptor.  "—RESSSSSH!"

	"Gaah!" Rainbow grunted as she was slammed to the metal floor beneath his thrashing weight.  "Okay!" She sputtered, curling her forelimbs to block his many-many jabs and punches.  "Mutant goldfish!  Mutant goldfish!"

	Razzar left hand raised high, and several claws ripped loose from the glove, ready to swipe across her muzzle.

	"Rrrrgh!" Pilate charged up from behind and swung the sparkling rod in his teeth.

	Razzar took the blow to the back of the head, jolting.

	With a grunt, Rainbow bucked him off, curled her body, and launched forward with wings spread.  She speared the naga in the chest, and the two went sprawling across the descending platform.  Their bodies reflected in the sheen of the purple ooze curtaining all around them.  At last, Razzar got the upper hand, wriggling around to Rainbow's and shoving his knuckles against the back of her skull, forcing her muzzle closer and closer to the deathly dribble of ooze.

	Rainbow's nostrils flared and flared as she shut one eye and fought the pressure to her cranium.  Inch by inch, her chin approached the purple waterfall.  She could smell the stench of decay and rust.  One of many eyeballs slid down, reflecting Razzar's body pressed to her spine.  She spotted his chest completely unguarded.

	Holding her breath, Rainbow spread her wings straight out, slapping both edges of Razzar's ripcage.  The naga winced heavily from the blow, his grip slipping.  Rainbow snaked her tail around one ankle, yanked, and slammed her elbow back into his mask as Razzar fell.  Finally freed, she flapped her wings and pulled herself away from the deadly muck, backflipping to the center of the platform where the Sword of Solstice lay.

	Without wasting a breath, Razzar charged towards her on all fours, hissing the whole way.

	Rainbow slapped a hoof over the sword's hilt, propelling it up into the air so she could grip it in her teeth.  Immediately, she swung at Razzar with a horizontal swipe.

	The naga ducked the burning slash.  All around him, a half-circle of falling ooze immediately dissolved from the golden blade's heat.  A larger round chamber could be seen, with four pedestals located at equidistant cardinal locations.

	Pilate gasped.  "The control room!"  He jerked his gaze back on the fight.

	Razzar leapt at Rainbow Dash in a vicious pounce.

	Frowning, Pilate twirled and flung his staff at the lizard at full force.  "Neuugh!"

	The bludgeon struck Razzar dead in the chest, making him collapse just two feet before he could have impacted Rainbow Dash.

	With a voice-cracking yelp, Rainbow viciously uppercutted with the sword, setting the entire room ablaze with fire and dissolving the ooze once again.

	CRACKKK!  Razzar's mask shattered up the center while a red mist billowed at the tip of the sword's blaze.  "Hrllghghklkkkttt!" He limped aside, clutching his skull.  With a furious hiss, he flung both arms forward, exposing no less than four mana blasters under each sleeve.  POW!  POW!  POW!  POW!  POW!

	Rainbow held her breath and dove backwards, holding the Sword of Solstice lengthwise before her.  At least a dozen shots deflected off the billowing blade, knocking her back into Pilate.  Both pegasus and zebra went tumbling off the puddle-soaked platform and onto the floor of the control room beyond.  At last, the elevator hissed to a stop in front of them, along with Razzar's limping, steam-spilling figure.

	"Mmmmfff!"  Pilate was the first to sit up, panting.  "Rainbow..."  He gulped.  "We're..."

	"I know..."  Rainbow nodded.  "Quick!" she breathlessly exclaimed.  "Find which one of these is the north pedestal and place the skystone on it!"

	"Right!"  Pilate stripped the skystone shard from his back and glanced between the four structures.  "Perhaps there's a rune that will designate which is which—"
	
	POW!  An amber energy blast deflected the skystone shard from his grasp.

	The zebra gasped, watching as the yellow chunk of glowing crystal slid off towards the far end of the room.  He and Rainbow glanced at the center of the room.

	Razzar limped down from the elevator platform, aiming his many smoking blasters.  His silver mask clung to his skull in tatters.  After a sputtering breath, he pulled at the triggers to his weapons again.  Zhht!  Zh-Zhht!  They fizzled out, refusing to fire anymore.  The amber glow of his suit faded with an ineffectual groaning noise.  He stood in place, growling and heaving.

	Slowly, Rainbow Dash stood up alongside Pilate.  "It's over, Razzar," she murmured, stealthily reaching a hoof over to the Sword of Solstice.  "You may have had a posse of badflank bounty hunters on your side, a slick black ship straight out of fantasy books, and a lot of sick glowy stuff... but none of that changes the fact that you're the most pathetic jobber who's ever existed."

	"Yes!"  Pilate sneered, lunging his head forward.  "And you reek!"

	"Pilate, I've got this," Rainbow muttered aside.  "Besides, you already had your chance at a monologue."

	"S-sorry..."

	"Over...?"  Razzar shook and quivered.  "Hckkkt... it is not overrrr..."  He pulled at his sleeves, cloak, and garments.  Shred by shred, he ripped them off his body with raking claws.  A multitude of nefarious concealed weapons fell to the floor, along with his bulky jetpack.  "Quezaat forgive me... but to dispense with your weak flesh, I must commit the sin of bearing my own... hckkkkt..."

	At last, he pulled at the fragments of his mask—a very slow gesture.  Steam billowed loose from a dozen places, and when it cleared, the two ponies could see an elongated snout rimmed with razor sharp crocodile teeth that surrounded a lashing tongue.

	"Hyeeuuuuuuuuhhhh..."  Razzar dropped the mask from two webbed hands fitted with two-inch long claws.  With an inward trilling—like a cat purr—the reptile stood up straight, his rust-brown body silhouetted against a fresh curtain of purple ooze dribbling down the central elevator shaft behind him.  He tilted his head back, eyes shut, as he inhaled deeply.  A long tail thrashed behind him, then finally relaxed.  Seconds later, two yellow eyeslits opened, and he tilted his snout to glare at the pair.

	"Rainbow, I can't see well enough..."  Pilate gulped.  "But is he—?"

	"Yup."  Rainbow nodded.  "Pretty motherbucking ugly."

	As if on cue, the naga's eyes widened.  Sharp spines arced along the path of his vertebra as he flexed his arms and lunged his head forward.  A wide, copper-colored frill flared around Razzar's neck as he roared with bestial fury.  "HRESSSSS-SHHHHHAAAAA!"

	Rainbow grimaced lethargically.  "Look, I love a good boss battle as much as the next pony, but—for realsies..."  That said, she flung the Sword of Solstice down at full force.  "Haaaaaaugh!"

	FLASSSH!  A burning wave of golden energy slammed into Razzar, shoving his naked body back into the evaporating slime.

	Pilate actually blinked under his helm.

	Rainbow turned towards him, exhaling sweatily.  "Right, so about that skystone—"

	"HRESSSSH!"  A thoroughly scalded Razzar plowed into her from the center of the room.

	"Luna poop!" Rainbow sputtered from under his weight.

	Pilate gasped, tilting his head towards where the two tumbled off and wrestled.

	"Nnnngh!"  Rainbow bucked Razzar's ravenous body off her and picked herself up with the Sword of Solstice, parrying his next attack.  "Cyberzebra!" she shouted over her shoulder.  "The skystone!"

	"R-right!"  Pilate galloped over to the glowing crystal, nervously picked it up, and ran from one pedestal to the other.  "Which one is north, which one is n-north?" he rambled beneath the clamor of the two combatants in the background.



	"It's collapsed!" Josho shouted, swinging his shotgun out so that it levitated at his side.  He fired one shot, only to splatter purple ooze across a quarter of the forward Observation Room.  He cursed under his teeth, backtrotting from the advancing undead.  "Run to the top deck!  We gotta abandon ship!"

	"Floydien would rather die than give up his precious 'Nancy!'" Zaid sputtered.

	"Not a club the rest of you should join!" Josho shouted.  "Now get moving!"

	"Not without you!" Eagle hollered, almost sobbing.  He tugged and tugged on Josho's tail.  "Come on!  Let's go!"

	"No!  I'm holding the fort!"

	"But—"

	"Dammit, go!"  Josho snarled over his shoulder.  "And grab your coltfriend while you're at it!"  He marched fearlessly towards the monsters.  "How many times do I have to tell you ponies—I've friggin' lived my life!"

	"Stop!" Eagle lunged, teary-eyed.  "Come back!"  He jerked in place, flailing.

	Zaid held Eagle from behind, dragging him back to the doorframe.  "Belle!  We gotta make like the wind and break, girl!"

	"You've got Eagle, and I've got Elma!"  Belle exclaimed, clutching the changeling to her chest.  "Who has Kera?"

	"Uhhhh..."

	Belle's eyes twitched.  She looked down at the metal floor beside Elma, and it was empty.  "Kera...?"  She looked up.

	A petite shadow slinked past Josho.  The old soldier saw it, and he did a grotesque double-take.

	"Kera!" Belle hollered.

	Josho lunged for her—but felt himself blown back by an unprecedented pulse of mana.

	Before everypony's eyes, the very much alive and very much awake filly marched two more steps forward, planted her hooves squarely against the floor, and lunged her head forward.  Rivulets of blue energy swam up her tattoos like reverse waterfalls.  They came to a focal point in her horn, surging outward in a white-hot explosion of unbridled magic.

	All the while, Kera's tiny face grotesquely contorted in a venemous expression.  Veins popped in her neck for a brief moment, then dissipated as the mother of all yells emanated from her throat—starting at first as a low siren, then bursting outward in a salvo of unmitigated rage and fury.  Everypony's ears popped, and even Josho flinched from the resulting echo as the entire bow of the Noble Jury shook.

	Then—like a chunk of the Sun thrown out of a cannon—a wall of merciless telekinesis hurled forward.  It not only swept the undead pegasi off their hooves and evaporated the purple stains, but it completely shattered the remaining metal frame of the shattered windows.  The pegasi's bodies were shred to ribbons among the resulting shrapnel, and the mess of debris and undead organs flew out into the winds of Stratopolis like a stream of calico vomit.



	"Bloody Hell!" Prowse gasped, wide-eyed.

	Seclorum clung to the back of the pilot's seat, for the Tarkington was inexplicably wobbling as if dealt an invisible blow.  "What in Ledo's toilet did that just now?!"

	Props slid her goggles up and blinked her teary eyes.  "Pizz fah wizz..."  She blinked again, and her muzzle slowly curved into a tender smile.  "Could... could it be...?"



	
	Staring out into the gaping hole of the Observation Room, Kera stood in place, panting and panting.  At last, she slumped down to her haunches, shivering internally.

	The rest of the ponies gawked in silence.  Slowly, Bellesmith laid Elma down and crawled forward—one pensive hoof after another.  "Kera...?"

	The filly's shoulders shook.

	Belle gulped.  "Kera, d-darling...?"

	The filly turned to look over her shoulder.  Her eyes were brimming with tears.  A muzzle quivered endlessly.

	Belle held a hoof over her mouth.  Sniffling, she gestured to the tiny pony.  "Kera, speak to me, honey..."

	Kera slowly shook her head.  At last, something came out of her, dry as a bone.  "So cold... so v-very cold," she mewled.  "All I can see is... is his eye..."  She curled her forelimbs against her scrunching his face.  "Cold and pale... like a second moon..."

	Belle slowly shuffled towards her, eyes glued to the filly's face.

	"I'm so lame... so fr-friggin' pathetic..."  Kera whimpered, starting to dry-heave as she collapsed to her side.  "Wanted t-to scream so h-hard... f-for so long..."  She gnashed at her teeth, her eyes streaming as she squealed, "Wh-why couldn't I do that to h-him?!"  She gripped her skull and growled, "I hate him I hate him I hate him I hate him..."

	"Kera, darling..."  Belle scooped the child up.  "There was nothing you could have done.  There was nothing any of us could have done..."

	"He made me see so many th-things... killed so m-many ponies... all b-because of me..."

	"No... No!"  Belle hissed, holding her close.  "It was nothing you did!  It was all him, Kera.  It's not your fault.  It was never your fault!"

	"I just... gnnngh... j-just..."  She writhed and writhed in Belle's grasp, her eyes clenched shut to the bleeding point.  "I can't... I c-can't..."  She squeaked.  "Going to explode..."

	"Let it out, darling..."  Belle stroked Kera's bangs and spoke nose to nose.  "Release it, Kera.  The worse thing you can do..."  She gulped and shuddered.  "The worse thing any of us can do is hold it in."

	Kera shuddered at first, then shook in tiny little spasms.  At last, she buried her head into Belle's shoulder—which was a good thing—for the resulting wail would otherwise have deafened them both.  She clung to Belle's coat like a vice, howling in undulating waves.

	Belle sobbed, tears streaming from her face as she rocked Kera's body in her forelimbs.  "That's it, honey.  It's okay to cry.  It's okay to mourn.  Because, no matter how horrible things have been, we're alive now.  We're alright, and one way or another we're going to have to live with what's happened to us.  But you're not going to be alone, do you hear me?  We're going to be with you every step of the way.  We're never... ever going to abandon you.  We cherish you so much, Kera.  By the Spark, we love you so..."

	Kera's body shuddered, shook, and then shifted.  She lifted a tear-stained face, staring wearily at Belle.  "M... M-Mommy...?"

	Belle gulped and nodded.  "Yes...?"

	Kera's lips quivered.  "Is... is Daddy alright too?"

	Belle fell silent.

	Kera nuzzled Belle's shoulder.  "I want to see Daddy again..."

	In a bursting breath, Belle's face melted.  She kissed the top of Kera's green mane and rocked the filly in her arms.  "You will.  I promise you."  She sniffled and broke into a sobbing smile.  "We will both see Daddy again."  She closed her eyes and sniffled.  "We will..."

	All the while, Josho was scratching his mane.  With a nervous smile, he glanced aside at t